<BODY DOCID=10>
Computer Terminal Systems Inc said
it has completed the sale of 200,000 shares of its common
stock, and warrants to acquire an additional one mln shares, to
&lt;Sedio N.V.> of Lugano, Switzerland for 50,000 dlrs.
    The company said the warrants are exercisable for five
years at a purchase price of .125 dlrs per share.
    Computer Terminal said Sedio also has the right to buy
additional shares and increase its total holdings up to 40 pct
of the Computer Terminal's outstanding common stock under
certain circumstances involving change of control at the
company.
    The company said if the conditions occur the warrants would
be exercisable at a price equal to 75 pct of its common stock's
market price at the time, not to exceed 1.50 dlrs per share.
    Computer Terminal also said it sold the technolgy rights to
its Dot Matrix impact technology, including any future
improvements, to &lt;Woodco Inc> of Houston, Tex. for 200,000
dlrs. But, it said it would continue to be the exclusive
worldwide licensee of the technology for Woodco.
    The company said the moves were part of its reorganization
plan and would help pay current operation costs and ensure
product delivery.
    Computer Terminal makes computer generated labels, forms,
tags and ticket printers and terminals.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12>
Ohio Mattress Co said its first
quarter, ending February 28, profits may be below the 2.4 mln
dlrs, or 15 cts a share, earned in the first quarter of fiscal
1986.
    The company said any decline would be due to expenses
related to the acquisitions in the middle of the current
quarter of seven licensees of Sealy Inc, as well as 82 pct of
the outstanding capital stock of Sealy.
    Because of these acquisitions, it said, first quarter sales
will be substantially higher than last year's 67.1 mln dlrs.
    Noting that it typically reports first quarter results in
late march, said the report is likely to be issued in early
April this year.
    It said the delay is due to administrative considerations,
including conducting appraisals, in connection with the
acquisitions.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=44>
McLean Industries Inc's United
States Lines Inc subsidiary said it has agreed in principle to
transfer its South American service by arranging for the
transfer of certain charters and assets to &lt;Crowley Mariotime
Corp>'s American Transport Lines Inc subsidiary.
    U.S. Lines said negotiations on the contract are expected
to be completed within the next week. Terms and conditions of
the contract would be subject to approval of various regulatory
bodies, including the U.S. Bankruptcy Court.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=45>
ChemLawn Corp &lt;CHEM> could attract a
higher bid than the 27 dlrs per share offered by Waste
Management Inc &lt;WNX>, Wall Street arbitrageurs said.
    Shares of ChemLawn shot up 11-5/8 to 29-3/8 in
over-the-counter- trading with 3.8 mln of the company's 10.1
mln shares changing hands by late afternoon.
    "This company could go for 10 times cash flow or 30 dlrs,
maybe 32 dollars depending on whether there is a competing
bidder," an arbitrageur said. Waste Management's tender offer,
announced before the opening today, expires March 25.
    "This is totally by surprise," said Debra Strohmaier, a
ChemLawn spokeswoman. The company's board held a regularly
scheduled meeting today and was discussing the Waste Management
announcement. She said a statement was expected but it was not
certain when it would be ready. 
    She was unable to say if there had been any prior contact
between Waste Management and ChemLawn officials.
    "I think they will resist it," said Elliott Schlang,
analyst at Prescott, Ball and Turben Inc. "Any company that
doesn't like a surprise attack would."
    Arbitrageurs pointed out it is difficult to resist tender
offers for any and all shares for cash. Schlang said ChemLawn
could try to find a white knight if does not want to be
acquired by Waste Management.
    Analyst Rosemarie Morbelli of Ingalls and Snyder said
ServiceMaster Companies L.P. &lt;SVM> or Rollins Inc &lt;ROL> were
examples of companies that could be interested.
    ChemLawn, with about two mln customers, is the largest U.S.
company involved in application of fertilizers, pesticides and
herbicides on lawns. Waste Management is involved in removal of
wastes.
    Schlang said ChemLawn's customer base could be valuable to
another company that wants to capitalize on a strong
residential and commercial distribution system.
    Both Schlang and Morbelli noted that high growth rates had
catapulted ChemLawn's share price into the mid-30's in 1983 but
the stock languished as the rate of growth slowed.
    Schlang said the company's profits are concentrated in the
fourth quarter. In 1986 ChemLawn earned 1.19 dlrs per share for
the full year, and 2.58 dlrs in the fourth quarter.
    Morbelli noted ChemLawn competes with thousands of
individual entrepreuers who offer lawn and garden care sevice.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=68>
CoFAB Inc said it acquired &lt;Gulfex Inc>,
a Houston-based fabricator of custom high-pressure process
vessels for the energy and petrochemical industries.
    CoFAB said its group of companies manufacture specialized
cooling and lubricating systems for the oil and gas,
petrochemical, utility, pulp and paper and marine industries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=96>
A group of affiliated New York
investment firms said they lowered their stake in Cyclops Corp
to 260,500 shares, or 6.4 pct of the total outstanding common
stock, from 370,500 shares, or 9.2 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group, led by Mutual Shares Corp, said it sold 110,000
Cyclops common shares on Feb 17 and 19 for 10.0 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=110>
American Express Co remained silent on
market rumors it would spinoff all or part of its Shearson
Lehman Brothers Inc, but some analysts said the company may be
considering such a move because it is unhappy with the market
value of its stock.
    American Express stock got a lift from the rumor, as the
market calculated a partially public Shearson may command a
good market value, thereby boosting the total value of American
Express. The rumor also was accompanied by talk the financial
services firm would split its stock and boost its dividend.
    American Express closed on the New York Stock Exchange at
72-5/8, up 4-1/8 on heavy volume.
    American Express would not comment on the rumors or its
stock activity.
    Analysts said comments by the company at an analysts'
meeting Tuesday helped fuel the rumors as did an announcement
yesterday of management changes.
    At the meeting, company officials said American Express
stock is undervalued and does not fully reflect the performance
of Shearson, according to analysts.
    Yesterday, Shearson said it was elevating its chief
operating officer, Jeffery Lane, to the added position of
president, which had been vacant. It also created four new
positions for chairmen of its operating divisions.
    Analysts speculated a partial spinoff would make most
sense, contrary to one variation on market rumors of a total
spinoff.
    Some analysts, however, disagreed that any spinoff of
Shearson would be good since it is a strong profit center for
American Express, contributing about 20 pct of earnings last
year.
    "I think it is highly unlikely that American Express is
going to sell shearson," said Perrin Long of Lipper Analytical.
He questioned what would be a better investment than "a very
profitable securities firm."
    Several analysts said American Express is not in need of
cash, which might be the only reason to sell a part of a strong
asset.
    But others believe the company could very well of
considered the option of spinning out part of Shearson, and one
rumor suggests selling about 20 pct of it in the market.
    Larry Eckenfelder of Prudential-Bache Securities said he
believes American Express could have considered a partial
spinoff in the past.
    "Shearson being as profitable as it is would have fetched a
big premium in the market place. Shearson's book value is in
the 1.4 mln dlr range. Shearson in the market place would
probably be worth three to 3.5 bilion dlrs in terms of market
capitalization," said Eckenfelder.
    Some analysts said American Express could use capital since
it plans to expand globally.
    "They have enormous internal growth plans that takes
capital. You want your stock to reflect realistic valuations to
enhance your ability to make all kinds of endeavors down the
road," said E.F. Hutton Group analyst Michael Lewis.
    "They've outlined the fact that they're investing heavily
in the future, which goes heavily into the international
arena," said Lewis. "...That does not preclude acquisitions and
divestitures along the way," he said.
    Lewis said if American Express reduced its exposure to the
brokerage business by selling part of shearson, its stock might
better reflect other assets, such as the travel related
services business.
    "It could find its true water mark with a lesser exposure
to brokerage. The value of the other components could command a
higher multiple because they constitute a higher percentage of
the total operating earnings of the company," he said.
     Lewis said Shearson contributed 316 mln in after-tax
operating earnings, up from about 200 mln dlrs in 1985.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=125>
Industrial Equity (Pacific) Ltd, a
Hong Kong investment firm, said it raised its stake in Wrather
Corp to 816,000 shares, or 11.3 pct of the total outstanding
common stock, from 453,300 shares, or 6.3 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Industrial Equity, which is principally owned by Brierley
Investments Ltd, a publicly held New Zealand company, said it
bought 362,700 Wrather common shares between Feb 13 and 24 for
6.6 mln dlrs.
    When it first disclosed its stake in Wrather earlier this
month, it said it bought the stock for investment purposes.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=128>
Liebert Corp said its shareholders
approved the merger of a wholly-owned subsidiary of Emerson
Electric Co &lt;EMR>.
    Under the terms of the merger, each Liebert shareholder
will receive .3322 shares of Emerson stock for each Liebert
share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=134>
Gulf Applied Technologies Inc said it
sold its subsidiaries engaged in pipeline and terminal
operations for 12.2 mln dlrs.
    The company said the sale is subject to certain post
closing adjustments, which it did not explain.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=135>
A group of affiliated Miami-based
investment firms led by Fundamental Management Corp said it
raised its stake in Robeson Industries Corp to 238,000 shares,
or 14.6 pct of the total, from 205,000 or 12.8 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group said it bought 32,800 Robeson common shares between
Jan 26 and Feb 9 for 175,691 dlrs.
    The group said it may buy more shares and plans to study
Robeson's operations. Afterwards it may recommend that
management make changes in its operations. Fundamental
Management Chairman Carl Singer was recently elected to the
Robeson board.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=153>
A senior official of Drexel Burnham
Lambert Inc and his father told the Securities and Exchange
Commission they have acquired 258,591 shares of Epsilon Data
Management Inc, or 9.4 pct of the total outstanding.
    Kenneth Thomas, senior vice president-investments at
Drexel's Los Angeles office, and his father, retired university
professor C.A. Thomas, said they bought the stake for 2.1 mln
dlrs primarily for investment purposes.
    They said they may buy more stock or sell some or all of
their stake, depending on market conditions, but have no plans
to seek control of the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=157>
Nova, the Canadian company that
owns 56 pct of Husky Oil Ltd, said it received government
approval for a transaction under which &lt;Union Faith Canada
Holding Ltd> would buy a 43 pct stake in Husky.
    Nova said the Minister of Regional and Industrial
Expansion, Michel Cote, ruled that Union Faith's purchase of
the Husky stake would not result in Husky ceding control to a
non-Canadian company. It said this ruling was a key condition
in completing the deal.
    Union Faith is equally owned by &lt;Hutchison Whampoa Ltd> and
&lt;Hong Kong Electric Holdings Ltd>.
    Under the agreement with Union Faith, Husky will become a
private company with Union Faith and Nova each holding 43 pct
of its stock.
    Nine pct of Husky would be owned by relatives of Li
Ka-Shing, chairman of Hutchison, and five pct by the Canadian
Imperial Bank of Commerice.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=162>
Suffield Financial Corp said the
Federal Reserve Board approved its application to acquire
Coastal Bancorp &lt;CSBK>, Portland, Me.
    Suffield said it still needs the approval of the
superintendent of Maine's banking department.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=185>
&lt;Versatile Corp> said
it agreed in principle to sell its Alberta-based Versatile
Noble Cultivators Co division to Vicon Inc, of Ontario, for
undisclosed terms.
    The division manufactures tillage and spraying equipment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=186>
(Groupe Videotron Ltd) said it agreed to
buy 50 pct of (Groupe Promexpo Inc), a company which
specializes in product exhibits, for three mln dlrs.           
  
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=199>
Circuit Systems Inc said it has
bought all of the stock of (Ionic Industries Inc) in exchange
for 3,677,272 shares of its common.
    Following the exchange there will be 4,969,643 shares of
Circuit Systems stock outstanding. Ionic holders will own about
74 pct of the outstanding stock of Circuit Systems, it said.
    Ionic, a maker of circuit boards, had revenues of 8.4 mln
dlrs and pretax profits of 232,000 dlrs in 1986, up from
revenues of 5.9 mln and pretax profits of 204,000 dlrs in 1985,
Circuit Systems said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=260>
Toshin Steel Co Ltd &lt;TOSS.T> and &lt;Azuma
Steel Co Ltd>, affiliates of Nippon Kokan KK &lt;NKKT.T>, are
considering a merger, company spokesmen said.
    Toshin Steel, owned 41.9 pct by Nippon Kokan, and Azuma
Steel, owned 41.3 pct by Nippon Kokan, are expected to decide
by the end of March, they said. Both firms have been struggling
with losses caused by the recession in the steel industry and
the yen's appreciation.
    Azuma Steel's current losses are estimated at 3.1 billion
yen in the year ending March 31 against a 6.99 billion loss a
year earlier, a spokesman said. The firm employs 1,100 workers
    Toshin Steel, with 1,700 workers, has given no forecast for
the year ending March 31.
    But industry sources said they expected the company to show
current losses of about five billion yen or more in 1986/87
compared with a 2.98 billion loss in 1985/86.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=302>
Sweden's Wallenberg group fought back
a bid by the London-based Swedish financier Erik Penser to
secure a large stake in Swedish Match &lt;SMBS ST>, one of the
companies at the core of their business empire.
    A statement issued by the Wallenberg holding companies AB
Investor and Forvaltnings AB Providentia said they had taken
over an option held by Nobel Industrier Sweden AB to acquire 33
pct of the voting rights in Swedish Match.
    Thre Wallenbergs paid Nobel Industrier &lt;NOBL ST>, in which
Penser group has a 72 pct stake, about 20 pct over the market
price for the Swedish Match option, the statement said.
    Swedish Match's B shares open to foreign buyers closed at
424 crowns on Friday. The A shares -- with increased voting
rights -- closed at 450 crowns for the restricted and 455 for
the free shares.
    The statement said the deal increased Investor's stake to
49.4 pct of the voting rights and 14.8 pct of the share capital
while Providentia is left holding 34.1 pct of the voting rights
and 14.5 pct of the share capital in Swedish Match.
    The Wallenbergs' stake in Swedish Match had previously
amounted to 52 pct of the voting rights in the company.
    The Swedish Match deal will cost the Wallenbergs about 400
mln crowns, share analysts said, making it one of the most
expensise moves the group has undertaken in the last four years
to defend its far-flung interests from outside predators.
    The Wallenbergs originally sold Nobel Industrier, an arms
and chemicals group, to Penser in 1984 to pay for buying Volvo
&lt;VOLV ST> out of two other key group companies, Atlas Copco
&lt;ASTS ST> and Stora Koppabergs &lt;SKPS ST>.
    Since then, the Wallenbergs were ousted as the largest
shareholders in SKF (SKFR ST> by Skanska AB &lt;SKBS ST> and
Frederik Lundberg wrested control of Incentive AB from them.
    Lundberg, a Zurich-based Swedish property tycoon, also
managed to acquire a 25 pct stake in another Wallenberg
company, the diary equipment firm Alfa -Laval AB &lt;ALFS ST>.
    During 1986, the Wallenbergs have been concentrating on
building up their stake in Investor and Providentia to prevent
any raid on the heart of their business empire.
    But analysts say the Wallenbergs' position in the
electrical engineering firm ASEA AB &lt;ASEA ST> is also too small
at 12.6 pct of the voting rights and there has been growing
speculation that the group will be forced to sell off fringe
interests to protect its core activities.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=304>
&lt;SHV (United Kingdom) Holding Co Ltd>
said it was making a tender offer for up to 33 mln ordinary
shares in Imperial Continental Gas Association.&lt;ICGS.L>.
    It said in a statement the offer was on the basis of 700p
for each IC Gas ordinary and 252p for every one stg nominal of
IC Gas loan stock.
    SHV already holds 6.8 mln IC Gas ordinary stock units
representing around 4.9 pct of the current issued share
capital.
    Successful completion of the offer would increase SHV's
stake in IC Gas to 39.8 mln shares, representing around 27.9
pct of issued share capital, it said.
    The offer capitalises IC Gas at around one billion stg.
    It said it was tendering for both ordinary stock and loan
stock, which when fully converted, gave a total of 33 mln IC
Gas ordinary. It is making the tender offer through N.M.
Rothschilds.
    IC Gas said in a statement it noted the SHV tender offer
and the terms were being considered.
    It said a further statement would be made as soon as
possible.
 REUTER...
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=315>
&lt;Sale Tilney Plc> said it has purchased
80 pct of the ordinary share capital of &lt;B and R International
Inc.>, a U.S. Insurance broker, for 5.6 mln dlrs.
    Sale is paying 3.6 mln dlrs in cash on completion, with the
balance plus interest to be paid in equal instalments over the
next six years.
    B and R posted pretax profit of 855,000 dlrs in the year to
Dec 31, 1986 when it had net tangible assets of 563,000 dlrs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=331>
&lt;Exco International Plc>, a subsidiary of
British and Commonwealth Shipping Co Plc &lt;BCOM.L>, said it had
agreed in principle to buy an 80 pct stake in &lt;RMJ Holdings
Corp> for about 79 mln dlrs.
    Exco Chairman Richard Lacy told Reuters the acquisition was
being made from Bank of New York Co Inc &lt;BK.N>, which currently
holds a 50.1 pct, and from RMJ partners who hold the remainder.
    Bank of New York and the partners will retain about 10 pct
each and these stakes will be bought over the next six years.
    RMJ is the holding company of RMJ Securities, one of the
largest U.S. Government securities brokers.
    It is also involved in broking notes, obligations and other
instruments sponsored by U.S. Federal agencies.
    Lacy said Exco had been considering buying a U.S.
Government securities broker for the past four years and had
made an offer for RMJ when it was sold by Security Pacific Corp
&lt;SPC.N> in 1985. RMJ was then valued at about 50 mln dlrs.
    B and C managing director Peter Goldie said RMJ would be
bought at about the same multiple as Exco, suggesting net
income of around 16 mln dlrs.
    The company's earnings had not been hit by the halving of
brokerage fees some 14 months ago as volumes had since doubled.
    Lacy said that RMJ employed some 300 people, with 200 in
the brokerage business and about 70 in its &lt;SMS> unit, which
provided computer software for the financial services
community.
    RMJ Securities had offices in New York, where total market
turnover of U.S. Government securities was 110 billion dlrs a
day, and in London where it has 15 billion.
    It was also given permission last week to open an office in
Tokyo where total market turnover had lifted rapidly to about
five billion dlrs a day.
    The acquisition would contribute between five and 10 pct of
B and C's share earnings in 1987 on a proforma basis.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=334>
&lt;Coloroll Group Plc> said it has entered
into a conditional agreement to acquire the business and assets
of &lt;Wallco Inc> and related companies for 14.5 mln dlrs.
    Miami-based Wallco manufactures and distributes
wallcoverings and showed a pretax profit of 1.5 mln dlrs on
turnover of 37 mln in the year ending June 1986. The total U.S.
Market was estimated to be worth 840 mln dlrs in 1986, having
grown by 47 pct in the previous five years, Coloroll said.
    The combined sales and profit of the enlarged Coloroll U.S.
Business would be 67 mln and four mln dlrs respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=361>
Scientific Micro Systems Inc said it
has acquired Supermac Technology, a rapidly growing supplier of
enhancement products and disc drive subsystems for the Apple
personal computer market.
    Scientific Micro said it acquired all the common stock of
Supermac in exchange for 1.05 mln shares of its own common
stock. The stock closed at 5.50 dlrs bid on Friday.
    Supermac, a privately held firm based in Mountain View,
California, as is Scientific Micro, reported a net profit of
300,000 dlrs on revenue of 9.5 mln dlrs in fiscal 1986. It
expects its revenue to approximately double in 1987.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=362>
American Express Co, rumored to be
considering a spinoff of part of Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc,
said it is studying a range of options for its brokerage unit
that could improve Shearon's access to capital and help it meet
broadening international competition.
    In a joint statement, American Express and Shearson said
the actions under consideration are an integral part of
American Express' worldwide financial services strategy and
that the two companies have been having both internal and
external discussions on the matters.
    American Express said no decision has been reached on the
strategic options and that it and Shearson could ultimately
decide to follow growth plans already in place.
    Last week, rumors circulated on Wall Street that the
financial services giant was considering a spinoff of part of
Shearson and there was speculation it may be considering
selling a stake to a Japanese firm. Analysts said the
speculation also focused on American Express selling 20 pct of
the profitable brokerage firm to the public.
    There was some speculation that American Express had also
considered a total spinoff of Shearson, but the plan was
considered highly unlikely, analysts said.
     American Express said in the statement on Sunday that it
will not comment on rumors and speculation and a spokesman
would not go beyond the statement. The company also remained
silent last Thursday and Friday, as rumors drove American
Express stock up a total of 5-1/2 dlrs in two days to bring it
to a Friday close at 74.
     It said it issued the statement on Sunday because a
similar statement was being circulated to employees.
    Analysts have been divided on whether it makes sense for
American Express to give up a stake in the wholly-owned
brokerage, which improved its after-tax earnings by about 50
pct in the last year.
    Some analysts said American Express may consider spinning
off part of Shearson because it is concerned that its stock
price does not fully reflect the value of the brokerage firm.
     Shearson contributed 316 mln dlrs of American Express'
1.25 billion dlr net in 1986.
    American Express' ambitious plans for international growth
may be also enhanced by the added cash that spinning out part
of Shearson would bring. Analysts speculated that all of
Shearson would have a market value of about 3.5 billion dlrs.
    To some however, the need for added capital is puzzling.
"(American) Express is in a position where they can raise
capital if they need to," said Larry Eckenfelder of
Prudential-Bache Securities.
    Analysts said rumors were fed by the reorganization of
Shearson management Wednesday. Chief operating officer Jeffrey
Lane got the added, previously vacant, post of president.
     The reorganization also created four new positions for
chairmen of Shearson's operating divisions, a move analysts
speculated would allow Shearson to be a stand alone company.
     Analysts, contacted on Sunday said the statement does
little to clarify last week's market speculation. It does
confirm, however, that the financial services firm, which
unsuccessfully attempted to expand Shearson with a major
acquisition last year, is looking beyond its own walls for
growth and positioning in the global market competition.
    Late last year, Shearson's takeover offer to the E.F.
Hutton Group Inc was rejected by Hutton, and analysts said
there had been speculation that Shearson also was rebuffed when
it approached another major Wall Street brokerage.        
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=366>
Ropak Corp said it received
and accepted about 456,968 common shares and 527,035 Series A
convertible preferred shares of Buckhorn Inc at four dlrs and
5.75 dlrs each respectively in response to its tender offer
that expired Friday, and it now owns 34.4 pct of Buckhorn
voting power.
    The company had owned 63,000 common and 25,100 preferred
shares before starting the hostile tender.  Ropak said it is
borrowing the funds needed to buy the Buckhorn shares from its
bank lender and will not need to use any funds that another
bank had committed to provide under a margin loan.
    Ropak said it waived minimum acceptance requirements to buy
the shares and intends to evaluate a number of possible ways of
completing an acquisition of Buckhorn.  It said it hopes that
Buckhorn's board will reevaluate its position and enter into
meaningful negotiations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=369>
Penril Corp said it is seeking to
sell its Triplett Electrical Instrument Corp subsidiary in
Bluffton, Ohio, and Triplett's Alltest division in Hoffman
Estates, Ill., as part of a plan to concentrate on its three
profitable division and reduce its debt load.
    The company also said it is evaluating a plan to satisfy
its obligations under its 10-7/8 pct subordinated notes but
gave no details.  Interest on the notes is due today.
    Penril further said director Clifford L. Alexander Jr. has
resigned from the board.  It gave no reason.
    Penril said shareholders at the annual meeting approved the
limitation of directors' liability.   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=371>
Dale Burdett Inc said it
faces damages claims totalling about 420,000 dlrs from the
former owners of Burdett Publications Inc.
    The company said on February 20, 1986, its predecessor
Nolex Development Inc acquired Burdett Publications Inc in an
exchange of 17 mln common shares for all Burdett Publications
shares, but the transaction was not qualified with the
California Department of Corporations.
    As a result, it said, the former Burdett Publications
owners have a claim for damages against Dale Burdett as
successor to Nolex for one yuear starting January 21, 1987,
with the damages measured by the difference in values of shares
exchanged plus interest from February 20, 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=372>
New Jersey-based overnight messenger
Purolator Courier Corp said it has agreed to be acquired for
about 265 mln dlrs by a company formed by E.F. Hutton LBO Inc
and certain managers of Purolator's U.S. courier business.
    Analysts have said that Purolator has been for sale for
some time. Purolator announced earlier it was mulling a
takeover bid, but analysts wrongly predicted the offer was from
another courier company.
    Hutton LBO, a wholly owned subsidiary of E.F. Hutton Group
Inc, will be majority owner of the company.
    Hutton said the acquiring company, PC Acquisition Inc, is
paying 35 dlrs cash per share for 83 pct of Purolator's stock
in a tender offer to begin Thursday. The rest of the shares
will be purchased for securities and warrants to buy stock in a
subsidiary of PC Acquisition, containing Purolator's U.S.
courier operations.
    If all the shares of Purolator are tendered, shareholders
would receive for each share 29 dlrs cash, six dlrs in
debentures, and a warrant to buy shares in a subsidiary of PC
Acquisition containing the U.S. courier operations.
    Hutton said in the merger shareholders would get 46 mln
dlrs aggregate amount of guaranteed debentures due 2002 of PC
Acquisition and warrants to buy 15 pct of the common stock of
the PC courier subsidiary. Hutton said the company has valued
the warrants at two to three dlrs per share.
    Purolator's stock price closed at 35.125 dlrs on Friday.
While some analysts estimated the company was worth in the mid
30s, at least one said it would be worth 38 to 42 dlrs.
    This follows sales of two other Purolator units. It agreed
recently to sell its Canadian Courier unit to Onex Capital for
170 mln dlrs, and previously sold its auto filters business.
    Purolator retains its Stant division, which makes closure
caps for radiators and gas tanks. A Hutton spokesman said the
firm is reviewing its options on Stant.
    Purolator's courier business has been lagging that of its
U.S. rivals because of the high price it paid in the past
several years to add air delivery to its ground fleet.
    E.F. Hutton will provide 279 mln dlrs of its funds to
complete the transaction. This so-called "bridge" financing
will be replaced later with long-term debt most likely in the
form of bank loans, Hutton said. Hutton LBO is committed to
keeping the courier business, its president Warren Idsal said.
    "Purolator lost 120 mln dlrs over the last two years
largely due to U.S. courier operations, which we believe the
management is turning around. We belive it will be a very
serious competitor in the future," said Idsal.
    William Taggart, chief executive officer of U.S. Courier
division, will be chief executive officer of the new company.
    The tender offer will be conditioned on a minimum of two
thirds of the common stock being tendered and not withdrawn to
the expiration of the offer as well as certain other conditions.
    The offer will begin Thursday, subject to clearances from
the staff of the Interstate Commerce Commission and will expire
20 business days after commencement unless extended.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=376>
Financial Corp of Santa
Barbara said it has signed a definitive agreement to purchase
Stanwell Financial, the lending operations unit of mortgage
banking company &lt;Stanwell Mortgage>, for undisclosed terms.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=379>
&lt;Four Seasons Hotels> said it and &lt;VMS
Realty Partners> of Chicago have agreed to purchase the Santa
Barbara Biltmore Hotel from Marriott Corp for an undisclosed
amount.
    It said the venture will rename the hotel the Four Seasons
Biltmore at Santa Barbara and invest over 13 mln dlrs in
improvements on the 228-room property.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=387>
Investor David F. La Roche of North
Kingstown, R.I., said he is offering to purchase 170,000 common
shares of NECO Enterprises Inc at 26 dlrs each.
    He said the successful completion of the offer, plus shares
he already owns, would give him 50.5 pct of NECO's 962,016
common shares.
    La Roche said he may buy more, and possible all NECO
shares. He said the offer and withdrawal rights will expire at
1630 EST/2130 gmt, March 30, 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=389>
&lt;Senior Engineering Group Plc> said it
reached agreement with &lt;Cronus Industries Inc> to acquire the
whole share capital of &lt;South Western Engineering Co> for 12.5
mln dlrs cash. This sum is being financed by a term loan.
    South Western is one of the U.S.'s leading manufacturers of
heat transfer equipment, with a turnover of 54.86 mln dlrs and
pre-tax profits of 1.72 mln in 1986.
    Completion of the deal is conditional on approval under
U.S. Hart-Scott-Rodino regulations which is expected within 30
days. Some 350,000 dlrs is payable immediately, 12 mln dlrs
payable on completion with the balance due by June 30, 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=393>
Viacom International Inc said it
received revised merger offers from &lt;National Amusements Inc>
and &lt;MCV Holdings Inc>.
    The company said the special committee plans to meet later
today to review both offers.
    Viacom said National Amusements' Arsenal Holdings Inc
raised the value of its offer for the Viacom shares not held by
National Amusements in three areas. National Amusements holds
19.6 pct of Viacom's stock.
    The cash value of the offer was raised to 42.00 dlrs from
the 40.50 dlrs a Viacom share offered February 23 while the
value of the fraction of a share of exchangeable preferred
being offered was increased to 7.50 dlrs a share from six dlrs.
The interest rate to be used to increase the cash value of the
merger, if delayed beyond April 30, was raised to nine pct from
eight pct and 12 pct after May 31.
    A Viacom spokesman said the Arsenal Holdings's offer
continues to include a 20 pct interest in Arsenal for present
Viacom shareholders.
    Viacom said MCV Holdings, a group which includes the
company's senior management and the Equitable Life Assurance
Society of the United States, raised the value of its offer by
increasing the value of the preferred being offered to 8.50
dlrs from 8.00 dlrs a share and raising the ownership in the
new company to be held by present Viacom shareholders to 45 pct
from 25 pct. MCV called its previous offer, made February 26,
the "final" proposed revision of its agreement with Viacom.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=401>
&lt;Miller Tabak Hirsch and Co> said it
has received an accepted 3,424,729 common shares of Penn
Traffic Co in response to its 31.60 dlr per share tender offer
that expired Friday, and together with the 380,728 shares it
already owned, it now has about 91.8 pct of Penn Traffic.
    The company said Penn Traffic is expected to hold a special
shareholders' meeting later this month to approve a merger into
Miller Tabak at the tender price.
    It said two Miller Tabak representatives will be named to
the Penn Traffic board on March Four to serve as the only
directors with Penn Traffic president and chief executive
officer Guido Malacarne.
    The company said it received financing for the transaction
from First National Bank of Minneapolis and Salomon Inc &lt;SB>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=408>
Pittston Co said it has
tentatively agreed to acquire WTC International N.V. in a
tax-free exchange of stock.
    Pittston said it agreed to exchange 0.523 common share for
each of the about 8,612,000 WTC common shares outstanding.
    Pittston said WTC's three principal shareholders, who own
62 pct of its stock, are parties to this agreement. They have
granted Pittston the right of first refusal to their shares.
    WTC has granted Pittston an option to buy WTC shares equal
to 18.5 poct of its outstanding stock. The agreement is subject
to approval of both boards and WTC shareholders.
    Pittston said described WTC as a fast growing air freight
forwarding company with operations throughout the world. Its
revenues totaled nearly 200 mln dlrs in the year ended November
30 and for the quarter ended on that date it earned 1.3 mln
dlrs on revenues of 55.8 mln dlrs.
    Pittston said its Burlington Air Express subsidiary
generates about two-thirds of its 450 mln dlrs in annual
revenes with its domestic air freight services.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=424>
Diagnostic Retrieval Systems Inc
said it has made an offer to acquire, through a wholly owned
unit, all outstanding shares of Rospatch Corp's common stock
for 22 dlrs a share cash, or about 53 mln dlrs.
    DRS, a warfare systems producer, said it would make the
transaction through a cash tender offer for all, but not less
than 51 pct, of Rospatch's outstanding common stock followed by
a merger with Rospatch, a labels, high technology and wood
producer, at the same purchase price per share.
    DRS said the deal is subject to approval by the Rospatch
board, and the tender offer expires on March 6, 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=436>
The Japan Fund Inc said it has received
an unsolicited offer from &lt;Sterling Grace Capital Management
LP>, acting together with certain other persons and entities,
to purchase all the assets of the fund at five pct below its
aggregate net asset value.
    The Japan Find said tne deal is subject to obtaining
satisfactory financing and a due diligence review.
    It added that the proposal has been referred to its Board
of Directors for consideration.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=441>
Bank of New York Co said it and the
management of RMJ Securities Corp have agreed to sell 80 pct of
their interests in RMJ Holding Corp to &lt;British and
Commonwealth Holdings PLC> and Bank of New York expects to
realize a substantial gain on the transaction.
    RMJ Holding is the holding company for RMJ Securities, a
large broker of U.S. government securities and agency
obligations  Bank of New York owns a majority interest in RMJ
Holding and management of RMJ Securities the remainder.
    Bank of New York said the sale is expected to be completed
during the second quarter.
    It said it and RMJ Securities management will continue to
own 20 pct of RMJ Holding for now, but the agreement provides
for the sale of that remaining interest to British and
Commonwealth over the next six years.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=442>
Corning Glass Works said the
exchange ratio for its previously announced acquisition of
Hazleton Laboratories Corp has been established at 0.5165
Corning common share for each Hazleton common share.
    Corning said the prospectus regarding the merger is
expected to be mailed tomorrow to all Hazleton holders of
record February 18. Hazleton shareholders will vote on the
proposed merger at a special meeting on March 31.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=447>
Bally Manufacturing Corp said it
completed the acquisition of the Golden Nugget Casino Hotel in
Atlantic City, New Jersey from Golden Nugget Inc.
    Bally also acquired from Golden Nugget various parcels of
real estate in Atlantic City, it noted.
    The transaction included 140 mln dlrs in cash and stock and
the assumption of a 299 mln dlrs mortgage.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=448>
&lt;Consolidated TVX Mining Corp> said it
agreed to issue 7.8 mln treasury shares to acquire interests in
three gold mining companies in Brazil and an option to increase
the company's interest in a platinum property.
    The company said the transactions will bring immediate
production and earnings to Consolidated TVX, enhance its
precious metal potential and is expected to improve cash flow
and earnings on a per share basis. The company did not give
specific figures.
    Consolidated TVX said it will acquire 29 pct of CMP, a
public gold mining company in which TVX already holds a 15 pct
interest, making TVX the largest single shareholder.
    The company also agreed to acquire a 19 pct stake in Novo
Astro, a private company, and a 16 pct interest in Teles Pires
Mining, increasing the TVX's ownership to 51 pct.
    In addition, Consolidated TVX said it will acquire the
right to add a 10 pct interest to a platinum property in which
it already owns a 29.4 pct stake.
    CMP earned 11 mln Canadian dlrs in 1986 and expects to
produce 42,000 ounces of gold in 1987 at a cost of 160 U.S.
dlrs an ounce, Consolidated TVX said.
    Novo Astro operates Brazil's richest gold mine located in
Amapa State, with an average grade of 0.8 ounces of gold a ton
in a hardrock quartz vein, Consolidated TVX said. Mining of
eluvial surface material produced 25,000 ounces in 1986 and is
expected to produce 60,000 ounces in 1987.
    It also said Teles Pires Mining controls rights to a 350
kilometer section of the Teles Pires River, where one dredge is
expected to produce 10,000 ounces of gold in 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=467>
American Nursery Products Inc
said it purchased Miami-based Heinl's Nursery Inc, for
undisclosed terms.
    Heinl's Nursery has sales of about 4.5 mln dlrs and owns
100 acres, of which 75 are in shade houses and about 58,300
square feet cover greenhouses, shipping and office facilities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=473>
&lt;Multi-Step Products Inc>, earlier
reporting an initial six month loss, said it agreed to sell
wholly owned Multi-Step Manufacturing Inc for 100,000 dlrs
cash, subject to shareholder and regulatory approval.
    Multi-Step also said it will pay 900,000 dlrs to cancel
711,192 of its own shares, which will be acquired from Michael
Penhale and his benficiaries. Penhale will control and manage
Multi-Step Manufacturing, following the transactions.
    Multi-Step had a 739,146 dlr loss for the six months ended
December 31. The company received its initial public listing in
December.
    The company said its ladder-making unit has been losing
300,000 dlrs quarterly.
    The sale, expected to close in April, also calls for
retirement of the unit's 400,000 dlr bank debt, Multi-Step
said. The unit also has agreed to pay a debt of 400,000 dlrs to
Tarxien Company Ltd, which is 40 pct owned by Multi-Step.
    Multi-Step previously said it agreed to acquire the
remaining 60 pct of Tarxien it does not already own.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=474>
Esselte Business Systems Inc's
Esselte Meto division said it has acquired the Antonson America
Co, a subsidiary of &lt;Antonson Machines AB>, of Sweden.
    Esselte said the Antonson unit, based in LaPorte, Indiana,
manufactures scales and label printers. The company said the
purchase is part of a plan to increase the range of retail
electronic scales being offered by Esselte in the U.S.
    It said the acquisition will enble Esselte to increase its
distribution base in its effort to grow in the U.S.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=478>
&lt;Four Seasons Hotels Inc> and VMS Realty
Partners said they agreed to acquire the Santa Barbara Biltmore
Hotel in California from Marriott Corp, for undisclosed terms.
    Closing was expected by March 31, they added.
    The companies said they would jointly own the hotel and
rename it the Four Seasons Biltmore at Santa Barbara. They said
they would spend more than 13 mln U.S. dlrs "to enhance the
Biltmore's position as one of the finest resort hotels in North
America." Chicago-based VMS Realty is a real estate and
development firm.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=496>
Investor Sumner Redstone, who leads
one of the two groups vying for control of Viacom International
Inc, offered to sweeten his bid for the company by 1.50 dlrs a
share cash and 1.50 dlrs in securities.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Redstone, who controls Dedham, Mass.,-based National Amusements
Inc, a theater chain operator, offered to raise the cash
portion of its Viacom offer to 42 dlrs a share from 40.50 dlrs.
    Redstone also raised the face value of the preferred stock
he is offering to 7.50 dlrs from six dlrs.
    The Redstone offer, which is being made through Arsenal
Holdings Inc, a National Amusements subsidiary set up for that
purpose, which also give Viacom shareholders one-fifth of a
share of Arsenal common stock after the takeover.
    Viacom said earlier today it received revised takeover bids
from Redstone and MCV Holdings Inc, a group led by Viacom
management which is competing with Redstone for control of the
company and already has a formal merger agreement with Viacom.
    The company did not disclose the details of the revised
offers, but said a special committee of its board would review
them later today.
    The Redstone group, which has a 19.5 pct stake in Viacom,
and the management group, which has a 5.4 pct stake, have both
agreed not to buy more shares of the company until a merger is
completed, unless the purchases are part of a tender offer for
at least half of the outstanding stock.
    The two rivals also signed confidentiality agreements,
which give them access to Viacom's financial records provided
they keep the information secret.
    In his SEC filing, Redstone, who estimated his cost of
completing the takeover at 2.95 billion dlrs, said Bank of
America is confident it can raise 2.275 billion dlrs.
    Besides the financing it would raise through a bank
syndicate, Bank of America has also agreed to provide a
separate 25 mln dlr for the limited purpose of partial
financing and has committed to provide another 592 mln dlrs,
Redstone said.
    Merrill Lynch, Pierce Fenner and Smith Inc has increased
its underwriting commitment to 175 mln dlrs of subordinated
financing debt for the Viacom takeover, from the 150 mln dlrs
it agreed to underwrite earlier, Redstone said.
    Redstone said his group would contribute more than 475 mln
dlrs in equity toward the takeover.
    The Redstone equity contribution to the takeover would
consist of all of his group's 6,881,800 Viacom common shares
and at least 118 mln dlrs cash, he said.
    The new offer, the second sweetened deal Redstone has
proposed in his month-long bidding war with management, also
contains newly drawn up proposed merger documents, he said.
    Last week, the management group submitted what it called
its last offer for the company, valued at 3.1 mln dlrs and
consisting of 38.50 dlrs a share cash, preferred stock valued
at eight dlrs a share and equity in the new company. Redstone's
previous offer had been valued at 3.2 billion dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=497>
Montedison Spa &lt;MONI.MI> said it has
concluded its negotiations with Spanish pharmaceuticals company
&lt;Antibioticos SA>.
    A company spokesman told Reuters "We have concluded the
talks and we are now awaiting authorization from Spanish
authorities." He declined to comment further.
    Earlier today the Italian company postponed a scheduled
press conference on its talks with Antibioticos. An Italian
press report today said Montedison has agreed to acquire
Antibioticos for 500 billion lire.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=498>
UtiliCorp United Inc said it
completed the acquisition of West Virginia Power from Dominion
Resources for about 21 mln dlrs.
    The sale was approved by the West Virginia Public Service
Commission in January and became effective March one. West
Virginia's management will continue to be responsible for
operating the utility, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=504>
Union Carbide Corp is looking to
acquisitions and joint ventures to aid its chemicals and
plastics growth, according the H.W. Lichtenberger, president of
Chemicals and Plastics.
    Describing this as a major departure in the company's
approach to commercial development, he told the annual new
business forum of the Commercial Development Association "We
are looking to acquisitions and joint ventures when they look
like the fastest and most promising routes to the growth
markets we've identified."
    Not very long ago Union Carbide had the attitude "that if
we couldn't do it ourselves, it wasn't worth doing. Or, if it
was worth doing, we had to go it alone," Lichtenberger
explained.
    He said "there are times when exploiting a profitable
market is done best with a partner. Nor do we see any need to
plow resources into a technology we may not have if we can link
up profitably with someone who is already there."
    He said Carbide has extended its catalyst business that way
and is now extending its specialty chemicals business in the
same way.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=505>
Bank of America NT and SA's
&lt;BAC.N> West German branch said it is negotiating the sale of
Bankhaus Centrale Credit AG, a small local West German bank it
acquired in 1965, and of its West German Visa credit card
operation.
    Michael Seibel, Bank of America vice-president and regional
manager, said the negotiations were proceeding well. He
declined to give further details.
    Bank of America's West German branch lost some 32 mln marks
in 1985. The result includes profit and loss transfers from
Bankhaus Centrale Credit and the Visa organisation. The sale of
the units is part of the bank's worldwide restructuring plan.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=532>
Kapok Corp said it is in
techical default of its loans from Southeast Banking Corp &lt;STB>
and Murray Steinfeld but is negotiating with the lenders.
    It said neither has declared the loans due.
    The company said it has agreed to sell the Peter Pan
Restaurant in Urbana, Md., for 1,100,000 dlrs, or one mln dlrs
after the payment of expenses.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=545>
WEDGE Group Inc, a Houston investment
firm with a 5.5 pct stake in American Medical International
Inc, said it has had talks with Pesch and Co, which is seeking
control of the company.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
WEDGE, which is owned by Issam Fares, a Lebanese citizen living
in Switzerland, also said it discussed the possibility of
joining with others in its own bid to seek control of AMI.
    WEDGE stressed that it has no current plans to seek control
of AMI, but refused to rule out a takeover try in the future.
    WEDGE said it has had discussions with AMI management,
Pesch, the closely held health care and investment concern
controlled by Chicago physician LeRoy Pesch, and other AMI
shareholders.
    It did not specify in its SEC filing which issues --
selling its AMI stake or joining with others in a takeover try
-- were discussed with which group. But it said the talks did
not produce any agreements or understandings.
    WEDGE said it believes that "some form of restructuring of
AMI and its business would be highly desirable and appropriate
at this time."
    WEDGE, which holds 4.8 mln shares of AMI common stock, said
it plans to hold further talks with company management, Pesch
and other shareholders.
    Pesch last week sweetened his bid for the company to 22
dlrs a share in cash and securties, or 1.91 billion dlrs based
on AMI's total outstanding, from an all-cash 20 dlr a share
bid, which the company rejected.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=547>
Banner Industries Inc said 19.8 mln of
the outstanding 20 mln shares in Rexnord Inc were tendered
pursuant to its 26.25 dlr a share offer that closed at midnight
EST Feb 27.
    Together with the five mln Rexnard shares it already owns,
the company said it now holds a 97 pct stake in the company.
    It said the completion of the deal is subject to approval
by Rexnard holders and to other closing conditions. It expects
the deal to close in about 60 days.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=550>
Bank of America NT and SA's &lt;BAC.N>
West German branch said it is negotiating the sale of Bankhaus
Centrale Credit AG, a small local West German bank it acquired
in 1965, and of its West German Visa credit card operation.
    Michael Seibel, Bank of America vice-president and regional
manager, said the negotiations were proceeding well. He
declined to give further details.
    Bank of America's West German branch lost some 32 mln marks
in 1985. The result includes profit and loss transfers from
Bankhaus Centrale Credit and the Visa organisation. The sale of
the units is part of the bank's worldwide restructuring plan.
-- corrects year of loss in third paragraph in item which
originally ran February 27.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=551>
OSR Corp said it has agreed
to acquire the properties and assets of Telcom International
Group for 10.5 mln common shares, which would give former
Telcom owners an 84 pct interest in the combined company.
    Telcom is an international film and television distributor.
 The assets being acquired consist mostly of distribution
rights to films valued at over one mln dlrs, the company said.
    OSR said as part of the acquisition agreement is is
required to sell its 80 pct interest in Standard Knickerbocker
Ltd, which makes jeans in Canada.
    OSR said it expects to net about 150,000 dlrs on the sale
of Standard Knickerbocker.
    The company said both transactions are subject to approval
by shareholders at a meeting to be held in April or May, it
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=553>
Cronus Industries Inc said it agreed to
sell its heat transfer equipment business, Southwestern
Engineering Co, for a slight premium over book value, plus a
release of Cronus from liability on approximately three mln
dlrs of subsidiary indebtedness.
    The company said the sale to a subsidiary of Senior
Engineering Group PLC, a British company, will take place this
month.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=558>
Hoechst AG of West Germany said
it has completed the acquisition of Celanese Corp.
    Hoechst acquired a majority of Celanese shares in a recent
tender offer at 245 dlrs per common share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=559>
Americus Trust for American Home
Products Shares said it extended its deadline for accepting
tendered shares until November 26, an extension of nine months.
    The trust, which will accept up to 7.5 mln shares of
American Home Products &lt;AHP>, said it has already received
tenders for about four mln shares.
    The trust is managed by Alex. Brown and Sons Inc &lt;ABSB> and
was formed November 26, 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=679>
Privately-held Pantry Inc, which
operates 477 convenience stores in five Southeastern states,
said it has engaged Alex. Brown and Sons Inc &lt;ABSB> to explore
a possbile sale of the company.
    It said it expects to start talks with prospective
acquirers shortly. The company said it has been approached by a
number of parties in recent months.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=682>
Renouf Corp of New Zealand said it
has decided to proceed with its offer for all outstanding units
of Benequity Holdings at 31 dlrs per unit.
    The company had been required to redice by March Two
whether to proceed with the offer or terminate it, based on its
ability to obtain financing and on its review of Benequity
operations.  The offer is to expire March 13.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=703>
Convergent Technologies Inc
said it has reached an agreement in principle to buy Oakleaf
Corp, which supplies finance, insurance and leasing computers
to auto dealers.
    The transaction will involve an exchange of Oakleaf stock
for cash and debt and is subject to a definitive agreement, the
companys said. No other terms were disclosed.
    Oakleaf had 1986 sales of about 26 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=706>
Rospatch Corp said it will
have a news release later in response to today's acquisition
bid by Diagnostic Retrieval Systems Inc for 22 dlrs a share.
    Rospatch earlier requested its stock be halted in over the
counter trading, last trade 24-1/8.
    Diagnostic said its bid was for a total 53 mln dlrs through
a cash tender offer for all, but not less than 51 pct of
Rosptach outstanding common.
    For its fourth-quarter ended December 31, 1986, Rospatch
reported net loss 2,649,000 or 1.10 dlrs a share compared a
loss of 627,500 or 35 cts profit for the 1985 period.
    In December the Brookehill Group in New York said it had
9.7 pct stake. J.A. Parini, Rospatch chief executive, responded
on January eight by saying the investment was a vote in
confidence in the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=712>
North American Group Ltd's North
American Acquisition Corp said it has a definitive agreement to
buy 100 pct of Pioneer Business Group Inc of Atlanta.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed. Closing of the
acquisition is scheduled for April.
    North American Acquisition said the agreement is subject to
due diligence and a satisfactory review of Pioneer's operation.
Pioneer makes business forms.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=714>
A bidding war for Viacom International
Inc, one of the largest U.S. entertainment companies, pitted a
management group and other investors against National
Amusements Inc, a closely held theater operator.
    Both sides raised their bids over the weekend. A source
close to the management side insisted that timing was on his
side. He said if outside directors approve the management
proposal, a merger plan could be put to a vote of shareholders
with proxy material going out late this week. "It would take 20
days from the day we mail," said the source.
    The source predicted National Amusements, controlled by
investor Sumner Redstone, would need "half a year" to complete
a tender offer because of the regulatory approvals that must
accompany any change in control of Viacom's broadcast licenses
and cable television franchises.
    Redstone was not available for comment.
    Some of Wall Street's arbitrage players said it was a rare
situation that could only be enjoyed - a true bidding war. One
said Redstone could begin a tender offer whenever he wanted and
if enough people were convinced his proposal was superior to
the Viacom management plan, he would have a chance to win.
    The independent directors of Viacom were called into a
meeting today. Word on a decision was expected early tomorrow.
    Viacom shares climbed 2-1/2 to 50-3/8 by midafternoon. One
major Wall Street firm issued a sell recommendation. "We think
we're at the end now, in terms of bidding," said the firm's
arbitrageur, who spoke on condition he not be identified.
    Both Redstone's proposal and the management proposal would
create a restructured company heavily leveraged with debt. The
management plan would result in a balance sheet with about 2.5
billion dlrs in debt and nearly 500 mln dlrs in preferred
stock, convertible into 45 pct of the common stock.
    Redstone's newest proposal offers holders 42 dlrs in cash,
a fraction of a share of exchangeable preferred stock with a
value of 7.50 dlrs, and one-fifth of a share of common stock
stock of Arsenal Holdings, representing 20 pct of the equity
interest in the restructured Viacom. One arbitrageur calculated
the equity in the Redstone plan was worth 2.50 dlrs making the
total package worth 52 dlrs per share.
    Management offered 38.50 dlrs in cash, exchangeable
preferred stock worth 8.50 dlrs and a fractional share of
convertible preferred. The arbitrageur said the equity portion
was worth about 4.00 dlrs for a total of 51 dlrs.
    Redstone's newest plan raised the amount of interest he
would pay on the cash portion of his offer for every day beyond
April 30 that a merger with Arsenal is not consummated. The
plan calls for intest to be paid at an annual rate of nine pct
during May and 12 pct thereafter. Previously Redstone offered
eight pct interest.
    Other arbitrageurs said both Redstone and the management
group, led by president and chief executive Terrence Elkes,
were offering high prices. "Redstone really wants to own the
company," one said. Another said management seemed to have the
edge on the timing issue.
    Redstone's company owns 19.6 pct ov Viacom's 35 mln shares.
    A Wall Street analyst said it was hard to determine what
the equity in the newly leveraged company would be worth. He
noted as an example that new stock in FMC Corp &lt;FMC>, which
adopted a highly leveraged structure last year, inititally
traded at 12.50 dlrs per share, dipped to nine dlrs, and is now
just over 30 dlrs.
    Last week, Viacom reported fourth quarter earnings fell two
two cts per share from 23 cts. The company said interest costs
from several acquisitions affected results.
    Shares of Warner Communications Inc &lt;WCI> rose 7/8 to
31-1/8. Analysts noted Warner owns warrants to purchase 3.25
mln Viacom shares at 35 dlrs and another 1.25 mln shares at
37.50 dlrs.
    Chris Craft Industries &lt;CCN>, which owns a stake in Warner,
rose 1-1/4 to 22-3/4.
    Viacom was created in 1970 and spun off from CBS Inc &lt;CBS>.
The company has 940,000 cable television subscribers, operates
nine satellite television services and owns television and
radio stations. It is one of the largest distributors of films
and other programs for television.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=724>
&lt;Wavehill International Ventures Inc>
said it has agreed to acquire Personal Computer Rental Corp of
Coral Gables, Fla., in a transaction in which shareholders of
Personal Computer will receive shares respresenting about a 25
pct interest in the combined company.
    The company said it will have about two mln shares
outstanding on a fully-diluted basis after the transaction. It
said after the acquisition it will infuse Perconal computer
with cash for expansion.  It said Personal Computer now has 26
franchised locations and plans to add over 30 in 1987, seeking
eventually to expand into 420 markets in the U.S. and abroad.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=725>
Security Pacific Corp said it
completed its planned merger with Diablo Bank following the
approval of the comptroller of the currency.
    Security Pacific announced its intention to merge with
Diablo Bank, headquartered in Danville, Calif., in September
1986 as part of its plan to expand its retail network in
Northern California.
    Diablo has a bank offices in Danville, San Ramon and Alamo,
Calif., Security Pacific also said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=730>
Imperial Chemical Industries PLC, the
largest chemical company in the United Kingdom, will expand its
specialty chemicals and drug businesses this year, and better
its 1986 results, said chairman-elect Denys Henderson.
    "We expect to shift our company toward higher value-added
businesses and continue to broaden our base," Henderson told
reporters at an informal meeting here.
    ICI today announced the formation of a new U.S.
drug company, ICI Pharma, which, with its Stuart
Pharmaceuticals unit, it said will double its current
pharmaceutical sales to 1.1 billion dlrs by 1990.
    Henderson said, "Our pharmaceutical business gets lost in
the way that Glaxo's (Glaxo Holdings PLC) does not."
    ICI's pharmaceutical division is the second largest drug
maker behind Glaxo in the U.K. Last year U.S. drug sales were
about 40 pct of its worldwide drug sales of 1.5 billion dlrs,
which in turn brought in 27 pct of its total profits.
    He estimated that by 1990, ICI's pharmaceutical division
would account for about 30 pct of total company profits.
    "The drug division far and away brings in the highest rate
of return," said A.W. Clements, finance director of ICI, who
was also at the meeting.
    Henderson said the new U.S. drug concern would basically
act as a second sales force to double the exposure of its drugs
to doctors. ICI will hire 145 new salespeople by October one.
    Henderson said the major new products in the company's
pipeline, expected to each bring in sales of over 200 mln dlrs
annually, were Statil, a treatment for diabetic complications,
Zoladex, a treatment for advanced prostate cancer, and Carwin,
a treatment for mild to moderate congestive heart failure.
    Henderson said U.S. Food and Drug Administration approval
to market Statil and Zoladex, both under joint licensing
agreements with Merck and Co Inc &lt;MRK>, is not expected until
about 1989. ICI expects to file for permission to market Carwin
in the U.S. later this year.
    Henderson said the company's 1987 results would top 1986
income of 888 mln dlrs or 5.45 dlrs per ADR on sales of 15
billion dlrs, but he declined to specify by how much.
    Henderson said 1987's results would be boosted by Glidden
Paints, which ICI bought last November for 580 mln dlrs from a
unit of Hanson Industries Inc.
    Henderson also said that ICI has about nine billion dlrs
available for acquisitions. Last year the company made 40
acquisitions, the largest being Glidden. He said that more
acquisitions may be made this year but he ruled out an
acquisition of a pharmaceutical concern as "too expensive."
    Henderson said that in his new role of chairman, effective
April one when he takes over from Sir John Harvey-Jones who
will retire, the biggest challenge ahead lay in continuing the
earnings momentum ICI has established over the past few years
after restructuring and selling off unprofitable businesses.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=732>
Albertson's Inc said its board has
adopted a stockholder rights plan intended to protect them in
the event of any proposed takeover of the company.
    Under the plan, stockholders will receive a dividend
distribution of one right for each share of common stock held
on March 23.
    The rights are exercisable ten days after a person or group
acquires 20 pct or more of Alberston's common stock or
announces a tender offer for 30 pct or more of the stock.
    Each right will entitle the shareholder to buy one newly
issued share of Alberston's common stock for 150.00 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=733>
Rospatch Corp said it
rejected a proposal by Diagnostic Retrieval Systems Inc to
acquire its stock at 22 dlrs a share.
    Rospatch's board believes that the long term interests of
its shareholders will be best served by continuing as an
independent public company at this time, the company said in
response to an unsolicited offer from Diagnostic Retrieval.
    Rospatch said Diagnostic's offer of February 27 is a
variation of a previous offer in January, the nature of which
was not disclosed.
    Rospatch said it advised Diagnostic Retrieval that "it
would be contrary to the best interests of the corporation
to engage in any discussions concerning a business combination
with Diagnostic Retrieval."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=735>
International Minerals and
Chemical Corp said it completed its acquisition of Johnson and
Johnson Co's Pitman-Moore unit, a producer of animal health
products.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed. International
Minerals and Chemical said annual sales of the unit are about
45 mln dlrs.
    Pitman-Moore makes health products for pets and for farm
and feedstock animals.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=736>
JWT Group Inc has not been approached
by former Ted Bates Worldwide Chairman Robert Jacoby about the
possibility of a syndicate buying a 35 pct stake in JWT Group
on a friendly basis, a company spokesman said.
    He said JWT would have no comment on an Advertising Age
report that Jacoby is considering heading up a venture capital
syndicate to purchase a 35 pct stake in JWT group.
    Jacoby was not immediately available for comment on the
report. Ted Bates is now owned by &lt;Saatchi and Saatchi>, the
world's largest advertising agency.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=741>
Foote Mineral Co said it signed a
letter of intent with Shieldalloy Corp, a wholly-owned
subsidiary of &lt;Metallurg Inc>, for the sale of its Cambridge,
Ohio, business.
    The company said the sale, which will be explained in
greater detail after the definitive agreement has been signed,
is part of Foote's previously-announced plan to sell the entire
company.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=745>
UtiliCorp United Inc said it
has closed the previously announced acquisition of West
Virginia Power from Dominion Resources Inc for about 21 mln
dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=748>
Chicago physician LeRoy Pesch said he
has had discussions with several American Medical International
Inc shareholders and sees support for a restructuring of the
company.
    Pesch said he has discussed his sweetened, 1.91 billion dlr
takeover bid for American Medical with several large
shareholders, including the biggest investor, the Bass family
of Texas. However, the Bass family has not indicated support
one way or the other for his offer, he said.
    Pesch, in an interview with Reuters, said based on the
conversations he held with shareholders, he could not guage
whether he had majority support. He said, however, there is
support for his offer.
    Pesch would not identify shareholders with whom he held
discussions other than the Bass family and the Wedge Group Inc,
the only other holder of more than five pct of American Medical
stock.
    Earlier today, Wedge Group, which has a 5.5 pct stake, 
said it held discussions with Pesch, American Medical
management and other American Medical shareholders.
    Wedge, in a filing with the Securities and Exchange
Commission, said it believes a restructuring of American
Medical and its business would be "highly desirable and
appropriate at this time."
    "That's the sort of position that I find a large segment of
shareholders of AMI really share," said Pesch.
    Pesch said he held discussions with Wedge about joining his
takeover effort, in which he is offering 17 dlrs cash, four
dlrs in preferred stock and one dlr in common stock for each
American Medical share. Wedge said it has no plans to join in
an effort to seek control of American Medical, but it would not
rule out a future takeover try.
    Pesch said he did not discuss a joint takeover proposal
with the Bass family.
    Some analysts saw the Wedge statement as a boost to Pesch's
takeover effort and a further sign that there could be some
shareholder dissatisfaction following American Medical's
previous rejection of a 20 dlr per share all cash offer from
Pesch.
    American Medical is expected to resist Pesch's latest bid.
Larry Feinberg, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc said a
management-led leveraged buyout cannot be ruled out.
    An American Medical spokesman said the company will comment
on the new Pesch offer by March 10.
    Analysts continue to view the Bass family as a factor in
the outcome of the bid for control of American Medical.
    The Bass family holds an 11. 6 pct stake in American
Medical, and the company has previously said the investors
support management's internal plan to improve the company's
performance. The Bass family would not comment on American
Medical or Pesch.
    Pesch, who led the leveraged buyout of Republic Health Corp
last year, continues to face a credibilty problem on Wall
Street because of the long time it took to finish the Republic
acquisition.
    Republic also has substantial debt, and has left wall
street questioning whether financing can be completed for the
much larger American Medical takeover proposal.
    Pesch's first offer for American Medical was made without
an investment banking firm, another cause for concern to Wall
Street. However, Pesch entered his second offer with
representation from Donaldson, Lufkin, and Jenrette Securities
and Security Pacific Merchant Banking Group.
    "I don't have any doubt that the current transaction can be
worked out and completed, provided we get to the point where
Ami management will sit down and talk in a friendly
environment," Pesch said.
    Pesch would not elaborate on what type of financing
arrangements are being made. He did say if he succeeds in
acquiring American Medical he plans to keep much of American
Medical management in place.
    He said he plans to combine the company with Republic to
form an efficient network of hospitals.
    Analysts said they do not believe a much higher offer could
be made for American Medical.
    Byron Nimocks of E.F. Hutton Group said improved second
fiscal quarter earnings could make American Medical stock worth
about 20 dlrs per share.
    Nimocks estimates American Medical earnings for the second
quarter ended February 28 could be 35 cts, compared to a 95 ct
loss last year.
    Nimocks said Pesch's revised offer is not worth much more
than the 20 dlrs cash offered previously.
    But Feinberg said there is a better chance a transaction
could be completed because of the revised structure of the
offer. "I think it's much more doable," he said.
    Analysts have said American Medical has begun a turnaround
by replacing some members of management and reducing costs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=757>
Coastal Bancorp said the U.S.
Federal Reserve Board approved the acquisition of Coastal by
Suffield Financial Corp &lt;SSBK>.
    The acquisition still requires approval from the Banking
Department in Maine, the company noted.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=762>
AMCA International Ltd said it finalized
agreement to sell certain assets and inventories of its
Dominion Bridge steel service center operations to &lt;Federal
Industries Ltd>'s Russelsteel Inc unit. Terms were undisclosed.
    It said the sale involved assets and operations of the
general line of steel service centers in Toronto and Edmonton,
Alberta and steel from inventories of closed AMCA branches.
    The company said the sale was part of a previously
announced restructuring program to allow it to focus on certain
core businesses and generate cash to cut debt.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=764>
&lt;Scott's Hospitality Inc> said it
acquired Capital Food Services Ltd, Ottawa's largest catering
and food service company, for undisclosed terms.
    Scott's said it would operate Capital Food as a separate
unit under Capital's current name and management.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=767>
Union National Corp said it
signed a definitive agreement under which its First National
Bank and Trust Co of Washington unit will merge with &lt;Second
National Bank of Masontown>.
    Under a previously announced merger agreement, each share
of Second National's common stock will be converted into 25
shares of Union National common.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=768>
Several analysts said they do not
believe another suitor will top the 265 mln dlr bid for
Purolator Courier Corp by E.F. Hutton LBO Inc and a management
group from Purolator's courier division.
    There had been speculation another offer might be
forthcoming, but analysts mostly believe the 35 dlrs per share
price being paid by Hutton and the managers' PC Acquisition Inc
is fully valued.
    Analysts and some Wall Street sources said they doubted
another bidder would emerge since Purolator had been for sale
for sometime before a deal was struck with Hutton Friday.
    Purolator's stock slipped 3/8 today to close at 34-3/4. It
had been trading slightly higher than the 35 dlr offer on
Friday. At least one analyst Friday speculated the company
might fetch 38 to 42 dlrs per share.
    analysts and wall street sources doubted a competitive
offer would emerge since the company has been for sale for
sometime before the deal with Hutton was struck Friday.
    Hutton had been in talks with Purolator's adviser, Dillon,
Read and Co since late December, a Hutton spokesman said.
    Hutton is offering 35 dlrs cash per share for 83 pct of the
shares. If all shares are tendered, shareholders would receive
29 dlrs cash, six dlrs in debentures, and warrants for stock in
a subsidiary of PC Acquisition containing the Purolator U.S.
courier operation. Hutton values the warrants at two to three
dlrs per share.
    Wall Street sources also said today that a rival bidder
might be discouraged by a breakup fee Purolator would have to
pay if it ends its agreement with Hutton. The sources would not
reveal the amount of the fee, which will be noted in documents
on the transaction to be made public later this week.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=787>
Ferro Corp said it has formed a
joint venture with Paris-based Alsthom Inudstrial Group to
export U.S. epxertise in specialty composite materials to the
European market.
    Ferro said although the airframe and aerospace industries
are the prime users of composite materials today, it plans to
develop applications for the ground transportation and
industrial markets in the near future.
    Ferro also announced it has agreed to purchase CompositAir,
a developer of composit materials applications, for an
undisclosed sum.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=797>
&lt;CCL Industries Inc>'s Continental Can
Canada Inc unit said it acquired the Wallaceburg, Ontario,
metal can making operations of Nestle Enterprises Ltd, wholly
owned by &lt;Nestle SA>, of Switzerland. Terms were undisclosed.
    Continental Can said it would supply Nestle's equivalent
can requirements under a long-term agreement.
    Nestle said it decided to stop manufacturing cans "in order
to be in a better position to take full advantage of the
changes underway or on the horizon in food packaging
technology."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=820>
Armtek Corp, previously the
Armstrong Rubber Co, said it agreed to sell its industrial tire
and assembly division to a Dyneer Corp &lt;DYR> for an undisclosed
sum.
    It said the agreement covers the division's tire production
facility in Clinton, Tenn., and its plants serving original
equipment and replacement markets. Armstrong Tire Co, an Armtek
unit, will continue to sell replacement industrial tires, the
company said.
    Final closing is expected in the third fiscal quarter
ending June 30.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=836>
Leucadia National Corp said two of
its subsidiaries have acquired a 7.2 pct stake in Minstar Inc,
a corporation controlled by corporate raider Irwin Jacobs and
used by him in his forays to acquire stock in companies.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Leucadia said its LNC Investments Inc, a Newark, Del.,
investment firm, and Charter National Life Insurance Co, a St.
Louis joint stock life insurance company, bought their combined
1,261,000 Minstar common shares for investment purposes only.
    The Leucadia subsidiaries had held an 11.0 pct stake in
Minstar, but cut to 1.8 pct, or 313,200 shares, last July.
    Since July, Leucadia said its companies have bought 947,800
Minstar common shares for a total of 24.7 mln dlrs.
    Leucadia said it bought the Minstar stake to obtain an
equity position in the company and has no intention of seeking
control of it.
    Nearly half of Leucadia's common stock is owned by TLC
Associates, a Salt Lake City, Utah, general partnership, whose
partners include the chairman and president of Leucadia and
other investors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=840>
Microbiological Research Corp
said it entered into a letter of intent for a proposed business
combination with privately owned &lt;DataGene Scientific
Laboratories Inc>, and &lt;Milex Corp> a newly formed company,
through a stock swap.
    It also said it received 100,000 dlrs from the sale of a
convertible note to Ventana Growth Fund as part of an overall
1,100,000 equity financing plan with Ventana. Under that plan,
a minimum of 400,000 dlrs and a maximum of one mln dlrs of
additional new capital is to be provided to fund the combined
operations of the three companies.
    Microbiological also said that if the maximum additional
capital is raised, it will own about 49 pct of 4,550,00 shares
of common outstanding in the new combined company, DataGene
holders will own 29 pct, and Ventana and others will own 13
pct.
    It said the remaining nine pct will be held by Milex
shareholder Norman Monson, who will become chief executive
officer of the combined companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=844>
Mitchell Hutchins Asset Management
Inc, a New York investment firm and subsidiary of PaineWebber
Group Inc, said it raised its voting stake in Shaer Shoe Corp
to 76,000 shares, or 7.5 pct, from 52,100 shares, or 5.1 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Mitchell Hutchins said it bought 11,900 shares between Jan 8
and Feb 24 at prices ranging from 12.125 to 12.75 dlrs a share
and obtained voting control over another 12,000 shares.
    The firm has said it bought the stake as an investment on
behalf of its clients, but said it has had discussions with
Shaer management. It did not disclose the topic of the talks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=849>
Rexnord Inc said it will redeem
all of its preferred stock purchase rights for 10 cts a right
effective today.
    Rexnord said the rights will be redeemed because it is
expected its shares will be tendered under a January 30
takeover offer from Banner Acquisition Corp. The rights trade
in tandem with Rexnord's common stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=850>
(Groupe Cantrex Inc) said it plans to
merge a new wholly-owned subsidiary a merger agreement with
(CAP Appliance Purchasers Inc), of Woodstock, Ontario, a group
of about 400 appliance and electronics retailers.
    It said CAP shareholders will receive 140,700 first
preferred Groupe Cantrex shares entitling the holders to
receive 6.05 dlrs per share or the equivilant in class A
subordinate voting Cantrex shares.
    The merger is effective April one and is subject to
shareholder approval.         
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=851>
Two affiliated investment firms and
the investment funds they control said they raised their
combined stake in LDBrinkman Corp to 653,600 shares, or 10.9
pct of the total outstanding from 585,600 shares, or 9.7 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Fidelity International Ltd, a Bermuda-based firm, said its
funds bought 68,000 LDBrinkman common shares between Jan 5 and
Feb 19 at prices ranging from 5.30 to 5.445 dlrs a share.
    Funds controlled by FMR Corp, a Boston-based investment
firm affiliated with Fidelity, hold 251,100 shares, bringing
the combined total to 653,600 shares, Fidelity said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=853>
The federal Securities and Exchange
Commission (SEC) is looking for possible securities laws
violations in connection with an unsuccessful 1986 bid by
Hollywood producer Burt Sugarman to take over TRE Corp,
attorneys contacted by SEC investigators said.
    During the takeeover attempt, a unit of Sugarman's Giant
Group Ltd at one point held a 9.9 pct stake in TRE.
    It had help in that effort from Jefferies Group Inc, a Los
Angeles investment banking firm which sold it an option on a
portion of the shares Sugarman eventually acquired.
    In addition, a company controlled by Sugarman raised 35 mln
dlrs in a debt offering underwritten by Drexel Burnham Lambert
Inc with help from Jefferies, and used a portion of the
proceeds to buy TRE stock.
    Finally, Reliance Group Holdings Inc acquired nearly six
pct of TRE, according to an SEEC filing.
    The attorneys, who asked not to be identified, said the SEC
was investigating whether Sugarman and other firms with TRE
holdings were working together without disclosing their
cooperation, as would be required by the federal securities
laws.
    One attorney said SEC probers also were examining whether
Sugarman and Drexel had made adequate disclosures of its
intended usage of the proceeds in the prospectus for the 35 mln
dlr bond offering.
    A TRE spokesman confirmed that TRE, since December a unit
of Aluminum Co of America, had been contacted by SEC
investigators and was cooperating with the probe.
    The spokesman added that TRE Chairman Leopold Wyler had
been interviewed by the SEC probers.
    A Jefferies spokesman said the SEC had asked for
information a few months ago as part of an informal probe.
    The spokesman said Jefferies had cooperated with the agency
and had heard nothing more since that time.
    "To the best of our knowledge, Jefferies is not the target
of a formal SEC investigation" in connection with the TRE bid,
he said.
    A Drexel spokesman acknowledged that his firm had
underwritten the debt offering for Sugarman but added:
    "We had nothing to do with TRE."
    As a matter of policy, the SEC routinely declines to
comment on its enforcement activities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=882>
Equity investment company &lt;Battery
Group Ltd> said it had agreed to buy &lt;Occidental Life Insurance
Co of Australia Ltd> from TransAmerica Corp &lt;TA> of the U.S.
For 105 mln Australian dlrs.
    The acquisition has been made possible by the efforts of
its major shareholder, &lt;Pratt and Co Financial Services Pty
Ltd>, Battery Group said in a statement.
    The purchase will be partly funded by the issue of eight
mln shares at 4.50 dlrs each and four mln free options to the
Pratt Group, controlled by entrepreneur Dick Pratt, plus four
mln shares to professional investors at 4.50 each, it said.
    The balance will be funded by debt, Battery Group said.
    The acquisition is subject to the approval of its
shareholders.
    On completion of the share placements, Pratt Group will
effectively have 51 pct of Battery's enlarged capital, assuming
exercise of all options, it said. Battery now has 22 mln shares
on issue.
    Battery said Occidental Life is a major underwriter of
individual term life insurance and a recent but fast-growing
entrant in the individual account superannuation market.
    It has some 200 mln dlrs in funds under management.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=904>
The U.K. Trade Department said it would
not refer Consolidated Goldfields Plc's &lt;CGLD.L> purchase of
&lt;American Aggregates Corp> to the Monopolies Commission.
    Cons Gold said last month that its &lt;ARC America Corp> unit
had agreed to buy the Ohio-based company for 30.625 dlrs a
share cash, or 242 mln dlrs, in a deal recommended by the
Aggregates board.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=932>
KLM Royal Dutch Airlines &lt;KLM.A> said
it agreed to take a 15 pct stake in Air U.K. Ltd, a subsidiary
of British and Commonwealth Shipping Plc &lt;BCOM.L>, in a
transaction worth around two mln stg.
   A KLM spokesman said KLM already cooperated closely with Air
UK, which runs 111 flights a week to Amsterdam's Schipol
airport from nine UK cities.
   British and Commonwealth Shipping said last week it held
preliminary talks about a KLM minority stake in Air U.K. But
gave no further details. KLM said it hoped the move would
attract more British feeder traffic to Amsterdam Airport.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=939>
Ultramar Plc &lt;UMAR.L> said it had reached
agreement in principle to sell its wholly owned U.K. Marketing
companies to Kuwait Petroleum Corp for around 50 mln stg.
    Ultramar's marketing units include &lt;Ultramar Golden Eagle
Ltd> which in 1985 made a profit of around 1.4 mln stg before
financing and group administration charges. A small loss was
recorded for the first nine months of 1986.
    The sale is due to take place on April 1 with the proceeds
intended to reduce group debt in the short term. But Ultramar
said the funds would ultimately be used for further development
of its core businesses in the U.K. And North America.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=941>
&lt;Underwoods Plc> said it had not been
possible to agree terms on a bid to be made by Woolworth
Holdings Plc &lt;WLUK.L> during talks.
    The two companies had been holding exploratory discussions.
No spokesman for either company was immediately available to
say why terms could not be agreed, nor whether the possibility
of a bid was now being abandoned.
    Last week, Underwoods shares rose 49p to 237p ahead of any
announcement of the talks. The announcement today brought them
back down to 214p from last night's close at 241p. Woolworth
was unchanged at 758p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=960>
The price of Hongkong and Shanghai
Hotels Ltd &lt;SHLH.HK>'s stock soared on speculation of a
takeover battle between major shareholders the Kadoorie family
and the Evergo Industrial Enterprise Ltd &lt;EVGH.HK> group, stock
brokers said.
    They noted heavy buying in Hk Hotel shares after an
announcement by Evergo's &lt;China Entertainment and Land
Investment Co Ltd> unit that it bought about 20 pct of Hk
Hotels from the firm's deputy chairman David Liang for 1.06
billion dlrs. The stock rose 12 H.K. Dlrs to 62 dlrs today.
    Thomas Lau, Evergo's executive director, declined comment
on whether the group is seeking a further stake in Hk Hotels.
But he told Reuters the group will hold the 20 pct stake bought
from Liang as long term investment.
    He said Evergo "was attracted by the underlying strength of
Hk Hotels."
    Analysts said Evergo may be looking for a possible
redevelopment of the Peninsula Hotel, one of Asia's best known
hotels, and another site on Hong Kong island. Both are owned by
Hk Hotels.
    &lt;Lai Sun Garment Co ltd> yesterday said it acquired a 10
pct stake in Hk Hotels from Liang for 530 mln dlrs.
    Lau denied any link between China Entertainment and Lai Sun
on their acquisitions of the Hk Hotels stake.
    "It is purely coincidence," he said.
    But analysts were not so certain, saying that the Evergo
group, which has a reputation as a corporate raider, may team
up with Lai Sun Garment for a takeover.
    Lau also denied any contact with the Kadoorie family, which
analysts estimate has more than 20 pct of Hk Hotels. Michael
Kadoorie is chairman of Hk Hotels.
    Lau said two representatives of Evergo will be nominated to
the Hk Hotels board.
    A source close to the Kadoorie family said the family has
not considered any countermoves so far.
    Analysts said it would be difficult for Evergo and the
Kadoorie family to cooperate because of different management
styles.
    "Evergo may want to split up the hotel management and
property developments of Hk Hotels but that strategy may not
fit the conservative Kadoorie family," said an analyst who asked
not to be named.
    Another analyst noted the price of Hk Hotels had been
distorted by the takeover talks because its net asset value is
only worth about 50 dlrs a share. The offers by Evergo and Lai
Sun were for 53 dlrs a share, though that is well below the
current trading price.
    Trading was suspended today in shares of Lai Sun, Evergo,
China Entertainment and the group's associate &lt;Chinese Estates
Ltd>.
    Chinese Estates lost 25 cents to 20.15 dlrs yesterday,
China Entertainment five to 8.60 dlrs and Evergo one to 74
cents. Lai Sun gained 50 cents to 70.50 dlrs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=963>
&lt;Bryson Oil and Gas Plc> said it paid a
cash consideration of around 5.4 mln dlrs for about 8.6 pct of
&lt;Cenergy Corp>, a U.S. Oil and gas exploration and production
company.
    Bryson said its board has been considering a number of
possible investments to expand the company's interests and
believes the opportunity to acquire an investment in Cenergy
provides a suitable extension to its existing U.S. Interests.
    Cenergy reported a net loss of 7.27 mln dlrs in the nine
months to September 30, 1986 while total stockholders equity on
the same date was 40.72 mln dlrs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=978>
Greenwood Resources Inc said it has sold
its 4,300,000 common share majority holding in &lt;New London Oil
Ltd> of London to an affiliate of &lt;Guinness Peat Group PLC> of
London and an affiliate of &lt;Sidro SA> of Belgium for a total of
1,700,0000 dlrs in cash.
    The company said it will apply the proceeds of the sale to
support its line of credit and as part of a proposed debt
restructuring with Colorado National Bancshares &lt;COLC> and
Greenwood shareholders.
    It said it will retain a seat on the New London board.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=982>
H.J. Heinz &lt;HNZ.N> chairman Tony O'Reilly
would be interested in buying Guinness PLC &lt;GUIN.L>'s brewery
division if it were for sale, a spokesman said.
    The spokesman, reacting to Irish and British press reports,
said "He continues to be interested were the group to offer the
brewery side of Guinness for sale. But he has not put together
a consortium, nor has he been buying shares."
    He was quoted by the Irish magazine Business and Finance as
saying he would be interested if it came on the market and that
he had the support of two international banks if he decided
such a purchase might be worthwhile.
    In the magazine article, he suggested that if brewing
profits were calculated to be in the region of 80 mln punts,
the asking price would not be higher than 800 mln punts.
    "A multiple of ten times earnings would be the top whack for
the brewing division in the current Guinness situation," he
said.
    "This would mean an expensive exercise, right on the edge,
but not impossible," he added.
    The deal would mean buying the Dublin, London, Nigerian and
Malaysian breweries because "It could only be sold as an
integral unit if it was going to be sold at all," O'Reilly said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1000>
Viacom International Inc said &lt;National
Amusements Inc> has again raised the value of its offer for
Viacom's publicly held stock.
    The company said the special committee of its board plans
to meet later today to consider this offer and the one
submitted March one by &lt;MCV Holdings Inc>.
    A spokeswoman was unable to say if the committee met as
planned yesterday.
    Viacom said National Amusements' Arsenal Holdings Inc
subsidiary has raised the amount of cash it is offering for
each Viacom share by 75 cts to 42.75 dlrs while the value of
the fraction of a share of exchangeable Arsenal Holdings
preferred to be included was raised 25 cts to 7.75 dlrs.
    National Amusements already owns 19.6 pct of Viacom's stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1020>
Sara Lee Corp said it agreed to buy a 34
pct interest in Paris-based DIM S.A., a subsidiary of BIC S.A.,
at a cost of about 84 mln dlrs.
    DIM S.A., a hosiery manufacturer, had 1985 sales of about
260 mln dlrs.
    The investment includes the purchase of 360,537 newly
issued DIM shares valued at about 51 mln dlrs and a loan of
about 33 mln dlrs, it said. The loan is convertible into an
additional 229,463 DIM shares, it noted.
    The proposed agreement is subject to approval by the French
government, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1029>
&lt;Scott's Hospitality Inc> said it
acquired all issued shares of Capital Food Services Ltd, of
Ottawa. Terms were not disclosed.
    Scott's said Capital Food had 1986 sales of more than 20
mln dlrs and will continue to operate under its present name
with existing management.
    Capital Food provides food services to several Ottawa
institutions, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1032>
Video Display Corfp said it has reached
a tentiative agreement to sell its existing cable television
business for undisclosed terms and expects to report a gain on
the transaction.  The buyer was not named.
    The company said it will redeploy its service assets into
manufacturing and distribution.
    It said the operations being sold accounted for about five
pct of revenues for the year ended February 28 and lost money.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1039>
Community Bank System Inc said it
has entered into a definitive agreement to acquire Nichols
Community Bank for 2,800,000 dlrs in common stock.
    It said subject to approval by Nichols shareholders and
regulatory authorities, the transaction is expected to be
completed later this year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1074>
Calmar Inc said KEBOO Ab of
Sweden, which now owns about 64 pct of Calmark, has approved
the acquisition of remaining Calmar shares at 25.375 dlrs in
cash at the request of the Calmar board.
    Calmar said a special meeting of its board will be held
March Nine to form a special committee of directors not
affiliated with KEBO to evaluate the transaction.
    KEBO is in turn 60 pct owned by &lt;Investment AB Beijar> of
Sweden.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1076>
Italy's state-owned &lt;Banca Nazionale Del
Lavoro-BNL> said it is negotiating to buy a West German bank as
part of its foreign expansion policy.
    BNL president Nerio Nesi told a news conference the Italian
bank was currently involved in talks but declined to name the
German institution.
    He said the takeover move could be seen as BNL's reply to
Deutsche Bank AG &lt;DBKG.F>, which entered the Italian market in
December 1986, with the purchase of BankAmerica &lt;BACN>
subsidiary &lt;Banca D'America e D'Italia>.
    Nesi said BNL had also approved a 200 mln dlr credit line
to the Soviet Union aimed at enabling Soviet companies to pay
for Italian imports. He gave no further details.
    BNL officials said the group had also decided to increase
its activities in the Soviet Union by opening a representative
office in Moscow this month through its subsidiary &lt;Sogecred>,
which specialises in Italian-Soviet trade.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1099>
Norton co said it has agreed to
sell its remaining South African business, Norton co Pty Ltd,
to &lt;Global Mining and Industrial Corp> of South africa for
undisclosed terms.
    The company said the unit accounts for less than two pct of
Norton revenues and is being sold because "Growing societal
pressures in the United States and the unsettled situation in
south Africa had required a disproportionate amount of
management tiome to oversee."
    Norton said the unit is profitable. 
    Norton said it will provide the South Afrcian unit with
future technical support, and products makde under that
agreement will continue to be marketed under the Norton
trademark.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1103>
Advertising agents Saatchi and Saatchi Co
Plc &lt;SACHY> said it was buying &lt;Cleveland Consulting Associates
Inc> for an initial consideration of 2.0 mln dlrs.
    Additional payments may be made annually through the year
ending March 31, 1991 to bring the total consideration up to
9.5 pct of Cleveland's average post-tax profits in the last two
years of the period.
    The purchase of Cleveland is a further step in Saatchi and
Saatchi's fast growing consulting industry, the company said.
It said its consulting operations now provide a platform for
major future expansion.
    For the 12 months ended 31 March 1986, Cleveland had
479,000 dlrs in pretax profits and forecasts one mln for 1987.
    At the Saatchi and Saatchi annual meeting today, the
company reported a particularly strong start to the current
year, with profits sharply higher than the same period last
year.
    Saatchi and Saatchi shares rose one pence on the Cleveland
announcement to 885p after yesterday's 870p close.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1104>
Chesebrough-Pond's Inc, recently
acquired by a unit of Unilever N.V., said it is offering to
sell its Bass shoe division, as a result of an
ongoing evaluation of the long-term direction of its
businesses.
    The diversified maker of health and beauty aids, said it
acquired Falmouth, Maine-based G.H. Bass and Co in 1978, when
the company reported annual sales of 59 mln dlrs. Bass is known
for its high-quality casual shoes.
    Chesebrough said Bass's 1986 sales exceeded 170 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1118>
An investor group led by Central
National-Gottesman Inc, a New York investment firm, and its
executive vice president, Edgar Wachenheim, said they cut their
stake in Material Sciences Corp to less than five pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group said it sold 19,500 Material Sciences common shares
between Feb 11 and 19 at prices ranging from 24.00 to 27.648
dlrs a share, leaving it with 239,500 shares, or 4.7 pct.
    As long as the group's stake remains below five pct, it is
not required to disclose further dealings in Material Sciences
common stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1123>
Tylan Corp aid it has retained
the investment banking firm Kahn and Harris to sell its furnace
product line.
    The company said it has already been contacted by several
potential buyers.
    In 1986, Tylan's furnace product shipments in the U.S.
represented 10.3 mln dlrs of the company's total net sales of
28.4 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1153>
Pantera's Corp said it agreed in
principle to acquire Pizza Inn Inc in a cash and stock
transaction.
    Under terms of the proposed transaction, each Pizza Inn
share can be exchanged for either three dlrs in cash plus the
lesser of 1.4 shares of Pantera's common stock or 11.50 dlrs
market value of Pantera's stock, or four dlrs in cash plus a
unit consisting of one share of Pantera's stock and a
non-transferrable right to receive up to 0.55 share of
Pantera's stock under certain conditions, it said.
    Completion of the transaction is subject to arrangement of
financing, negotiation of a definitive agreement, and various
regulatory approvals, it said.
    Pantera's said Pizza Inn's largest shareholder, F.J.
Spillman, previously granted Pantera's an option to buy more
than one mln shares of Pizza Inn common stock owned by him.
    Pantera's also said it retained Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc
to act as its financial advisor in connection with the merger.
Pizza Inn has retained Dean Witter Reynolds Inc to act as its
financial advisor, Pantera's said.
    Yesterday, Pantera's stock closed at 9.50 dlrs on NASDAQ,
while Pizza Inn's stock was quoted at 12 dlrs when the Amex
halted trading pending the announcement of the proposed merger.
    From its Dallas headquarters, Pizza Inn said completion of
the transaction is subject to certain conditions including that
the price of Pantera's stock average not less than seven dlrs
during the 20 trading days before the merger.
    Under the agreement, Pizza Inn said it will still be
permitted to complete a leveraged buyout agreement with Pizza
Inn Acquiring Corp, which has been approved by its
shareholders, but is subject to otaining financing.
   
 More
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1159>
Lifetime Corp said it agreed to buy
five mln shares, or 16 pct, of &lt;Nippon Lace Co Ltd> for 3.28
dlrs a share, or 16.5 mln dlrs.
    It said it plans to enter the health care business in
Japan.
    In addition, it said &lt;Koba Electronics Co Ltd>, an
affiliate of Lifetime, will buy four mln unissued shares, or a
12 pct stake, of Nippon for 20 mln dlrs or five dlrs a share.
    The company said Ohta Shoji, chief executive officer of
&lt;Toho Mutual Life Insurance Co>, owns the majority of Koba
Electronics' shares. Toho Mutual Life is also the largest
shareholder in Nippon Lace, the company said.
    Lifetime also said the &lt;Private Bank and Trust of Zurich>,
on behalf of Lifetime director and shareholder Terence Ramsden,
intends to subscribe for two mln shares of Nippon Lace at the
same price paid by Lifetime.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1203>
Imtec Inc said some
shareholders of Computer Identics Inc &lt;CIDN> have proposed a
merger of the two companies.
    The company said the shareholders had previously expressed
dissatisfaction with Computer Identics' management and had
informed Computer Identics that the present board no longer had
the support of a majority of shares held.
    It said the shareholders had called for the resignation of
all but one of Computer Identics' directors and suggested that
a new board pursue merger talks with Imtec.  But Imtec said no
merger talks havew yet taken place.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1209>
Lifetime Corp said it agreed to buy
five mln shares or 16 pct of &lt;Nippon Lace Co Ltd> for 3.28 dlrs
a share, or 16.5 mln dlrs.
    It said it plans to enter the health care business in
Japan.
    In addition, it said &lt;Koba Electronics Co Ltd>, an
affiliate of Nippon, will buy four mln unissued shares, or a 12
pct stake, of Lifetime for 20 mln dlrs or five dlrs a share. -
Corrects to show Nippon's affiliate Koba buying stake in
Lifetime.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1213>
Tender Loving Care Health Care
Services Inc said it and Staff Buildiers Inc have extended the
term of their merger agreement until May 31.
    Tender Loving Care also said &lt;Norrell Corp> agreed not to
acquire any additional Staff Builders shares until September
30, adding Norrell was paid 750,000 dlrs for the standstill
arrangement. 
    Tender Loving Care said it agreed to buy the 610,000 Staff
Builders common held by Norrell, about 19.1 pct of those
outstanding, for 6,950,000 dlrs immediately prior to the
consummation of the merger.
    Tender Loving Care said the extended merger agreement
continues to provide for the exchange of 1.6 of its shares for
each Staff Builders share outstanding.
    As announced February 26, the Staff Builders shareholders
meeting to vote on the merger, originally convened and
adjourned December 23, will be reconvened on April 22.
    Tender Loving Care said its payment to Norrell will include
1,950,000 dlrs in cash and five mln dlrs of a new series of
eight pct Tender Loving Care convertible preferred.
    Tender Loving Care said it and Staff Builders have filed a
revised registration and proxy statement with the Securities
and Exchange Commission. Upon clearance of the revised proxy
statement by the commission and its distribution to Staff
Builders' shareholders, that company's management will continue
to solicit proxies for approval of the merger.
    Tender Loving Care said it will have the power to vote
about 15.8 pct of Staff Builders' shares at the adjourned
meeting with a spokesman explaining that this represents the
proxies held by Norrell, which started buying the stock after
the record date for the meeting.
    In addition, Staff Builders officers and directors own
about 13.8 pct of its stock and have agreed to vote in favor of
the merger.
    Accordingly, the vote of an additional 37.1 pct of the
outstanding shares will be required to approve the merger,
Tender Loving Care said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1217>
Varian Associates Inc said it
is holding discussions with Philips Electronics regarding the
purchase of Philips' broadcast transmission unit in the United
Kingdom, Pye TVT Limited.
    Pye TVT designs and manufactures broadcast transmission
equimpment, specializing in television frequencies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1220>
Butler Manufacturing Co said it
agreed in principal to sell part of its controls division to
Enercon Data Corp of Minneapolis.
    Terms of the sale were not disclosed.
    The transaction, expected to be closed in March, involves
the controls division's energy management and power line
carrier product lines.
    Butler said costs associated with the sale were included in
its restructuring charge taken in last year's fourth quarter,
and will have no effect on its 1987 earnings.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1228>
Magellan Corp said it has entered into a
letter of intent to acquire Balzac Investments Inc in a
transaction that will result in former Balzac shareholders
owning about 83 pct of the combined company.
    The company said on completion of the merger, the combined
company wopuld be known as Power-Cell Inc and be engaged in the
development of Balzac technology related to its Quick Charge
product for charging auto batteries.
    The transaction is subject to approval by shareholders of
both companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1238>
&lt;American Aircraft Corp> said it
has acquired a 51 pct interest in privately-held &lt;Hunter
Helicopter of Nevada, Inc>.
    The purchase was made for an undisclosed amount of American
Aircraft stock, the company said.
    It said the acquisition will increase shareholder equity in
American Aircraft to 45 cts per share from 18 cts per share.
    Hunter Helicopter builds two-passenger helicopters that
retail for about 50,000 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1243>
International Technology Corp
said it has purchased &lt;Western Emergency Services Inc> in a
pooling-of-interests transaction.
    International Technology, a hazardous materials management
company, said it purchased Western Emergency, an environmental
services firm, to offer a broader range of environmental
services to the Gulf Coast area.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1276>
&lt;American Aircraft Corp> said it
has acquired a 51 pct interest in privately-owned &lt;Hunter
Helicopter of Nevada Inc> for an undisclosed amount of stock.
    An American Aircraft official said the company has an
option to acquire the remaining 49 pct.
    Hunter Helicopter is in the business of building a two
passenger helicopter retailing for about 50,000 dlrs each which
is certified by the Federal Aviation Administration. The
helicopters will be manufactured in American Aircraft's Uvalde,
Texas, plant, it added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1280>
International Technology Corp
said it has purchased privately-held Western Emergency Service
Inc in a stock transaction.
    Western Emergency, an environmental services firm, has
annual sales of between one and two mln dlrs, compared to
International Technology's roughly 240-mln-dlr annual sales, a
spokesman for International Technology said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1291>
Harris Associates L.P., a Chicago
investment advisory limited partnership, said it lowered its
stake in Bell Industries Inc to 1,015,800 shares, or 18.7 pct
of the total outstanding, from 1,083,800 shares, or 20.0 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Harris said it sold 68,000 Bell common shares between Dec 18
and Feb 20 at prices ranging from 20.25 to 25.24 dlrs each.
    Harris said its dealings in Bell stock are on behalf of its
advisory clients.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1292>
The chairman of Goodyear Tire and Rubber
Co, a concern that survived a recent hostile takeover bid,
charged that "terrorists in three-piece suits" are undermining
the nation's industrial base.
In a speech to a meeting of south Florida business executives,
Goodyear Chairman Robert Mercer lashed out at corporate raiders
and takeover specialists, accusing them of causing serious harm
to the companies they target.
  "Their interest is not in preserving and strengthening
America's industrial and providing jobs," he said. "Their
product is simply deals, and that is not a product which a
country ... can base a future on."
    Last year, Mercer fought off a takeover attempt by British
industrialist Sir James Goldsmith.
    But Goodyear's independence was preserved at a high price,
Mercer said.
    The company bought back Goldsmith's stock for 620 mln dlrs,
giving him a 93 mln dlr profit. Goodyear also paid him 37 mln
dlrs for expenses and bought about 41 mln other shares for over
two billion dlrs.
    In an effort to trim its new debt, Goodyear closed down
three plants Mercer believes otherwise could have been saved,
sold its motor wheel and aerospace units and reduced its
payroll by 10 pct, he said.
    Mercer, who plans to testify tomorrow at a Senate hearing
on a proposed bill to control corporate raiders, said hostile
takeovers have also hurt workers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1303>
Hanson Trust PLC said Kaiser Cement
shareholders today approved the previously announced merger
agreement making Kaiser Cement an indirect wholly owned unit of
Hanson Trust.
    Hanson said that promptly following the filing of the
certificate of merger Kaiser Cement common shares will be
delisted from the New York Stock Exchange.
    Hanson also said, in accordance with the merger agreement
Kasier Cement also has redeemed all outstanding shares of its
1.375 dlr convertible preferance stocks and its outstanding 9
pct convertible debentures due 2005.
    The acquisitions total purchase price (including cost of
financing the above-mentioned redemptions) will be about 250
mln dlrs, Hanson said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1316>
Royal Resources Corp said its board set
an April 21 a shareholders' meeting to vote on the sale of its
oil and gas properties for 3,650,000 dlrs, an increase in
authorized common to 20 mln shares from 15 mln and the change
of the company's name to Royal Gold Inc.
    The company has agreed to sell its oil and gas properties
to &lt;Victoria Exploration N.L.> of Perth, Western Australia.
    Royal Resources also said the sale of its interest in two
gold properties -- the Colosseum Mine in San Bernardino County,
Calif., and the Camp Bird mine near Ouray, Colo. -- was closed
on February 27. The company said it received 4.4 mln dlrs and
cancellation of the remaining balance due on the acquisition of
the interest, adding this represents 2.5 mln dlrs more than it
paid for the interest.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1340>
Reid-Ashman Inc said it has
decided to divest its test products division, located in Santa
Clara.
    The company said it will entertain offers through March 30.
It also said Steven Reid, a company founder and president of
the test division, has made an offer to purchase the unit.
    The company's test division accounted for about ten pct of
total revenues in the year ended Sept 30, 1986 and is currently
running a revenue rate of under two mln dlrs per year, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1354>
Oppenheimer and Co, a New York
brokerage firm, said it raised its stake in Viacom
International Inc to the equivalent of 2,709,600 shares, or 7.7
pct of the total, from 2,232,400 shares, or 6.3 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Oppenheimer said it bought a net 477,200 Viacom common shares
between Jan 19 and March 3 at prices ranging from 40.50 to an
average of 49.31 dlrs each. Part of its stake is in options.
    It said it bought the shares as part of its arbitrage and
investment business. Movie theater magnate Sumner Redstone and
a Viacom management group are in a bidding war for Viacom.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1409>
GTX Corp said Nippon Steel Co of Japan,
in a move to diversify into high technology, invested eight mln
dlrs in GTX.
    Nippon's move was the result of current exchange rates and
the revaluation of the yen, which "have made the U.S.
electronics industry an attractive investment opportunity for
Japanese corporations," according to a GTX statement.
    GTX noted that Nippon is expecting sales of 27 billion dlrs
by 1995. Of that amount, six billion dlrs is targeted for
electronics. GTX, located in Phoenix, makes computerized
systems that read drawings and transfer them into data bases.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1412>
C.T.C. Dealer Holdings Ltd said it
extended its previously announced offer for 49 pct of &lt;Canadian
Tire Corp Ltd> to midnight on March 26.
    CTC, a group of Canadian Tire dealers, which already owns
17 pct of Canadian Tire, is currently appealing in an Ontario
court against a previously announced Ontario Securities
Commission ruling blocking CTC's 272 mln dlr bid.
    The blocked bid did not include non-voting shareholders,
who hold 96 pct of Canadian Tire equity.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1425>
Metropolitan Federal Savings
and Loan Association said it has signed a letter of intent to
acquire American Trust of Hendersonville, Tenn., for an
undisclosed amount of cash.
    American Trust had year-end assets of over 40 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1429>
Dow Chemical Co said it has
agreed in principle to sell its industrial chemicals and
plastics business interests in South Africa and related assets
to a group of South African investors for undisclosed terms,
completing the sale of the company's South African assets
    Dow said it will continue to support its educational and
health programs for South African blacks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1477>
Senate Banking Committee chairman
William Proxmire called for curbs of hostile corporate
takeovers and new restrictions on risk arbitrageurs.
    "At the very least, it is high time that we require all risk
arbitrageurs to register seperately and specifically  with the
Securities and Exchange Commission and that we consider
precluding brokerage firms and their employers from investing
in, or owning any securities issued by, third party risk
arbitrage operations," Proxmire said at the start of a hearing
on corporate takeovers.
    "A burning issue must be whether there ought to be a
complete seperation in the future of risk arbitrage and
investment banking," Proxmire said.
    He said he was concerned that hostile takeover attempts
were hurting the economy, a view shared by corporate executives
who tesitified at the hearing. "I believe that takeovers have
become so abusive and so tilted in favor of the financial
buccaneers that remedial action is required," USX Corp chairman
David Roderick said. "For Congress to allow the takeover game to
continue unchecked, would be economic suicide," Champion
International Corp chairman Andrew Sigler added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1480>
French ski and tennis equipment maker
&lt;Skis Rossignol> said its 97.7-pct owned subsidiary &lt;Skis
Dynastar SA> agreed to buy Canadian ski stick and boot
manufacturer &lt;CFAS> from &lt;Warrington Inc>.
    A Rossignol spokesman declined to give financial details
but said turnover of CFAS was about 100 mln French francs,
doubling the Rossignol group's activities in the boot and stick
sectors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1497>
Buffton Corp said it completed
the purchase of B and D Industruments Inc for two mln dlrs cash
and 400,000 shares of common stock.
    It said B and D is a private company headquartered in
Kansas, and had sales of 4,700,000 dlrs in 1986.
    Buffton said the company designs and manufactures aviation
computer display systems and engine instrumentation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1500>
Allwaste Inc said it has agreed in
principle to acquire an air-moving and related industrial
services company it did not identify for up to 1,400,000 dlrs
in common stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1506>
Convenient Food Mart Inc said it
has tentatively agreed to buy all the outstanding stock of
Plaid Pantries Inc and two associated businesses in Oregon and
Washington for undisclosed terms.
    Plaid Pantries owns and operates 161 convenience stores in
the Portland and Seattle areas. The other business are two
companies involved in the wholesale distribution of groceries
and health and beauty aids, it said.
    Closing is expected by May 15.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1512>
Marine Midland Banks Inc said it has
acquired the customer account base of New York discount
brokerage firm Ovest Financial Services Inc for undisclosed
terms to expand its discount brokerage operations in the
Northeastern U.S.
    It said it will combine Ovest's activities with those of
its Marine Midland Brokerage Service unit.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1562>
Piedmont Avaition Inc's board of
directors will conduct a special meeting beginning at 1400 est
today, a Piedmont spokesman said.
    The spokesman would not say what was on the agenda.
    In mid-February, Piedmont said its board would meet to
discuss all proposals to acquire the company. Its board also
withdrew a recommendation to accept a 65 dlrs a share cash
offer from Norfolk Southern Corp &lt;NSC> in light of a competing
revised bid from U.S. Air Group Inc &lt;U>. U.S. Air offer to buy
50 pct of the company's stock for 71 dlrs a share cash, and the
remaining for 73 dlrs a share of its stock.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1577>
Harris Associates L.P., a Chicago
investment advisor, said it raised its stake in Builders
Transport Inc to the equivalent of 466,754 shares, or 9.1 pct
of the total outstanding, from 335,800 shares, or 6.7 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Harris said it bought 36,700 Builders Transport common shares
on Feb 10 at 17 dlrs a share. It also said it bought debentures
on Feb 23 that could be converted into 94,254 shares.
    Harris said its dealings in Builders Transport were on
behalf of its advisory clients. It has also said it has no
intention of seeking control of the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1581>
Mark Hammer, a private investor from
Melville, N.Y., and members of his family told the Securities
and Exchange Commission they have acquired a total of 375,200
shares of Exovir Inc, or 12.9 pct of the total outstanding.
    Hammer said his group has been accumulating Exovir stock
since Oct 28, 1985 for investment purposes and may buy more
shares or sell all or part of his current stake.
    While he said he has no intention of seeking control of the
company, Hammer said that because of his "extensive business
experience" and his interest in Exovir stock, he may be
"invited" to become a member of the company's board.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1584>
Lotus Development Corp said it
has signed a letter of intent to acquire substantially all of
the assets of Computer Access Corp for undisclosed terms.
    Computer Asscess makes BlueFish full-text search and
retrieval software for International Business Machines Corp
&lt;IBM> and compatible personal computers.
    The company said the acquisition is subject to approval by
both boards.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1601>
Hayes-Albion Corp said it has
delayed the special meeting at which shareholders will vote on
its merger into Harvard Industries Inc &lt;HAVA> until March 24
from March 17 due to a delay in Securities and Exchange
Commission clearance of proxy materials.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1606>
Comdata Network Inc said it is
in active talks with other parties on a possible acquisition or
recapitalization of Comdata in an effort to maximize
shareholder values.
    Comdata said &lt;Rosewood Financial Inc> together with
&lt;Cypress Partners LP> and &lt;Driftwood Ltd> have acquired over
five pct of Comdata stock and Rosewood intends to acquire over
15 pct of Comdata.
    Comdata said it has not yet reached a definitive agreement
with &lt;Mason Best Co> for the previously-announced
recapitalization and self-tender offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1622>
First Savings Bank of
Florida said it expects a special shareholder meeting to be
held around May 21 to consider the proposed merger into
Gibraltar Financial Corp &lt;GFC>.
    It said the annual meeting will be held April 30 to elect
two directors and ratify the appointment of auditors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1626>
Safeway Stores Inc said it
agreed to sell the assets and operations of its Salt Lake City
Division to Borman's Inc under undisclosed terms.
    The division includes 60 operating supermarkets in five
states, most of which are in Utah, Idaho and Wyoming, together
with distribution and manufacturing facilities, Safeway said.
    It said sales for the division for the year ended January
three were about 350 mln dlrs.
    Safeway also said the transaction is subject to Borman's
ability to obtain financing and to successfully negotiate new
labor agreements with the various unions involved.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1628>
Fisher Foods Inc said
&lt;American Financial Corp> has sold its 1,500,000 Fishers
shares, a 44 pct interest, to a group consisting of &lt;American
Seaway Foods Inc>, &lt;Rini Supermarkets Inc> and &lt;Rego
Supermarkets Inc>.
    The company said in connection with the transaction, all
five American Financial representatives have resigned from its
board.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1634>
Wall Street traders said the stock of
Outboard Marine Corp was rising on a rumor over a cable
television program that Outboard is a likely takeover target of
Sun Chemical Corp &lt;SNL>.
    Outboard was up 3-1/8 to 34-5/8. On Tuesday it rose 1-3/8
to 31-1/2 Tuesday.
    A report on Cable News Network today said Sun Chemical has
4.9 pct of Outboard and is conducting a study on whether to go
for control of the whole company.
    An Outboard Marine spokesman would not comment on the
rumor.
    The cable program said a buyout of Outboard would be for up
to 40 dlrs a share, or for a total of 680 mln dlrs.
    A spokesman for Sun Chemical was not immediately available.
    Outboard Marine last June adopted a shareholder rights plan
that will be triggered when a person or group acquires
beneficial ownership of 20 pct or more of its common or begins
a tender offer that would result in 30 pct ownership.
    Wayne Jones, vice president at Outboard for strategic
planning, said management wants to stay independent. "We are
not trying to sell the company. We are proceeding with our
strategic plans," he said.
    That plan includes integrating five boat companies that
Outboard Marine has bought since the middle of December. Jones
said all five will cost between 100 mln dlrs to 120 mln dlrs.
    An analyst who wanted anonymity said 40 dlrs a share is a
"decent" price for outboard. "A bdding war to 50 or 60 dlrs a
share is stretching it. Maybe 45 dlrs a share tops," he said.
    Outboard, which has 17 mln shares outstanding, is in
registration for a two mln common share offering with Morgan
Stanley Inc. It makes sense, the analyst said, for Sun Chemical
to strike before the offering is underway.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1649>
Varian Associates Inc said it
acquired all the outstanding stock of closely-held Analytichem
International Inc for an undisclosed amount of cash.
    Analytichem, based in Harbor City, Calif., is a supplier of
bonded phase preparation products used to prepare chemical
samples for analysis, Varian said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1659>
Digicon Inc said it has completed the
previously-announced disposition of its computer systems
division to an investment group led by &lt;Rotan Mosle Inc's>
Rotan Mosle Technology Partners Ltd affiliate.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1665>
Computer Horizons Corp said it
purchased ComputerKnowledge Inc, a software training education
company headquartered in Dallas.
    Terms were not disclosed.
                
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1666>
Policy Management Systems Corp
said it has acquired the majority of the assets and business of
Allied Research Inc of Salem, Ore., and Consolidated Insurance
Services Inc, of Springfield, Va., for undisclosed terms.
    It said the two companies, which had combined 1986 revenues
of about two mln dlrs, provide underwriting information
services to property and casualty insurers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1667>
Unicorp Canada Corp told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it cut its stake in
Purolator Courier Corp to 286,500 shares, or 3.7 pct of the
total outstanding, from 962,400 shares, or 12.4 pct.
    Unicorp, a management and investment holding company
controlled by its chairman, George Mann, said it sold 675,900
Purolator common shares on March 2 and 3 at 34.782 and 34.750
dlrs a share.
    Purolator agreed this past weekend to be acquired by
managers of its U.S. courier business and E.F. Hutton LBO Inc
in a leveraged buyout valued at 265 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1673>
&lt;Nusource Investments Inc>, a
publicly held shell company, said it acquired American
Nutrition Works Inc through a transaction in which American
Nutrition shareholders received 28 mln shares of Nusource stock
in exchange for their shares.
    American Nutrition operates a chain of stores sellings
vitamins and health products.
    Nusource said shareholders elected a new board consisting
of Richard A. Trydahl, Samuel Mineo and Charles E. Flink and
voted to change the name of the company to ANW Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1676>
First Southern Federal Savings and
Loan Association said it has agreed in principle to acquire
Horizon Financial Corp and Horizon Funding corp from &lt;Victor
Federal Savings and Loan Association> of Muskogee, Okla., for
undisclosed terms.
    The company said the purchase is subject to approval of the
boards of First Southern and Victor and regulatory agencies.
    Horizon Financial services mortgage loans and Horizon
Funding is a wholesale loan purchasing operation. Horizon
services 3.2 billion dlrs in mortgage loans.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1678>
&lt;Chatsworth Enterprises
Inc>, a publicly held shell corporation, said it signed a
letter of intent to merger with &lt;Lotoquik International Ltd>, a
Nassau, Bahamas-based maker of video lottery machines.
    Under terms of the merger agreement, Chatsworth said
Lotoquik shareholders would own a majority of the surviving
company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1679>
&lt;Asbestec Industries Inc> said
it signed a letter of intent to buy asbestos abatement
contractor &lt;P.W. Stephens> for three mln dlrs in cash, stock
and notes.
    The transaction is expected to be completed early in the
third quarter of its fiscal year ending September 30, 1987.
    Asbestec also said it expects to sign March six a 900,000
dlr contract to remove asbestos from a major apartment complex
in Washington, D.C. The project is scheduled to begin on March
nine.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1684>
Parsow Partnership Ltd, a Nevada
investment partnership, said it lowered its stake in ERC
International Inc to 343,500 shares or 8.3 pct of the total
outstanding common stock, from 386,300 shares, or 9.3 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Parsow said it sold 42,800 ERC common shares between Jan 9 and
March 2 at prices ranging from 12.125 to 14.50 dlrs each.
    The partnership said its dealings in ERC stock are for
investment purposes and it has no intention of seeking control
of the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1693>
&lt;Chase Manhattan Bank N.A.> is considering
expanding its operations in Italy, particularly in the consumer
banking sector, a Chase Manhattan official said.
    Robert D. Hunter, Chase Manhattan area executive for
Europe, Africa and the Middle East, said at a news conference
that plans to broaden the bank's activities on the Italian
market have not been finalised, however.
    Asked if Chase Manhattan would consider an acquisition in
Italy, Hunter said: "We will look at any opportunity, but the
prices of Italian banks have been quite high." Chase Manhattan
has branches in Milan and Rome.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1694>
International H.R.S. Industries Inc said
it would reduce its stake in Hal Roach Studios Inc to 22 pct
from 52 pct in return for 6.3 mln U.S. dlrs from Qintex Inc's
Qintex America (Media) Ltd unit.
    H.R.S. said that under the deal's first stage, closng March
22, it would sell Qintex 900,000 Hal Roach shares at seven U.S.
dlrs a share each for a total of 6.3 mln dlrs and Roach will
repay H.R.S. 3.3 mln U.S. dlrs of advances.
    Qintex will also complete the 16.8 mln U.S. dlr buy of 2.4
mln Roach treasury shares at seven dlrs each and provide Roach
with 50 mln U.S. dlrs of financing for expansion, H.R.S. said.
    H.R.S. said that the agreement also provided for a second
stage over one year in which it had a put option exercisable 
one year from closing to sell Qintex all or part of its two mln
Roach shares for 8.50 U.S. dlrs a share.
    It said Qintex had a 30-day call option, exerciseable nine
months from closing, to buy from H.R.S. all or part of one mln
Roach shares at the greater of 8.50 dlrs each or the average
Roach share price for three months before exercise date.
    Qintex will also acquire another 2.4 mln Roach treasury
shares at seven dlrs a share 12 months after closng for another
16.8 mln dlrs, H.R.S. said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1729>
Dynamics Corp of America said
it has reached an agreement with CTS Corp resolving all
differences between the two companies.
    It said as a result of the settlement, CTS's special board
committee has stopped soliciting orders to purchase some or all
of CTS.
    Dynamics, which now owns 27.5 pct of CTS' outstanding
stock, said it agreed to limit its shareholdings to not more
than 35 pct of the outstanding shares for a year following the
company's 1987 annual meeting.
    Dynamics said the CTS board will recommend CTS shareholders
vote at the 1987 annual meeting in favor of the company paying
Dynamics 2,178,000 dlrs as a reimbursement for its CTS releated
costs and granting Dynamics an option to buy enough CTS common
at 29.625 dlrs a share to give it ownership of 35 pct of the
outstanding stock.
    Dynamics said the price of stock under the option,
exercisable for one year, is based on the average closing price
for the stock for the five days ending March two.
    Dynamics said CTS Chairman George F. Sommer will assume the
additional title of President. Former President Robert D.
Hostetler is resigning as a director, as is Chief Financial
Officer Gary B. Erekson, Ted Ross and Donald J. Kacek.
    Dynamics said the CTS board will be reduced to seven
members for eight with the remaining four members of the
current board and three representatives of Dynamics as new
directors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1735>
Trans World Airlines said it has
proposed a cash merger of USAir Group with TWA in which the
holders of USAir common would receive 52 dlrs in cash in
exchange for their stock.
    TWA said the offer was made in a letter to Edmin Colodny,
chairman and president of USAir.
    TWA said, however, that if the negotiated deal is not
acceptable it may make an offer directly to USAir's
shareholders for up to 51 pct of USAir's outstanding stock, to
be purchased in a voting trust at a price lower than today's
offer.
    TWA said it is filing an application with the Department of
Transportation seeking approval of the merger as well as an
application for approval, on an expedited basis, of its
purchase of up to 51 pct of USAir common and the deposit of the
stock in a voting trust, pending DOT approval.
    TWA said that in respect to USAir's recent offer for
Piedmont Aviation &lt;PIE> it believes that USAir's shareholders
would prefer a cash merger proposal for USAir over its proposed
acquisition of Piedmont.
    TWA said, however, it also would be interested in
discussing a three way deal among USAir, Piedmont and TWA.
    TWA said the merger is subject to the USAir board redeeming
the preferred stock purchase rights (the poison pill) issued to
shareholders last year and taking action so that the vote of a
majority of the outstanding common stock is required to approve
its proposed move.
    Additionally, TWA said it would need a satisfactory due
diligence review of USAir.
    TWA said it has not yet had an opportunity to obtain the
necessary financing for the deal, but added it is confident
that it will get it.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1739>
CTS Corp and Dynamics Corp of
America reached an agreement resolving all outstanding
differences between them, according to a joint statment.
    As a result of the settlement, a special committee of the
board of directors of CTS stopped soliciting offers to buy all
or part of the company, it said.
    CTS and DCA also agreed to dismiss all pending litigation
between the two companies except for one appeal pending before
the U.S. Supreme Court relating to the Indiana Control Share
Chapter, it said.
    Under the agreement, the CTS board will immediately be
reduced to seven from eight with four current directors and
three representatives of DCA being elected to the board, it
said. This board will be presented as the slate for CTS' 1987
annual shareholders meeting, it added.
    CTS' directors will recommend to shareholders that they
approve reimbursement to DCA of about 2.2 mln dlrs in expenses
relating to CTS, and grant DCA an option to buy up to 35 pct of
CTS' shares, it said.
    In addition, DCA said it agreed to limit its ownership in
CTS for the year following the 1987 annual meeting to not more
than 35 pct of the outstanding stock. DCA currently holds 27.5
pct of the outstanding shares of CTS.
    Both companies said they support the agreement and believe
it to be fair to both sides.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1740>
Measurex Corp said it
completed the sale of its Measurex (South Africa Pty)
subsidiary to a group of employees who manage the operation.
    Measurex, a maker of computer integrated manufacturing
systems, said the subsidiary represented less than one pct of
worldwide revenues and the sale will have no impact on this
year's earnings.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1741>
Jefferies and Co said it is making a
market in the stock of USAir Group Inc at 48-1/2 to 50.
    USAir received an offer from Trans world airlines to buy
the airline at 52 dlrs cash per share.
    USAir was halted on the New York Stock EXcahnge for
dissemination of the news. It was indicated at 47 to 54.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1760>
Healthvest, a Maryland real estate
investment trust, said it began selling five mln shares of
common stock at 21 dlrs a share.
    The company said it is also selling 543,237 shares to
Healthcare International Inc &lt;HII>, giving the company a 9.8
pct stake in Healthvest.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1771>
USAir Group Inc said it had no comment
on an offer it received from Trans World Airlines to buy USAir
for 52 dlrs cash per share.
    USAir spokesman David Shipley also declined comment on
Piedmont Aviation Inc &lt;PIE>. USAir has offered 71 dlrs cash per
share for half of Piedmont's stock, and 73 dlrs in its own
stock for the balance.
    Piedmont also received an offer from Norfolk Southern Corp
&lt;NSC> of 65 dlrs cash per share. Piedmont's board was meeting
today, but the company declined to say what was on the agenda.
A spokesman said he could not comment on the twa action.
    A Norfolk Southern Corp &lt;NSC> spokesman said the company
had no comment on TWA's offer for USAir or on its proposal to
negotiate a three-way merger between TWA, USAir and Piedmont.
    "We don't have all the details," a Norfolk Southern
spokesman said. The company's 65 dlr-a-share cash offer for
Piedmont stands, he said.
    In its offer, TWA said as an alternative to a merger with
USAir, it would be interested in discussing a three-way
combination among USAir, Piedmont and TWA. It said the
three-way merger would serve the best interests of the
shareholders of all three companies, employees and consumers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1787>
Itel Corp said it obtained commitments
from a syndicate of banks for a six-year secured loan of about
325 mln dlrs and had separately filed registration statements
for two public offerings for a total of 150 mln dlrs to fund
its December 1986 acquisition of &lt;Anixter Bros Inc>.
    It said one of the offerings will be a new 75 mln dlrs
issue of convertible exchangeable series C preferred and the
other will be a 75 mln dlr issue of seven-year senior
subordinated notes. Both offerings will be through Merrill
Lynch Capital Markets.
    It said a portion of the proceeds from the offerings,
together with the proceeds form the new bank loan, wll be used
to repay the 395 mln dlr bridge loan Merrill Lynch and Co Inc
&lt;MER> provided for Itel to buy Anixter.
    Itel said the banks it obtained commitments from include
Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co &lt;MHC>, &lt;Chemical Bank of New
&lt;York>, and the &lt;First National Bank of Chicago>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1789>
Great American First Savings Bank said
the bank recorded gains exceeding 80 mln dlrs on sales of loans
and mortgage securities valued at 1.1 billion dlrs.
    The San Diego-based bank said in a prepared release of its
report to analysts here that the gains included 6.6 mln dlrs in
arbitrage profits from the premium paid for the separation of
interest and principal components of new Federal National
Mortgage Association strip securities.
    The bank said it reported a profit of more than 20 mln dlrs
on the transaction, involving 390 mln dlrs of FNMA securities,
including the arbitrage gain.
    Great American recently announced plans to acquire &lt;Capital
Savings Bank>, Olympia, Wash., and last year acquired &lt;Home
Federal Savings and Loan Association>, Tucson, Ariz., and &lt;Los
Angeles Federal Savings Bank>, which resulted in 66 new offices
and three billion dlrs in assets.
    The bank also said it plans to expand into other major
western banking markets and is considering an acquisition in
Colorado.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1790>
Tandy Brands Inc said it sold
its Grate Home and Fireplace division to an investor group that
includes some members of Grate's management for 1,600,000 dlrs
in cash and secured notes.
    The company said the sale will not materially offset the
9,848,000 dlr non-recurring charge it took against the sale of
the division.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1798>
Banner Industries Inc said it completed
the purchase of all Rexnord Inc &lt;REX> common shares for its
26.25 dlrs per share cash tender offer that ended Feb
27, 1987.
    The purchase follows Banner receiving earlier today 310 mln
dlrs under a credit agreement with Citicorp Industries Credit
Inc and the Bank of Nova Scotia, and an additional 260 mln dlrs
from offerings made for Banner and its subsidiary through
Drexel Burnham and Lambert.
    As a result of the tender offer, Banner said it will own
approximately 96 pct of the outstanding shares of Rexnord. The
company said a merger of Rexnord and a subsidiary of Banner
will be completed before mid-May.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1801>
&lt;Phoenix Steel Corp> said a group
of investors offered to buy its Clayton steel plate mill for
eight mln dlrs and the assumption of a bond obligation.
   Phoenix did not disclose the indentity of the investors.
    Phoenix was forced to close the Clayton mill last month.
    The company said the offer represents a major step in
restructuring the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1808>
Sumner Redstone, president of National
Amusements, Inc, predicted he can win regulatory approvals to
wrap up the 3.4 billion dlr acquisition of Viacom International
Inc in 60 to 90 days.
    Redstone, 63, catapulted himself into the big leagues of
entertainment early today when a group of Viacom managers and
their financial backers decided not to top National's bid.
    "We've had counsel working for some time in every region
where Viacom has cable televison systems" Redstone told Reuters
in a telephone interview.
    Redstone also said "Viacom is committed to working very
closely with us to obtain approvals." Viacom has been seeking
approvals for transfer of its broadcast licenses and cable
systems since September when its management group first
advanced a buyout plan.
    But Redstone turned the situation into a spirited bidding
contest which was capped by the announcement this morning that
Viacom's independent directors on behalf of Viacom entered into
a defintive merger agreement with National.
    National is a family business which operates a chain of
movie theaters. It is dwarfed by Viacom.
    Redstone said he was weary after talks dragged on through
the night but also excited at the prospect of running a leading
electronic media company. He noted that the number of motion
picture admissions in the U.S. has shown no growth in 15 years.
    Of nine satellite television channels operated by Viacom,
four are motion-picture oriented pay channels. Redstone said
exclusive contracts with pay television networks are the
emerging trend. "Up until recently you could see any motion
picture on any pay channel," Redstone said.
    He noted Viacom has exclusive agreements with two studios
and plans to sign a deal with a third company next month.
    Redstone said the management group's investment bankers
will be paid what is due for termination of its merger
agreement. Such fees could total about 30 mln dlrs. "That will
be a company expense," Redstone said.
    He said BankAmerica &lt;BAC> Corp has had numerous inquiries
from lenders who want to participate in a 2.25 billion dlr
financing for the deal. BankAmerica will provide 592 mln dlrs.
    After the merger, Viacom will be a subsidiary of National
but 17 pct of the company will be in public hands.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1835>
New York investor Julian Robertson
and several investment partnerships he controls said they
raised their stake in Capital Wire and Cable Corp to 481,800
shares, or 12.2 pct of the total, from 430,200, or 10.9 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission
Robertson and his Tiger, Jaguar, Puma and Tiger Management Co
entities said they bought 51,600 Capital Wire common shares
between Feb 3 and 17 at 13.25 dlrs a share.
    Robertson said his group has spent a total of 5.9 mln dlrs
on its investment in the company so far.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1836>
Trans World Airlines Inc complicated
the bidding for Piedmont Aviation Inc by offering either to buy
Piedmont suitor USAir Group or, alternatively, to merge with
Piedmont and USAir.
    Piedmont's board was meeting today, and Wall Street
speculated the board was discussing opposing bids from Norfolk
Southern Corp and USAir. The TWA offer was announced shortly
after the Piedmont board meeting was scheduled to begin.
    TWA offered to buy USAir for 52 dlrs cash per share. It
also said it was the largest shareholder of USAir and
threatened to go directly to USAir shareholders with an offer
for 51 pct of the stock at a lower price.
    TWA also said it believed its offer was a better deal for
USAir shareholders than an acquisition of Piedmont, but it said
it alternatively would discuss a three-way combination of the
airlines.
    Market sources and analysts speculated that TWA chairman
Carl Icahn made the offer in order to put his own airline into
the takeover arena.
    "We're just wondering if he's not just trying to get TWA
into play. There's speculation on the street he just wants to
move onto somthing else," said one arbitrager. "We think TWA
might just be putting up a trial balloon."
    Analysts said the offer must be taken seriously by USAir,
but that the airline will probably reject it because the price
is relatively low compared to other airline deals.
    They also said Icahn must prove his offer credible by
revealing financing arrangements. "They need to show their
commitment and their ability to finance. I think it's a
credible offer," said Timothy Pettee, a Bear Stearns analyst.
    "I think it's certainly on the low end of relative values
of airline deals," said Pettee. Pettee estimated 58 dlrs would
be in a more reasonable range based on other airline mergers.
    USAir stock soared after TWA made public its offer. A
spokesman for USAir declined comment, and said USAir had not
changed its offer for Piedmont. USAir offered of buy 50 pct of
that airline's stock for 71 dlrs cash per share and the balance
for 73 dlrs per share in USAir stock.
    USAir closed up 5-3/8 at 49-1/8 on volume of 1.9 mln
shares.
    Piedmont, which slipped 1/2 to close at 69-5/8, also
remained silent on the TWA action. Piedmont has an outstanding
65 dlr cash per share offer from Norfolk Southern Corp.
    Norfolk Southern declined comment, but said it stuck with
its offer for Piedmont. Norfolk owns about 20 pct of Piedmont
and opened the bidding when it said it would propose a takeover
of Piedmont.
    Some analysts said Icahn may be trying to acquire USAir to
make his own airline a more attractive takeover target.
    "Icahn I think had wanted to sell his airline and there
were no takers. I think the strategy might have called for
making his investment more attractive. One way to accomplish
that specific objective is to go out and acquire other
airlines," said Andrew Kim of Eberstadt Fleming.
    "I don't know whose going to buy them, but at least this
way it becomes a much more viable package," said Kim.
    But Icahn's financing ability for such a transaction
remains in doubt, in part because of TWA's heavy debt load.
    Wall street sources said TWA has some cash with which to do
the offer.
    The sources said Icahn has not lined up outside financial
advisers and plans to make his own arrangements.
   Icahn earlier this year abandoned plans to buy USX Corp &lt;X>
and still retains 11 pct of that company's stock.
    Some Wall street sources said the financier's USX plan was
impacted by the cloud hanging over his adviser, Drexel Burnham
Lambert Inc, because of Wall Street's insider trading scandal.
    Industry sources also predicted USAir might reject the TWA
offer on price and financing concerns. "It's littered with
contingencies and it doesn't even have a financing
arrangement," said one executive at another major airline.
    But the executive conceded a merged TWA-USAir would be a
strong contender with USAir's east coast route system and
planned west coast presence from PSA. USAir could feed the
intenrational flights of TWA, which has a midwest presence in
its St. Louis hub. Adding Piedmont, dominant in the southeast,
to the mix would develop an even stronger force.
    The combined entity would also have TWA's pars reservation
system.
    Such a merger would be complex and analysts said it would
result in an airline iwth an 18 pct market share.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1847>
Banner Industries Inc said it completed
the previously announced purchase of Rexnord Inc &lt;REX>. It said
it owns 96 pct of Rexnord's outstanding following the purchase
of all Rexnord's common validly tendered pursuant to its 26.25
dlr per share cash tender offer ended February 27.
    Banner also said it received 310 mln dlrs pursuant to a
credit agreement with &lt;Citicorp Industrial Credit Inc> and the
&lt;Bank of Nova Scotia> and 260 mln dlrs from an offering made
through Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.
    The merger of Rexnord with a subsidiary of Banner will be
copmleted before mid-May, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1860>
Allis-Chalmers Corp said it asked
lenders and other groups to approve a restructuring plan that
would cause a dilution of the company's existing common stock.
    The company said it would sell all of its businesses other
than the American Air Filter business, make a public financing
of more than 100 mln dlrs and pay part of the currently
outstanding debt with the proceeds.
    Under the plan, which was presented to institutional
lenders, the company's unions and the Pension Benefit Guaranty
Corp, "substantial amounts" of institutional debt would be
converted to common stock of the restructured company.
    Allis-Chalmers said it will exchange existing preferred
stock for common. The exchange of the institutional debt and
preferred stock for common equity will cause a "resulting
dilution of the existing common stock," Allis-Chalmers said in
a statement.
    Under the plan, holders of existing common would hold about
15 pct of the restructured common stock. Holders of existing
preferred would hold about 35 pct of the new common.
    Allis-Chalmers said its only alternative to the plan is
bankruptcy. The restructuring must be approved by creditors,
common and preferred holders,and present and former employees.
    Allis-Chalmers said a bankruptcy filing "appears to
represent the company's only alternative if agreement upon the
terms of the plan cannot be reached."
    The spokesman said in response to an inquiry that he was
not aware of any extraordinary charge against earnings that
would result from the restructuring.
    "It is too early to talk about a charge" because the plan
must still be approved by the lenders and unions, he said.
    Also under the plan, payments to Allis-Chalmers' private
lenders would be deferred. Trade payables and obligations
incurred in the ordinary course of business will be met.
    Payment of health benefits for active and retired employees
would be made "at substantially reduced levels."
    Allis-Chalmers, once one of the leading farm equipment
companies, sold all of its farm equipment operations to Deutz
of West Germany for 107 mln dlrs, leaving the company with
businesses in lift trucks, air conditioning, fluids handling
and solid materials processing.
    Last year, Allis-Chalmers sold the lift truck business to
AC Material Handling Co of Columbus, Ohio.
    Under the restructuring plan, Allis-Chalmers will sell its
solid materials processing and fluids handling businesses.
Solid materials processing, which makes equipment to crush
stones for highway construction, accounted for 288 mln dlrs of
Allis-Chalmers's total 1985 revenues of 886 mln dlrs.
    The company will also sell its fluids handling operations,
which makes pumps and valves. That business accounted for 196
mln dlrs of the company's 1985 revenues.
    Allis-Chalmers in 1986 reported a net loss of 8.6 mln dlrs,
or 1.09 dlrs a share. In 1985, the company lost 168.4 mln dlrs,
or 12.27 dlrs a share.
    The company's last profit was in 1980, when it earned 52.4
mln dlrs on sales of 2.1 billion dlrs.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1862>
Piedmont Aviation Inc said
its board meeting recessed today without taking action on
proposals to combine Piedmont with other corporations.
    Piedmont has received opposing bids from Norfolk Southern
Corp and US Air Corp.
    Earlier today, Trans World Airlines Inc offered to either
buy Piedmont suitor US Air or, alternatively, to merge with
Piedmont and U.S. Air.
    IN a prepared statement, Piedmont said there would be no
further announcements concerning this situation today.
    The company declined to say when the board would meet
again.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1886>
WTC International N.V. said it
has sold its affiliates in South Africa to an independent
trust, created to continue the operations in that country.
    The purchase price was about 8.4 mln dlrs, represented by a
ten-year interest-bearing note, payable annually at 11 pct, to
be paid by the trust out of proceeds from the South African
operations, the company said.
    WTC said its board concluded in view of the social,
political and economic situatin in South Africa, it was best to
separate the company from its interests there.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1920>
The directors of Hughes Tool Co
&lt;HT> said they would recommend to shareholders that they reject
a merger with Baker International Corp &lt;BKO> today.
    Hughes vice-president Ike Kerridge said the recommendation
would be put to shareholders at a meeting scheduled for 10 A.M.
Local time (1600 GMT) to discuss the proposed merger.
    Kerridge said the board met yesterday to discuss the merger
but decided against it.
    The Hughes board objected to a U.S. Department of Justice
requirement that Baker sell off several specialised
subsidiaries in businesses related to oil-drilling.
    The Hughes board last week indicated that it might cancel
the merger because of the Department of Justice requirement.
    The board of directors of the California-based Baker had
approved the merger. On February 17 Baker said it had signed an
agreement to sell one of the subsidiaries.
    The companies had been given until April 22 to comply with
the Justice Department requirement, Kerridge said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1994>
Baker International corp said it has
filed suit in state court in Houston to compel Hughes Tool Co
to complete its proposed merger with Baker.
    Late yesterday, Hughes said it had terminated the merger
agreement because Baker would not agree to an alternative
divestiture plan devised by Hughes.  Hughes' board had
previously found unacceptable a U.S. Justice Department consent
decree that would have required broader divestitures.
    Baker said it has not obtained any satisfactory explanation
from Hughes of its objections to the provisions of the Justice
Department consent decree.
    Hughes yesterday adjourned the special meeting at which
shareholders were to vote on the merger without permitting the
counting of votes on the deal.  Baker said it believes the vote
was overwhelmingly in favor of the merger.
    Baker said the new terms that Hughes proposed for the
merger, as an alternative to the consent decree, were "more
burdensome" than those of the consent decree themselves.
    Baker said divestitures under the consent decree would
reduce revenues for the combined company by about 65 mln dlrs
or three pct.
    Baker said it will continue to pursue the divestitures of
the units named in the consent decree.
    It said its suit names as defendants Hughes and certain of
its directors and seeks either an injunction forcing Hughes to
live up to the merger agreement or "substantial" monetary
damages it did not name.
    Baker said it believes the merger to be in the best
interests of shareholders of both companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1996>
USAir Group Inc said its board has
rejected Trans World Airlines Inc's offer to acquire USAir for
52 dlrs per share in cash as grossly in adequate and not in the
best interests of USAir shareholders, employees or passengers.
    The company said the unsolicited bid by the Carl C.
Icahn-led TWA was "highly conditional."
    USAir said its board and that of Piedmont Aviation Inc
&lt;PIE> met separately yesterday to consider USAir's offer to
acquire 50.1 pct of Piedmont for 71 dlrs per share and
remaining shares for 1.5 to 1.9 common shares each, valued at
about 73 dlrs per share based on the average closing price of
USAir common during a period just before the merger.
    The company said it is continuing talks with Piedmont on
arriving at a definitive merger agreement and the two companies
hope to reach one very shortly.
    USAir said "In light of the highly conditional nature and
other terms of the TWA offer, the timing of the offer and the
circumstances under which it was made, USAir Group believes
that the purpose of the TWA offer is to interfere with USAir
Group's proposed acquisition of Piedmont.
    "TWA's proposal is nothing more than an attempt by Carl
Icahn to disrupt at the eleventh hour USAir Group's acquisition
of Piedmont, a transaction which the USAir Group board views as
most beneficial to USAir Group shareholders, employees and
passengers and which Mr. Icahn obviously regards as contrary to
his own personal interests."
    USAir said its board has authorized counsel to explore all
appropriate legal remedies against what it called TWA's
last-minute attempt to interfere with USAir Group's acquisition
of Piedmont.
    The company said conditions to the TWA offer include TWA
obtaining financing, the USAir board redeeming defensive rights
issued to shareholders last year and acting to render the "fair
price" provision contained in USAir's charter inapplicable to
the TWA offer and Transportation Department approval.
 Reuter...
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10005>
Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher said
the U.K. Was growing more impatient with Japanese trade
barriers and warned that it would soon have new powers against
countries not offering reciprocal access to their markets.
    She told Parliament that the bid by the U.K.'s Cable and
Wireless Plc &lt;CAWL.L> to enter the Japanese telecommunications
market was being regarded by her government as a test case.
    "I wrote to the prime minister of Japan, Mr Nakasone, on the
fourth of March to express our interest on the Cable and
Wireless bid. I have not yet had a reply. We see this as a test
on how open the Japanese market really is," Thatcher said.
    Thatcher told Parliament that "shortly ... We shall have
more powers than we have now, when, for example the powers
under the Financial Services Act and the Banking Act become
available, then we shall be able to take action in cases where
other countries do not offer the same full access to financial
services as we do."
    Cable and Wireless is seeking a stake in the proposed
Japanese telecommunications rival to Kokusai Denshin Denwa.
    But the Japanese minister for post and telecommunications
was reported as saying that he opposed Cable and Wireless
having a managerial role in the new company.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10018>
Gould Inc said it has
completed the sale of its French battery business, Compagnie
Francaise D'Electro Chimie, to a group of investors including
the unit's employees and &lt;GNB Inc> of Minnesota.
    Gould did not disclose terms of the deal.
    Gould said the move is part of its previously announced
plan to divest assets unrelated to its computer and electronics
businesses.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10025>
First Wisconsin Corp said it
plans to acquire Shelard Bancshares Inc for about 25 mln dlrs
in cash, its first acquisition of a Minnesota-based bank.
    First Wisconsin said Shelard is the holding company for two
banks with total assets of 168 mln dlrs.
    First Wisconsin, which had assets at yearend of 7.1 billion
dlrs, said the Shelard purchase price is about 12 times the
1986 earnings of the bank.
    It said the two Shelard banks have a total of five offices
in the Minneapolis-St. Paul area.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10042>
&lt;Meridian Energy Inc> and Castone
Development Corp, a privately-held company, jointly announced
that they have decided to terminate the letter of intent under
which Meridian would have acquired Castone.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10049>
Federal Reserve Board Governor
Robert Heller said the banking system could be strengthened by
permitting formation of financial services holding companies
involved in areas like banking, insurance, real estate and
securities.
    In a speech prepared for delivery in New York to the Bank
and Financial Analysts' Association, Heller said, "I believe
that increased diversification along geographic and product
lines is the key to strengthening the American banking system."
    He said he supported the idea of financial services holding
companies advocated by the Association of Bank Holding
Companies in which regulation of various bank, thrift,
insurance, investment, securities and real estate subsidiaries
would be handled on functional lines.
    "Limits would be placed on the extension of credit by the
bank to the associated institutions, and all transactions would
have to be on an arms-length basis," Heller said.
    Measures would be necessary to avoid abuse of the banks'
special position by such holding companies or subsidiaries.
    Heller said he "would require the holding company to serve
as a 'source of strength' to the bank by making a commitment to
maintain the bank's capital.
    "In other words, the bank would not be allowed to fail as
long as the holding company has a positive net worth."
    Heller also said commercial enterprises should be permitted
to own a financial services holding company, again with the
provision that capital would flow to the financial enterprise
if necessary.
    Heller said the effects of these actions "would be banks
that are at least as strong as the corporations holding them" in
which customer deposits were assured while any incentive to
"loot the bank" was removed.
    Such diversification would give access to national and
international financial services to corporations across the
United States.
    Heller said that would mean "the steady decline of America's
banks in the world financial league tables would be arrested" by
permitting them to become more competitive.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10052>
Gould Inc said it sold its
French Battery unit, Cie Francaise d'Electro Chimie, to a group
of investors including the unit's employees and &lt;GNB Inc> of
Minnesota.
    Terms of the sale were not disclosed. The unit had 1986
sales of 65 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10058>
Fidelity National Financial
Inc said its Fidelity National Title Insurance Co subsidiary
acquired the operations of Safeco Title Insurance Co in the
northern California counties of Alameda, Contra Costa and San
Mateo.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10066>
Security Pacific Corp and
&lt;Users Inc>, a credit union data processing concern, said they
have mutually agreed to withdraw from further merger
negotiations.
    Users said that since it signed a letter of intent to merge
with Security in November, it has received a strong show of
support for continuing the credit union ownership of the
company with credit unions committing themselves to purchase
additional Users common.
    Users also said it is in the strongest financial position
in its 24-year history.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10071>
Dennison Manufacturing Co
said it has signed a letter of intent to sell its Dunn Paper Co
subsidiary to James River Corp &lt;JR> for an undisclosed amount
of cash, resulting in a first quarter charge against earnings.
    The company saiud the loss on the sale may be partly
reduced by contingent payments over the next five years and
will in the first quarter be more than offset by the gain from
the previously-announced sale of its Hygeia Sciences Inc
shares.
    Dunn had sales last year of about 65 mln dlrs.
    In Richmond, Va., James River said closing is expected by
the end of April, subject to approval by both boards and on the
reaching of satisfactory labor agreements.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10073>
The Pillsbury Co said it
filed a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange
Commission for the sale of limited partnership interests in a
second master limited partnership of its Burger King unit's
restaurant properties.
    Pillsbury said it expects the offering to yield 73-82 mln
dlrs, resulting in an after-tax gain of 20-23 mln dlrs.
    A spokesman for Pillsbury said the company is aiming to get
this after-tax gain in the fourth fiscal quarter ending in May.
    Pillsbury said the sale will occur as soon as practicable,
considering the business and legal contigencies.
    The company said Burger King and another Pillsbury unit,
QSV Properties, will be the master limited partnership's
general partner.
    Pillsbury said it expects the interests to be sold to
public investors and listed for trading on the New York Stock
Exchange.
    Merrill Lynch will lead the underwriting, Pillsbury said.
    Pillsbury first sold limited partnership interests in
Burger King Investors L.P. in February 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10078>
British Petroleum Co Plc does not
intend to raise the price of its planned 70 dlr per share offer
for the publicly held 45 pct of Standard Oil Co, BP Managing
Director David Simon said.
    "We don't seen this as any progressive bidding game," he
told reporters at a news conference. BP now owns 55 pct of
Standard's stock.
    Simon said BP had carefully considered the amount of its
planned bid and he quoted an oil analyst, whom he would not
identify, as saying BP's careful evaluation means the company
is not going to raise its offer.
    "I think that (an increase) would be totally wrong. I think
the price is very fair and it is much to early to speculate
about ligigation," he said. "Let's wait and see how the offer
runs."
    Another official declined to speculate under what
circumstances BP might raise its bid.
    The BP official said the 70 dlrs a share offer is 7.2 times
Standard's 1986 cash flow and 56 pct above an independent
evaluation of the company's assets, including the value of its
oil, natural gas liquids and natural gas reserves.
    He said the price Royal Dutch/Shell Group &lt;RD> &lt;SC> paid
for publicly held Shell Oil Co shares in 1985 was 5.1 times
cash flow.
    The BP official also said the 70 dlr bid is a 40 pct
premium over Standard's stock price over the past year.
    BP Group Treasurer Rodney Chase said more than half to as
much as two-third's of the 7.4 billion dlrs BP needs for its
offer will come from existing sources. The rest will be
financed by new debt.
    BP will draw in cash from its operating companies around
the world and is also arranging a five billion dlr line of
credit, he explained.
    The company's debt to equity ratio will rise 11 or 12
percentage points from the current 33 pct if the offer is
completed, Chase said. But the ratio will be back below 40 pct
within 12 months, he added.
    Chase also said 50 to 60 pct of Standard Oil's publicly
held shares are held by financial institutions.
    Simon said Standard's board was informed of the offer on
March nine and has been considering it since that time.
    He said BP does not expect any regulatory problems that
would delay completion of the acquisition. "We have informed
Washington of our intentions and we've already been an integral
part of ownership of U.S. oil reserves," he pointed out.
    Simon said there is a good chance that current world oil
prices of about 18 dlrs a barrel could be maintained, and that
the more stable market is due mostly to changes in policy in
Saudi Arabia and other OPEC members to control oil production.
    "We think there are signals that current conditions are
more favorable than they have been for sometime," Simon said.
    "We have hopes for greater stability, but we do not see
prices going much higher," he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10086>
Louisiana-Pacific Corp said it
plans to sell its sawmill in Lakeview, Oregon and 18,000 acres
of timberland to Ostrander Construction Co.
    The company said the transaciton shoould be finalized in
early April. Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10088>
Suburban Bancorp Inc said it
received approval from the Federal Reserve Board to acquire
&lt;Valley National Bank of Aurora> for an undisclosed price.
    Suburban said it has received shareholder tenders for 100
pct of Valley National's stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10098>
Fair Lanes Inc said its shareholders
approved the previously announced merger with Maricorp Inc, a
unit of &lt;Northern Pacific Corp>.
    Under terms of the merger, Fair Lanes said each of its
shares of common stock will be converted into the right to
receive 1.3043 shares of &lt;BTR Realty Inc>, which is owned by
Fair Lines.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10102>
CB and T Bancshares Inc said the
board of Carrolton State Bank of Carrolton, Ga., has approved a
merger into CB and T for an undisclosed amount of stock,
subject to approval by regulatory agencies and Carrolton
shareholders.
    Carrolton has 26 mln dlrs in assets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10106>
USX Corp chairman David Roderick said
the company had ended talks with British Petroleum Co Plc &lt;BP>
about the possible sale of some energy assets and said USX has
no immediate restructuring plans for its oil businesses.
    "We have terminated our discussions," Roderick told Reuters
after a speech to the Petroleum Equipment Suppliers Association
here. He said USX was not conducting talks with any other
possible buyer of its energy assets.
    Earlier today, BP said it planned to offer 70 dlrs per
share for the Standard Oil Co's &lt;SRD> publicly held stock.
    USX said in December the company had held formal
discussions with BP about the potential sale of some of its
overseas oil assets and USX had received expressions of
interest from a half dozen other oil companies.
    Roderick, in response to a question, said USX had no
immediate plans to restructure its Marathon Oil Co, or Texas
Oil and Gas Corp. He said USX also did not plan to sell any of
its 49 pct interest in the giant Yates Field in west Texas.
    "We want to maintain our production in the Yates Field
during these difficult times," Roderick added.
    In response to a question, Roderick also said he did not
know whether Australian investor Robert Holmes a Court was
accumulating USX stock. In recent days, traders have suggested
Holmes a Court was buying additional shares.
    Roderick said Carl Ichan, who terminated an eight billion
dlr hostile takeover plan for USX in January, continued to hold
a sizable interest in the company. "Mr. Ichan still apparently
has 11.4 pct. He hasn't bought any more stock or sold any,"
Roderick said. "He's a very satisfied shareholder right now. I
talk with him monthly."
    In his speech, Roderick predicted the fall in the value of
the dollar would set the stage for the U.S. to solve its trade
deficit problem which totaled 170 billion dlrs in 1986.
    "I expect by the early 1990s the U.S. will be running a net
trade surplus," Roderick said. "I think the worst is over and
we can look forward to stability and upward movement ahead."
    However, the USX chairman warned that European trading
partners may resist the turn in the U.S. trade deficit. "Some
economic discomfort must be transferred from the United States
to our friends, trading partners and allies."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10128>
First Financial Management Corp said it
acquired Confidata Corp, a unit of &lt;North Ridge Bank>, paying
500,000 dlrs in cash and pledging a guarantee on a 500,000 dlr
Confidata note held by North Ridge.
    First Financial, which provides data processing services to
community banks and other financial institutions, said the
acquisition will expand its customer base.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10129>
Combustion Engineering Inc said
its C-E Environmental Systems and Services Inc unit agreed in
principle to acquire &lt;E.C. Jordan and Co>, a privately held
firm based in Portland, Me.
    Terms of the acquisition were mot disclosed.
    Combustion Engineering said C-E Environmental, which
provides environmental sciences and management services, had
1986 sales of about 24 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10139>
Sources close to Italy's &lt;Gruppo
Ferruzzi> said &lt;European Sugar (France)>, a French company
owned by Ferruzzi, would take over control of &lt;CPC Industrial
Division>, the corn wet milling business acquired by the
Italian group earlier this week from CPC International Inc
&lt;CPC>.
    The sources told Reuters that European Sugar, owned by
Ferruzzi subsidiary Eridania Zuccherifici Nazionali SpA
&lt;ERDI.MI>, planned to seek a listing on the Paris bourse and
make a share offering there.
    CPC International announced Tuesday it had agreed in
principle to sell its European corn wet millng business to
Ferruzzi. The deal is worth 630 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10146>
Lomak Petroleum Inc and Strata
Corp, based in Columbus, Ohio, jointly said they entered into a
merger agreement for Strata to become a wholly owned subsidiary
of Lomak.
    Under the merger's terms, Strata shareholders will receive
5.7 cts per share of Strata common and warrants to buy about
.06 shares of Lomak common at 37.5 cts per share on or before
December 31, 1990, for each Strata common share.
    The merger is subject to approval by the companies' boards
and shareholders and agreement of certain Strata creditors,
among other things, said the companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10158>
Americanture Inc said it has
purchased American Adventure Inc &lt;GOAQC> for cash, the
assumption of liabilities and the issuance of American
Adventure Inc common and preferred stock to creditors,
shareholders and members.
    The acquisition was pursuant of a Chapter 11 reorganization
plan of American Adventure.
    The company said the transaction involved assets valued at
more than 83 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10168>
British Petroleum Co PLC may have to
raise its planned 70 dlrs a share tender offer for the publicly
traded shares of Standard Oil Co &lt;SRD>, analysts said.
    "There's a lot of speculation here that someway or other
they would be forced to come up with another bid," said Rosario
Ilaqua of L.F. Rothschild.
    And despite BP managing director David Simon's denial today
that BP would raise the offer, the analysts said that remained
a distinct possibility.
    Analysts said they base their thinking on Royal Dutch/Shell
Group's &lt;RD> &lt;SC> bid to buy the outstanding stake of Shell Oil
Co in 1984 and 1985. Royal Dutch/Shell eventually raised its
initial 55 dlrs a share offer to 60 dlrs a share, after
lawsuits by minority shareholders.
    "I think they're going to have to go a little higher
eventually, just as Royal Dutch/Shell had to go a little higher
for the Shell Oil minority shares," Bruce Lazier of Prescott
Ball and Turben said. He estimated a price of 75 dlrs a share.
    Royal Dutch/Shell offered 55 dlrs a share for the 30.5 pct
of Shell Oil it did not already own in January of 1984. After
objections from minority shareholders about the price, Royal
Dutch/Shell raised its bid and began a 58 dlrs a share tender
offer in April 1984.
    But shareholders sued and a court blocked completion of the
offer. After months of wrangling over the worth of Shell Oil,
Royal Dutch/Shell agreed to another two dlrs increase.
    It ended up paying 5.67 billion dlrs for the outstanding
Shell Oil stake, a significant premium to its original bid of
about 5.2 billion dlrs.
    The analysts made their comments before Simon's remarks at
a BP press conference in New York this afternoon.
    Sanford Margoshes of Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc told
clients this morning that a sweetened offer was possible. The
analyst said the bid could be raised by two dlrs a share.
    Analysts do not expect regulatory hurdles because of the
Royal Dutch/Shell group precedent. But there may be shareholder
lawsuits for the same reason, they said.
    Goldman Sachs and Co, BP's investment advisor, advised the
Shell Oil board in 1984 and 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10171>
Viacom International Inc said it set
April 6 as the record date for shareholders entitled to vote at
a special meeting to be held to vote on the proposed merger of
Arsenal Acquiring Corp, a wholly-owned subsidiary of &lt;Arsenal
Holdings Inc> into Viacom.
    It said the date of the special meeting has not yet been
determined.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10190>
Standard Oil Co expects the sale of
assets and federal tax refunds resulting from last year's loss
to add about one billion dlrs to its normal cash flows from
operations in 1987, its annual report said.
    Last year, the report noted, the cash flow from operations
dropped to 1.8 billion dlrs from 3.5 billion dlrs in 1985 and
3.2 billion dlrs in 1984 due principally to lower oil prices.
    The report, prepared before British Petroleum Co Plc &lt;BP>
disclosed plans to seek the rest of Standard's stock, put 1987
capital spending at 1.6 billion dlrs, down from the 1.7 billion
dlrs projected in January.
    Standard's capital spending totaled 1.77 billion dlrs in
1986.
    The report showed a decline in proven oil reserves to 2.41
billion barrels at the end of 1986 from 2.65 billion barrels a
year earlier as discoveries and other additions dropped to 11.4
mln barrels last year from 23.2 mln in 1985.
    But it said gas reeserves rose to 7.31 trillion cubic feet
from 7.22 trillion at the end of 1985 despite a 30.9 mln cubic
feet downward revision in previous reserve estimates during
1986. Discoveries and other additions totaled 200.5 billion
cubic feet last year, up from 175.9 billion in 1985, it added.
    Standard said both oil and gas production increased last
year -- to 726,600 barrels per day from 719,700 barrels the
previous day and to 154.4 mln cubic feet daily from 10.1 mln in
1985.
    But the average sales price of both dropped -- to 13.83
dlrs per barrel from 26.43 dlrs for oil in 1985 and to 1.49
dlrs per thousand cubic feet from 2.18 dlrs a year earlier.
    Standard said its refined product sales also rose last
year, to 644,500 barrels per day from 604,200 barrels daily in
1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10213>
Chicago real estate developer
Leonard Chavin told the Securities and Exchange Commission he
had raised his stake in the L.E. Meyers Co Group to 11 pct from
9.7 pct.
    He also said an investment banker repesenting him met with
Myers' officers, telling them of his plans for a takeover and
that he may solicit proxies for a seat on Myers' board.
    Chavin also said if he takes control of the firm, it could
result in delisting Meyers' from the New York Stock Exchange.
    He told the SEC that while he is trying to buy or acquire
the firm, he still may only hold the shares for an investment.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10218>
Honeywell Inc said its total debt
rose by more than 85 pct in 1986, mainly due to its 1.02
billion dlr acquisition of the Sperry Aerospace Group.
    At yearend, according to the company's 1986 annual report,
Honeywell's total debt stood at 1.44 billion dlrs, compared
with 776.6 mln dlrs in 1985.
    Honeywell said that if it had acquired the Sperry unit at
the beginning of 1986, its loss for the full year would have
been 9.88 dlrs a share.
    Honeywell's actual loss in 1986 was 8.33 dlrs a share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10219>
McIntyre Mines Ltd said it completed
the previously announced sale of all shares of wholly owned
Smoky River Coal Ltd and certain related assets to Smoky River
Holdings Ltd for a nominal cash consideration.
    McIntyre did not specify the cash amount of the sale.
    Smoky River Holdings is an Alberta company controlled by
Michael Henson, former president and chief executive of
McIntyre, the company said.
    McIntyre said it retained an unspecified royalty interest
in Smoky River Coal based on net operating cash flows from the
company's coal properties.
    McIntyre also said it provided a three mln dlr last
recourse letter of credit to the Alberta government for Smoky
River Coal's reclamation obligations.
    The credit letter expires either when Smoky River completes
three mln dlrs of reclaiming activities or December 31, 1992,
which ever occurs first.
    McIntyre said it also remains contingently liable for
certain obligations now totalling about seven mln dlrs, which
will reduce over time as Smoky River continues to operate.
    McIntyre's principal asset continues to be its 14 pct
interest in Falconbridge Ltd &lt;FALCF>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10224>
A multinational shareholder group
told the Securities and Exchange Commission it increased its
stake in Scandinavia Fund Inc to 35.5 pct, from 30.5 pct.
    The investors include Ingemar Rydin Industritillbehor AB,
of Sweden, and VBI Corp, of the West Indies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10238>
CTC Dealer Holdings Ltd said it would
appeal a previously reported Ontario court ruling upholding an
Ontario Securities Commission decision to block CTC's bid for
49 pct of &lt;Canadian Tire Corp Ltd> common shares.
    CTC, a group of Canadian Tire dealers, added that it also
extended its tender offer to March 31 and was seeking approval
to extend its bid while the appeal court heard the case.
    It said Alfred and David Billes, two of Canadian Tire's
controlling shareholders, backed the appeal and would seek
leave to appeal while third controlling shareholder Martha
Billes supported the appeal but would not join an appeal
motion.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10310>
Mitsubishi Corp &lt;MITT.TOK> said it has
taken a 25 pct stake worth five mln krone in &lt;Danish Dairy
Farms Ltd> and will jointly market its produce from April.
    The company was set up last year by three major Danish
livestock cooperative federations to expand markets for their
dairy products, a Mitsubishi official said.
    This is the first time a Japanese trading house has traded
non-Japanese dairy products in the world market, he said.
    He said Mitsubishi expects the Danish company's annual
sales to be 10 billion yen in its first year, from April 1.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10311>
Japan has sought to assure the U.S. It is
not trying to keep foreign equity in a new Japanese
international telecommunications company below the legal limit
of 33 pct, a Post and Telecommunications ministry official
said.
    In a letter sent yesterday, Postal Minister Shunjiro
Karasawa told U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige that the
ministry does not object to foreign participation by those U.S.
Firms that have expressed interest.
    But it does oppose any foreign international
telecommunications carrier having a management role, he said.
    The move appears to be an effort to dampen U.S. Opposition
to the planned merger of two rival firms seeking to compete
with the current monopoly &lt;Kokusai Denwa Denshin Co Ltd>, and
to reduce the share held in any KDD rival by U.K.'s Cable and
Wireless Plc &lt;CAWL.L>, industry analysts and diplomats said.
    One of the rival firms, &lt;International Telecom Japan Inc>
(ITJ) has offered a stake in the company to eight U.S. Firms
including General Electric Co &lt;GE>, Ford Motor Co &lt;F> and
Citibank NA &lt;CCI), and two European companies, ITJ president
Nobuo Ito said yesterday.
    Cable and Wireless holds a 20 pct share in a second
potential KDD rival, &lt;International Digital Communications
Planning Inc>, along with &lt;C Itoh and Co>. Merrill Lynch and Co
Inc &lt;MER> and Pacific Telesis International Inc &lt;PAC>, both of
the U.S., Hold three and 10 pct shares respectively.
    The Post and Telecommunications Ministry has urged the
merger of the two firms because it says the market can only
support a single KDD competitor.
    It has also rejected management participation by an
international common carrier, such as Cable and Wireless,
arguing no international precedent for such a stake exists.
    Cable and Wireless Director of Corporate Strategy, Jonathan
Solomon, yesterday again told ministry officials he opposes a
merger proposal that would limit Cable and Wireless' share to
less than three pct and total foreign participation to about 20
pct, the ministry official said.
    Channeling the U.S. Firms into a single merged competitor
would most probably result in diluting Cable and Wireless'
share, industry analysts said.
    "Eventually the ministry will get what it wants -- one
combined competitor," Bache Securities (Japan) Ltd analyst
Darrell Whitten said.
    "Political ... Leverage may get the total foreign share up
to a certain amount, but you won't find any one company with an
extraordinarily large holding," Whitten said.
    Western diplomatic sources were more blunt.
    "They (the ministry) don't want to see Cable and Wireless
with a reasonable share and they think of all sorts of
strategies to reduce that share," one said.
    Fumio Watanabe, a senior Keidanren (a leading business
organization) official who has been trying to arrange the
merger, will present a new outline of his proposal on Thursday,
the ministry official said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10313>
&lt;Northern Star Holdings Ltd> said
Britain's &lt;Associated Newspapers Holdings Plc> will hold 9.99
pct of its enlarged issued capital after applying to acquire
15.9 mln shares in its recently announced placement.
    Associated was one of the major investors participating in
the previously reported placement of 128.9 mln shares at 3.75
dlrs each, Northern Star said in a statement.
    The northern New South Wales regional group is emerging as
a national media force in the wake of the industry
restructuring sparked by the News Corp Ltd &lt;NCPA.S> takeover of
the Herald and Weekly Times Ltd &lt;HWTA.S> group.
    Associated now holds 3.3 pct of Northern Star's current
issued capital, a company official said.
    As previously reported, Northern Star is raising 623 mln
dlrs through placements and a subsequent one-for-four rights
issue at 2.95 dlrs a share.
    Of the placements, 56.9 mln shares will go to a number of
investors and 72 mln to investment group &lt;Westfield Capital
Corp Ltd>, which arranged Northern Star's purchase of News
Corp's television assets, three newspapers and three radio
stations for 842 mln dlrs. Westfield will increase its stake in
Northern Star to about 45 pct from 20 as a result.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10335>
Alcan Australia Ltd &lt;AL.S> said it will
make a 39.3 mln N.Z. Dlr cash bid for all the issued shares of
&lt;Alcan New Zealand Ltd> at 1.80 N.Z. Dlrs each with a
four-for-three share alternative.
    Both are 70 pct owned by Canada's Alcan Aluminium Ltd &lt;AL>
which will take the share swap option, Alcan Australia deputy
chairman Jeremy Davis said in a statement. The remainder of
Alcan New Zealand's totalled issued 21.84 mln shares are
broadly held while Alcan Australia's are primarily held by
institutions. Alcan NZ last traded at 1.55 NZ dlrs, while Alcan
Australia today ended four cents down at 1.15 dlrs.
    Davis said the offer, which is subject to approval by the
New Zealand Overseas Investment Commission, was a response to
the integration of the two countries' markets under the
Australia-New Zealand Closer Economic Relations treaty.
    Alcan New Zealand shareholders who accept the offer would
also receive the final dividend of 10 cents a share normally
payable on May 27.
    Alcan Australia would invite New Zealand representation to
its board and would apply to list its shares on the New Zealand
Stock exchange, Davis said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10348>
Applied chemicals group Henkel KGaA
&lt;HNKG.F> said it is selling its Hamburg vegetable oil and fats
subsidiary Noblee und Thoerl GmbH to Oelmuehle Hamburg AG.
    A company spokesman declined to give the purchase price.
Noblee, a supplier of specialised refined oils and fats to the
food processing industry, had turnover of 161 mln marks last
year.
    A Henkel statement said the divestment was part of the
company's strategy of concentrating on its core businesses. For
Oelmuehle, the acquisition of Noblee means access to new
markets, the statement added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10361>
&lt;Brierley Investments Ltd> (BIL)
launched a full takeover bid for the supermarket group
&lt;Progressive Enterprises Ltd> at 4.35 dlrs a share.
    BIL said in a statement the offer is conditional on minimum
acceptances totalling 30 mln shares, just under 25 pct of the
120.4 mln Progressive shares on issue.
    Progressive is currently involved in a proposed merger with
&lt;Rainbow Corp Ltd>. Rainbow earlier this week raised its stake
in Progressive to 52 pct. BIL opposes the Rainbow merger and
analysts say BIL needs a 25 pct stake in Progressive to prevent
it occurring.
    The merger involves shareholders in Progressive and Rainbow
both receiving shares in a new company &lt;Astral Pacific Corp
Ltd> on a one-for-one exchange basis.
    The BIL bid is higher than the 4.20 dlrs BIL said it would
offer when it first announced on Monday it would make a full
bid for Progressive, and it follows much public debate between
BIL and Rainbow.
    BIL Chief Executive Paul Collins said last week that he
opposes the Rainbow/Progressive merger because BIL sees
Progressive shares as being worth twice as much as Rainbow's.
BIL has not disclosed how many Progressive shares it holds.
    Rainbow has said the merger is soundly based. Chairman
Allan Hawkins said last week that BIL's actions were aimed only
at dirsrupting the merger and were not in the interests of
Progressive shareholders.
    Both Rainbow's and Progressive's boards have approved the
merger proposal. It has also been approved by the Commerce
Commission, but BIL's bid is still subject to the Commission's
scrutiny.
    Progressive shares ended at 4.35 dlrs, Rainbow at 3.42 and
BIL at 4.17 at the close of New Zealand Stock Exchange trading
today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10371>
&lt;Union Miniere SA> said in a statement
that it has acquired an eight pct interest in Pancontinental
Mining Ltd &lt;PANA.S> for a sum equivalent to 1.2 billion Belgian
francs.
    Pancontinental operates gold and coal mines in Australia
and natural gas and oil fields in Canada.
    Union Miniere said the location of its interest within the
Pancontinental group will be decided later. It did not
elaborate.
    Union Miniere is a wholly owned subsidiary of Societe
Generale de Belgique &lt;BELB.BR>.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10404>
&lt;Dixons Group Plc> said it bought
about 2,445,000 Cyclops Corp common shares, boosting its
holdings of the company's stock to about 83 pct of those now
outstanding and 79 pct on a fully diluted basis.
    Dixons said the stock was purchased in a single block
transaction at 95 dlrs per share.
    The company said it expects to proceed with a merger and
has advised Cyclops it intends to increas the per-share amount
to be paid in the merger to 95 dlrs, form 90.25 dlrs, for each
of the about 880,000 remaining Cyclops shares outstanding on a
fully diluted basis.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10414>
Metropolitan Financial Corp said it
signed an agreement to acquire the stock of closely held
Rothschild Financial Corp, St. Paul, Minn.
    Details of the purchase were withheld.
    It said Rothschild in 1986 originated 500 mln dlrs of
mortgage loans, and its loan servicing portfolio stands at 1.4
billion dlrs. Officials of both companies estimated their
combined efforts could produce originations of 800 mln dlrs and
a loan servicing portfolio "well over 2.0 billion dlrs by
yearend."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10419>
Hanson Trust Plc &lt;HAN> said its U.S.
subsidiary, Hanson Industries, sold PCR Inc, a specialty
chemicals unit, for 6.25 mln dlrs in cash to &lt;Chemical Partners
Inc>.
    Hanson Industries said it acquired PCR Inc in 1986 as part
of its purchase of &lt;SCM Corp>.
    PCR Inc posted an operating loss in 1986 of 381,000 dlrs on
sales of 13.2 mln dlrs, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10423>
&lt;Elders IXL Ltd>, of Australia, said
wholly owned IXL Holdings Canada Inc extended its previously
announced offer to acquire all outstanding shares of Carling
O'Keefe Ltd to midnight April 23, 1987, from March 25.
    The 18-dlr-a-share offer is being extended for Elders to
obtain Canadian federal government approval for the acquisition
of control of Carling. Elders said its application to
Investment Canada is still being processed under normal review
procedures.
    Up to March 26, 19,962,000 shares or 92 pct of Carling's
stock has been deposited under the offer, Elders said.
    Elders also said it arranged for a credit facility of up to
390 mln dlrs, shared equally between two Canadian banks, which
would be available to acquire shares under the offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10429>
Multivest Corp said it has ended talks
on &lt;Oryx Capital Corp>'s possible acqusition of Multivest and
is starting an offer of 1.51 dlrs a share for all the
oustanding shares of &lt;T.B.C. Industries Inc>.
    Multivest said its T.B.C. tender offer is scheduled to
expire April 30.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10434>
Restaurant Associates Industries Inc
said it expects to record a pretax gain of 3.3 mln dlrs in the
first quarter from the sale and lease of real estate.
    The company said it received a 2.5 mln dlrs partial payment
in connection with the sale of property in Manhattan and an
additional one mln dlrs for early termination of the lease for
its headquarters, which was relocated in February.
    The outstanding balance of about 8.5 mln dlrs on the sale
of the property will be paid at closing scheduled for Sept 28,
1987, it said.
    In the first quarter ended March 31, 1986, Restaurant
Associates reported net income of 313,000 dlrs or seven cts a
share on sales of 40.8 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10435>
&lt;Hudson's Bay Co> said it signed a
letter of intent to sell its Hudson's Bay Wholesale unit to a
private investment group. Terms were not disclosed.
    The company said Normal Paul, a member of the private
investment group, will head Hudson's Bay Wholesale management.
    The unit's existing management group, headed by Ron
McArthur, will also participate in ownership, the company said
without elaborating.
    The wholesale unit is a major distributor of tobacco,
confectionary and other products through 34 wholesale and 28
vending branches in Canada. 1986 sales were 798 mln dlrs.
    Hudson's Bay said the sale of its wholesaling unit is part
of a program to concentrate financial and management resources
on its core business of department stores and real estate.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10442>
Safety-Kleen Corp said it agreed in
principle to acquire McKesson Envirosystems Co, a subsidiary of
McKesson Corp.
    It said McKesson Envirosystems' current annual gross
revenues are about 14 mln dlrs.
    The company collects flammable solvents from its industrial
customers for a fee, after which it analyzes and processes the
solvents before they are burned.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10446>
Clearwater Fine Foods Inc, a Canadian
company minority owned by Hillsdown Holdings PLC of London, has
acquired Channel Foods Ltd, a Cornwall, England producer of
chilled smoke fish and pate products, Hillsdown said.
    Privately held Clearwater was sold for three mln stg, the
company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10453>
Hanson Trust Plc &lt;HNSN.L> said its U.S.
Subsidiary, Hanson Industries Inc, is to sell PCR Inc, a
speciality chemicals unit, for 6.25 mln dlrs cash to &lt;Chemical
Partners Inc>.
    PCR had sales of 13.2 mln dlrs in fiscal 1986 and an
operating loss of 381,000 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10458>
LSB Industries Inc said it agreed
to acquire Northwest Federal Savings and Loan Association for
1,500,000 dlrs.
    As part of the agreement, LSB said it also would transfer
assets valued of not less than 30 mln dlrs to Northwest
Federal, which is located in Woodward, Okla.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10462>
Investor Paul Bilzerian disclosed he
holds a 7.2 pct stake in Pay 'N Pak Stores Inc common stock and
is considering seeking control of the retail building material
firm.
    Bilzerian said he and a Tampa, Fla., investment firm he
controls called Bicoastal Financial Corp "may acquire additional
shares, or they may seek to acquire one or more positions on
(Pay 'N Pak's) Board of directors or to acquire a controlling
interest in the (company's) shares, by tender offer or
otherwise." The statement was made in a filing with the
Securities and Exchange Commission.
    Bilzerian said his course of action would depend on the
company's prospects, market conditions and other factors.
    Bilzerian said he and Bicoastal made net purchases of
515,600 shares on the New York Stock Exchange Jan 26-March 25.
    His 7.2 pct stake makes up a total of 722,000 shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10467>
Allegheny International Inc
said it sold three overseas subsidiaries to Reil Corp Ltd, a
North Sydney, Australia, investment group.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    The units sold were Sunbeam Corp Ltd Australia, Sunbeam New
Zealand Ltd and Victa (U.K.) Ltd. The units make and distribute
various products, including lawn mowers, small appliances and
sheep shearing equipment. They employ a total of about 1,750.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10473>
Honeywell Inc said it has
completed the sale of 57.5 pct of its Honeywell Information
Systems &lt;HIS> computer business to &lt;Compagnie des Machines
Bull> of France and &lt;NEC Corp> of Japan for 527 mln dlrs in
cash.
    Honeywell said it will use much of the money to reduce
short-term debt incurred last December when the company
purchased the Sperry Aerospace Group.
    Honeywell said the sale of HIS has created a new dedicated
computer company jointly owned by Bull, NEC and Honeywell.
    The new privately held company, named Honeywell Bull, is
42.5 pct owned by Honeywell Inc, 42.5 pct by Bull and 15 pct by
NEC, the new company said.
    Honeywell added that terms of the agreement with NEC and
Bull allow it to reduce its current 42.5 pct stake in the new
company to 19.9 pct at the end of 1988 by selling just over
half its shares to Bull. Book value at the time will determine
the move's pricing, Honeywell said.
    Honeywell chairman and chief executive officer, Edson
Spencer, said the move is the last major step in Honeywell's
restructuring.
    "As the leading worldwide supplier of of automation and
controls for buildings, industry, aerospace and defense,
Honeywell is now focusing its management, technical and
financial resources on high market share business," Spencer
said.
    Honeywell said it expects to be Honeywell Bull's largest
customer, purchasing computers for its own internal data
processing, for integration into Honeywell buidling and
industrial automation systems and for resale to the U.S.
governement.
    Honeywell said HIS's Federal Systems Division is now a
wholly owned unit of Honeywell Inc, and has been named
Honeywell Federal Systems Inc.
    Honeywell said it accounted for HIS as a discontinued
operation in 1986, and will account for its future interest on
a cost basis, recording any dividends as received.
    Honeywell Bull said it will continue to develop its product
line and build its business in integrated systems for
networking, database management and transaction processing.
    The new company said its board will have nine members,
including the chairman and chief executive officer.
    Bull will have four members, Honeywell two and NEC one, the
new company, which began worldwide operations today, said.
    It added that Jacques Stern, Bull's chairman and chief
executive officer, will serve as Honeywell Bull's chairman of
the board, while Jerome Meyer, formerly executive vice
president of Honeywell Information Systems, was named president
and chief executive officer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10508>
&lt;Southam Inc> said it agreed to sell
its 49 pct interest in Sun Publishing Co Ltd, which publishes
The Brandon Sun, to majority shareholder publisher Lewis D.
Whitehead.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Southam said the proposed sale resulted from an offer made
by Whitehead, whose family has had majority control of the
newspaper since 1905.
    The Brandon Sun has daily circulation of 19,100.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10518>
First Sarasota Bancorp said
its shareholders approved the acquisition of its City
Commercial Bank subsidiary by First Union Corp's &lt;FUNC> First
Union National Bank of Florida.
    The purchase price of the outstanding shares is about 8.6
mln dlrs.
    The transaction, subject to regulatory approval, is
expected to be completed during the second quarter of 1987.
    After completing the City Commercial acquisition and four
other acquisitions having combined assets of 248 mln dlrs,
First Union will have assets of 28.6 billion dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10527>
LSB Industries Inc said it
entered into an agreement to acquire Northwest Federal Savings
and Loan Association of Woodward, Oklahoma.
    Upon completion of the acquisition, LSB would pay about 1.5
mln dlrs to the shareholders of Northwest and transfer to
Northwest Federal certain assets having a net current appraised
value of not less than 30 mln dlrs.
    At completion of this transaction, Northwest Federal would
be a subsidiary of LSB's non-consolidated wholly-owned
financial subsidiary.
    The acquisition is subject to obtaining approvals, waivers
and forbearances from the Federal Home Loan Bank Board and
other government approvals.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10541>
&lt;Plaza Group> said it completed a
transaction in which it merged its wholly owned subsidiary,
Flyfaire International Inc, into Shefra Inc, a public company,
in return for a controlling interest in Shefra.
    With completion of the merger, Shefra changed its name to
Flyfaire International Inc.
    Flyfaire, with annual sales of 100 mln dlrs, is engaged in
the wholesale vacation travel business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10551>
Hanson Industries, the U.S. arm of
Hanson Trust PLC, said contracts have been exchanged in London
for the sale of Bond's Delivery Service to Rockwood Holdings
PLC for about 6.0 mln dlrs in cash.
    Completion is subject to Rockwood shareholder approval.
    In its most recent financial year, Bond's which was
purchased
by Hanson Trust Plc in its acquisition of Imperial Group PLC in
April 1986, made 960,000 dlrs pre-tax profit on sales of 13.6
mln dlrs.
    Net tangible assets are 5.2 mln dlrs, Hanson said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10555>
Westinghouse Electric Corp &lt;WX> said
it is still open to a merger of its radio operations with
General Electrics Co's &lt;GE> NBC radio operations.
    "We have left the door open and GE is reassessing the
merger and so are we," Westinghouse chairman Douglas Danforth
told Reuters at the conclusion of a meeting before analysts.
    Danforth said he continues to see value in a merger between
Westinghouse's radio operation and those of NBC. 
    Discussions with NBC on the merger of the two companies'
radio units were suspended in December.
    Danforth reaffirmed that Westinghouse is interested in
acquisitions, saying the company is leaning toward acquisitions
in the 300 mln to 500 mln dlr range. He said, however, that
larger acquisitions are possible if they are the right fit.
    Danforth, who earlier today said he expects earnings growth
in the double-digit range through 1989, said he is comfortable
with analysts' predictions of 4.80 dlrs to 5.30 dlrs a share
this year. In 1986 the company earned 4.42 dlrs a share.
    He said the company has targeted waste energy systems and
hazardous waste removal, as some of the emerging growth areas
for the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10563>
Finance Minister Edouard Balladur,
Industry Minister Alain Madelin and Telecommunications Minister
Gerard Longuet met for more than an hour today to discuss the
imminent sale of the French telephone switching group &lt;Cie
Generale de Constructions Telephoniques>, a spokesman for
Longuet said.
    No decision was announced as a result of the meeting, and
the French government has given itself until the end of next
month to choose between the candidates.
    The sale of CGCT, which controls 16 pct of France's
telephone market, has been priced at 500 mln francs, and three
international consortia are battling for the right to buy it.
    West Germany's Siemens AG &lt;SIEG.F> has teamed up with the
French group Jeumont-Schneider, in opposition to a bid from the
U.S. Group ATT &lt;T.N> and the Dutch Philips Telecommunications
BV &lt;PGLO.AS> in association with the French telecommunications
firm SAT &lt;Societe Anonyme de Telecommunications>.
    A third bid has been lodged by Sweden's AB LM Ericsson
&lt;ERIC.ST>, allied with French defence electronics group Matra
&lt;MATR.PA> and Bouygues SA &lt;BOUY.PA>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10582>
McLean Industries Inc said its
two shipping subsidiaries -- UNITED States Lines Inc and United
States Lines (S.A.) Inc -- have agreed in principle to dispose
of substantially all their remaining operating shipping assets.
    The units have been operating under protection of Chapter
11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code since last November.
    McLean said U.S. Lines has a letter of intent with CSX
Corp's &lt;CSX> Sea-Land Corp subsidiary to transfer assets of its
Transpacific/Hawaii/Guam Service to Sea-Land.
    McLean said Sea-Land has tentatively agreed to pay 125 mln
dlrs for six vessels, certain port facilities, and various
other equipment used in U.S. Lines' Transpacific service and
theree Lancer class vessels and subsidy rights owned by the two
McLean subsidiaries.
    As previously announced, U.S. Lines (S.A.) will transfer
its South American Service to &lt;Crowley Maritime Corp>'s
American Transport Lines Inc subsidiary in return for a fixed
lease payment for the four Lancer class vessels and a
participation based on American Transport's South American
revenues.
    McLean said the agreement also calls for Crowley to release
U.S. Lines (S.A.) for any damages and unpaid charter hire for
three vessels leased to U.S. Lines (S.A.) by Crowley which have
been returned to Crowley.
    McLean said the minimum lease payments will be seven mln
dlrs and estimated revenue participation during the first four
years at about 16 mln dlrs. In addition, U.S. Lines (S.A.)
subsidiaries in Brazil and Argentina will be sold to American
Transport.
    The company said both agreements in principle have been
approved by directors of the companies involved, but still need
court, regulatory and lender approval.
    McLean said it is requesting the bankruptcy court to
schedule a hearing on its motion to approve the agreements,
adding that the court has granted the company's request to
extend for 90 days the period for the shipping companies to
file a proposed plan of reorganization.
    It said the planned transactions will leave McLean with no
significant shipping assets except 12 New York class vessels,
which are not in operation and are expected to be sold.
    McLean said its shipping units are returning the vessels
operating in foreign commerce to United States ports to permit
the planned transfer to purchasers.
    The company said U.S. Lines will maintain its weekly
service from the U.S. West Coast to Hawaii and Guam until the
vessels are transferred and the transaction is completed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10596>
Corning Glass Works said it
bought a 50 pct interest in Technology Dynamics Inc, a
Woodinville, Wash., company involved in research and
development of fiber-optic sensors.
    The purchase price was not disclosed.
    Privately held Technology Dynamics plans to introduce its
first line of fiber-optic sensors later this year, Corning
Glass said.
  
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10674>
&lt;BTR Nylex Ltd> said it will increase
its takeover offer for Borg-Warner Corp's &lt;BOR> listed unit,
&lt;Borg-Warner (Australia) Ltd> (BWA) to five dlrs each from four
dlrs for all issued ordinary and preference shares.
    The new offer values the diversified auto parts
manufacturer's 27.22 mln ordinary shares and 13.22 mln first
participating preference shares at 202.2 mln dlrs.
    Formal documents will be sent to shareholders as soon as
possible, it said in a brief statement.
    BTR Nylex, which manufactures rubber and plastic products,
first bid for BWA in late January.
    As previously reported, Borg-Warner Corp, which owns 65 pct
of BWA's ordinary shares and 100 pct of the preferences,
advised a month ago that it would not accept the offer.
    This meant BTR Nylex's 50.1 pct acceptance condition could
not be met, BWA said in a statement reporting its parent's
decision.
    BWA advised shareholders to ignore the offer and said other
parties had expressed interest in bidding for it.
    But no other bid has yet emerged.
    BTR Nylex is a 59.5 pct-owned listed subsidiary of
Britain's BTR Plc &lt;BTRX.LON>.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10676>
An investor group trying to acquire
GenCorp Inc said it would move to unseat the board of directors
and take other action if GenCorp refuses to discuss a 2.3
billion dlr takeover bid.
    General Acquisition Co, a partnership of Wagner and Brown
and AFG Industries Inc &lt;AFG>, reiterated in a statement sent to
GenCorp on Friday that it was willing to negotiate its earlier
offer of 100 dlrs a share for the tire, broadcasting, plastics
and aerospace conglomerate.
    Analysts have speculated GenCorp could fetch at least 110
to 120 dlrs per share if broken up.
    GenCorp officials declined to comment on the statement, but
a spokesman reiterated a request to shareholders to wait until
the board renders an opinion before making a decision on the
offer. GenCorp has said a statement would be made on or before
the company's annual meeting on Tuesday.
    General Acquisition said the board could not carry out its
duties to shareholders and make an informed decision until it
has, "... Explored with us the ways in which our offer can be
revised to provide greater value to your shareholders."
    General Acquisition added it was aware the board may be
reviewing alternative transactions, which might provide GenCorp
shareholders with a payment other than cash.
    "If that is the case, you should recognise that our
additional equity capital may very well enable us to offer cash
and securities having greater value than GenCorp could provide
in any similarly structured transaction," it said.
    It added GenCorp's board had an obligation to present any
alternative proposal to shareholders in a way that allowed
competing offers.
    General Acquisition requested it be given a chance to bid
on a competitive and fair basis before any final decision was
made on any other buyout proposal.
    The statement repeated the request GenCorp remove a "poison
pill" preferred share purchase rights to shareholders, making
any takeover more expensive.
    It said it might take legal action, or seek the support of
shareholders in calling a special meeting to replace the board
and consider other proposals.
    GenCorp should not accept any other proposal containing
defensive features, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10694>
Woolworth Holdings Plc &lt;WLUK.L> said it
would make a 244 mln stg agreed bid for &lt;Superdrug Stores Plc>
valuing the company's shares at about 696p each.
    The offer would be made on the basis of 17 new Woolworth
ordinary shares for every 20 in Superdrug.
    Woolworth said it had received acceptances from the holders
of 61 pct of Superdrug shares.
    The bid is Woolworth's second attempt in recent months to
acquire a retail chemist chain. Earlier this year it negotiated
a possible bid for &lt;Underwoods Plc> buit the talks were broken
off two weeks ago.
    Full acceptance of the offer would involve the issue of
about 29.8 mln new Woolworth shares, or 14 pct of the enlarged
share capital. A cash alternative would offer 646p for each
share in Superdrug. Members of the Goldstein family have
accepted the offer for 11.7 mln shares, which have not been
underwritten.
    Another major shareholder, Rite Aid Corp's Rite Investments
Corp unit, had accepted the offer for 9.9 mln shares, and would
take the cash alternative for 9.0 mln of these.
    In the year to end-January, Woolworth reported pretax
profits sharply higher at 115.3 mln stg after 81.3 mln
previously.
    In the year to end-February, Superdrug reported pretax
profits of 12.26 mln after 10.36 mln previously on turnover
that rose to 202.9 mln from 164.3 mln. Superdrug shares firmed
to 670p from 480p on Friday. Woolworth eased to 813p from 830p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10714>
Tesco Plc &lt;TSCO.L> said &lt;County Bank
Ltd> had bought 165,000 shares in &lt;Hillards Plc> on its behalf,
increasing its stake to 5.4 pct. The shares were bought at
313.25p each.
    Tesco is making an opposed 151 mln stg bid for Hillards.
    Hillards shares at 0900 GMT were quoted one penny firmer at
317p while Tesco was one penny easier at 479p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10721>
Sweden's Wallenberg group said it
raised its holding in telecommunications maker Telefon AB L.M.
Ericsson &lt;eric.St.> to 37.5 of the voting rights from 28.9 pct.
    The move by the Knut and Alice Wallenberg Foundation, one
of the institutions at the core of the group of companies
formed by the late industrialist Marcus Wallenberg, further
consolidated group control over one of its key firms, analysts
said.
    The foundation now controls 14.1 pct of Ericsson's voting
rights with 22.3 pct held by the group's investment companies
&lt;AB Investor> and &lt;Forvaltnings AB Providentia>.
    The move comes after the Wallenberg group fought off a
hostile takeover bid earlier this month for match and packaging
conglomerate Swedish Match AB &lt;smbs.St> from arms and chemical
concern Nobel Industrier AB &lt;NOBL.ST> by increasing its stake
in Swedish Match to 85 pct from 33 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10744>
Mannesmann AG &lt;MMWG.F> said it has
reached a series of agreements giving it an indirect majority
stake in the &lt;Fichtel und Sachs AG> car parts group.
    The takeover is contingent on approval from the Federal
Cartel Office in West Berlin, a spokesman said, adding that
Mannesmann was confident the authorities would not block the
purchase.
    Mannesmann is buying 75 pct of &lt;MEC Sachs
Vermoegensholding> which owns 37.5 pct of Sachs AG, which in
turn holds 96.5 pct of Fichtel und Sachs. The MEC shares will
be bought from the granddaughters of the firm's founder.
    Mannesmann is also purchasing a 25.01 pct stake in Fichtel
und Sachs from Commerzbank AG &lt;CBKG.F> and has an option to buy
the bank's remaining 10 pct stake, a company statement said.
    In addition to these firm agreements, Mannesmann is also
talking with the state-owned steel group Salzgitter AG
 &lt;SALG.H> on buying its 24.98 pct stake in Fichtel und Sachs.
 This would give Mannesmann around 75 pct of Fichtel und Sachs.
    Salzgitter said it decided to give up its own original
plans to seek a majority stake in Sachs after holding talks
with the government in Bonn.
    Earlier this month Mannesmann disclosed that it might want
a majority stake in Sachs after previously saying it was
seeking to buy only a minority holding in the company, which
has annual turnover of 2.2 billion marks and employs 17,000.
    The acquisition is part of Mannesmann's efforts to
diversify into high-technology areas and away from its previous
reliance on steel and pipe-making. More
    A spokesman for the Federal Statistics Office later said
the anti-cartel authorities would probably rule on the takeover
in the new few weeks.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10768>
Belgian starch manufacturer &lt;Amylum NV>
is surprised and disappointed that its 675 mln dlr offer for
the European business of CPC International Inc &lt;CPC.N> was
apparently rejected in favour of a lower 630 mln dlr bid by
Italy's &lt;Gruppo Ferruzzi>, chairman Pierre Callebaut said.
    Callebaut told Reuters that Amylum, a leading starch and
isoglucose manufacturer in which Britain's Tate and Lyle Plc
&lt;TATL.L> holds a 33.3 pct stake, had made an undisclosed
initial takeover offer for CPC's European corn wet milling
business by the close of CPC's tender on March 17.
    The offer was raised on March 24 to a final 675 mln dlrs in
cash after CPC told Amylum its initial bid was below Ferruzzi's
630 mln stg offer, Callebaut said.
    On the same day, CPC announced it had agreed in principle
to sell its European business to Ferruzzi in a 630 mln dlr
deal.
    Noting that Ferruzzi was studying a public offering of
shares in its unit &lt;European Sugar (France)> to fund the CPC
takeover, Callebaut said Amylum may still succeed in its bid.
    "For the time being we just await developments. But I note
that whereas our higher offer was in cash, Ferruzzi apparently
is still organising finance," Callebaut said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10784>
An investor partnership, seeking to
acquire GenCorp Inc, said it would attempt to unseat the
company's board of directors and take other hostile actions if
the firm refuses to discuss its 2.3 billion dlr takeover bid.
    General Acquisition Co, comprising investors Wagner and
Brown and glass-maker AFG Industries, also reiterated its
willingness to negotiate with Gencorp.
    The partnership has earlier offered 100 dlrs per share for
GenCorp -- a tire, broadcasting, plastics and aerospace
conglommerate.
    Analysts have speculated that GenCorp, on a break-up basis,
could fetch more than 110 to 120 dlrs per share.
    GenCorp officials had no comment on General Acquisition's
statement but a spokesman reiterated an earlier request to
shareholders to wait until its board renders an opinion before
making a decision on the General Acquisition tender.
    Gencorp said its statement would be made on or before the
company's annual meeting, scheduled for Tuesday.
    General Acquisition made its statement in a letter sent to
the GenCorp board on Friday.
    The partnership said it was willing to negotiate all points
of its offer, including price.
    The group the board cannot fully carry out its fiduciary
duties to GenCorp shareholders and make a fully informed
decision about its offer until it has "thoroughly explored with
us the ways in which our offer can be revised to provide
greater value to your shareholders."
    General Acquisition said it is aware the board may be
reviewing alternative transactions which might provide GenCorp
shareholders with a payment other than cash.
    "If that is the case, you should recognize that our
additional equity capital may very well enable us to offer cash
and securities having greater value than GenCorp could provide
in any similarly structured transaction," the partnership said.
    General Acquisition also said it believes that GenCorp's
board has an obligation to present any alternative transaction
it may propose to shareholders in a manner that would allow for
competing offers.
    The partnership requested that if any other proposal is
under consideration that it be given the same information
available to GenCorp's managers and advisers in constructing a
proposal.
     General Acquisition said that if GenCorp agrees to accept
another buyout proposal that it also be given an opportunity to
bid on a competitive and fair basis before any final decision
is made.
    General Acquisition repeated its request that GenCorp
remove its "poison pill" or shareholders rights plan.
    General Acquisition said if GenCorp does not allow an
"environment for fair competition," it will take all steps
necessary to create such an enviroment.
    It said it may take legal action or seek the support of
shareholders in calling a special meeting to replace the board
and to consider other proposals it might develop.
    General Acquisition also said if the board decides to
accept an alternate proposal it asked that it not accept a plan
that would include defensive features.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10786>
United Banks of Colorado Inc said it has
received Federal Reserve Board approval to acquire IntraWest
Financial Corp &lt;INTW> in an exhcnmage of 0.7234 United share
for each IntraWest share.
    The company said the acquisition is still subject to 30-day
review by the U.S. Justice Department and is expected to be
completed in the second quarter.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10787>
Suffield Financial Corp said it
has received approvcal from the Maine Bureau of Banking for its
proposed acquisition of Coastal Bancorp of Portland, Maine, and
the acquisition is expected to close around April One.
    The approval was the last regulatory clearance required for
the transaction.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10788>
Marketing Systems of America Inc
said it has retained Richter, Cohen and Co to assist in efforts
to redirect its business through merger or acquisition.
    The company said as consideration for services to be
renedered, it has agreed to grant Richter five-year warrants to
buy 231,000 common shares at 32 cts each, exercisable starting
in March 1988, and a negotiated fee on completion of any
transaction.  It said it has the right to cancel the warrants
after one year if no transaction has been completed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10794>
Swedish construction and real estate
company Skanska AB &lt;skbs.St.> said it will sell its 49 pct
holding in Canadian building firm &lt;Canadian Foundation Company
Ltd> to rival &lt;Banister Continental Ltd>.
    A company spokeswoman told Reuters Skanska will receive
Banister shares as payment, giving the Swedish group 15 pct of
the stock in the expanded Banister firm.
    She said Skanska will also be appointing two board members
to the Canadian company.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10816>
&lt;Canadian Worldwide Energy
Ltd> said it acquired Triton Energy Corp's wholly owned
Canadian subsidiary, Triton Petroleum Ltd, for the issue of
3.75 mln common shares of Canadian Worldwide, subject to
regulatory approvals.
    The company said the transaction will increase Triton
Energy's holding in Canadian Worldwide to 13.25 mln shrs or a
60 pct fully diluted interest from 9.5 mln shares.
    Triton Petroleum's assets consist of proven oil reserves of
1.3 mln barrels, exploratory acreage, and unspecified working
capital and a significant tax loss carryforward.
    Canadian Worldwide said it is optimistic the Triton
Petroleum Ltd acquisition will strengthen its financial and
production base and permit acceleration of its conventional oil
exploration program.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10831>
Mobil Corp's &lt;MOB> Mobil Oil Francaise
unit said it will take a stake of about 10 pct in the French
butane and propane gas distribution company &lt;Primagaz> in
exchange for the transfer to Primagaz of Mobil's small and
medium bulk propane activity.
    Small and medium bulk propane sales totalled 55,000 tonnes
in 1986 and the transfer will increase total business of
Primagaz by about 12 pct, equal to 32,000 extra customers.
    A Primagas spokesman said Mobil will take the stake by
means of a capital increase, terms of which have not yet been
established.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10834>
Morrison Inc, a diversified food
service company, said it acquired Custom Management Corp, based
in Kingston, Penn., for an undisclosed amount.
    Custom manages some 215 food contract management operations
and about 65 environmental service accounts, producing about
100 mln dlrs in annual revenues.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10843>
Bolt Beranek and Newman Inc said it
filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission a
registration statement covering a 75 mln dlr issue of
convertible subordinated debentures due 2012.
    A portion of the proceeds will be used to acquire all of
the outstanding capital stock of Network Switching Systems Inc.
 Another part will allow Bolt to exercise its option to
purchase all of the limited partnership interests in BBN
RS/Expert Limited Partnership, with the rest used for general
corporate purposes. The company named PaineWebber, Merrill
Lynch and Montgomery Securities as underwriters.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10848>
Tenneco Inc said its Newport
News Shipbuilding subsidiary has completed the purchase of the
Sperry Marine Systems division of Unisys Corp for about 70 mln
dlrs.
    Sperry Marine has annual revenues of about 100 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10849>
Biogen NV said as part of a
program to reduce expenses, it is in talks on the sale of its
Geneva, Switzerland operations.
    The company gave no details.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10867>
Bow Valley Industries Ltd said
it filed a preliminary short form prospectus in Canada and the
United States for a secondary offering of 22.8 pct of
outstanding common stock, or 9,362,197 common shares, being
sold by certain shareholders.
    The company said Bowcan Holdings Inc, a holding company
principally owned by the Seaman brothers of Calgary and Charles
Rosner Bronfman Trust of Montreal, is offering to sell all of
its holding of 8,279,665 Bow Valley common shares.
    The balance of the offering is owned directly and
indirectly by various trusts of Jean and Charles deGunzberg.
    Proceeds and expenses from the secondary offering of Bow
Valley Industries common shares are for the account of the
selling shareholders, the company said.
    The shareholders will engage Salomon Brothers Inc for
distribution of the shares in the United States and McLeod
Young Weir Ltd for distribution in Canada.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10872>
Henley Group said in a 10-K filing
with the Securities and Exchange Commission that it has 7.9 mln
shares or close to five pct of Santa Fe Southern Pacific Corp,
a spokesman said.
    In response to questions from Reuters, the Henley spokesman
said the filing was as of December 31, 1986, but that the
company still holds the shares.
    "It's an investment and we're very happy with it. Beyond
that, I have no comment," the spokesman said.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10874>
Combustion Engineering Inc said
it has completed the previously-announced acquisition of
AccuRay Corp in a merger trasaction that closed Friday at 45
dlrs per share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10883>
Oppenheimer, the brokerage and
investment subsidiary of Oppenheimer Group Inc, told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it has acquired 243,400
shares of Cyclops Corp, or 6.0 pct of the total outstanding.
    Oppenheimer said it bought the stake in connection with
risk arbitrage and other investment activities in the ordinary
course of its business. It said it has no plans to seek control
of the company.
    As of Friday, &lt;Dixons Group PLC> had acquired 2,455,000
Cyclops shares, giving it 83 pct of the total.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10887>
Allegheny International Inc said it
sold its Wilkinson Sword Consumer Group to the &lt;Swedish Match
Co> of Stockholm for for 230 mln dlrs.
    After settlement of intercompany transactions between the
Wilkinson Sword groups and Allegheny, the net payment by
Swedish Match will amount to about 160 mln dlrs.
    The Wilkinson Sword Group was transferred to the Swedish
Match Co today except for companies in certain countries where
approval from government authorities is required, the company
said.
    Allegheny said it acquired a 44 pct interest in Wilkinson,
then known as Wilkinson Match Ltd, in 1978, and the remaining 
share in 1980.
    This divestiture is part of Allegheny's overall
restructuring program and strategy to concentrate primarily on
its North American consumer products business, the company
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10892>
C.O.M.B. Co said it sold three of
its retail stores in Omaha to Bob Cummins Enterprises Inc, a
retail closeout merchandiser.
    It said the sale is consistent with its previously
announced Retail Division restructuring plans.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10895>
Heritage Communications Inc
said it expects to hold a special shareholder meeting in May to
consider its proposed acquisition by an investor group
including members of senior management and Tele-communications
Inc &lt;TELE>.
    The company said it is seeking to obtain all regulatory
approvals needed to complete the transaction before or shortly
after the special meeting.  Heritage said it has filed
preliminary proxy materials with the Securities and Exchange
Commission and has applied for a change of control of its
broadcast licenses with the Federal Communications Commission.
    Heritage it and Tele-Communications made required
Hart-Scott-Rodino filings with the Federal Trade Commission and
Justice Department on March 11 and 12, respectively.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10899>
Louisiana Pacific Corp said it
reached a non-binding agreement in principle to buy a gypsum
wallboard plant in Seattle from Norwest Gypsum.
    Purchase price and other details of the agreement were not
disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10901>
Nobel Industries Sweden SA &lt;NOBL.ST>
said its arms subsidiary, &lt;AB Bofors>, plans to sell its 40 pct
stake in &lt;Allied Ordnance Co of Singapore Ltd> because of its
part in weapons exports which contravene Swedish law.
    "The events we have uncovered are unacceptable and highly
regrettable incidents in our company's history," Nobel chairman
Lars-Erik Thunholm told a news conference.
    Nobel managing director Anders Carlberg said an internal
inquiry has revealed an extensive network of international arms
smuggling.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10908>
Kaufman and Board Inc and its
insurance subsidiaries said they lowered their stake in Quaker
State Oil Refining Corp to 1,795,908 shares, or 6.9 pct of the
total outstanding, from 2,120,908 shares, or 8.1 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the Kaufman and Board group, which includes Sun Life Group,
said it sold 325,000 Quaker State common shares between Feb 27
and March 23 at prices ranging from 28.00 to 31.00 dlrs each.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10909>
Saul Brandman, a California business
executive, told the Securities and Exchange Commission he has
acquired 118,714 shares of Arden Group Inc, or 5.7 pct of the
total outstanding common stock.
    Brandman, chairman of Domino of California Inc, a Los
Angeles garment maker, said he bought the stake for 3.1 mln
dlrs for investment purposes.
    He said he may buy more Arden Group shares, or he may sell
some or all of his current stake. He also said he has no plans
to seek control of the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10918>
Orange Julius International Inc said
it entered into a definitive agreement to sell Orange Julius of
America and Orange Julius Canada Limited to H.C. Holdings Inc,
owned by Branford Castle Inc, a merchant banker, members of its
management and certain of its shareholders.
    Orange said the purchase price will consist of 19 mln dlrs
in cash and 10 pct redeemable preferred, 10 pct of HC's common
equity, and the right for it to prospectively receive 20 pct of
certain royalties under a proposed licensing program.
    It said HC also agreed to lend up to 600,000 dlrs to it in
advance of closing and it had already received 300,000 dlrs.
    Orange Julius announced the proposed sale of the units when
a letter of intent was signed February 17.
    The company said it is reviewing other offers to buy the
units and if it decides to accept another offer it will pay HC
an agreed upon amount and reimburse HC for its expenses.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10928>
A group of firms and funds
controlled by New York investor Mario Gabelli said it has
acquired the equivalent of 882,507 shares of Allegheny
International, or 8.0 pct of the total outstanding.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the Gabelli group said it bought the stake as part of its 
business and not in an effort to seek control of the company.
    It said it may by more shares or sell some or all of its
current stake. The stake includes 782,000 common shares and
cumulative convertible preferred stock which could be converted
into 100,507 common shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10941>
Privately-held Clayton and Dubilier
Inc said it has sold W. Atlee Burpee Co to a new company formed
by Wicks Capital Corp, Bankers Trust New York Corp &lt;BT> aND
Burpee management for undisclosed terms.
    The garden supply company was acquired from ITT Corp &lt;ITT>
in December along with O.M. Scott and Sons Co.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10950>
An investor group controlled by New
York Investor David Rocker told the Securities and Exchange
Commission it has acquired 291,400 shares of Circle Express
Inc, or 6.1 pct of the total outstanding common stock.
    The group, Rocker Partners Ltd and Compass Investments Ltd,
said it bought the stake for investment purposes and not as
part of an effort to seek control of the company.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10960>
Vista Management Inc said it has
agreed to acquire General Energy Development Inc for over
2,200,000 dlrs in cash, with financing to come from mortgage
loans on the National Auto Service Centers General Energy
operates.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10961>
golden Poultry Co Inc said it has
signed a letter of intent to purchase privately-held food
distributor Don Lowe Foods Inc of Pompano Beach, Fla., for
undisclosed terms, subject to approval by both boards.
    It said Tampa operations of Lowe are not involved in the
sale.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10962>
Willcox and Gibbs Inc said it has
agreed to acquire Atlantia electric parts distributor B and W
Electric Supply Co for an undisclosed amount of cash.
    B and W had sales of about eight mln dlrs in its most
recent year.
    Willcox said it plans further expansion in the Atlanta area.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10969>
City Resources Ltd said it has agreed
in principle to sell a 50 pct interest in a group of mineral
properties in the southwest Pacific to a buyer it did not name
for 30 mln Canadian dlrs.
    The company said a preliminary estimate of the geological
resources of one of the properties to a depth of 200 meters
indicates a potential of 1.2 mln ounces of gold, and by the
middle of 1987 it expects to establish proven ore reserves
containing at least 500,000 ounces of gold.  It said mining
could start in 1988, subject to a satisfactory prefeasibility
study.
    The company said completion of the transaction is subject
to regulatory and shareholder approvals.
    City Resources is controlled by City Resources Ltd of
Australia.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10971>
Hughes Supply Inc said it has
signed a letter of intent to acquire most of the assets of Tri
State Supply Inc, a wholesale distributor of electrinical
fixtures and supplies with sales for the year ending tomorrow
of about 13 mln dlrs.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    It said clopsing is expected around April 30, subject to
approval by Tri State's board and shareholders.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10978>
Ohio Mattress Co said itr has
executed a definitive agreement to acquire Sealy Mattress Co of
Michigan Inc, the Detroit licensee of Ohio Mattress's 82 pct
owned Sealy Inc subsidiary in a transaction that also involves
a settlement between Sealy and Michigan Sealy.
    The company said on completion of the acquisition, the
Sealy stock owned by Michigan Sealy will be redeemed, raising
Ohio Mattress' interest in Sealy to 93 pct.  Michigan Sealy has
been in litigation against Sealy, alleging violations of
antitrust laws, and Sealy was recently found liable for 45 mln
dlrs in damages to Michigan Sealy.
    Under the acquisition agreement, the company said Sealy
will enter into a cash settlement of its litigation with
Michigan Sealy.
    The company said shareholders of Michigan Sealy will
receive a total of 48.6 mln dlrs, subject to adjustment, from
the acquisition and the settlement, both of which are subject
to regulatory approvals.
    Michigan Sealy had sales of about 12.5 mln dlrs in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10985>
York International Corp said it has
agreed to acquire Frick Co and Frigid Coil/Frick Inc for
undisclosed terms.
    The company said Frick makes refrigeration equipment and
compressors and Frigid Coil also makes refrigeration equipment.
 Together the two had revenues of about 50 mln dlrs in 1986.
    The company said it hopes to complete the acquisition in
May, subject to its review of Frick and Frigid and regulatory
approvals.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10988>
Nuclear Support Services Inc
said it agreed in principle to buy the business and assets of
ITT Henze Service from ITT Corp for an undisclosed amount.
    Henze, which is engaged in performing nuclear plant repair
work, had revenues of 12.7 mln dlrs for the year ended December
31, 1986.
    For 1986, Nuclear Support, a supplier of support personnel
and services to the nuclear power industry, had net income of
2.4 mln dlrs on sales of 30.6 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10989>
Colonial BancGroup said it
acquired Farmers and Merchants Bank, a Baldwin County bank with
assets of 103 mln dlrs, through an exchange of stock valued at
about 12 mln dlrs.
    Colonial said it also signed letters of intent to acquire
First Federal Bank in Opelika, Athens-Limestone Bank in Athens,
Jackson County Bank in Scottsboro and Commercial National Bank
in Demopolis, with aggregate assets totaling 130 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10992>
Rochester Telephone Corp said
it completed its acquisition of the Enterprise Telephone Co,
based in New Holland, Pa., in exchange for stock valued at 26.3
mln dlrs.
    Enterprises serves about 16,000 access lines in Lancaster
County. Enterprise becomes the third operating telephone
subsidiary of Rochester Telephone in Pennsylvania and its sixth
largest overall, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10994>
City Resources Ltd said it has agreed
in principle to sell a 50 pct interest in a group of mineral
properties in the southwest Pacific to a buyer it did not name
for 30 mln Canadian dlrs.
    The company said a preliminary estimate of the geological
resources of one of the properties to a depth of 200 meters
indicates a potential of 1.2 mln ounces of gold, and by the
middle of 1987 it expects to establish proven ore reserves
containing at least 500,000 ounces of gold. Mining could start
in 1988, subject to a satisfactory feasibility study.
    The company said completion of the transaction is subject
to regulatory and shareholder approvals.
    City Resources is controlled by City Resources Ltd of
Australia.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10998>
Home Shopping NEtwork Inc said
its Silver King Broadcasting Co INc unit entered a definitive
contract to buy the broadcasting assets of TV station KWVT,
Channel 22 in the Portland/Salem, Ore. area for undisclosed
terms.
    Additionally, the company said KWVT, which serves 785,000
homes, began broadcasting Home Shopping Network full time this
morning under an affiliation agreement.
    Home Shopping also said it entered a definitive contract to
buy TV Station KPST, Channel 66 in San Francisco and KLTJ,
Channel 49 in Dallas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11029>
A group led by members of the
wealthy Bass family of Fort Worth, Texas, which holds a 24.9
pct stake in Taft Broadcasting Co, said it has had talks about
taking part in a move to take control of the company.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group said it has had discussions with other Taft
stockholders and some company managers and directors
"concerning participation in a group to acquire control" of the
company.
    The Bass group, which did not identify any of the other
people with whom it said it has had talks, said it plans to
continue evaluating Taft and "will be involved in further
discussions relating to the future control and direction" of
the company.
    The group, which holds 2,291,210 Taft common shares, said
its members may buy more shares of Taft common stock, or may
decide to sell some or all of its stake.
    On Friday Taft said it would negotiate with a group led by
its vice chairman, Dudley Taft, and a Rhode Island investment
firm, which had offered 150 dlrs a share for the company.
    The Dudley Taft group, Theta Corp, which also includes
Narragansett Capital Corp, a Providence, R.I., investment firm,
is seeking to take the company private in a leveraged buyout
valued at 1.38 billion dlrs.
    Besides the Bass group, another major Taft shareholder,
Cincinnati, Ohio, financier Carl Lindner, has also said he has
had talks about increasing his stake in the company, taking
part in a takeover effort, or launching one himself.
    Lindner controls 1,489,298 shares of Taft common stock, or
16.2 pct of the total.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11041>
Santa Fe Southern Pacific Corp said it
has discussed with Henley Group that company's almost five pct
stake and was told the holdings are for investment purposes.
    "We have confirmed with the Henley Group that they own
approximately 7.9 mln shares of Santa Fe Southern Pacific
common stock. They have informed me that they like our company
and purchased the stock last year for investment purposes,"
Santa Fe chairman John Schmidt said in a statement.
    Henley late Friday filed a 10-K report with the Securities
and Exchange Commission concerning the Santa Fe stake.
    Earlier Santa Fe's stock was up 4-7/8 to 41 before slipping
to be up 1-7/8 at 38.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11048>
Amoskeag Bank Shares Inc said
the New Hampshire Supreme Court overturned its proposed
acquisition of Portsmouth Savings Bank in a three-two vote.
    The acquisition had been opposed by some depositors, who
filed an action to block the takeover.
    "We will respond to this news as soon as we have had an
opportunity to analyze the decision, and any and all options
available to us," chairman William Bushnell said in a
statement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11051>
Ball Corp said it was unable to
complete negotiations to acquire the plastic container business
of Monsanto Co.
    It said the two companies had entered into exclusive
negotiations last October.
    Neither company provided details on why the talks were
terminated.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11056>
Reef Energy Corp said its
board entered into agreements with Penteco Corp, a private
Tulsa-based company, to buy a 12-pct interest in the general
partnership of Penteco East Central Pipeline and a 10-pct
interest in Lincoln Gas and Marketing Corp.
    Penteco East is a gas gathering and transmission system in
southern Kansas and northern Oklahoma.
    It said Penteco in turn has purchased one mln shares of
Reef common and taken options for the purchase of another two
mln shares over the next 36 months.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11063>
Vanderbilt Gold Corp said
shareholders at a special meeting approved its reincorporation
in Delaware, an increase in authorized common to 25 mln shares
from 12 mln shares, and a non-qualified stock option plan.
    It also said shareholders approved the merger of Morning
Star Mine interests held by six corporations in exchange for
issuing 2,098,602 shares of its common. It said the acquisition
brings its ownership in Morning to over 94 pct and it intends
to acquire the remaining interests before mid year.
    It said its plans call for 1987 production of 30,000 ounces
of gold with product costs per ounce at about 200 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11074>
The Bass Group, once thought by
analysts to be eager to sell its holdings in Taft Broadcasting
Co, emerged as another potential bidder for the Ohio
broadcasting company.
    The Bass Group, which holds 24.9 pct of Taft, said it had
talked with other taft stockholders and some company managers
and directors "concerning participation in a group to acquire
control" of the company.
    The Bass group said it had talks with other Taft
stockholders and members of Taft management about participating
in a group to acquire control. The group, which is led by the
wealthy bass brothers of Fort Worth, Texas, did not identify
any of the other people with whom it had talks.
    Taft said Friday it would negotiate with its vice Chairman
Dudley Taft on his group's 150 dlr per share or 1.38 billion
dlr offer for the company.
    At the time, the company said it authorized its adviser,
Goldman, Sachs and Co, to explore other takeover proposals and
to supply financial data to other interested bidders.
    "If indeed, the reason Dudley Taft is no longer president
is because the bass group tossed him out, I couldn't see them
backing him on any deal," said one analyst, who asked not to be
identified.
    "I think they wanted a way out. Now, this sounds like
they're going to join the group and buy themselves out," said
Edward Atorino, media analyst with Smith Barney, Harris Upham
and Co.
    Analysts have speculated that Carl Lindner may be
interested in acquiring the company. they speculated he may be
one of the shareholders in talks with the bass group.
    Lindner, chairman of American Financial Corp, holds 16.2
pct of Taft. He was not immediately available for comment.
    Analysts have said they are baffled by the strength of
Taft's stock price compared to what they see as breakup values
for the company.
    Several analysts had estimated a break up value of less
than 150. One analyst said he believes it has a breakup value
of 160 to 165 dlrs per share.
    Taft stock closed at 156-1/2, up 1-3/4.
    "They (investors) are saying here's another one - another
family dispute," said Dennis McAlpine of Oppenheimer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11078>
Investor Paul Bilzerian, who has
said he may seek control of Pay 'n Pak Stores Inc, said he
raised his stake in the company to one mln shares, or 9.9 pct
of the total, from 721,900 shares, or 7.2 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Bilzerian and Bicoastal Financial Corp, a Tampa, Fla.,
investment firm he controls, said they bought 278,000 shares of
Pay 'n Pak common stock on March 26 and 27 at prices ranging
from 13.29 to 17.04 dlrs a share.
    Bilzerian last week said he was considering raising his
stake in the company, seeking a board seat or control.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11086>
Service Resources Corp's Chas. P.
Young Co subsidiary said it agreed to acquire Atwell Fleming
Printing Ltd, a Canadian financial printer, for about 3.2 mln
dlrs.
    Young said the acquisition, which is expected to close in
April, is subject to due dilligence review.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11088>
Genova Inc said its shareholders
approved a merger into &lt;Genova Products Inc>, which will be
consumated within a few days. Under the agreement, Genova said
each of its shareholders will receive 5.375 dlrs per share in
cash.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11095>
Chas. P. Young Co, a subsidiary of
Service Resources Corp, said it signed a definitive agreement
to acquire Atwell Fleming Printing Ltd, of Canada, for about
3.2 mln dlrs.
    The transaction is expected to close in April.
    ON February 23, Chas. P. Young said it had aquired 19.05
pct of the shares of Sorg INc &lt;SRG> to facilitate a newgotiated
business combination.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11101>
Dixons Group PLC said that pursuant to
an agreement with Audio/Video Affiliates Inc, part of an
investor group that made a rival bid for Cyclops Corp &lt;CYL>,
all litigation between them has been dismissed.
    As part of the agreement, Dixons said Cyacq Corp, the
Audio/Video investor group that includes Citicorp Capital
Investors Ltd, agreed to "promptly" terminate its existing
tender offer for all outstanding Cyclops common at 92.50 dlrs
per share.
    Dixons said it agreed to pay an additional 4.75 dlrs per
share, or 95 dlrs per share, to each shareholder whose shares
were purchased under its offer for Cyclops at 90.25 dlrs per
share.
    On Friday, Dixons announced that it had increased its
holdings in Cyclops Corp to about 83 pct of the currently
outstanding shares and that it intended to increase to 95 dlrs
from 90.25 dlrs the amount per share paid in the merger of a
Dixons subsidiary with Cyclops.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11102>
The U.S. Department of
Transportation (DOT) said it gave final clearance to the
proposed 225 mln dlr acquisition of AirCal Inc by American
Airlines Inc.
    "The acquisition is not likely to substantially lessen
competition or to be inconsistent with the public interest," the
DOT said in a statement.
    AirCal is a unit of ACI Holdings Inc while American is a
unit of AMR Corp.
    The DOT had given tentative approval to the merger plan
Feb. 20.
    American is the third largest U.S. airline in terms of
revenue passenger miles while AirCal--a relatively small
carrier that primarily serves West Coast cities--is the
nation's 17th largest passenger carrier. Their merger would not
alter American's third-place ranking, according to data
compiled by Aviation Daily, a leading industry trade magazine.
    The combination would incrase American's share of the U.S.
market to 15.4 pct from its current 14.7 pct, the DOT said.
    The DOT said the merger was unlikely to substantially
reduce competition on the four routes on which both carriers
provide either nonstop or single-plane service.
    At 13 of the 14 terminals served by both carriers, the DOT
said it found no evidence that other carriers could not
increase or begin service that competed with a merged
American-AirCal.
    Concerning the 14th, "While entry may not be possible at the
Orange County Airport in the near future, DOT found that the
service provided at other airports in the Los Angeles area,
especially at the Los Angeles International Airport, will
provide effective competition for Orange County travelers in
long-haul markets," the DOT said.
    The merger would give American control of 37 pct of the
authorized takeoff and landing slots at the Orange County
terminal, where environmental concerns and a small terminal
building limit future opportunities for expansion.
    The DOT said the Air Line Pilots Association filed comments
opposing the merger but "raised no new facts or arguments."
    Under the merger terms, announced Nov. 17, American will
pay 15 dlrs a share for the outstanding stock of ACI Holdings.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11113>
Neoax Inc said it bought
Rexnord Inc's Fairfield Manufacturing Co for 70.5 mln dlrs
cash.
    The unit makes custom gears for industrial use and had
sales of 84 mln dlrs in its Oct. 31, 1986 fiscal year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11126>
Infinity Broadcasting Corp said it
entered an agreement to acquire radio stations KVIL AM/FM from
Sconninx Broadcasting Co for 82 mln dlrs.
    Upon completion of the transaction, Infinity will own nine
FM and four AM stations in 10 major markets.
    The transaction is subject to FCC approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11133>
Amfac Inc said it entered an
agreement to sell the last remaining store of its original
Liberty House of California operation to H and S - San Mateo
Inc.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11134>
Harper International Inc
said it intends to buy the major asset, patents and trade name
of Demarkus Corp, a designer and installer of process gas
systems for the soft drink and brewing industries.
    The purchase price is about 125,000 dlrs.
    Demarkus' sales were 470,000 dlrs in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11136>
Olson Industries Inc said
it signed a letter of intent to sell substantially all of its
remaining egg operations to Sunny Fresh Foods inc.
    Olson said it expects to receive about nine mln dlrs from a
combination of a sale of tangible assets to Sunny Fresh and
realization of intangible and other assets by Olson.
    The transaction is expected to result in a charge for
discontinued operations of about two mln dlrs but is also
expected to generate substantial cash flow to pay off
egg-related indebtedness of about 7.5 mln dlrs and to further
improve working capital.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11143>
A group of investment firms which
had once sought control of Comdata Network Inc, told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it sold its remaining
1,113,500-share, or 5.9 pct, stake in the company.
    The group, which had owned as much as 9.5 pct of the total,
said it sold the stake on March 27 at 15-3/4 dlrs a share. Last
week it sold 455,000 Comdata shares.
    Group members are CNI Partners, an investment partnership,
Mason Best Co, a Texas investment partnership, and Houston
Imperial Corp, a real estate development firm.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11144>
Gencorp Inc said its board urged
shareholders to reject the hostile unsolicited 100 dlr a share
tender offer made March 18 by General Acquisition Inc, an
affiliate of Wagner and Brown and AFG Industries INc.
    Gencorp also said it is developing a financially superior
alternative that would enable shareholders to benefit from the
full value of the company.
    In a letter to shareholders, Chairman A. William Reynolds 
said the offer is a "highly conditional, contingently financed
bust-up offer" that seeks to deny shareholders the true value
of their investment in Gencorp.
    Reynolds said the board reached its decision to reject the
offer after careful study with legal and financial advisers. He
said the board has authorized management to explore
alternatives aimed at providing shareholders with a
"financially superior" alternative to the general acquisition
offer.
    A Gencorp spokesman, in response to questions, would not
comment on market speculation that the company's management may
develop a leveraged buyout offer of its own. He would also not
comment on when a better alternative might be developed.
    Gencorp's stock has traded well above the 100 dlr offer
price since the tender was made. Today, Gencorp closed at
114-1/4, up 1-5/8.
    Reynolds said in the letter that for the last few years,
Gencorp management has taken action to enhance shareholder
value, and the stock price and earnings have improved since he
joined the company.
    Gencorp said the partnership's offer is a "bargain price"
acquisition that was "using financing from a syndicate of banks
that does not yet exist and a bridge loan from Shearson Lehman
brothers that shearson is not obligated to provide."
    Reynolds also said the offer would result in a radical
alteration and selloff of Gencorp's assets, including Aerojet
General to refinance General Acquisition's borrowings with the
profits going to Wagner and Brown and AFG instead of
shareholders.
    The letter also said the General Acquisition offer
"jeopardizes the security and interests" of its shareholders,
employees, customers, suppliers and the communities throughout
the country where the company's facilities are located.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11161>
General Acquisition Co said it was
disappointed by Gencorp's response to its tender offer and
questioned how the company might give better value to
shareholders.
    Gencorp earlier urged shareholders to reject a 100 dlr per
share tender offer from the partnership, which includes Wagner
and Brown and AFG Industries Inc. The company said it was
studying financially superior alternatives.
   The partnership called the response inflammatory and
unproductive, particularly since it had attempted to discuss
the offer with Gencorp.
     The partnership said Gencorp failed to say how it would
provide a "superior value yet they continue their attempt to
prevent a satisfactory offer by failing to redeem their poison
pill." Poison pills are shareholder rights plan that make
takeovers more expensive.
    Gencorp said in its statement earlier that the date its
rights will trade separately from the common stock was extended
to April six from April three. It said the extension was
subject to further extensions by the board and is conditioned
on no person aquiring beneficial ownership of 20 pct or more of
Gencorp prior to April six.
    General Acquisition said it is confident its offer can be
completed in a timely manner using its financial arrangements.
    The partnership in its statement again urged management to
work with it to facilitate a transaction.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11177>
CSR Ltd &lt;CSRA.S> and Exxon Corp &lt;XON>
unit &lt;Esso Exploration and Production Australia Inc> said CSR
has agreed to sell its &lt;Delhi Australia Fund> (DAF) to Esso for
985 mln Australian dlrs.
    The sale is effective from tomorrow, they said in a joint
statement.
    The previously announced float of part of its Delhi
interest will not now proceed, CSR said in the statement.
    Delhi Australia Fund owns &lt;Delhi Petroleum Pty Ltd>, which
holds an average of 25 pct in the Santos Ltd &lt;STOS.S>-led
Cooper and Eromanga Basin gas and liquids projects.
    In addition to the purchase price, CSR will share equally
in any returns due to increases in crude oil and condensate
prices over certain levels for liquids produced from Delhi's
interests in the next two years, the statement said.
    "The Esso proposal to purchase all the Delhi interest will
be more beneficial to our shareholders than proceeding with the
float," CSR chief executive Bryan Kelman said in the statement.
    Kelman said the sale of Delhi would enable CSR to focus
efforts on expanding business areas such as sugar and building
materials in which CSR has had long and successful management
experience and strong market leadership.
    With the sale, CSR will be able to expand those businesses
more aggressively and earlier, he said.
    As reported separately, soon after announcing the Delhi
sale CSR launched a takeover bid for the 68.26 pct of &lt;Pioneer
Sugar Mills Ltd> that it does not already hold, valuing its
entire issued capital at 219.6 mln dlrs.
    After Bass Strait, the onshore Cooper and Eromanga Basin is
Australia's largest oil and gas producing area with current
gross oil production of 45,000 barrels per day (BDP), gas
liquids output of 30,000 BPD and gas sales of 480 mln cubic
feet a day, the CSR-Esso statement said.
    The purchase gives Esso, a 50/50 partner with The Broken
Hill Pty Co Ltd &lt;BRKN.S> in the Bass Strait, its first onshore
production in Australia, they said.
    Esso's chairman Stuart McGill said he hoped Esso can assist
in maintaining the high rate of oil and gas discoveries in the
Cooper-Eromanga area.
    "These discoveries will help Australia's self-sufficiency in
oil reserves thereby offsetting in part the decline in Bass
Strait production now under way," McGill said.
    In a separately released letter to CSR shareholders, Kelman
said CSR was within days of completing plans for the float of
CSR Petroleum when it received an offer from Esso.
    He said CSR is convinced the sale was the correct decision
in view of the risks associated with the oil business.
    The price-sharing arrangement provides for CSR to share
equally with Esso in higher returns if oil prices average more
than 20 U.S. Dlrs a barrel in the next two years, he said.
    Kelman said a revaluation of CSR's investment in Delhi to
net realisable value as of today, CSR's annual balance-date,
will result in an extraordinary loss of 97 mln dlrs.
    However, revaluations and profits on sales of other assets
will significantly reduce this loss, he said.
    He also said that CSR is sufficiently encouraged by future
prospects and the opportunity to reposition the group in core
businesses to foreshadow an increase in final dividend payable
in July to 10 cents from nine to make an annual 19 cents
against 18 in 1985/86.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11192>
Public Relations consultancy &lt;Shandwick
Plc> said it had agreed to buy the Los Angeles-based &lt;Rogers
and Cowan Inc> which specialises in the entertainment industry.
    A total of 2.25 mln dlrs is payable on completion, 1.5 mln
will be injected into the business through an interest free
loan and the expenses of the acquisition amount to 660,000 stg.
    Shandwick said it would raise 5.1 mln stg through the
placing of 1.16 mln shares to finance the deal, with the
balance of 2.04 mln stg used to strengthen the balance sheet
and in anticipation of future performance-related payments.
    In the year to end-September Rogers' operating income was
more than 10 mln dlrs. After the acquisition Shandwick's U.S.
Operating income will be comparable to that it earns in the
U.K.
    Rogers' estimated that pretax profit in the year to
end-1987 would exceed 900,000 dlrs. An extraordinary loss of
504,000 dlrs in 1986 resulted from the write off of assets.
    Net tangible assets at end-September were 363,000 dlrs.
    Shandwick shares were unchanged at 460p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11201>
London International Group Plc &lt;LONL.L>
said it had agreed to sell its &lt;Haffenden Moulding Co Ltd> unit
to &lt;Melton Medes Ltd> for 2.1 mln stg.
    Haffenden is a moulder of hot water bottles and also
produces a variety of rubber and plastic mouldings. The book
value of its assets is 4.4 mln stg.
    LIG said the disposal was part of its strategy of
concentrating on its core activities.
    LIG shares were one penny firmer at 277p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11202>
Shares in Cable and Wireless Plc
&lt;CAWL.L> firmed in morning trading on market speculation that
its participation in a joint telecommunications venture in
Japan would not be curtailed, dealers said.
    The company's shares were quoted at 372p at 0915 GMT
compared with 364p last night.
    The dealers said the speculation appeared to originate in
Japan. Cable has said it is resisting attempts by the
Federation of Economic Organisations to merge two Japan-based
telecommunications firms, a move which would have cut Cable's
stake from 20 pct in one to three pct in the merged unit.
    However, the dealers were uncertain exactly how the dispute
over the shareholdings had been resolved.
    British prime minister MargaretThatcher said in parliament
last week that she regarded Cable and Wireless's participation
in the Japanese venture as a test case of how open the Japanese
telecommunications market really was.
    A spokesman for Cable said he was unaware if the
speculation had any foundation. Cable itself had issued no
statement today on the issue.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11210>
The Adelaide Steamship Co Ltd &lt;ADSA.S>
(Adsteam) said it will subscribe to 30 mln shares in listed
British property developer, &lt;Markheath Securities Plc>, at 60p
each, subject to shareholder approval.
    The subscription, expected to take place in May, will give
Adsteam 49 pct of Markheath, Adsteam said in a statement.
    Adsteam's managing director John Spalvins will become
chairman of Markheath and two other Adsteam nominees will join
its board. "We hope that in time Markheath will become a
significant property and industrial company in the same style
as Adsteam," Spalvins said in the statement.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11213>
CSR Ltd &lt;CSRA.S> has made a bold move in
selling its oil and gas interests for almost a billion dlrs and
ploughing 150 mln into its traditional sugar business, share
analysts said.
    "It sounds like a good deal," Stuart McKibbin of &lt;A.C. Goode
and Co> told Reuters.
    CSR said it had dropped plans to float its oil and gas
interests held in the &lt;Delhi Australia Fund> and would instead
sell it to Exxon Corp &lt;XON> unit &lt;Esso Exploration and
Production Australia Inc> for 985 mln dlrs.
    In a twin announcement CSR, already Australia's largest
sugar refiner, made a 2.20 dlr a share bid for the 70 pct it
does not already hold in &lt;Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd>.
    "This will be a big shock to the market, which was under the
impression that CSR was well down the road to floating Delhi,"
McKibbin said.
    A float of part of Delhi would have raised between 200 and
300 mln dlrs, but in opting to sell outright, CSR had given
itself the cash to practically eliminate its debt and embark on
an ambitious expansion programme in its best-performing
divisions of sugar and building products, analysts said.
    CSR not only gets the 985 mln dlrs but also has the right
to share equally with Esso any higher returns resulting from an
oil price over 20 U.S. Dlrs a barrel in the next two years.
    Delhi is one of Australia's largest onshore oil producers
yielding about six mln barrels a year from the Cooper Basin.
Analysts said the deal could net CSR as much as three mln dlrs
for every dollar rise in the oil price above 20 dlrs.
    Neale Goldston-Morris of Sydney broker &lt;Bain and Co Ltd>
said the move out of Delhi and investment in the sugar industry
was a sensible one but added that it represented the loss of
Australian-owned assets to a foreign company.
    "The farm they bought back a few years ago is being sold
back to the Americans," Goldston-Morris said.
    The Pioneer Sugar investment would make CSR by far the
largest player in Australia's 850 mln dlr a year sugar industry
and would give it access to some of the best sugar properties
and mills in the country, analysts said.
    They said Pioneer Sugar was expected to recommend
acceptance of the bid through which CSR would benefit from the
bottom out of a cyclical downturn in sugar prices.
    Sugar prices are forecast to rise to 340 dlrs a tonne next
season from an estimated 270 dlrs this year, they said.
    Selling Delhi meant CSR has finally quit a damaging
investment, made in 1981, which has dragged down the company's
overall performance, analysts said.
    CSR last year wrote off more than 550 mln dlrs in losses on
what had been a 591 mln U.S. Dlr investment financed entirely
from U.S. Dollar debt, they said.
    "It was a bad investment for them. They financed it entirely
with debt, the currency collapsed on them and then the oil
price collapsed on them," Owen Evans of Sydney broker &lt;Meares
and Philips Ltd> said.
    Esso not only picked up Delhi's oil and gas output but also
gained as much as 300 mln dlrs in transferable tax losses
accumulated in exploration allowances and other concessions.
    Analysts said Esso also gained its first real onshore stake
in Australia in its first major diversification from the 50/50
Bass Strait partnership with The Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd
&lt;BRKN.S>.
    "Esso has been very keen to diversify from the Gippsland
Basin. They haven't found too much oil in Bass Strait lately
and Esso needed a large pool of ongoing production,"
Goldston-Morris said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11236>
CSR Ltd &lt;CSRA.S> and Exxon Corp &lt;XON>
unit &lt;Esso Exploration and Production Australia Inc> said CSR
has agreed to sell its &lt;Delhi Australia Fund> (DAF) to Esso for
985 mln Australian dlrs.
    The sale is effective from tomorrow, they said in a joint
statement.
    The previously announced float of part of its Delhi
interest will not now proceed, CSR said in the statement.
    Delhi Australia Fund owns &lt;Delhi Petroleum Pty Ltd>, which
holds an average of 25 pct in the Santos Ltd &lt;STOS.S>-led
Cooper and Eromanga Basin gas and liquids projects.
    In addition to the purchase price, CSR will share equally
in any returns due to increases in crude oil and condensate
prices over certain levels for liquids produced from Delhi's
interests in the next two years, the statement said.
    "The Esso proposal to purchase all the Delhi interest will
be more beneficial to our shareholders than proceeding with the
float," CSR chief executive Bryan Kelman said in the statement.
    Kelman said the sale of Delhi would enable CSR to focus
efforts on expanding business areas such as sugar and building
materials in which CSR has had long and successful management
experience and strong market leadership.
    With the sale, CSR will be able to expand those businesses
more aggressively and earlier, he said.
    As reported separately, soon after announcing the Delhi
sale CSR launched a takeover bid for the 68.26 pct of &lt;Pioneer
Sugar Mills Ltd> that it does not already hold, valuing its
entire issued capital at 219.6 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11237>
CSR Ltd &lt;CSRA.S> said it will offer 2.20
dlrs cash each for the shares it does not already hold in
&lt;Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd>.
    CSR already holds 31.74 pct of Pioneer's 99.80 mln issued
shares, it said in a statement.
    The offer price values the entire Pioneer Sugar share
capital at 219.6 mln dlrs and compares with today's closing
market level of 1.85 dlrs a share.
    CSR said it will announce further details of the offer
soon, including an alternative offer of CSR shares for Pioneer
Sugar stock.
    It said the offer is generous since it will give Pioneer
Sugar shareholders a price equivalent to 29 times Pioneer's net
earnings last financial year and a premium of 22 pct over
yesterday's market price which CSR said it believed already
contained an element of takeover speculation.
    It also gives a premium of 91 pct over Pioneer's last
reported net tangible assets per share, CSR said.
    CSR said the generous offer price reflects the cost savings
which will flow from integrated management of CSR's and
Pioneer's raw sugar mills and building materials businesses.
    These economies can only be achieved through CSR control
and management of Pioneer Sugar, it added.
    The takeover announcement came soon after CSR's earlier
reported statement that it will sell its &lt;Delhi Petroleum Pty
Ltd> unit to an Exxon Corp &lt;XON> unit for 985 mln dlrs and not
proceed with the previously announced float of part of Delhi.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11239>
&lt;Fletcher Challenge Ltd> (FCL)
Managing Director Hugh Fletcher said he was disappointed that
&lt;Rada Corp Ltd> had decided to sell its shares in &lt;N.Z. Forest
Products Ltd> (NZFP) to Australia's &lt;Amcor Ltd>.
    He said in a statement that FCL had made an offer for the
24 pct of NZFP held by Rada. He said the FCL offer was better
than Amcor's because it would have been made to all NZFP
shareholders, but he gave no further details.
    Amcor and NZFP said earlier today they were merging their
pulp and paper interests in a joint partnership and were
increasing their existing cross-shareholdings.
    The plan involves NZFP increasing its current holding in
Amcor to about 20 pct from four pct. Amcor will acquire Rada's
NZFP stake to add to its existing 11 pct and will seek
statutory approval to increase its holding to 50 pct.
    Rada bought its stake for 505.5 mln dlrs from &lt;Wattie
Industries Ltd> last year, but it has not disclosed the price
to be paid by Amcor.
    FCL originally launched a takeover bid for NZFP late last
year with a scrip and/or cash offer at 3.90 dlrs a share,
valuing the company at 1.3 billion dlrs. NZFP shares ended at
3.88 dlrs today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11242>
The Peking-owned China International
Trust and Investment Corp (Citic) bought the unfinished City
Garden Hotel in Hong Kong from a subsidiary of Cheung Kong
(Holdings) Ltd &lt;CKGH.HKG> for 235 mln H.K. Dlrs, Cheung Kong
director Albert Chow said.
    Cheung Kong's subsidiary &lt;International City Holdings Ltd>
will complete work on the hotel by the end of 1988, when it
will be handed over to Citic. The deal does not include the
decoration or fitting out of the interior of the hotel.
    The 600-room hotel stands on a 26,700 sq ft site on the
eastern side of Hong Kong island.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11252>
State-owned &lt;Cie Generale
d'Electricite>'s electrical contracting unit &lt;CGEE ALSTHOM> has
taken a 34 stake in the U.S. Computer firm &lt;ESCA Corp>, CGEE
ALSTHOM chairman Philippe Boisseau told a press conference.
    According to an agreement in principle between the two
companies CGEE ALSTHOM could take a majority stake in the
future but no time-scale has been set, he added.
    ESCA, which had a turnover of 13.6 mln dlrs in 1986 and is
expected to see this rise to 20 mln this year, is one of the
leading U.S. Suppliers of electric despatching and telecontrol
systems.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11253>
General Acquisition Co said it was
disappointed by Gencorp's response to its tender offer and
asked how the company might give better value to shareholders.
    Gencorp had earlier urged shareholders to reject a 100 dlr
per share tender offer from General Acquisition, an affiliate
of Wagner and Brown and AFG Industries Inc, and said it was
studying financially superior alternatives.
    The General Acquisition partnership called the response
inflammatory and unproductive, particularly since it had tried
to discuss the offer with Gencorp.
    The partnership said Gencorp failed to say how it would
provide a "superior value yet they continue their attempt to
prevent a satisfactory offer by failing to redeem their poison
pill." Poison pills are shareholder rights plans that make
takeovers more expensive.
    Gencorp said in its statement earlier that it planned to
put off the date its rights will trade separately from the
common stock to April 6 from April 3. It said the extension was
subject to further extensions by the board and is conditional
on no person acquiring beneficial ownership of 20 pct or more
of Gencorp before April 6.
    General Acquisition said it is confident its offer can be
completed in a timely manner using its financial arrangements.
    The partnership in its statement again urged Gencorp
management to work with it to facilitate a transaction.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11255>
Sedgwick Group Plc &lt;SDWK.L> said its
wholly-owned Canadian subsidiary Sedgwick Tomenson Inc had
acquired BSi Incorp for a maximum eight mln Canadian dlrs.
    The funds will be raised through the issue of up to 1.16
mln ordinary Sedgwick shares to the vendors of BSi by no later
than 31 January 1991. Some 427,054 shares already have been
issued.
    BSi is a privately-held Canadian company involved in
actuarial, employee and executive benefits consulting and
administration. Its 1986 pretax profits excluding extraordinary
items totalled 1.14 mln Canadian dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11257>
Rexnord Inc, 96 pct owned by Banner
Industries Inc &lt;BNR> following a recent tender offer, said it
has completed the sale of its Fairfield Manufacturing Co
subsidiary to NEOAX Inc for 70.5 mln dlrs in cash.
    Rexnord said it still plans to sell its Process Machinery
Division and Mathews Conveyor Co as part of its planned program
to divest five businesses with 200 mln dlrs in assets.
Bellofram Corp and Railway Maintenance Equipment Co have
already been sold.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11268>
Hudson Foods Inc said it has
agreed in principle to acquire Thies Cos Inc, a poultry, beef
and pork products provider to midwest supermarkets and food
distributors with sales of about 69 mln dlrs for the year ended
November One.
    The company said a definitive agreement is expected to be
signed in April.  Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11274>
Alpha Industries Inc said it has
sold its Microelectronics Division to Triax Corp for
undisclosed terms, retroactive to February One.
    It said the division has yearly revenues of about 12 mln
dlrs and makes RF microwave components for the defense
electronics industry.
    Alpha said it plans to concentrate on the high frequency
portion of the electromagnetic spectrum.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11279>
British package courier &lt;Interlink
Express Plc> does not plan to bid for the whole or part of  
Purolator Courier Corp &lt;PCC.N>, a spokesman said.
    "There is no intention of making any sort of approach to
Purolator," the spokesman told Reuters, adding, "it would be a
case of David versus Goliath."
    Interlink shares started trading in the U.K. Unlisted
Securities Market in October 1986. It posted pre-tax profits of
2.13 mln stg on turnover of 9.6 mln stg in the six months to
December 31, 1986. Purolator last year topped turnover of 465
mln dollars, the spokesman said.
between Purolator and Interlink in view of a takeover or
participation. He categorically denied press reports suggesting
Interlink was developing a buyout bid.
    The reports said the proposed bid would be a price above
the 35 dlrs per share offered by &lt;E.F. Hutton LBO Inc>. The
Hutton offer expires tomorrow.
    The spokesman said Interlink was seeking to expand
business, first in continental Europe and later in the U.S. But
the company did not expect to gain foothold in the U.S. Market
until 1989 at the earliest, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11285>
Cable and Wireless Plc &lt;CAWL.L> said
proposals to resolve a dispute over entry to Japan's
telecommunications market were not acceptable.
    A company spokesman said the proposals appear to have been
made in today's edition of the Japanese daily Asahi by Fumio
Watanabe, head of a telecommunications committee with the
Federation of Economic Organisations.
    However, the suggestion still recommended a merger between
the two consortia tendering for contracts and would give Cable
a five pct stake, more than the three pct originally proposed
but less than the 20 pct it holds in its original venture, he
said.
    The proposal would also offer a Cable nominee a seat on the
board of the merged company.
    The spokesman said he believed Japan should accept
applications from the two rivals for fair review.
    Earlier today Cable shares firmed on market speculation
that the dispute -- which is being treated by Britain's
government as a test case of how open the Japanese
telecommunications market is -- was near settlement.
    Cable shares at 1350 GMT were quoted at 375p compared with
a close last night at 364p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11292>
&lt;Gruppo Ferruzzi> is studying a
project which could result in a public share offer of up to 49
pct of its French unit &lt;European Sugar (France)> and could
raise around 400 mln dlrs, Ferruzzi chairman Raul Gardini said.
    Gardini told Reuters the operation under consideration was
aimed at "international markets" and that the figure of 400 mln
dlrs given in some press reports "was probably about right."
    European Sugar, wholly-owned by Ferruzzi unit Eridania
Zuccherifici Nazionali SpA &lt;ERDI.M>, is expected to absorb the
European corn wet milling business of CPC International Inc
&lt;CPC.N> which Ferruzzi recently agreed to buy.
    Ferruzzi announced last week it had agreed in principle to
buy the CPC operation for 630 mln dlrs.
    A Ferruzzi spokesman later confirmed that the group was
studying the transfer of the CPC business to European Sugar
along with a possible share offering in the Paris unit, but
gave no details.
    The flotation plan has been interpreted by financial
analysts as a means of helping finance the acquisition of the
CPC business.
    In London yesterday, chairman of Belgian starch producer
&lt;Amylum NV> Pierre Callebaut told Reuters that since Ferruzzi
was "apparently still organising finance," his company might
still succeed with its rival bid for the CPC business.
    Gardini, commenting on Callebaut's remarks, said the 630
mln dlrs agreed for the CPC acquisition would be paid "at the
date foreseen in the preliminary contract."
    Gardini could not reveal the date in question nor give any
indication of the likely timing of an offering of shares in
European Sugar, but it was announced last week that Ferruzzi's
purchase of the CPC business was expected to be completed by
September 30.
    Callebaut said yesterday that Amylum was surprised and
disappointed that its 675 mln dlr bid cash offer for CPC's
European business was apparently rejected in favour of
Ferruzzi's lower bid.
    Gardini, commenting on Callebaut's remarks, said "Amylum
should know that one succeeds in a bid by making the right
offer at the right moment - exactly as Ferruzzi did in the case
of the acquisition of CPC's European business."
    Gardini said it was not Callebaut's business to concern
himself with the European Sugar capital raising operation under
study, he added.
    Asked about press reports that Ferruzzi might follow up the
European Sugar flotation with the sale of 49 pct of the CPC
business, Gardini said: "We do not exclude having minority
partners in the CPC business." He declined to elaborate.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11299>
GAF Corp said it has made an all
cash merger proposal to Borg-Warner Corp at 46 dlrs per share
for all the company's common stock.
    Following a meeting yesterday with Borg-Warner officials
and investment bankers, GAF said, it is today delivering a
letter to the Borg-Warner board outling the terms of the
proposal that would be made by tender offer, pursuant to a
mutually acceptable merger agreement to be approved by the
Borg-Warner board and conditioned on that board's
recommendation of the tender offer and merger.
    GAF, in its letter, stated it intends to finance the
proposed acquisition entirely with its own funds and bank
borrowings under a syndicated bank loan from a group of banks
led by Chase Manhattan Corp's &lt;CMB> Chase Manhattan Bank.
    Last week, GAF increased its ownership of Borg-Warner
shares to 19.9 pct of those outstanding Minstar Inc &lt;MNST> sold
its 12.4 pct holding.
    GAF emphasized "the amicable nature of the proposed
transaction," which it characterized as a partnership.
    GAF said it wanted to discuss with the Borg-Warner board 
key roles for Borg-Warner's senior management in the new
organization, board representation for Borg-Warner directors on
a newly constituted board, and a company name change.
    GAF said it will be filing an amendment to its 13-D with
the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
    Borg-Warner has about 85.6 mln common shares outstanding.
    Minstar chairman Irwin L. Jacobs sold his stake after
Borg-Warner after the company failed to respond to his
mid-February offer for a negotiated agreement at a minimum
price of 44 dlrs a share.
    In November, Jacobs had offered to enter into acquisition
talks with Borg-Warner based on a price of between 43 and 48
dlrs a share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11324>
Dutch chemicals group Akzo
NV &lt;AKZO.AS> said it hoped to consolidate its core activities
this year by making small acquisitions in the US.
   Akzo chairman Aarnoud Loudon told a news conference on its
1986 report that the company wanted to achieve the same level
of US investments it had before it divested its fibre firm
American Enka in December 1985, when US investments represented
20 pct of Akzo's total capital.
   The US expansion plans were not an attempt to compensate for
losses in guilder income through the lower dollar, Loudon said.
    He said a more important factor was the speed of growth in
the US, adding "It's the largest industrial market in the world."
But he said the company would also be looking at possible
acquisitions in Europe.
    Despite its highly liquid cash flow, Akzo did not plan
acquisitions on a scale that would negatively influence the
company's debt/equity ratio, Loudon said.
   The chairman said in the past two years Akzo had spent 1.1
billion guilders on acquisitions, of which nearly two thirds
were in the United States.
REUTER...
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11344>
Gruppo Ferruzzi is studying a
project which could result in a public share offer of up to 49
pct of its French unit European Sugar (France) and could raise
around 400 mln dlrs, Ferruzzi chairman Raul Gardini said.
    Gardini told Reuters the operation under consideration was
aimed at "international markets" and that the figure of 400 mln
dlrs given in some press reports "was probably about right."
    European Sugar, wholly-owned by Ferruzzi unit Eridania
Zuccherifici Nazionali SpA, is expected to absorb the European
corn wet milling business of CPC International Inc which
Ferruzzi recently agreed to buy.
    Ferruzzi announced last week it had agreed in principle to
buy the CPC operation for 630 mln dlrs.
    A Ferruzzi spokesman later confirmed that the group was
studying the transfer of the CPC business to European Sugar
along with a possible share offering in the Paris unit, but
gave no details.
    The flotation plan has been interpreted by financial
analysts as a means of helping finance the acquisition of the
CPC business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11348>
Gandalf Technologies Inc said it
acquired a significant minority equity interest in privately
held Data/Voice Solutions Corp, of Newport Beach, Calif., for
undisclosed terms.
    Gandalf did not specify the size of the interest.
    Data/Voice is a three-year-old designer and manufacturer of
a multiprocessor, multiuser MS-DOS computing system that
Gandalf plans to integrate with its private automatic computer
exchange information system, Gandalf said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11349>
Keycorp said it has signed a
definitive agreement to acquire Commercial Security Bancorp
&lt;CSEC> by exchanging Keycorp common valued at 63 dlrs for each
Commercial Securities share.
    Keycorp said this gives the transaction an indicated value
of 102 mln dlrs.
    Keycorp said the amount of its stock to be exchanged will
be based on the daily average closing price of the shares for
an unspecified period prior to the closing of the acquisition.
    Based on a maximum of about 2.75 Keycorp shares and a
minimum of about 1.8 Keycorp to be exchanged, the agreement
provides that if the average price of Keycorp common is less
than 21.50 dlrs a share during the pricing period, the
agreement will terminate unless a new conversion ratio can be
negotiated.
    Keycorp said the transaction is designed to be tax free to
Commercial Security shareholders. The company said it will
treat the merger as a pooling of interests.
    It said the proposal is subject to approval by Commercial
Security shareholders and various regulators.
    Keycorp said the merger is expected to become effective as
soon as possible after December 31, 1987, the date Utah's
interstate banking law becomes operational.
    Keycorp said Richard K. Hemingway and certain members of
the Hemingway family who own about 30 pct of Commercial
Security's outstanding shares have agreed to vote in favor of
the transaction and not dispose of their stock.
     Based in Salt Lake City, Commercial Security ended 1986
with assets of 830.3 mln dlrs, net loans of 496.6 mln dlrs and
deposits of 707.9 mln dlrs. It had net income of 5.1 mln dlrs
or 3.16 dlrs a share on 1.6 mln average shares outstanding last
year.                        
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11362>
Peat Marwick and KMG Main Hurdman said
their merger will be completed tomorrow.
    The new firm, to be known as KPMG Peat Marwick, will rank
among the largest public account and consulting firms in the
U.S. based on combined 1986 revenues of 1.35 billion dlrs,
1,825 partners and a total staff of 16,500 in 136 offices.
    KPMG was created as part of the merger announced last
September of Peat Marwick International Klynveld Main Goerdeler
to form Klynveld Peat Marwick Goerdeler.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11369>
Borg-Warner Corp in a statement said it
has received GAF Corp's 46 dlrs a share acquisition proposal
and will have no comment until its board of directors has had a
chance to examine it thoroughly.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11373>
Audio/Video Affiliates Inc said it
will receive an undisclosed amount from &lt;Dixons Group PLC> in
connection with the termination of Cyacq Corp's 92.50 dlr per
share tender offer for Cyclops Corp &lt;CYL>.
    The company said the amount from Dixons is in lieu of
reimbursement expenses for the Cyacq tender.  Citicorp &lt;CCI>
was the other partner in Cyacq.
    The payment was in connection with Dixons' previously
-announced agreement to increase its tender price for Cyclops
to 95.00 dlrs per share, Cycacq's ending of its competing bid
and the ending of litigation between the parties.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11374>
Republic Savings and Loan
Association and &lt;Pioneer Savings> of Racine, Wis., said they
have signed a definitive agreement to combine the two
associations into a publicly held holding company to be called
Republic Capital Group Inc.
    The associations said they would form the company by
exchanging Republic's stock for shares in the holding company,
which Pioneer savers could purchase when Pioneer converts from
mutual to stock ownership.
    The associations added that they would remain independent,
but wholly owned, units of the holding company.
    The associations said they would continue to do business
using their present names and management.
    The combination of Republic's 459 mln dlrs in assets with
Pioneer's 125 mln dlrs would make the new holding company the
fifth largest savings and loan organization in Wisconsin, they
said.
    The associations said the move is subject to approval by
the Federal Home Loan Bank Board and the Wisconsin Commissioner
of Savings and Loan, as well as Republic's shareholders and
Pioneer's depositors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11378>
Brougher Insurance Group Inc
said it plans to sell 40 pct of the stock of its subsidiary,
Intercontinental Corp, for one mln dlrs to three European
insurance companies.
    The parent company said it signed a letter of intent to
sell the stock to &lt;WASA Europeiska Forsakrings AB> of Sweden,
&lt;Europeiske Reiseforsikring A/S> of Norway, and &lt;Europeiska
Rejseforsikrings A/S> of Denmark.
    Brougher said it expects to realize a net after-tax gain of
approximately 330,000 dlrs, or 12 cts per share, from issuing
stock of Intercontinental.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11386>
Acton Corp said it has agreed to
sell its five Michigan cable television systems to Wisconsin
Cablevision Inc for about 9,500,000 dlrs, resulting in a gain
of about six mln dlrs.
    The company said the sale is subject to review by local
authorities.  The systems have about 7,500 subscribers.
    Acton said proceeds will be used to retire bank debt.
    The company said it has also entered into a 15.5 mln dlr
bank credit agreement that will allow it to complete the
prepayment of all its obligations to members of its present
bank syndicate.
    The company said the new credit will also allow it to
prepay some other debt and redeem its Class C Series Two
preferred stock.
    It said the new facility has allowed it to take full
advantage of an early payment discount of about 13 mln dlrs in
principal and interest which was negotiated with its banking
syndicate in connection with an April 1986 financial
restructuring.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11393>
USX Corp's Texas Oil and Gas Corp
subsidiary and Consolidated Natural Gas Co have mutually agreed
not to pursue further their talks on Consolidated's possible
purchase of Apollo Gas Co from Texas Oil.
    No details were given.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11396>
The Chubb Corp said it completed the
previously-announced merger of its subsidiary with and into
Sovereign Corp &lt;SOVR>, a life insurance holding company.
    Under the terms of the merger, Sovereign stockholders
wil receive, in a tax free exchange, 0.1365 of a share of Chubb
common stock for each share of Sovereign held, the company
said. 
    This equals 9.11 dlrs per share of Sovereign stock based on
the closing price of Chubb common stock on March 30.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11402>
Investor David F. Laroche said he has
decided to drop the condition to his tender offer for 170,000
shares of NECO Enterprises Inc at 26 dlrs each that at least
170,000 shares be tendered.
    He said he has extended the expiration of the offer until
April 14.
    Thorugh March 27, he said 45,696 NECO shares had been
tendered.
    Laroche said he may obtain a short-term loan of up to one
mln dlrs from Amoskeag Bank to help finance the purchase of
shares under the offer, bearing interest of up to nine pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11405>
Telecast Inc said it closed on
the financing portion of its previously-announced acquisition
of approximately 14,600 hotel rooms from &lt;Dynavision Inc>.
    The three mln dlr financing package was provided by Sanwa
Business Credit Corp, a subsidiary of &lt;Sanwa Bank Ltd> of
Japan, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11431>
The May Department Stores Co said it
has signed an agreement to sell its Sycamore Specialty Store
Division to an investment group that includes Syacmore senior
management.
    May said it expects to close the deal, which includes the
entire division and its 1,000 employees, in April.
    Sycamore has 111 women's apparel stores in Indiana, Ohio,
Illinois, Kentucky and Michigan, May said.
    May added that the Indiana National Bank of Indianapolis
provided a portion of the deal's financing.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11441>
Reichhold Chemicals Inc said
it is part of a group that has purchased PCR Inc from Hanson
Trust PLC's SCM Corp subsidiary.
    It said other group members include Jacksonville, Fla.,
businessman Jack C. Demetree and managers of PCR.
    Reichhold said it made a "modest" cash investment.  PCR
makes high-performance materials for a variety of industries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11449>
Investor David LaRoche said he has
extended his cash offer to buy 170,000 shares of NECO
Enterprises Inc at 26 dlrs each until April 14. The tender
offer was to have expired yesterday.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
LaRoche, a North Kingstown, R.I., investor who already holds
nearly one-third of NECO's total outstanding commonstock, also
waived a condition of his offer that a minimum of 170,000
shares actually be tendered.
    NECO has 957,000 shares outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11464>
UAL Inc said it completed the
acquisition of Hilton International from Transworld Corp &lt;TWT>,
paying 982.5 mln dlrs in cash and securities.
    Hilton International will add 90 hotels to UAL's Westin
hotel unit, which operates 61 hotels. The two chains will have
a total of 151 hotels with 67,000 rooms and 71,000 employees,
it said.
    Harry Mullikin, chairman and chief executive of UAL's
Westin Hotel unit, has been elected to the additional post of
chairman and chief executive of Hilton International.
    UAL will change its name to Allegis at its annual meeting.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11465>
Henkel KGaA of Dusseldorf, West
Germany, said it has completed the acquisition of the Process
Chemicals Division of Occidental Petroleum Corp's &lt;OXY>
Occidental Chemical Corp subsidiary for undisclosed terms.
    Process Chemicals, acquired from Diamond Shamrock Corp
&lt;DIA> in September, makes specialty chemicals for a variety of
industrial markets and has annual sales of about 160 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11468>
AMR Corp's American Airlines unit said
it plans to complete the integration of AirCal into its
operations within four to five months.
    American's merger with AirCal, announced last November,
received final approval from the Department of Transportation
yesterday.
    American said Richard D. Pearson, coordinator of the
airline's merger activities, will become chairman and chief
executive officer of AirCal during the period up to completion
of the merger.
    American said Pearson succeeds William Lyon, who has been
elected to AMR's board.
    It added that David A. Banmiller will continue as AirCal's
president and chief operating officer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11477>
Butler Mfg Co said it signed a
memorandum of intent to acquire Naturalite Inc, a manufacturer
of skylights.
    It said Garland, Texas-based Naturalite had sales in 1986
of about 20 mln dlrs.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11484>
Tradestar Corp said it acquired
&lt;Image Video Inc> for an undisclosed sum.
    The company said Image Video produces and distributes
videos for the home market.
    Image Video is scheduled to release 20 video projects in
1987, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11492>
A. William Reynolds, chairman and
chief executive of GenCorp Inc, told shareholders he expects to
announce a company alternative to a 100-dlr-per-share hostile
tender within a week.
    Last night the company urged shareholders to reject the
tender. Reynolds urged shareholders to be patient, saying the
group sponsoring the tender offer had months to evaluate
GenCorp while "we have had only 10 days to respond."
    Reynolds also disclosed the company has resolved legal
challenges to its planned sale of WOR TV, serving the New York
City market, and expects to complete the sale by Friday.
    Reynolds said the company expects to book an after tax gain
of 250 mln dlrs from the sale of WOR TV. The company plans to
sell the station to MCA Inc &lt;MCA> for 387 mln dlrs.
    Reynolds did not specify whether the legal challenges were
dropped or dismissed. The Federal Communications Commission has
already approved the station's sale.
    Money from the sale of the station will play a role in
helping develop an alternative to the tender offer co-sponsored
by AFG Industries Inc &lt;AFG> and Wagner and Brown, Reynolds
said. He provided no other details.
    Randall Hubbard, chairman of AFG, and Joel Reed, chief
financial officer of Wagner and Brown, attended the meeting,
which was shifted from a tire plant to a downtown hotel. About
300 people were present despite an overnight snowstorm.
    Hubbard and Reed chatted briefly with Reynolds after the
meeting but declined to discuss their proposal with reporters.
    Reynolds told the shareholders friends and family members
have been telling him "Bill, just don't pay greenmail" to end
the takeover threat. Greenmail describes a buyout of a minority
shareholder at a price not available to other holders. Reynolds
said he considers it a "repugnant device."
    Shareholders elected management's slate of 11 directors.
Mario Gabelli, head of a New York investment firm which owns a
large block of stock, proposed one nominee for the board.
Gabelli said the unsuccessful attempt was designed to "stiffen
the backbone of the board to discourage greenmail."
    Hubbard and Reed reiterated previous statements that they
are open to negotiations with GenCorp.
    Asked about severance contracts for key executives in the
event of a shift in control of the company, Reynolds asserted
"we're developing alternatives that would not result in a
change in control."
    Asked whether the company's plan would be superior to any
proposal of AFG and Wagner and Brown, Reynolds commented, "We
know the company, we know the values and we know the
opportunities better than any outside group."
    In response to a question about whether any units are up
for sale, he said only that GenCorp is evaluating alternatives.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11504>
Borg-Warner Corp will vigorously
resist GAF Corp's 46-dlr-per-share takeover offer, but the
Midwest conglomerate may fall prey to another offer,
either from GAF or its own management, analysts believe.
    Analysts also said Borg-Warner may attempt to escape GAF
through a restructuring. The speculation pushed Borg-Warner's
stock up 1-3/8 to 48-1/2 in heavy trading.
    Analysts predicted feisty GAF Chairman Samuel Heyman will
stage a tough campaign to gain control of Borg-Warner so he can
add its profitable plastics and chemical business to GAF.
    "It seems from at least their dealing with (raider Irwin)
Jacobs that they don't want to be taken over. The question is
now do they acquiesce to GAF. I think instinctively, they want
to remain independent," said Dudley Heer of Duff and Phelps.
    Borg-Warner has been under siege by takeover speculation
for almost a year. Last week, Jacobs' investment vehicle,
Minstar Inc, and an investor group sold its 10.1 mln
Borg-Warner shares. The same day, GAF Corp raised its stake by
9.1 mln shares to 19.9 pct of the outstanding.
    Jacobs was interested in buying the company, but took no
steps toward a transaction.
    "Their (Borg-Warner) policy has been to stonewall them for
the last nine months. It's been one of the dullest corporate
battles I've seen," said one analyst.
    The battle, however, has heated up, and the range of
breakup values on Wall Street span from the current market
price to almost 60 dlrs per share. Most analysts said they
think a price in the low 50s would be appropriate.
    Arbitragers speculate that GAF will not give up easily on
its 3.16 billion dlr offer to buy the balance of Borg-Warner.
    Analysts who know GAF predict Heyman will either end up
with Borg-Warner or enrich his chemicals and building materials
company in some other way. Heyman two years ago attempted an
unsuccessful takeover of Union Carbide Corp, but GAF benefited
from that company's restructuring.
    "Borg Warner can't quibble that it's not a legitimate
offer. It seems to me the short of it is Borg Warner is kind of
between a rock and a hard place. They either have to accept a
46 dlr proposal or perhaps work a deal where it's sweetened. I
personally think the company is (worth) around 55 dlrs per
share," said Pershing analyst Richard Henderson.
    Henderson also speculated the company might attempt a
restructuring such as the one carried out by Goodyear Tire and
Rubber Co last year when it was being courted by Sir James
Goldsmith. The company bought back the financier's stock and
carried out a wider share repurchase.
    Arbitragers, however, said they do not believe Heyman is
seeking "greenmail," or the repurchase of his stock by the
company at a premium.
    Analysts noted that Heyman seems to have no problems with
financing the transaction.
    Previously associated with "junk bond" experts, Drexel
Burnham Lambert Inc, GAf said it would finance its Borg-Warner
takeover with bank financing. GAF said it would make a tender
offer following a merger agreement approved by the Borg-WArner
board and conditioned on the board's recommendation of the
tender offer and merger.
    Heyman said in a letter to Borg-Warner that he expects a
merger would provide job security for Borg-Warner employees
since the two companies businesses overlap. Analysts, however,
believe Heyman would sell off assets he did not want to repay
debt from the transaction.
    GAF's stock rose 1-5/8 today, to 48-5/8.
   "I believe, obviously, if GAF takes over Borg-Warner at the
level it is proposing it would enhance GAF share values
substantially," said Oppenheimer analyst Charles Rose.
    He said at 46 dlrs per share, Heyman's average cost for the
company's stock would be 44 dlrs per share based on GAF's
current holdings.
    Rose said the Borg-Warner plastics and chemical business,
which makes thermo-plastics is the asset attracting Heyman.
Analysts said it accounts for a third of Borg's earnings.
    The plastics are used in telephone equipment, office
equipment and appliances. "Borg has half the market in the U.S.
and is the leading technical player and the leading innovator,"
Rose said. Its competitors are Dow Chemical Co &lt;DOW> and
Monsanto Corp &lt;MTC>, he said.
    Borg-Warner also has an automotive parts business, and a
protective systems business, which includes Wells Fargo
security guards. It also has an information services business,
and is trying to sell its financial services business.
    Borg-Warner earned 206.1 mln dlrs or 2.35 dlrs per share on
revenues of 3.62 billion dlrs in 1986. Smaller GAF, in 1986,
earned on an operating basis 80.7 mln dlrs or 2.22 dlrs per
share on sales of 753.8 mln dlrs.
    GAF's net earnings included an after tax gain of 201.4 mln
from its participation in a Union Carbide exchange offer, a
special union carbide dividend, and the sale of its Union
Carbide shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11505>
Manhattan National Corp said its
shareholders overwhelmingly approved a proprosal through which
&lt;Union Central Life Insurance Co> took control of the company
by acquiring about 3.6 mln shares of newly issued Manhattan
National common stock for 43.2 mln dlrs.
    The company said the transaction gives Union Central, a
Cincinnati-based mutual insurance company, a total of 8,804,397
shares of Manhattan National stock, or 52.2 pct of the total
outstanding.
    Manhattan National said about three mln dlrs of the
invested funds will be used to repay short-term debt and two
mln dlrs has been earmarked for other short-term needs.
    The remainder will be available for the company's insurance
units, or for other business purposes, it said.
    Charles C. Hinkley, president and chief executive officer
of Union Central, is expected to be named chairman, president
and chief executive of Manhattan National, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11508>
Computer Network Technology Corp
(CNT) said that &lt;Quantum Venture Partners LP>, a private
investment limited partnership, has acquired an additional
600,000 shares of CNT common stock, raising its stake in CNT to
15.3 pct from 9.6 pct of the currently outstanding shares.
    CNT said Quantum bought the shares by exercising 1.5 mln
dlrs in warrants, bringing its total investment in CNT to 2.5
mln dlrs.
    CNT also said &lt;Sand Technology Systems Inc> of Canada
bought two of its CHANNELink networking units for a data
processing service for major health care facilities in Canada.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11514>
Quest Biotechnology Inc said its Quest
Blood Substitute Inc subsidiary executed an agreement with Alza
Corp &lt;AZA> which will make Alza a preferred shareholder of its
subsidiary.
    Quest said the agreement also offers Alza the right to
acquire up to 25 pct of the unit's equity in exchange for the
acquisition of patent rights to Alza technology in an area
where Quest has an interest.
    Quest also said its signed a merger agreement with &lt;Hunt
Research Corp> and its affiliate &lt;ICAS Corp>. Quest said it
expects to complete the merger within the next several weeks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11515>
Chubb Corp said it completed the
previously announced acquisition of Sovereign Corp.
    Under terms of the acquisition, Sovereign shareholders will
receive, in a tax-free exchange, 0.1365 share of Chubb common
for each Sovereign share held.
    Chubb said the transaction was valued at 9.11 dlrs a share
based on the closing price of its stock on March 30.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11522>
&lt;Inverness Petroleum Ltd> said
it acquired the oil and gas assets of its controlling
shareholder &lt;Silverton Resources Ltd> for 26.4 mln dlrs,
effective March 3, 1987.
    Inverness said it issued 2,640,000 class A convertible
retractable redeemable preferred shares in exchange for the
assets, which include all Silverton's oil and gas properties,
undeveloped acreage and its shares of Australian subsidiary
S.R.L. Exploration Pty Ltd.
    The preferred shares were immediately retracted for cash,
the company said.
    The transaction resulted in a discharge of Silverton's bank
debt of 21.0 mln dlrs and a three mln dlr loan to Inverness
from Silverton, Inverness said.
    As a result of the acquisition, Inverness has bank debt of
18.0 mln dlrs, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11523>
&lt;Americus Shareowner Service Corp>
said the Americus Trust for Bristol-Myers will continue to
accept tendered Bristol-Meyers Co &lt;BMY> shares until December
one, extending the original expiration date of April one for
eight months.
    If the common stock price exceeds the trust's termination
price of 110 dlrs, Americus Shareowner Service said, the trust
will be temporarily closed until the price of the underlying
stock falls below the termination price.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11526>
Quest Biotechnology Inc said its new
subsidiary, Quest Blood Substitute Inc, signed the agreement
and plan of merger with Hunt Research Corp and its affiliate,
ICAS Corp.
    It said Quest Blood expects to complete the merger within
the next several weeks. Terms were not disclosed.
    In a related transaction, Quest Blood said it executed an
agreement with Alza Corp, which will make Alza a preferred
shareholder of Quest Blood and offer Alza the right to acquire
a total equity position of up to 25 pct of Quest Blood in
exchange for acquisition of patent rights to Alza technology.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11527>
Lincoln Foodservice Products
Inc said it completed purchasing certain assets of Redco
product line of food slicers, cutters and wedgers from the
Dean/Alco Food Prep division of &lt;Alco Foodservice Equipment
Co.>
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11539>
Wilson Brothers said it completed
the sale of most of the assets of its Enro Shirt Co Inc,
Enro-At-Ease Inc and Foxcroft Shirt Ltd subsidiaries to Enro
Acquisition Corp for about 24.2 mln dlrs, half in cash and half
in subordinated promissory notes.
    Enro Acquisition is a newly formed corporation and owns
Ramar Intercapital Corp and Wilson's chief operating officer,
V. Jerome Kaplan, and other managers.
    Enro Acquisition also assumed most of the units'
liabilities including a 6.2 mln dlrs term loan.
    Completion of the sale and recent sales of substantially
all the assets of the company's 50 pct owned affiliate GMW
Industries INc, are expected to result in a net gain of about
nine mln dlrs in the first quarter of 1987.
    For the year ago first quarter, Wilson reported net income
of 28,000 dlrs, including a 103,000 dlrs credit, on sales of
15.8 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11550>
Standex International Corp said it
acquired &lt;Alan Duffy Engineering Ltd> of Blackburn, Lancashire,
England, for an undisclosed amount of cash.
    The newly-acquired company will operate as part of
Standex's Perkins division, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11553>
Sterling Drug Inc said it sold the
assets of its subsidiary Greene Dental Products Inc to Rinn
Corp, of Elgin, Ill.
    The cash purchase price was not disclosed.
    Greene produces and sells dental X-ray tabs, mount products
and record systems.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11563>
&lt;Scan-Graphics Inc> said it has
completed a merger with &lt;Captive Venture Capital Inc> in which
former shareholders of Scan-Graphics have beome majority
shareholders of the merged company and the Scan-Graphics board
has been named the board of the merged company.
    It said the merged company is now known as Scan-Graphics
Inc and expects to be listed on the NASDAQ system soon.
    It said Captive Venture issued 1,600,000 restricted
preferred shares convertible into 16 mln common shares for
Scan-Graphics.  Captive had 2,649,500 common shares outstanding
before the merger.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11579>
Tribune Co said it exchanged cash and
the assets of eight of its Sunbelt Publishing Co community
publications circulated in the Naples and Fort Myers, Fla.,
area for assets of nine community papers in suburban Tampa and
St. Petersburg published by Gulf Coast Newspapers Inc.
    Gulf Coast is a subsidiary of the E.W. Scripps Co (doing
business as Scripps Howard).
    No additional financial details were disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11597>
Gould Inc's systems protection
division said it selected Merrill Lynch Interfunding INc to
provide financing for the purchase of the division from the
parent company.
    Terms were not disclosed. The agreement was announced in
February and Gould expects the transaction to be completed by
the end of April.
    The agreement assures the retention of more than 600 jobs
at a northeast Philadelphia plant which had been in jeapardy
when Gould had accepted a tentative offer from Westinghouse INc
which was later terminated.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11598>
Welbilt Corp said it
completed the previously announced acquisitions of the assets
of L and M Manufacturing Co and Food Machinery Engineering Co,
two manufacturers of automated bakery production equipment
headquartered in Toronto.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11599>
Charles Schwab announced the
completion of the 280-mln-dlr purchase from BankAmerica Co of
Charles Schwab and Co Inc and its holding company Charles
Schwab Corp.
    The leveraged buyout is being financed by a syndicate of
seven banks led by the Security Pacific National Bank unit of
Security Pacific Corp &lt;SPC>, the announcement said.
    Charles Schwab and Co is the nation's largest discount
brokerage firm.
    The Schwab announcement said BankAmerica received 175 mln
dlrs in cash, 50 mln of 10 pct senior subordinated debentures,
55 mln dlrs of nine pct junior subordinated debentures and the
right to receive 15 pct of the appreciated value of the common
equity of the new company over a maximum period of eight years.
    Security Pacific also acquired a stock appreciation right,
equal to 1.8 pct of the value of the new company's fully
diluted common stock, Schwab said.
    The right is exchangeable into warrants upon transfer to a
Security Pacific non-affiliate, Schwab said.
    BankAmerica originally acquired Schwab in 1983 for 57 mln
dlrs worth of BankAmerica common stock.
    The sale of the profitable discount brokerage firm back to
Charles Schwab was aimed at raising capital and was seen by
banking analysts as a means of heading off a hostile takeover
attempt by First Interstate Bancorp &lt;I>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11602>
&lt;Royex Gold Mining Corp> said it is
making an offer for &lt;International Corona Resources Ltd> of 50
dlrs per share and 40 dlrs per warrant.
    The offer covers four mln Corona common shares and all
outstanding 9.50 dlr Corona share purchase warrants expiring
August 31, 1987, Royex said.
    Royex said that if it gains four mln Corona common shares,
its interest in Corona will increase to 50 pct from 38 pct. It
also said that if more than four mln shares are tendered, it
will pay for them on a pro rata basis.
    Royex said the purchase price for each Corona share
consists of one Royex convertible retractable zero coupon
Series B first preference share at 20 dlrs nominal value, one
Royex convertible 6-1/2 pct Series C first preference share at
20 dlrs nominal value, one five-year 7.50 dlr Royex share
purchase warrant and four dlrs in cash.
    The price for each Corona warrant consists of 1.75
convertible retractable zero coupon Series B first preference
share at 35 dlrs nominal value and one five-year 7.50 Royex
share purchase warrant.
     Royex said both series of preference shares will be
convertible into Royex common shares, initially on a basis of
3.33 common shares for each preference share converted.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11619>
Butler Manufacturing Co said it
signed a letter of intent to purchase &lt;Naturalite Inc>, a
designer of skylights.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Naturalite had sales of about 20 mln dlrs in 1986. The
transaction is expected to be completed in May and subject to
both boards' approvals.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11623>
Safety-Kleen Corp said it has
completed the acquisition of McKesson Envirosystems Co, a unit
of McKesson Corp &lt;MCK> for an undisclosed amount.
    Safety-Kleen, an industrial, automotive parts cleaning
service, said McKesson Envirosystems has solvent recycling
plants in Illinois, Kentucky and Puerto Rico.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11657>
Allied-Signal Inc said it
completed the previously announced sale of its Linotype Group
to Commerzbank AG of West Germany.
    The purchase price was not disclosed.
    Eschborn, West Germany-based Linotype had 1986 sales of
more than 200 mln dlrs, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11661>
GAF Corp chairman Samuel Heyman told
Reuters he did not foresee major changes in Borg-Warner &lt;BOR>
if GAF's 46 dlr-per-share offer to acquire Borg-Warner is
successful.
    "We have great respect for Borg-Warner mangagement," Heyman
said, following a speech at the American Institute of Chemical
Engineers annual meeting. "We don't have any particular changes
in mind."
    Earlier today, GAF announced that a 3.16-billion-dlr-offer
was presented to the board of directors of the Chicago-based
company.
    Last week, GAF had purchased additional shares of the
company for 40-1/8 dlrs, increasing its stake in Borg-Warner to
19.9 pct.
    In 1985, GAF made an unsuccessful effort to acquire Union
Carbide Corp for five billion dlrs, and has since expressed an
interest in acquiring a chemical company that would complement
its own chemical business.
    When asked whether GAF would consider selling the
non-chemical assets of Borg-Warner if its takeover offer is
accepted, Heyman declined to comment.
    He also refused to say whether GAF would consider
increasing its the dollar value of its takeover offer if the
initial proposal is rejected.
    Heyman emphasized that he considered the GAF offer to
Borg-Warner to be a friendly one.
    "We think we made a fair offer that is good for Borg-Warner
management and good for its shareholders," Heyman said.
     In his speech, Heyman said he feared too many chemical
companies were attempting to specialize in the same high margin
niche products.
    He said they were turning their backs on core commodity
chemical businesses. 
    Heyman said the chemical industry has taken a total of
seven billion dlrs in pre-tax writeoffs during the past two
years to trim balance sheets.
    He predicted that the U.S. chemical industry, which
reported a total of 13 billion dlrs in 1986 profits, would see
a 20 pct gain in earnings this year because of increasing
exports, cheaper feedstock costs and the weakened U.S. dlr.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11679>
Philadelphia Suburban Corp said
it acquired Mentor Systems Inc, a Lexington, Ky., computer
software company, for common stock.
    Detailed terms were not disclosed.
    Mentor specializes in public sector accounting systems. It
has 73 employees at its Lexington facility, four branch offices
in the Midwest and one in New York.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11707>
Holder Communications Corp said it
agreed to buy five privately held companies with combined 1987
revenues expected to be about 25 mln dlrs.
    Holder plans to issue 32 mln common shares to buy the
Nashville-based companies, all of which are owned by Jack
Norman and Joe Shaw, their families and employees.
    The companies include radio stations WKXC-AM and WWKZ-FM,
which operate in the New Albany/Tupelo, Miss., market, and
General Masonry Inc, a contractor in the Southeast.
    The acquisitions are subject to approval by Holder
shareholders and the Federal Communications Commission.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11722>
Innovex  Inc said it has completed
the purchase of substantially of the interest in Lucht
Engineering Inc that it did not already own.
    Prior to this move Innovex owned 79 pct of Lucht, the
company said.
    Innovex said it bought the shares by exchanging 293,101
shares of unregistered Innovex common stock. Innovex president,
Thomas Haley, said the exchange is non-dilutive and will cause
a slight increase in Innovex's fully diluted earnings per share
during the last half of fiscal 1987.
    Lucht will continue to function as a unit of Innovex,
Innovex said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11738>
Eli Lilly and Co told the Securities
and Exchange Commission it cut its stake in Liposome Co Inc to
500,000 shares, or 4.0 pct of the total outstanding common
stock, from 900,000 shares or 7.3 pct.
    Lilly said it sold 400,000 Liposome common shares on March
17 at eight dlrs each.
    As long as Lilly's stake in Liposome is below five pct, it
is not required to report any further dealings it has in the
company's stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11743>
Acceleration Corp said it sold a
24.9 pct stake in the common stock of &lt;United Coasts Corp> to
the &lt;Sheet Metal Workers' National Pension Fund>.
    The company said it agreed to sell the fund an additional
5.1 pct of Hartford, Conn.-based United when the fund receives
approval from the director of insurance of the state of
Arizona.
   The company said today's sale reduced its holdings in United
to 25 pct. The second sale, when completed, will lower its
stake to 19.9 pct, Acceleration said.
    The company said the proceeds from both sales will be
roughly equal to the 3,330,000 dlrs it originally invested in
United Coasts in late 1985 even though it will retain a 19.9
pct stake.
    Acceleration said it plans to include gains from the stock
sales in its results for the first and second quarters of 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11744>
Oppenheimer, the brokerage and
investment subsidiary of Oppenheimer Group Inc, told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it sold its entire 6.0 pct,
stake of Cyclops Corp.
    Oppenheimer said it sold the 243,400-share stake on March
27 at 95.00 dlrs a share.
    It said it initially bought the stock in connection with
risk arbitrage and other investment activities in the ordinary
course of its business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11748>
An investment partnership led by
four sons of Loews Corp &lt;LTR> Chairman Lawrence Tisch said it
cut its Tosco Corp stake to the equivalent of 1,499,985 shares,
or 4.95 pct of the total, from 1,666,650 shares, or 5.5 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the partnership, FLF Associates, said it sold 10,000 shares of
Serier E convertible preferred stock on March 26 for 34.125
dlrs each and 5,000 shares of preferred stock on March 27 at
35.25 dlrs each. The sales leave the Tisch brothers with
135,000 shares of preferred stock which can be converted into
1,499,985 shares of common stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11751>
Cominco Ltd said it
sold its 50 pct stake in Canada Metal Co Ltd to Canada Metal
senior management for an undisclosed sum.
    Cominco said the sale was part of its previously announced
policy of divesting non-core businesses.
    Canada Metal is a Toronto-based producer of lead alloys and
engineered lead products.
    Canada Metal production figures were not immediately
available.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11755>
A group led by New York investors
David Bellet and Chester Siuda said it lowered its stake in DBA
Systems Inc to 100,000 shares, or 3.7 pct of the total
outstanding, from 170,000 shares, or 6.3 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group said it sold 70,000 DBA common shares between Feb 13
and March 23 at prices ranging from 18.25 to 20.00 dlrs a
share.
    So long as the group's stake in DBA is below five pct, it
is no longer required to report its further dealings in the
company's common stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11763>
Emery Air Freight Corp said it
plans to begin tomorrow a 40 dlr a share tender offer for 83
pct of the outstanding common stock of Purolator Courier Corp.
    The company said the tender offer is the first step in a
plan to buy 100 pct of the Purolator shares.
    Following the tender offer, Emery said it would offer 40
dlrs of junior subordinated debentures for each remaining
Purolator share outstanding.
    On March one, Purolator agreed to a 35 dlr a share
leveraged buyout by eight Purolator executives and EF Hutton
LBO Inc, a unit of EF Hutton Group Inc.
    Emery said it had tried unsuccessfully to open merger
discussions with Purolator before the company accepted the
management-led buyout offer.
    In a letter to Purolator's chairman, Nicholas F. Brady,
Emery's chairman, John C. Emery, said the company would still
prefer to negotiate with Purolator.
    But he said the imminent expiration of the leveraged buyout
group's offer has forced the company to make an unsolicited
tender offer of its own.
    Emery said its offer is scheduled to expire at 2400 EST on
April 28, unless extended.
    The company said conditions of the offer include the
receipt of at least two-thirds of Purolator's shares
outstanding, on a fully diluted basis, and the repeal of its
share purchase rights plan.
    Emery said the offer is also subject to completion of the
previously announced sale of Purolator's Canadian operations.
    Emery said Chemical Bank, Bankers Trust, Morgan Guaranty
Trust Co and Salomon Bros had agreed to provide financing for
the tender offer.
    It said the junior subordinated debentures to be issued in
the subsequent merger will carry a 13 pct annual interest rate,
payable twice a year.
    For the first three years after the notes are issued,
interest will be paid, at Emery's option, in cash or in
additional notes, Emery said.
    It added that the notes will not be subject to redemption
for one year after they are issued.
    Emery said Purolator would operate as a wholly owned unit
of the company after the merger. It said it hoped Purolator's
management would continue with the company.
    "We believe that our two companies provide an excellent fit
with each other and that the combination will enable each of us
to better serve our existing customers and meet the challenges
of the future," Emery's chairman said in his letter.
    He said a merger would significantly enhance the financial
turnaround that Purolator's management had previously forecast.
    Officials at Purolator could not immediately be reached for
comment on the offer, which was released several hours after
the stock market had closed.
    Emery's stock closed up 1/2 at 12-5/8.
    Purolator closed at 34-7/8, off 5/8.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11791>
A U.S. Appeals court last night
blocked the 860 mln dlr merger of Delta Airlines Inc &lt;DAL.N>
and &lt;Western Airlines> just hours before it was to go into
effect because of a dispute over union representation.
    The ruling came in a lawsuit in which the Air Transport
Employees union said Western's management should fulfil a
promise to honour union contracts if a merger took place.
    The airlines argued that Western's promise could not be
enforced in a takeover by a larger company. Airlines officials
could not be reached for comment on the ruling, which halts the
merger until arbitration on the dispute is completed.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11793>
Boliden AB &lt;BLDS ST> mining and metals
group said it will announce a major foreign corporate takeover
today involving a company with an annual turnover of two
billion crowns.
    A Boliden spokesman told Reuters details of the
announcement would be given at a news conference by chairman
Rune Andersson at 1030 gmt today. He said the company involved
employed 4,000 people, but declined to name the takeover price
or say what field the firm operated in.
    Share analysts said they expected Boliden to announce it
will be taking over the U.S. Allis-Chalmers Corp &lt;AH.O> but
company officials refused to confirm the reports ahead of the
news conference.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11808>
Ajinomoto Co Inc &lt;AJIN.T> said it will
sign around end-April to buy the 50 pct of &lt;Knorr Foods Co
Ltd>, capitalised at four billion yen, that it does not already
own from its U.S. Partner &lt;CPC International Inc>.
    Ajinomoto will also acquire 50 pct each of CPC's two sales
subsidiaries and six production units in Hong Kong, the
Philippines, Singapore, Malaysia, Taiwan and Thailand, he said.
    The total cost of the acquisition is 340 mln dlrs, the
spokesman said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11812>
The Secretary of State for Trade and
Industry said he had decided not to refer the proposed
acquisition by Reed International Plc &lt;REED.L> of &lt;Technical
Publishing Company Inc> to the Monopolies and Mergers
Commission.
    The proposed acquisition by &lt;Rosehaugh Plc> of &lt;The General
Funds Investment Trust Plc> was also cleared.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11816>
Singapore's United Industrial Corp Ltd
(UIC) has agreed in principle to inject 16 mln dlrs in
convertible loan stock into &lt;Teck Hock and Co (Pte) Ltd>, a
creditor bank official said.
    UIC is likely to take a controlling stake in the troubled
international coffee trading firm, but plans are not finalised
and negotiations will continue for another two weeks, he said.
    Teck Hock's nine creditor banks have agreed to extend the
company's loan repayment period for 10 years although a
percentage of the new capital injection will be used to pay off
part of the debt.
    Teck Hock owes more than 100 mln Singapore dlrs and since
last December the banks have been allowing the company to
postpone loan repayments while they try to find an investor.
    The nine banks are Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp Ltd, United
Overseas Bank Ltd, Banque Paribas, Bangkok Bank Ltd, Citibank
N.A., Standard Chartered Bank Ltd, Algemene Bank Nederland NV,
Banque Nationale de Paris and Chase Manhattan Bank NA.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11822>
Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd &lt;MITH.T>
(MHI) and C. Itoh and Co Ltd &lt;CITT.T> have decided to sell
their combined 65 pct stake in Indonesia's &lt;Pt Triguna Utama
Machinery Industries> to &lt;Caterpillar Tractor Co>,  spokesmen
for the two Japanese companies said.
   Triguna, set up in 1982, is owned 40 pct by MHI and 25 pct
by C. Itoh and 35 pct by an Indonesian company. It makes about
10 forklift trucks and a similar number of excavators each
month in technological cooperation with MHI.
    The spokesmen said the sale results from an expected
restructuring later this year of the 50/50 Caterpillar/MHI
joint venture Japanese company &lt;Caterpillar Mitsubishi Ltd>,
formed in 1963.
    They said the venture will be renamed &lt;Shin Caterpillar
Mitsubishi Ltd> and capitalised at 23 billion yen. It will
still be owned equally by MHI and Caterpillar and will be set
up with the aim of centralising MHI's excavator business.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11829>
Swedish mining and metals group
Boliden AB &lt;BLDS ST> said it would buy the mining equipment
operations of the U.S. Allis-Chalmers Corp &lt;AH.O>, amounting to
more than 50 pct of group sales, for 600 mln crowns.
    Boliden president Kjell Nilsson told a news conference the
acquisition of the Allis-Chalmers unit, which he described as
the world's leading producer of equipment for the mineral
processing industry, would yield positive synergy effects for
Boliden mining, metals and engineering operations.
    Nilsson said the takeover also will provide opportunities
to cooperate with the mining and materials handling operations
of Boliden's parent company, &lt;Trelleborg AB>.
    He said Allis-Chalmers was selling out because it needed
new cash after suffering big losses in its farm equipment
operation.
    The deal is subject to approval by Allis-Chalmers' annual
meeting, company officials said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11833>
Internatio-Mueller NV &lt;INTN.AS> said it
will acquire &lt;Promac Controls Inc> of Canada but declined to
comment on the amount of the payment, which will be in cash.
    Promac, which produces measurement and regulating
equipment, has a work force of 50 and had 1986 turnover of five
mln guilders, an Internatio spokesman said.
    He said the takeover fits into the company's drive for
expansion in the U.S and Canada and further acquisitions are
possible.
    Promac Controls will be part of Internatio's
electrotechnical sector.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11837>
Dutch steel concern
&lt;Hoogovens Groep BV> said it had reached agreement with NV
Philips Gloeielampenfabrieken &lt;PGLO.AS> on its takeover of
Cirex, a specialised Philips precision wax moulding unit.
    Neither party would reveal financial details of the deal,
initially announced in October.
    Hoogovens said Cirex turnover had grown in recent years to
30 mln guilders in 1986 and it expected further expansion.
    The unit delivers mainly to the car industry.
    Hoogovens said the acquisition would strengthen its
position as a supplier to industry of high-value metal
products.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11841>
Swedish mining and metals group
Boliden AB said it would buy the mining equipment operations of
the U.S. Allis-Chalmers Corp, amounting to more than 50 pct of
group sales, for 600 mln crowns.
    Boliden president Kjell Nilsson told a news conference the
acquisition of the Allis-Chalmers unit, which he described as
the world's leading producer of equipment for the mineral
processing industry, would yield positive synergy effects for
Boliden mining, metals and engineering operations.
    Nilsson said the takeover will provide opportunities to
cooperate with the mining and materials handling operations of
Boliden's parent company, Trelleborg AB.
    He said Allis-Chalmers was selling out because it needed
new cash after suffering big losses in its farm equipment
operation.
    The deal is subject to approval by Allis-Chalmers' annual
meeting, company officials said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11847>
Bond Corp Holdings Ltd &lt;BONA.S> said it
has completed the 1.05 billion dlr purchase of the electronic
media interests of unlisted &lt;Consolidated Press Holdings Ltd>.
    The new company &lt;Bond Media Ltd> now holds the television,
broadcasting and associated businesses previously held by Kerry
Packer's Consolidated, Bond Corp said in a statement.
    Packer, who made the sale in January, will be a director of
Bond Media. As previously reported, Bond Media will be publicly
floated with a rights issue to Bond Corp shareholders. Bond
Media will be 50 pct owned by Bond Corp and is expected to be
listed by the end of May, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11854>
Swedish Match AB &lt;SMBS.ST> said it was
selling one of its Portuguese subsidiaries, &lt;Sociedade de
Iniciativa e Aproveitamentos Florestais Sarl> (SIAF), to the
Porto-based &lt;Sonae Group> for an undisclosed price.
    SIAF, a subsidiary of Swedish Match since 1946, had a
turnover last year of 62 mln crowns, the Swedish group said in
a statement.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11860>
Swedish mining and metals group
Boliden AB &lt;BLDS.ST> said the takeover of the U.S.
Allis-Chalmers Corp's &lt;AH.O> mining machinery division made it
the world's leading maker of such equipment.
    President Kjell Nilsson, announcing the 600 mln crown deal,
told a news conference Boliden would now become a truly
international concern with operations in Brazil, Chile and
other big minerals-producing nations.
    He said the Allis-Chalmers' division, accounting for some
50 pct of the U.S. Group's sales, would fit in well into
Boliden.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11863>
U.S. Supreme Court Justice Sandra Day
O'Connor early this morning lifted an Appeals Court injunction
blocking the planned merger of Delta &lt;DAL> Airlines
Inc and Western Airlines &lt;WAL>, the Court said.
    O'Connor's action came hours after a three-judge panel of
the 9th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in San Francisco had
blocked the merger until a dispute over union representation
had been settled by arbitration.
    A Supreme Court spokesman said O'Connor granted a stay of
the injuction, allowing the merger, worth nearly 860 mln dlrs,
to go through as planned later today.
    The Supreme Court spokesman provided no other details. Each
of the nine Supreme Court justices has jurisdiction over a
particular regional Appellate circuit and has the power to
provisionally overturn its rulings without comment.
    The Appeals Court ruling surprised officials of
Atlanta-based Delta, which had been preparing for the merger
for months and had already painted Delta logos on airplanes
belonging to Western, which has headquartera in Los Angeles.
    "Our plans were to finalize the merger at midnight tonight,"
Delta spokesman Bill Berry told the Atlanta Constitution late
last night. "There was really very little that remained to be
done."
    The ruling in San Francisco came in a lawsuit that had been
filed in a Los Angeles federal court in which the Air Transport
Employees union sought to force Western's management to fulfill
a promise that it would honor union contracts if a merger took
place.
    The airlines argued that Western's promise could not be
enforced in a takeover by a larger company.
    After learning of the appeals court ruling, Delta officials
last night spread the word by telephone that Western employees
should report for work today in their old uniforms, not in new
Delta outfits.
    Delta announced last September that it was purchasing
Western. The merger took place in December, and Western has
been operated as a Delta subsidiary since then. The Western
name was to have disappeared at midnight last night.
    At issue is whether the Western unions would continue to
represent Western employees after the integration of the two
airlines.
    While all but eight pct of Western's 11,000 employees are
unionized, only Delta's pilots are union members.
    Delta had maintained that the three unions having contracts
with Western -- The Association of Flight Attendants and the
Teamsters, as well as the Air Transport Employees -- would be
"extinguished" after today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11867>
Citadel Holding Corp said it
has settled its litigation with Great Western Financial corp.
    The company said under the terms, Great Western has agreed
not to acquire or seek to acquire any voting securities of
Citadel or propose a merger with Citadel for five years, and
Citadel has paid Great Western six mln dlrs.
    Citadel said it is continuing to pursue its claims against
Salomon Inc &lt;SB>, which represented it in connection with the
disputed proposed merger with Great Western that was the
subject of the litigation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11872>
British Petroleum Co PLC said it has
started its previously announced 7.4 billion dlr offer to
purchase the 45 pct interest in Standard Oil Co that it does
not already own for 70 dlrs per share.
    In a newspaper advertisement, the company said the offer,
which is not conditioned on receipt of any minimum number of
shares, and associated withdrawal rights will expire April 28
unless extended.
    BP said it is asking Standard Oil for the use of its
shareholder list in disseminating the offer, on which the
Standard board has not yet taken a position.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11873>
Visual Technology Inc said a group
led by &lt;Hambrecht and Quist Group> has acquired majority
ownership of Visual for 9,250,000 dlrs in equity financing.
    The company said Hambrecht and Quist president William R.
Hambrecht and three other Hambrecht and Quist representatives
have been named to the Visual board, with Robert M. Morrill,
managing partner of the Boston office of Hambrecht's Hambrecht
and Quist Venture Partners unit named chairman.  Clifford G.
Zimmer Jr. remains president and chief executive officer.
    Visual also said about nine mln dlrs of its debt has been
converted to equity.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11888>
Investor Martin T. Sosnoff said
Southmark Corp and affiliate Pratt Hotels Corp have ended talks
with his MTS Acquisition Corp on a possible joint venture for
the acquisition of Caesars World Inc.
    Sosnoff said the talks had not been actively pursued since
they were announced March 20, but it had been agreed that
unless the discussions were formally terminated, Pratt and
Southmark would not initiate a competing tender offer for
Caesars World or take any other action that would hamper
Sosnoff's current offer to acquire all Caesars shares he does
not now own for 28 dlrs each.
    Sosnoff said his 28 dlr per share bid for Caesars, which is
scheduled to expire May 15, still stands, and he remains
receptive to negotiating a transaction to buy Caesars on
friendly terms.
    Pratt recently made an apparently unsuccessful bid to
acquire control of Resorts International Inc &lt;RTB>, seeming to
lose out to Donald Trump.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11891>
CPC International Inc
said said it has agreed in principle to sell interests in its
grocery products operations in Hong Kong, Malaysia, the
Philippines, Singapore, Taiwan and Thailand to &lt;Ajinomoto Co
Inc> of Japan for 340 mln dlrs.
    The company said the move will reduce Asian overhead and a
substantial part of the proceeds will be used to reduce debt.
    It said as part of the agreement, its current direct
investment in its existing non-consolidated joint venture with
Ajinomoto will be converted into a cooperative arrangement for
the long-term utilization of technology and trademarks.
    The company said the change in the Japanese arrangement
will give Ajinomoto full equity ownership while leaving CPC a
continuing earnings stream and cash flow.
    The transactions are subject to definitive agreements and
government approvals.
    CPC said not included in the 340 mln dlr consideration are
proceeds from the sale of some smaller Asian investments,
including a 51 pct equity interest in an oat-based food venture
to an Australian partner.
    The company said the actions being taken under its
restructuring program, including the sale of its European corn
wet milling business and other assets, overhead reductions and
other expense items and the Asian transactions, will have a
one-time positive effect on 1987 earnings.
    CPC said "Although the extent cannot yet be determined, the
company expects that 1987 earnings per share will increase by
substantially more than the previously estimated 20 pct
increase over 1986."  In 1986 CPC earned 2.30 dlrs per share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11892>
Energy Development Partners Ltd said
it has completed the acquisition of May Energy Partners Ltd for
1,817,697 depositary units following approval yesterday by May
Energy unitholders.
    Energy Development said May Petroleum Inc &lt;MAYP>, general
partner of May Energy, will distribute about 35 Energy
Development units for each 100 May Energy Partners units to
holders of 100 May Energy Partnners units or more and cash to
others.
    Energy Development said the transaction increases its units
outstanding to 12.6 mln and raises total proved reserves as of
the end of 1986 27 pct.  Angeles Corp &lt;ANG> is general partner
of Energy Development.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11895>
Schering-Plough corp said it is
considering the sale of its Dr. Scholl's businesses in Europe,
Latin America and the Far East, which had sales of about 150
mln dlrs in 1986.
    The company said the transaction is not expected to have a
material impact on earnings.  It said it has engaged Merrill
Lynch and Co Inc &lt;MER> to assist in the sale process.
    Schering said it will retain Dr. Scholl's businesses in the
U.S., Canada and Puerto Rico, which had sales of about 135 mln
dlrs last year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11909>
Medar Inc said it
acquired Automatic Inspection Devices Inc, a subsidiary of
Owens-Illinois Inc, Toledo, Ohio, through an exchange of stock
for 80 pct of the company.
    Automatic Designs and manufactures a line of machine vision
systems for the packaging, pharmaceutical, electronics and
consumer goods industries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11910>
Allis-Chalmers Corp said it
expects cash proceeds from the proposed sale of its solids
processing equipment and minerals systems businesses to exceed
90 mln dlrs, with no material gain or loss anticipated from the
planned sale.
    Closing of the sale to Boliden AB of Sweden would be part
of the overall restructure of Allis-Chalmers, which was
announced on March Four, the company said.
    Allis-Chalmers said the business entities included in the
transaction had total sales of about 250 mln dlrs in 1986, with
total employment of about 4,300.
    The solids processing equipment business involves
manufacture of crushing and related equipment for mining. It
consists of operations in Sweden, Australia, Brazil, France,
Great Britain, Spain and Appleton, Wis.
    The minerals systems business has operations in West Allis,
Wis., and Lachine, Quebec, Canada.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11915>
Conrac Corp said its board has
rejected MArk IV Industries Inc's tender offer for all Conract
shares at 25 dlrs each, and no Conract director of officer
plans to tender any shares.
    The company said financial advisor &lt;Goldman, Sachs and Co>
determined the price to be inadequate.
    It said its board has instructed management to explore and
develop with financial and legal advisors alternative courses
of action to maximize shareholder values.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11916>
Taft Broadcasting Co said the
sale of its independent television stations to TVX Broadcast
Group, which had been set for yesterday, did not occur.
    TVX and its investment bankers, Salomon Inc's &lt;SB> Salomon
Brothers, advised Taft the closing would not be consumated as
scheduled, the company said.
    TVX and Salomon also advised Taft they hope to be able to
close in near future, the company said, adding it is prepared
to close at any time.
    A Taft spokeswoman referred all questions to TVX and
Salomon.
    Taft agreed in November to sell the stations in
Philadelphia, Washington, Miami, Fort Worth-Dallas and Houston
TVX Broadcast for 240 mln dlrs.
    At the time, Taft said the transaction would result in an
after tax charge of 45 to 50 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11920>
Cyclops corp said it has
reconstituted its board to include three &lt;Dixons Group PLC>
executives following Dixons' acquisition of 83 pct of Cyclops'
4,061,000 shares in a 95 dlr per share tender offer.
    Cyclops said remaining on the six-member board are chairman
and chief executive W.H. Knoell, president and chief operating
officer James F. Will and senior vice president William D.
Dickey.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11923>
Southmark Corp said it has completed the
purchase of Georgia International Life Insurance Co from
Capital Holding Corp &lt;CPH> for cash and Southmark securities
worth over 85 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11954>
Privately-held investment firm
&lt;Dubin Clark and Co> said it has signed a definitive agreement
for an investment group it heads to acquire Roberts
Consolidated Industries from &lt;Beecham Group PLC> for 45 mln
dlrs.
    Roberts makes and distributes accessories, adhesives and
tools used in carpet installation.
    Dubin Clark said its group includes Roberts management and
London investment company &lt;J. Rothschild Holdings PLC>.  It
said Ronald J. Dubin will become vice chairman of Roberts and
J. Thomas Clark chairman.
REUTER^M
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11962>
Autospa Corp said it has signed an
agreement to purchase 2,400,000 shares of eight pct convertible
preferred stock of Cardis Corp -- representing voting control
-- for 15 mln dlrs.
    The company said the preferred purchase will be financed by
an investment group led by Autospa.
    It said it will also receive from Cardis five-year options
to buy 2,400,000 Cardis common shares at 6.25 to seven dlrs
each, depending on the time of exercise, and warrants to
purchase about 3,200,000 shares at 6.60 to 7.60 dlrs each.
    The company said the exercise of all options and warrants
by Autospa would result in a tital investment of 50 to 55 mln
dlrs.  Execution of a definitive agreement is expected by April
22, it said, subject to the completion of financing
arrangements, and closing is expected by May 15.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11968>
Allied Supermarkets Inc said it filed a
registration statement with the Securities and Exchange
Commission for a proposed merger with &lt;The Vons Companies>, a
supermarket, combination store operator.
    Allied said the statement covers 140 mln dlrs of senior
subordinated discount debentures and 100 mln dlrs of
subordinated debentures, principal amounts, with a proposed
aggregate offering price of about 100 mln dlrs for each issue.
    Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc and Donaldson, Lufkin and
Jenrette Securities Inc are co-underwriters of both issues,
which Allied expects to offer in early June, Allied said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11981>
1st Source Bank said it
completed its merger with &lt;Community State Bank> of North
Liberty, Ind.
    The bank said Community State Bank's shareholders approved
the merger at a meeting last Saturday, while Monday the
directors of 1st Source also approved the move.
    The merger would add Community Bank's 20 mln dlrs in assets
to 1st Source's more than one billion dlrs in assets, 1st
Source said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11982>
First National Bank Corp,
the newly formed parent of First National Bank in Mount
Clemens, Mich., and Bankers Fund Life Insurance Co, said it
reached an agreement to buy a branch in Clinton Township from a
nonrelated financial institution.
    It said the acquisition brings to 10 the number of bank
branches in Macomb County. Terms were not disclosed.
    Separately, the newly formed holding company also said it
named Arie Guldemond as chairman and Harold Allmacher as
president and chief executive officer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11996>
Biotechnology Development Corp
said its Medicontrol Corp subsidiary received a 500,000 dlr
investment by Monsanto Co's G.D. Searle and Co subsidiary.
    The company said the investment was made pursuant to an
option Searle held, and increases Searle's stake in Medicontrol
to 19.8 pct with a total investment of one mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11997>
Chase Manhattan Corp said Chase
Trans-Info, a subsidiary of its Chase Manhattan Bank N.A. unit,
has bought Borg-Warner Corp's Traffic Services business,
including an Illinois processing center, for an undisclosed
sum.
    Borg Warner Traffic Services provides freight bill
pre-audit, payment and information services to industry through
Borg-Warner Acceptance Corp.
    Chase Trans-Info, which offers similar services, is now the
largest provider of information services for the transportation
industry.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11999>
Mountain States Resources Corp
said it acquired two properties to its strategic minerals
holdings.
    The acquisitions bring to its land position a total of
5,100 acres of titanium, zirconium and rare earth resources,
the company said.
    Both properties, located in southern Utah, consist of
approximately 1,430 acres of unpatented mining claims and one
state lease, it said.
    The company also announced the formation of Rare Tech
Minerals Inc, a wholly-owned subsidiary.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12007>
Mountain States Resources Corp
said it acquired two properties to add to its strategic
minerals holdings.
    The acquisitions include a total of 5,100 acres of
titanium, zirconium and rare earth resources, the company said.
    Both properties, located in southern Utah, consist of
approximately 1,430 acres of unpatented mining claims and one
state lease, it said.
    The company also announced the formation of Rare Tech
Minerals Inc, a wholly-owned subsidiary.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12028>
Delta Air Lines Inc said it completed
the acquisition of Western Air Lines Inc this morning.
    The action follows U.S. Supreme Court Justice Sandra Day
O'Connor's overnight granting of Delta and Western's request to
stay an earlier injunction against the deal issued by the U.S.
Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit.
 More
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12049>
MacAndrews and Forbes Group Inc said it
began an 18.50-dlr-a-share cash offer for all common stock of
Revlon Group Inc it does not already own.
    The offer, which is being made by a wholly owned
subsidiary, Revmac Acquisition Corp, is subject to financing
and at least 28.5 mln shares being tendered, the company said.
    MacAndrews and Forbes, wholly owned by Ronald Perelman,
chairman of Revlon Group, held about 31.8 pct of the voting
power of Revlon as of March 27, a spokesman said. The stake
includes about 15.1 pct of Revlon common and 95 pct of its
series A preferred stock, he said.
 More
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12053>
Deak International, a foreign currency
and precious metals firm, announced the acquisition of Johnson
Matthey Commodities of New York from Minories Finance Limited,
a unit of the Bank of England.
    The purchase valued at 14.8 mln dlrs follows the recent
acquisition of London's Johnson Matthey Commodities Limited,
Deak said.
    The New York firm will be known as Deak International
Trading Ltd, the company said.
    Arkadi Kuhlmann, president and chief executive officer of
Deak International said the purchase will expand Deak's
operations into the precious metals and wholesale non-ferrous
metals trading arenas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12054>
Purolator Courier Corp stock jumped
5-3/8 on a 40 dlr per share takeover offer from Emery Air
Freight Corp &lt;EAF>, traders said.
    Purolator was trading at 40-1/4, 1/4 above the offer price.
The Emery offer tops a 35 dlr per share buyout agreement E.F.
Hutton LBO Inc reached with Purolator February 27.
    That offer was to have expired today. Neither Hutton nor
Purolator had any immediate comment.
    "There's probably some speculation out there that there
might be another offer," said one analyst.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12068>
Deak International, a foreign currency
and precious metals firm, announced the acquisition of Johnson
Matthey Commodities of New York from Minories Finance Limited,
a unit of the Bank of England.
    The purchase valued at 14.8 mln dlrs follows the recent
acquisition of London's Johnson Matthey Commodities Limited,
Deak said.
    The New York firm will be known as Deak International
Trading Ltd, the company said.
    Arkadi Kuhlmann, president and chief executive officer of
Deak International, said the purchase will expand Deak's
operations in the precious metals and wholesale non-ferrous
metals trading arenas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12083>
J.C. PEnney Co Inc said it signed a
letter of intent to acquire one mln shares, or a 20 pct equity
interest, of Beeba's Creations Inc &lt;BEBA> for 18.75 dlrs a
share.
    Penney said the agreement also calls for Beeba's, a major
supplier of junior sportswear, to work with Penny in the
establishment of junior specialty shops to be created in about
100 Penney stores in early 1988.
    Freestanding stores are also being planned, the company
said. Beeba's will be the principal source of merchandise to
the shops, it said.
    For the six months ended February 28, Beeba's reported net
income of 1.2 mln dlrs on sales of 39.4 mln dlrs.
    Penney said it will establish an independent merchandising
and marketing organization to manage and support the shops
which will be staffed by personnel both from within and outside
the company.
    The company said the new agreement would have no impact on
its current supplier base and it will continue to work with as
braod base of suppliers of junior sportswear as it does in its
other merchandise areas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12087>
Peripheral Systems Inc said it
agreed in principle to acquire the outstanding shares of
&lt;Nucell Inc>.
    The agreement calls for an exchange of one share of
Peripheral for each share of Nucell, subject to approval by
both companies' boards, it said.
    Peripheral said its increased involvement in the
development of Nucell's nuclear battery technology made the
merger practical.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12093>
First Chicago Corp's American National
Bank unit said it completed the acquisition of four suburban
Chicago banks with combined assets of about 231 mln dlrs.
    The banks are National Bank of North Evanston, Elgin
National bank, First National Bank of Schiller Park and
Merchants and Manufacturers State Bank in Melrose Park.
    American National now owns nine banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12094>
Centerre Bancorp said it completed the
acquisition of Benefit Plan Services Inc, Maryland Heights,
Mo., which specializes in designing and administering small and
moderately sized pension plans.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12106>
&lt;Union Enterprises Ltd> said holders of
7.2 mln or 80 pct of its class A series one preferred shares
requested to retract their shares under terms of the issue,
thus raising &lt;Unicorp Canada Corp>'s voting stake in Union to
58 pct from 50.
    Union said it paid about 90 mln dlrs on April 1 for the
retraction, using existing credit lines.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12127>
Horn and Hardart Co said it
disposed of 33 Bojangles' Chicken 'N Biscuits restaurants in
Florida as part of its previously announced retrenchment of its
Bojangles' subsidiary.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    The company said the restaurants in Orlando, Tampa and
Jacksonville markets have incurred the majority of Bojangles'
operating losses over the last two years.
    Due to the transaction, Horn and Hardart is projecting a
positive cash flow for the unit for the remainder of fiscal
1987.
    A spokesman said the disposition consists of a combination
of sale, lease and re-franchise agreements.
    The transaction involves one-quarter of the company-owned
Bojangles' restaurants and is in accordance with its
restructuring program announced in October 1986.
    A spokesman said the company is considering the sale or
spinoff of the 91-company owned additional restaurants, which
are profitable.
    The company said the disposition will result in no profit
or loss for the company because the costs were anticipated in a
34-mln-dlr reserve taken in the third quarter of 1986.
    The foodservice division, which includes Burger King,
Arby's and Tony Roma's, had a pre-tax operating loss of 29.6
mln dlrs in 1986, including the 34.0 mln dlr charge to
restructure Bojangles. Excluding Bojangles', the group had
revenues of 43.8 mln dlrs.
    The company said that, pursuant to the restructuring, it
has cut general and administrative expenses attributable to
Bojangle' by 35 pct.
    
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12132>
Chemical Fabrics Corp said an
agreement in principle under which OC Birdair Inc would have
purchased assets related to the architectural structures
business of Dow Corning corp's ODC Inc division has been
terminated.
    Under that agreement, Chemical Fabrics would also have
become distributor of Dow Corning's Vestar silicone-coated
fiberglass architecural fabrics.
    OC Birdair is a joint venture of Chemical Fabrics and Owens
Corning Fiberglas Corp &lt;OCF> and Down Corning a venture of Dow
Chemical Co &lt;DOW> and Corning Glass Works &lt;GLW>.
    Chemical Fabrics said once the current project backlog of
Dow Corning's ODC division is completed, Dow Corning plans to
discontinue its design-engineering, fabrication and
installation services.
    Chemical Fabrics said the companies will cooperate on the
development of new products for architectural and industrial
applications and may supply architectural materials to each
other.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12133>
SIS Corp said it has completed
the acquisition of its franchisor Sisters International Inc
from Wendy's International Inc for 14.5 mln dlrs in stock.
    It said the purchase includes 35 restaurants in Ohio
operates by Sisters, giving SIS a total of 55 restaurants, and
franchise relationships in six Midwestern and Southern states.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12138>
CTC Dealer Holdings Ltd said &lt;Canadian
Tire Corp Ltd> controlling shareholders Alfred, David and
Martha Billes did not extend an agreement expiring yesterday to
tender their shares only to CTC's previously reported offer for
49 pct of Canadian Tire common shares.
    CTC, which already holds 17.4 pct of Canadian Tire common,
said it would therefore not take up any shares tendered under
its offer unless they totaled at least 1.1 mln or another 32.7
pct of Canadian Tire common. The Billes control 60 pct of
Canadian Tire common. It added that it extended its offer to
May 11 at a fixed price of 165.36 dlrs a share.
    CTC, a group of Canadian Tire dealers, said it expected to
know by May 11 if it would obtain approval to appeal a
previously reported Ontario court ruling upholding a regulatory
decision to block CTC's offer.
    The dealers' bid was previously blocked by the Ontario
Securities Commission because the offer excluded holders of
Canadian Tire class A non-voting shares, which make up about 96
pct of company equity.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12146>
Conrac Corp, whose board has
rejected a 25 dlr a share tender offer from Mark IV Industries
Inc &lt;IV>, said it is exploring alternatives such as a
restructuring, leveraged buyout or takeover of the company.
     In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Conrac said its board of directors authorized its financial and
legal advisors to explore a several alternatives to the Mark IV
offer, which it said it considers inadequate.
    The alternatives being explored include a restructuring,
leveraged buyout or a takeover of the company by another
company, Conrac said.
    Conrac, which said its board discussed the alternatives at
special meetings on March 26 and 30, said that its decision on
whether to adopt any of the alternatives would hinge on "the
future actions of Mark IV" and its unsolicitied tender offer.
    Putting into effect any of the alternatives being explored
could hurt or defeat the Mark IV offer, it said.
    Board members were also instructed to keep confidential the
terms of any transaction that might be entered into until it
becomes final, the company said.
    The board also took other defensive steps, including
granting severance agreements to some officers, it said.
    At a board meeting yesterday, Concac's directors deleted a
provision allowing the holder of at least one-third of of all
classes of its voting stock to call a special shareholders
meeting and deleted another provision allowing shareholders to
remove directors without cause, the company said.
    The defensive moves were taken because Mark IV had said it
planned to elect a majority of its designees as directors at a
special holders meeting if it succeeded in acquring a majority
of the company's common stock in the offer, Conrac said.
    Conrac's president, vice president and treasurer were given
severance agreements, or "golden parachutes," it said.
    Under the agreements, Conrac President Paul Graf would get
a cash payment of twice his annual salary, which was 209,906
dlrs last year, if there were a change of control in the
company, including acquisition of 30 pct or more of the
company's voting stock, Conrac said.
    Treasurer Joseph Smorada and Vice President Joseph
O'Donnell, who made 143,325 dlrs last year, would get
one-and-a-half times his salary if there were a change in
control. Smorada's salary was not listed in the SEC filing.
    The executives would also get cash settlements of options
plans and continuation of insurance and other benefits.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12156>
E.F. Hutton Group's E.F. Hutton LBO Inc
unit said it extended the expiration date for its 35 dlr per
share tender offer for Purolator Courier corp to midnight EST
April six from midnight April one.
    E.F. Hutton lbo inc said its wholly owned PC Acquisition
Inc subsidiary, which is the entity making the offer, extended
both expiration date and the withdrawal rights period for its
pending tender for 6.3 mln shares or 83 pct of Purolator
common.
    Hutton's offer was topped today by a 40 dlr per share bid
for 83 pct of the stock from Emery Air Frieght Corp &lt;EAF.>
    Both offers would pay shareholders a package of securities
for the balance of their shares, valued at the respective
tender offer prices.
    Hutton said as of the end of the day yesterday, about
880,000 shares of Purolator common stock repesenting 11.5 pct
of outstanding shares had been validly tendered and not
withdrawn.
    Manhattan supreme court justice Lewis Grossman today
adjourned until Monday a hearing on a stockholder suit seeking
to block the Hutton LBO transaction. The judge told attorneys
he needed time to hear other cases.
    Plaintiffs cited their belief that a superior offer would
be forthcoming, however one company mentioned in an affadavit,
Interlink Express plc, denied that it was interested.
    Yesterday, Frank Hoenemeyer, a retired vice chairman of
Prudential Insurance Co and currently a Purolator board member,
said an initial offer from Hutton was rejected by the board of
directors February third.
    Hoenemeyer testified that by the next meeting of the board,
February 17, Hutton submitted a revised proposal which was
accepted.
    He also testified a committee of directors had hired
Goldman Sachs and Co to consider alternatives to the Hutton
offer and also to consider a discussion of possible mergers
with other companies including Emery and Federal Express Corp
&lt;FDX>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12171>
Ausimont Compo NV said it has
sold the assets of its Equipment and Machinery Division for
about six mln dlrs to an investment group including the unit's
management, resulting in a modest pretax gain that will be
included in first quarter results.
    The unit had sales of five mln dlrs in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12172>
Atlantic Research corp said it
has completed the acquisition of professional services firm ORI
Group for 1,414,313 common shares on a pooling of interests
basis.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12173>
&lt;Peabody Holding Co Inc> said it has
completed its acquisition of substantially all Eastern Gas and
Fuel Associate's &lt;EFU> coal properties for 15.01 pct of Peabody
Holding's stock.
    Peabody said the purchase includes seven underground mines
and seven coal preparation plants currently operated by
Eastern, as well as coal properties being mined by several
contractors in West Virginia.
    The acquisition also involves about 800 mln tons of coal
reserves, mostly in West Va., and includes Eastern's coal
reserves and inactive Powderhorn operations near Palisade,
Colo, Peabody said.
    Peabody added that it expects to announce within the next
week how it will staff and operate the properties and offices
it has acquired from Eastern.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12178>
French Prime Minister Jacques Chirac
told U.S. congressmen France would announce a decision in two
to three weeks on which group is to control its second largest
communications firm, Compagnie Generale de Construction
Telphoniques, French sources said.
    They said Chirac promised that France's decision would be
based on financial, economic and technical criteria, and not on
political grounds.
    U.S. and German companies are the leading contenders to
take control of CGCT.
    The Reagan administration has warned France and Germany
that it may retaliate if control of the company is awarded on
political grounds.
    Jacques Delors, President of the European Community's
Executive Commission, called last month for control to go to
West Germany's Siemens AG in order to strengthen European
industry.
    The other leading contender is a consortium of American
Telephone and Telegraph Co &lt;T> with Philips NV of the
Netherlands.
    Chirac said France would make public its reasons for
awarding control, the sources said. He was asked about the
company's fate on two occasions, in meetings with leaders of
the Senate and House of Representatives.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12186>
Itel Corp said it has completed the
previously-announced acquisition of the container fleet and
related assets of Castle and Cooke Inc's Flexi-Van Leasing Inc
subsidiary for about 130 mln dlrs in cash and marketable
securities, 30 mln dlrs in notes, three mln common shares and
the assumption of liabilities.
    The company said it has obtained 150 mln dlrs in financing
from a bank group for the deal, and the common shares are
subject to a 10-year restriction on their sale and voting.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12191>
Dynalectron Corp said it purchased
certain assets of Standard Aero Inc including leasehold rights
to its aircraft modification and maintenance facility in
Phoenix, Ariz.
    Terms were not released.
    The facility consists of 285,000 square feet of hangar and
shop space. Dynalectron will operate the plan as Dynair Tech
Inc and is offering continued employment to about 460 former
standard Aero employees.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12195>
Emery Air Freight Corp topped a
leveraged buyout offer for Purolator Courier Corp by about 40
mln dlrs, but Wall Street is reacting as though another offer
may surface.
    Purolator's stock climbed 5-3/8 today, to 40-1/8, 1/4 over
Emery's 40 dlr per share offer. Emery topped a 35 dlr per share
or 268 mln dlr offer from E.F. Hutton LBO Inc.
    Some analysts said the latest, 306 mln dlr offer for
Purolator exceeded their expectations.
    Several analysts previously had said they saw takeover
values for the package delivery company in the 35 dlr per share
range. At least one, however, estimated the company could be
taken over in a range of 38 to 42 dlrs per share.
    Analysts today would not venture to say whether another
offer could be made, but some arbitragers still held to the
belief that the bidding could go higher.
    "They have no choice to seek out the best possible offer.
Emery has shown the courage to go forth," said one arbitrager,
who speculated other courier companies may also emerge as
bidders.
    "It makes sense," said James Parker of Robinson Humphrey.
But "It won't make out as well as they think. They won't get a
100 pct of the synergies."
    Analysts said the acquisition could cost Emery earnings in
the short term, but long term, after eliminating redundancies
and selling other Purolator assets, it should boost Emery's
profitability.
    Parker said a combined Purolator and Emery would rival
United Parcel Service as the second largest U.S. package
delivery company after Federal Express Corp &lt;FDX>, which has 47
pct of the market.
    Parker speculated that the combined Emery-Purolator would
have about 24 pct of the six to seven billion dlr delivery
business.
    "This will make Emery a bigger factor in the light weight
(delivery) business, but it will not make them a power house,"
said Douglas Arthur of Kidder, Peabody and Co.
    Purolator today declined comment on the Emery offer, and
its chairman Nicholas Brady did not return a phone call.
    E.F.Hutton LBO also declined comment on the Emery offer,
but said it extended the expiration and withdrawal period on
its offer to April six at midnight from today at midnight EST.
    One analyst speculated the extension makes it more likely
Hutton will attempt another offer. However, he was skeptical a
company outside the package delivery industry would want to
outbid 40 dlrs per share because it would not have the same 
synergies as a courier company.
    Since Purolator agreed in late February to a buyout by some
of its management and the E.F. Hutton Group &lt;EFH> subsidiary,
speculation has arisen that more bidding was to come.
    The buyout was surrounded by controversy since a Purolator
board member, Doresy Gardner resigned in March. Gardner said he
believed a better offer could be made by another entity.
    A spokesman for Gardner today said the former director had
no contact with Emery, nor did he have any other buyers lined
up for Purolator.
    Purolator's deal with Hutton was also called into question
by a shareholder suit filed earlier this week, which attempted
to stop the tender offer to allow another bidder to come forth.
Hearings in a New York state court were delayed until Monday.
    Arbitragers had said they believed the Hutton offer could
be bettered because the Wall Street firm was not planning to
keep its cash tied up in Purolator. Hutton is providing a 279
mln dlr "bridge" loan that would later be replaced with other
debt. Hutton would maintain a majority interest in Purolator.
    Hutton sources have said the firm was in fact facing risk n
its investment since it did not know when it could reclaim its
279 mln dlr loan.
    Emery last year lost 5.4 mln dlrs on revenues of 887.5 mln
dlrs. Purolator lost 57.6 mln dlrs on 841.4 mln dlrs in
revenues.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12203>
Rumors that New York investor Asher
Edelman has acquired a stake in Polaroid Corp and optimism
about tomorrow's status hearing on the patent infringement suit
pending with Eastman Kodak Co &lt;EK> sent Polaroid's stock
higher, traders said.
    Polaroid rose 1-1/8 to 74-1/2.
    "Speculation that Edelman was going to take a stake in
Polaroid was kicking around a few months ago, and resurfaced
today," one trader said.
    Edelman had no comment on the rumors.
    A spokesman for Polaroid said the company had not been
contacted by Edelman and no filing had been made with the
Securities and Exchange Commission about a stake in the
company.
    "There is some hope among investors that there will some
progress in the status hearing tomorrow on the patent
infringement suit with Kodak," analyst Michael Ellmann of
Wertheim and Co said.
    Traders said it is conceivable that a trial date could be
set or some progress made on an out-of-court settlement.
    The suit, filed by Polaroid in April 1976, charges that
Kodak infringed upon Polaroid's instant camera patent. In
October 1985, the court barred Kodak from selling cameras or
film that infringe upon the patent, the Polaroid spokesman
said.
    Ellmann said he feels it is highly unlikely that any
progress will be made in tomorrow's hearing.
    Ellmann said the stock may have also gotten a boost today
from some optimism concerning new products the company is
currently working on.
    "Polaroid's announcement that a particularly senior company
executive had been chosen to work on a major unidentified new
product spurred some speculation about their products," he
said. "I am speculating that the new product could be an
electronic still camera," referring to a camera that records
its images on magnetic disks as opposed to conventional film.
    Ellmann said the stock may have also gotten a boost today
from some optimism concerning new products the company is
currently working on.
    "Polaroid's announcement that a particularly senior company
executive had been chosen to work on a major unidentified new
product spurred some speculation about their products," he
said. "I am speculating that the new product could be an
electronic still camera," referring to a camera that records
its images on magnetic disks as opposed to conventional film.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12205>
Itel Corp said it completed the
previously announced purchase of the container fleet and
certain related assets of Flexi-Van Leasing Inc for about 130
mln dlrs cash and marketable securities, 30 mln dlrs in notes,
three mln shares of newly issued Itel common and assumption of
certain liabilities.
    The company said it obtained financing from a syndicate of
major banks for 150 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12213>
Loral Corp climbed 3-3/4 to 48-3/4 amid
rumors the company might be a takeover target of General
Electric Co &lt;GE>. However, analysts said they were skeptical.
    "Jack Welch doesn't want any more exposure to defense
markets," said one analyst who heard the rumors but doubted
their accuracy. The reference was to GE's chairman.
    The analyst, who requested anonymity, said, "I wouldn't
believe this one unless there's a deal on the table."
    Loral Corp officials were not immediately available for
comment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12219>
Stryker Corp said it acquired
Hexcel Medical Corp, a wholly owned subsidiary of Hexcel Corp.
    The terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
    The sale completes Hexcel's plan to sell all its medical
products businesses, Hexcel said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12221>
Old Stone Corp said it
completed the previously announced acquisition of First Federal
Savings Bank of North Carolina, a Shelby, N.C., savings bank,
for common stock.
    The final purchase price, expected to be between seven mln
and 7.5 mln dlrs, will be based on an exchange of common stock
valued at 1.5 times the book value of First Federal as of the
March 31 closing date, the company said.
    At February  28, First Federal had 129 mln dlrs in assets
and 120 mln dlrs in deposits. Old Stone is a Rhode Island-based
financial services company with assets of 3.9 billion dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12222>
Moore Medical Corp said it
plans to acquire privately-held Penta Products, a wholesale
distributor of generic durgs, for undisclosed terms.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12225>
Upland Minerals and Chemicals Corp said
it agreed to acquire Consolidated Brazilian Mines International
Inc, a public company with one mln acres of diamond and gold
properties in Brazil.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Consolidated owns 42 mining concessions in three regions of
eastern and northern Brazil -- Gammara, Santo Antonio and
Diamazon, the company said.
    Upland also said the previously announced acquisition of
Aslaminas Aslambeck Mining Corp, a Minas Gerais, Brazil, mining
concern, will produce revenues of 9.6 mln dlrs a year for the
next 25 years.
    New York-based Upland is traded over-the-counter.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12226>
Inspeech Inc said it acquired
Norma Bork Associates Inc and Bork Medical Services Inc for
undisclosed terms.
    These firms, with combined revenues of about one mln dlrs,
are providers of speech pathology, physical therapy and
occupational therapy services.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12236>
Upland Minerals and Chemicals Corp said
it agreed to acquire Consolidated Brazilian Mines International
Inc, a public company with one mln acres of diamond and gold
properties in Brazil.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Consolidated owns 42 mining concessions in three regions of
eastern and northern Brazil -- Gammara, Santo Antonio and
Diamazon, the company said.
    Upland also said the previously announced acquisition of
Aslaminas Aslambeck Mining Corp, a Minas Gerais, Brazil, mining
concern, will produce revenues of 9.6 mln dlrs a year for the
next 25 years.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12250>
Crime Control Inc said it reached a
definitive agreement under which a subsidiary of Hawley Group
Ltd will buy assets and assume certain liabilities of Crime
Control for 51.3 mln dlrs.
    Of this amount, it said about 47 mln dlrs would be
available for distribution to the company's banks, debenture
holders and shareholders. The balance would be used to pay
various state taxes and other expenses relating to the
transaction, and to establish reserves to provide for certain
unassumed obligations of the company.
    Crime Control said it would use proceeds to pay its bank
lenders approximately 28.6 mln dlrs, representing about 87 pct
of the principal amount of all its indebtedness to bank
lenders.
    It also said it would propose to acquire all of its 20 mln
dlrs worth of outstanding 10 pct convertible subordinated
debentures for an aggregate of approximately 15.4 mln dlrs and
propose liquidation of the company with shareholders receiving
an estimated 54 cts a share.
    As reported earlier, Crime Control is in default on
approximately 33 mln dlrs of bank debt and in default under the
indenture governing its convertible subordinated debentures.
    On January 19, 1987, Crime Control, which installs,
services and monitors electronic surveillance systems, said it
retained Rothschild Inc to arrange for the sale of the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12276>
&lt;Campeau Corp> and the &lt;Edward J.
DeBartolo Corp> have closed on their previously-announced 
purchase of five of the regional shopping centers of Allied
Stores Corp.
    Campeau said it and the DeBartolo Association will each
hold a 50 pct ownership interest in the shopping centers.
    Campeau separately announced that, as required by a bank
agreement, it has contributed an additional 50 mln dlrs of
capital to Allied.
    Campeau acquired Allied Stores Corp earlier this year, the
company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12281>
A committee of independent directors of
the Standard Oil Co unsuccessfully sought a delay in a tender
offer for Standard shares by British Petroleum Co plc,
according to offering documents.
    BP's offering document for its 70 dlr per share offer
describes discussions with Douglas Danforth, who chairs a
special committee of independent directors responsible for
monitoring relations with BP. BP has been owner of a 55 pct
stake in Standard for several years.
    According to the document, the committee's counsel said it
needed one to two months to evaluate the offering price.
    Danforth, who is chairman of the Westinghouse Electric Co
&lt;WX>, first learned of BP's interest in acquiring the rest of
Standard in a telephone call March five from Sir Peter Walters,
chairman of BP.
    At a meeting march nine, Danforth informed BP that the
special committee had hired First Boston Corp &lt;FBC> as its
financial adviser and also retained independent counsel.
    Danforth's concerns that the special committee did not have
sufficient time were expressed to Walters in a telephone
conversation and reiterated in a letter from counsel on Monday
of this week.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12298>
Century Business Credit Corp said it
received an offer from Stanley Tananbaum, chairman and chief
executive officer, to take the company private in a transaction
giveing shareholders 24.40 dlrs per share in cash.
    There were 603,106 shares outstanding as of December 31.
    The independent directors said they will engage an expert
to evaluate the fairness of the offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12305>
Emery Air Frieght Corp, which has
launched a 40 dlr a share tender offer for 83 pct of Purolator
Courier Corp, said it would sell some Purolator assets to help
pay the estimated 265 mln dlr cost of the stock purchase deal.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Emery said it would sell or lease Purolator's air hub in
Indianapolis, Ind., which is currently under construction, and
would divest Purolator's Stant Inc subsidiary.
    No indications of interest for the assets have been
received so far, Emery said.
    Emery said it would operate Purolator as a subsidiary if it
succeeded in the takever, but would integrate its air hub.
    It said it plans to finance its stock purchases with
borrowings from Chemical Bank, Morgan Guaranty Trust Co of New
York, Bankers Trust Co and Salomon Brothers Holding Co Inc, the
parent of Salmon Brothers Inc, Emery's financial advisor.
    Emery said it already has a commitment letter from its
banks for up to 129.9 mln dlrs for the stock purchases. An
unspecified amount of internally generated funds would also be
used for the stock purchases, it added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12309>
Illinois Central Gulf Railroad, a
subsidiary of IC Industries Inc, said it will complete the sale
to the Chicago, Missouri and Western Railway of its 631-mile
line from Joliet, Ill., to St. Louis by April 30.
    The Chicago, Missouri is a wholly owned subsidiary of the
Venango River Corp, a transportation holding company.
    It said the purchase price of the line is 81 mln dlrs.
    The Chicago, Missouri will employ 625 workers and start
operation immediately upon closing of the transaction.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12321>
Gould Inc said it has
completed the sale of its Systems and Simulations Division to
the unit's management for an undisclosed price.
    Gould said the move is part of its plan to divest its
defense systems businesses and focus on its computer and
electronics sectors.
    Gould added that it accounted for the division as a
discontinued operation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12331>
Compagnie Generale Des Eaux
&lt;EAUG.PA>, a French water, waste treatment and disposal,
heating, ventilation and air conditioning concern said it has a
5.0 pct stake in California Water Service Co.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Compagnie Generale said it bought its 139,200 California Water
shares for a total of 7.0 mln dlrs for investment purposes.
    While it said it might acquire more shares in the company,
it said it has no plans to seek control of it.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12339>
Deak International, a foreign currency
and precious metals firm, announced the acquisition of Johnson
Matthey Commodities of New York from Minories Finance Limited,
a unit of the Bank of England.
    The purchase valued at 14.8 mln dlrs follows the recent
acquisition of London's Johnson Matthey Commodities Limited,
Deak said. The New York firm will be known as Deak
International Trading Ltd, the company said. Arkadi Kuhlmann,
president and chief executive officer of Deak International,
said the purchase will expand Deak's operations in precious
metals and wholesale non-ferrous metals trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12344>
Crown Resources Corp said it plans to
sell its Oklahoma-based oil and gas unit as part of its
strategy to focus on developing precious metals properties.
    The company said it bought the Wyona Water Flood Oil and
Gas unit in 1984 for 650,000 dlrs.
    Crown said the Wyona field is fully developed with 28
producing wells.
    Current oil production is 80 barrels a day, it said, adding
that no gas was produced for sale in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12345>
M.D.C. Holdings Inc said it sold
substantially all the assets of its oil and gas unit, Mizel
Petro Resources Inc, and affiliated partnerships, for 38 mln
dlrs in cash to &lt;Parker and Parsley Petroleum Co>, Midland,
Texas.
    The company said that, subject to certain post-closing
adjustments, it expects to post a small profit on the sale.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12350>
Fidelcor Inc's Fidelcor Business Credit
Corp subsidiary said it reached a definitive agreement to
acquire a substantial portion of the Bank of New England Corp's
&lt;BKNE> Lazere Financial Corp's assets.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed. The
acquisition is subject to approval of the Federal Reserve
Board.
    Fidelcor said it would acquire most of Lazere's loan
portfolio and other assets, including its Miami office. It said
it plans to hire the majority of Lazere's 100 employees.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12356>
Two executives of a Memphis, Tenn.,
investment advisory firm told the Securities and Exchange
Commission they have acquired 132,000 shares of Killearn
Properties Inc, or 10.4 pct of the total outstanding.
    The executives, O. Mason Hawkins and William Reid, who work
for Southeastern Asset Management Inc, said they bought their
Killearn stock with personal funds as an investment.
    While they said they might increase their stake Killearn
Properties, they said they have no plans to seek control of it.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12368>
American Barrick Resources Corp said it
sold two coal supply agreements and certain mining equipment,
representing substantially all of the assets of its two Ohio
coal mines, to Peabody Coal Co, of Kentucky.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Proceeds from the sale combined with the sale of the
company's remaining coal assets should result in full recovery
of its investments in the operations, the company said without
further elaborating.
    The sale will complete the planned disposition by American
Barrick of all its non-gold assets, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12374>
&lt;Novamin Inc> said
its board will recommend to shareholders the takeover offer
made by Breakwater Resources Ltd.
    Breakwater is offering to exchange one Breakwater share for
each two shares of Novamin, the company said.
    Breakwater will issue about 3.7 mln shares for all Novamin
shares presently issued and outstanding. Additional shraes of
Breakwater will be issued if warrants and options of Novamin
are exercised.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12378>
Newmont Mining Corp said it completed
the previously announced reduction of its share in &lt;Peabody
Holding Co Inc> to 49.97 pct from 61.47 pct.
    Newmont realized 116.8 mln dlrs in the transaction.
    For 1986, Newmont reported net income of 74.2 mln dlrs.
Peabody, the largest coal producer in the U.S., had net income
of 100.8 mln dlrs on sales of 1.4 billion dlrs in 1986.
    Newmont doubled its ownership in Peabody in January by
purchasing 30.74 pct interest held by the Williams Cos for 320
mln dlrs.
    The reduction resulted from completion of an earlier
announced agreement by Peabody to sell a 15.01 pct interest in
the company to Eastern Gas and Fuel Associates in exchange for
all the coal properties owned by Eastern.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12386>
LIfetime Corp said Retirement Housing
Corp has accepted its previously announced acquisition offer.
    Retirement will operate autonomously as a separate
subsidiary.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12390>
&lt;Galveston Resources Ltd> said it agreed
in principle for an option to earn up to a 50 pct interest from
&lt;Hemlo Gold Mines Inc> in certain mining properties known as
the Interlake Property, subject to regulatory approvals.
    Galveston said it will earn up to a 50 pct interest by
spending a minimum of one mln dlrs in exploration and
development work by December 31, 1989.
    It expects work will commence shortly and continue during
the 1987 exploration season.
    Galveston also said it granted Hemlo Gold options to
acquire up to two mln Galveston shares.
    It said the options can be exercised at 10 dlrs a share up
to December 31, 1987, then at 12.50 dlrs a share until December
31, 1988, and then at 15 dlrs a share until December 31, 1989.
    Separately, Galveston said it agreed in principle with
&lt;Noranda Inc> unit Noranda Explorations Ltd for an option to
earn up to a 50 pct interest in a major mineral property
located at the Baie Verte Peninsula, Newfoundland.
    Galveston can earn a 50 pct interest by spending six mln
dlrs in exploration and development work on the property by
December 31, 1989.
    The company also said it granted Noranda an option to
purchase two mln Galveston shares.
    The options can be exercised at 10 dlrs a share until
December 31, 1987, then at 12.50 dlrs a share until December
31, 1988, and then at 15 dlrs a share until December 31, 1989.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12395>
Deutsche Bank AG &lt;DBKG.F> has agreed
to take over the outstanding 25 pct in &lt;Deutsche Bank (Asia)
AG>, the former &lt;European Asian Bank AG>, from
Creditanstalt-Bankverein &lt;CABV.VI>, Deutsche management board
joint spokesman Alfred Herrhausen told a news conference.
    Euras broke even in 1986 and required no funding from
Deutsche, he said. He gave no details of the deal with
Creditanstalt.
    Press reports that Deutsche was planning a takeover of
Lloyds Bank plc &lt;LLOY.L> were without foundation, he said.
    Herrhausen said Deutsche had taken part in the recent
capital increase of &lt;Morgan Grenfell Group plc>, but had no
plans to raise its 4.4 pct share in Morgan Grenfell.
    &lt;Banca d'America e d'Italia SpA>, in which 98.3 pct was
acquired from Bankamerica Corp &lt;BAC.N> late last year, would be
consolidated this year, and contribute to further expansion of
Deutsche's business, management board joint spokesman F.
Wilhelm Christians said.
    Following a ruling earlier this year from the Federal High
Court, Deutsche had included its non-bank holdings in the
balance sheet section "participations," Christians said.
    But Christians said the bank still regarded shares in these
non-bank companies as an investment rather than an active
participation.
    Parent bank total participations rose to 6.45 billion marks
in 1986 from a comparable 4.57 billion in 1985 including a rise
to 3.79 billion from 2.34 billion in bank participations.
    Herrhausen said the grouping of holdings in the balance
sheet in this was was not a first step to floating them off in
a separate holding company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12409>
A Japanese businessman announced plans for
a new telecommunications firm in which Britain's Cable and
Wireless Plc would be a core company.
    However, the plan, unveiled by senior Federation of
Economic Organizations official Fumio Watanabe, does not
specify what stake Cable and Wireless would have.
    "The share holdings of the core companies should be equal,"
Watanabe said in a statement. "The actual percentage of
shareholdings should be agreed by the core companies."
    He said the eight core companies will provide directors for
the firm.
    "The new company shall immediately set to work on the
feasibility study of constructing a new cable for itself,"
Watanabe said.
    Watanabe has acted as mediator between two rival groups,
one of which included C and W, seeking to compete against
&lt;Kokusai Denshin Denwa Co Ltd>, which now monopolizes Japan's
overseas telephone business.
    The Post and Telecommunications Ministry has said it wants
only one competitor to KDD and has backed Watanabe's efforts.
    A British source, who declined to be identified further,
said the proposals could open the door to further talks between
C and W &lt;CAWL.L> and the other firms involved.
    C and W had earlier rejected a reported proposal which
would have given it a five pct share in the new
telecommunications firm, compared to the less than three pct
stake Watanabe originally proposed. C and W has a 20 pct stake
in one of the two firms Watanabe has proposed should merge.
    The British source said the decision not to specify the
exact shareholdings of the core companies could leave the door
open for further discussion.
    "It's probably a sensible approach on their part," the
British source told reuters.
    C and W has also been pushing hard for permission to lay a
new cable between Japan and the U.S.
    The proposed merger has sparked an international row, with
British government sources threatening retaliatory action
against Japan for what they see as discriminatory practices
against foreign firms.
    The sources said last Friday that one option for Britain
would be to revoke licenses of Japanese banks and securities
companies operating in London.
    The U.S. Has also attacked the original merger plans,
saying that both rival consortia should be licensed.
    Asked about participation by other U.S. And European firms,
Watanabe said, "They will not be core companies but if they wish
they could participate." Under the Japanese law, total foreign
participation would be limited to one-third.
    "It might be wise for C and W to join the new firm which has
the support of many influential backers and work within this
for the realization of their ideas," Watanabe told reporters.
    The other core firms are Mitsubishi Corp &lt;MITT.T>, Mitsui
and Co &lt;MITS.T>, Sumitomo Corp &lt;SUMT.T>, Matsushita Electric
Industrial Co &lt;MC.T>, Toyota Motor Corp &lt;TOYO.T>, C Itoh and Co
&lt;CITT.T>, and &lt;Pacific Telesis International Inc>.
    Watanabe said that his latest proposal represented his
final effort.
    If it fails to satisfy the British government, it will be
up to the Japanese government to explain its position, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12441>
Guinness Plc &lt;GUIN.L> said that as part
of a new strategy for the company it will be selling its retail
interests to concentrate resources on developing its
international beverage businesses.
    Among the firms to be sold are Martin's and Gordon Drummond
pharmacies, the 7-Eleven convenience stores, speciality U.S.
Food importer Richter Brothers and the health products company
Nature's Best/DSL.
    Guinness said in a statement that the company's strength
was in its well known beer and spirits brands.
    Several had good brand development potential, including
Gleneagles, Champneys, Cranks, Hediard and and Guinness
publications.
    Guinness shares were trading at 323p after the announcement
after closing yesterday at 317p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12443>
&lt;San Miguel Corp>, SMC, and &lt;United
Coconut Planters Bank>, UCPB, have reached a compromise on a
disputed block of 38.1 mln shares of SMC, the head of a
government panel that controls the sequestered shares said.
    Ramon Diaz, Chairman of the Presidential Commission on Good
Government (PCGG) told Reuters SMC had offered a price of 126
pesos per share for the block, held in trust by the UCPB.
    "It looks good," Diaz said. But he added several issues,
including the identity of the ultimate buyers of the shares,
had to be resolved before the PCGG gave its approval to the
sale.
    The PCGG's sequestration last year of 33 mln shares aborted
SMC's bid to buy them back from 14 trading companies in the
UCPB group. The commission said it suspected the shares were
actually controlled by Eduardo Cojuangco, an associate of
former President Ferdinand Marcos.
    Cojuango, who headed the boards of both SMC and UCPB when
he fled last year after Marcos was toppled, personally owned 24
mln shares in SMC. His holdings are also under sequestration.
    "The shares that SMC now proposes to buy from the UCPB are
owned by 1.4 mln coconut farmers," Diaz said. "Naturally we do
not want them to go back into the hands of Marcos cronies."
    PCGG sources said a compromise would end a row over a down
payment of 500 mln pesos made by SMC's Hong Kong subsidiary
Neptunia Corp Ltd in a bid to buy back the shares last year.
    The UCPB had said the 500 mln peso payment would be
forfeited because SMC Chairman Andres Soriano III had failed to
fulfil his commitment to buy back the shares at an originally
negotiated price of 3.3 billion pesos.
    PCGG sources said SMC, the Philippines' largest food and
beverage manufacturer, has agreed to sell 14 mln "B" class shares
from the 38.1 mln shares to Australian brewer Alan Bond at a
price of 150 pesos per share.
    The PCGG sources said of the proposed 4.79 billion peso
transaction, 1.6 billion pesos would be offset against the 500
mln peso down payment, the 500 mln pesos worth of preferred
shares in UCPB held by SMC, 210 mln pesos in uncollected
dividends on the UCPB shares and 400 mln pesos advanced to
UCPB-controlled trading companies.
    The UCPB rejected an original offer of 100 pesos per share
made by SMC for 33 mln shares, which grew to 38 mln after a 15
pct stock dividend declared in June last year.
    A spokesman for SMC said the company's 15-member board met
today to discuss the proposed compromise.
    The spokesman declined comment on the outcome of the board
meeting, saying the dispute was under arbitration.
    President Corazon Aquino last month asked SMC and UCPB to
set up a three-man arbitration panel to resolve the ownership
issue. The panel is due to submit its report by April 15.
    Eduardo de Los Angeles, a government nominee in the SMC
board, filed a formal complaint before the Securities and
Exchange Commission last week, accusing Soriano and eight other
directors of violating "fiduciary duty."
    De Los Angeles was said to have opposed a decision by SMC's
board last December to assume the 500 mln peso Neptunia loan.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12449>
Ranks Hovis McDougall Plc &lt;RHML.L> said
it was making an increased and final offer for the Avana Group
Plc &lt;AVNA.L>. The company already holds about 22.9 pct or 7.1
mln Avana ordinary shares.
    It said in a statement the terms of the offer will be 13
new Rank Hovis shares for every five Avana ordinary shares,
valuing each Avana share at 829p.
    Avana shareholders will be entitled to receive and retain
the net interim dividend of 5.25p per Avana share for the year
ending 28 March 1987.
    Accepting Avana shareholders will also be entitled to
receive Ranks Hovis's forecast net interim dividend of 2.65p
for the financial year ending 5 September 1987.
    Ranks Hovis said that full acceptance of the increased
offer would result in the issue of a maximum of 72.3 mln new
Ranks Hovis shares or about 20 pct of the enlarged issued
ordinary share capital of the company.
    The latest offer will lapse on 17 April. Ordinary
shareholders in Avana who accept the increased offer will have
the opportunity to elect for cash for all or part of their
holdings on the basis of 800p cash for each Avana share.
    Ranks Hovis said the cash required for the cash alternative
would be met by one of several methods.
    For the first 10 mln Avana shares received opting for the
cash alternative, Ranks Hovis would make a cash payment from
its own resources.
    For cash alternatives of more than 10 mln Avana shares,
Morgan Grenfell, as agent for participants, will make a
separate offer to purchase at 300p per share, net of expenses,
up to 46.3 mln Ranks Hovis new shares to which such
shareholders will be entitled under the increased offer. This
is equivalent to 780p per Avana ordinary.
    In addition, Ranks Hovis will make a further cash payment
of 20p per Avana ordinary. Avana shares traded at 800p after
the announcement, 32p up from last night's close of 768p. REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12454>
Cable and Wireless Plc &lt;CAWL.L> said new
proposals unveiled by Japan for it to become a core member of a
merged telecommunications firm to compete for
telecommunications contracts did not remove the group's
objections.
    The suggestions by Federation of Economic Organisations
official Fumio Watanabe was a formal announcement of proposals
made earlier this week and reported in the Japanese press.
    Cable has a 20 pct stake in one of the two groups trying to
compete against Japan's &lt;Kokusai Denshin Denwa Co Ltd> which
monopolises Japan's overseas telephone business.
    But a Cable spokesman said it still believed a merger of
the two consortia would be impracticable. "They are like oil and
water," he said.
    The Japanese authorities want only one competitor and have
proposed that the two consortia band together. The issue has
been taken up by the British government as a test case on the
openness of Japanese markets. Watanabe's latest proposals said
that the eight core companies of the new group should have
equal share holdings but added that they could work out the
precise percentages amongst themselves.
    The reports earlier this week said that Cable would be
offered a five pct stake, up from an originally proposed three
pct.
    Despite the apparent differences in stakes offered, the
Cable spokesman said the two offers appeared to be essentially
the same.
    Cable shares at 1100 GMT were quoted nine pence firmer at
374p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12460>
U.K. Defence secretary George Younger is
expected to announce the government's decision on the sale of
state-owned arms manufacturer &lt;Royal Ordnance> today,
parliamentary sources said.
    The government originally intended to float the munitions
and explosives concern on the stock market, but last July said
a private sale was a more appropriate way to dispose of the
firm.
    The bidders for the company were British Aerospace Plc
&lt;BAEL.L> and engineering group GKN Plc &lt;GKN.L>. Royal Ordnance
sold its Leeds tank factory last summer to Vickers Plc
&lt;VICK.L>.
    Defence electronics manufacturer Ferranti Plc &lt;FNTI.L> and
shipping and property group Trafalgar House Plc &lt;THSL.L> both
pulled out of the bidding shortly before last month's deadline.
    Royal Ordnance made pre-tax profits of 26 mln stg on sales
of 487 mln stg in calendar 1985, its first full year of
commercial operation. The company has assets of around 240 mln
stg and employs 17,000 at 15 sites in Britain.
    Other state-held companies earmarked for privatisation this
year include engine maker &lt;Rolls Royce Plc> and the &lt;British
Airports Authorities Plc>.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12468>
Toshiba Corp &lt;TSBA.T> said it regrets its
plan to enter the U.K. Business facsimile and telephone market
may be caught up in a diplomatic row over the position of Cable
and Wireless Plc's &lt;CAWL.L> in the Japanese market.
    Britain is considering how to retaliate against Japan's
attempt to prevent Cable and Wireless from taking a major
position in a Japanese international telecommunications
venture.
    "As a matter of timing it is regrettable that this has been
linked with the question of market access in Japan," a Toshiba
spokesman told Reuters.
    &lt;Toshiba Information Systems (U.K.) Ltd>, a Toshiba
subsidiary, said yesterday it planned to enter the U.K. Market
under the Toshiba own brand name and had applied for government
approval to do so.
    Toshiba has supplied equipment to U.K. Manufacturers for
sale under their brand names since last year.
    The Toshiba spokesman said the sale of such equipment was
not comparable to Cable and Wireless' efforts to take a stake
in the new Japanese telecommunications firm.
    "They are matters of a different category," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12485>
News Corp Ltd of Australia said it has
started its previously announced tender offer for all shares of
Harper and Row Publishers Inc at 65 dlrs per share.
    In a newspaper advertisement, the company said the offer is
conditioned on received of at least 51 pct of Harper and Row's
shares.  The offering and withdrawal rights expire April 29
unless extended.
    A merger at the tender price is to follow the offer, which
has been approved by the Harper and Row board.  Harper and Row
has granted NEw Corp an option to buy up to 800,000 new shares
or a 15.4 pct interest at 65 dlrs each.
    News Corp said if the merger agreement were terminated
under certain circumstances, News would be entitled to a 16 mln
dlr cash payment.
    Last month, Theodore Cross offered to acquire Harper and
Row for 34 dlrs per share but was soon outbid by Harcourt Brace
Jovanovich Inc, which offered 50 dlrs per share.  Late in the
month, Harper and Row said its board had received expressions
of interest from a number of domestic and foreign companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12492>
Aloha Inc said its leveraged buyout by
AQ Corp, which acquired 91 pct of Aloha common and 82 pct of
Aloha preferred in a tender offer that concluded December 26,
has been completed for 28.50 dlrs per common or preferred
share.
    AQ is controlled by Aloha chairman Hung Wo Ching, vice
chairman Sheridan C.F. Ing and president A. Maurice Myers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12504>
CPC International Inc
said it has completed the sale of its South African subsidiary
Robertsons Pty Ltd to a consortium of European and South
African investors for an undisclosed amount in excess of book
value due to the increasing difficulty of operating there.
    It said the operation accounted for less than two pct of
worldwide sales of 4.5 billion dlrs in 1986.
    The company said small royalties expected to result from
use of CPC trademarks by the new owners will be utilized for
social programs in south Africa."  It said no significant
impact on earnings is expected from the sale.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12512>
American Barrick Resources Corp said it
sold two coal supply agreements and substantially all assets at
its two coal mines in Ohio to &lt;Peabody Coal Co> of Henderson,
Kentucky, for an undisclosed price.
    The company said proceeds from this sale, together with the
sale of the remaining coal assets, should allow it to fully
recover its investment in the operations.
    It said the transactions will complete its previously
announced plan to sell all non-gold assets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12529>
First Federal Savings and Loan
Association of Fort Myers said its board has executed a letter
of intent to acquire First Presidential Savings and Loan
Association of Sarasota, Fla., for 8,500,000 dlrs in cash.
    The company said a definitive agreement is expected to be
executed by May 15 and the transaction is expected to be
completed by year-end.
    The purchase price is subject to an increase on a dollar
for dollar basis to the extent that the net worth of First
Presidentail exceeds 4,100,000 dlrs at the time of closing, the
company said.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12532>
Eli Lilly and Co said its board
decided to sell Elizabeth Arden Inc, a wholly owned subsidiary
that manufactures and markets cosmetics and fine fragrance
products.
    It said the business, which had sales of 67 mln dlrs when
it was acquired in 1971, had sales last year of 398 mln dlrs,
up 12 pct from 1985. It had operating profits of about 33 mln
dlrs in 1986.
    Lilly said it retained Morgan Stanley and Co to help
evaluate offers.
    Lilly said it expects to use the after-tax proceeds from
the sale of its cosmetics business for general corporate
purposes, including the repurchase from time to time of its
common stock or warrants on the open market.
    In a statement, Lilly Chairman Richard Wood said "This
strategic decision was reached on the basis of our belief that
in the future the corporation's resources, including its
research activities, should be focused on its other business
which have a high technology, life sciences orientation."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12538>
Key Centurion Bancshares Inc
said it has completed the previously-announced acquisitions of
Union Bancorp of West Virginia Inc and Wayne Bancorp Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12540>
CB and T Bancshares Inc said it
has completed the acquisition of First Community Bancshares Inc
Of Tifton, Ga., which as assets of 62 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12546>
The Zimbabwe government has bought 85 pct
of the equity in &lt;Astra Corporation> for 25.5 mln dlrs from
Netherlands-based &lt;Bommenede Houdstermaatschappij (Nederland
BV)>, Astra announced.
    Astra owns five companies with interests in engineering,
paint manufacture and the distribution of farm machinery and
equipment, motor vehicles and earthmoving equipment.
    The company is now locally controlled with 80 pct of its
equity owned by the government, 14 pct by the Dutch firm. A six
pct stake was donated to the Astra Corporation Workers' Trust
by the government and the Dutch company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12557>
Jacobs Suchard AG said it acquired a
"comfortable majority" interest in its takeover bid for Cote d'Or
SA, Belgium's leading producer of chocolate.
    In a statement, Jacobs said it had acquired all the shares
tendered by the time its offer expired on March 30. The offer,
for 100 pct of Cote d'Or at 8,050 Belgian francs per ordinary
share, was agreed with the Belgian firm's board.
    A Jacobs spokesman declined to specify the size of the
majority stake and said Jacobs had not decided what it would do
about acquiring the outstanding shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12751>
MIM Holdings Ltd &lt;MIMA.S> said it has
issued 23.33 mln shares to Preussag AG &lt;PRSG.F> to complete the
previously announced purchase of 20 pct of &lt;Norddeutsche
Affinerie AG> from Preussag.
    Terms of the acquisition of 10 pct of Norddeutsche
Affinerie from Degussa AG &lt;DGSG.F> are currently being
resolved, MIM said in a statement.
    Norddeutsche Affinerie will then be owned 40 pct by
Metallgesellschaft AG &lt;METG.F> and 30 pct each by MIM and
Degussa, but MIM said it and Metallgesellschaft are proposing a
further arrangement to give them 35 pct each.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12759>
&lt;Skandia International Holding AB>,
the overseas offshoot of Swedish insurance group Forsakrings AB
Skandia &lt;SKDS.ST> said it was buying a 29.9 pct share in the
London-quoted property and financial services company &lt;Nevi
Baltic Plc>. No financial details were given.
    Nevi Baltic, with a 1986 turnover of 20 mln stg and total
assets of 70 mln stg, is controlled by Norwegian finance
company &lt;Nevi AS> which will retain a 30.1 pct stake in the
British unit, Skandia said in a statement.
    The deal is subject to formal approval from the Swedish
central bank, the statement added.
 REUTER

</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12767>
Bass Plc &lt;BASS.L> and &lt;Horizon Travel
Plc> said terms have been agreed for an offer worth around 94.8
mln stg for Horizon by Bass.
    The offer values each Horizon share at some 0.213 of a Bass
ordinary share, or 190p. This is based on a price of 892p, the
Bass share quotation at 1630 gmt on April 2.
    Horizon said its board and financial advisers consider the
offer to be fair and reasonable and the board will unanimously
recommend acceptance to its shareholders.
    Horizon shares jumped 23p to 188 after the announcement
while Bass shares dipped 13p to 879.
    Bass has for some time regarded overseas holidays as an
area for expansion and in pursuit of this objective, acquired a
25.6 pct holding in Horizon in 1985 when it set up the jointly
owned hotel company.
    Both Bass and Horizon said that Bass's resources will
enable Horizon's businesses to expand strongly this year.
    On March 30 Bass said it had agreed to sell its Pontins
U.K. Holiday camps to a newly formed private company, Pontins
Ltd, for some 57.5 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12797>
&lt;Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd> said it
considered the proposed 2.20 dlrs a share cash takeover offer
announced by CSR Ltd &lt;CSRA.S> on March 31 to be too low in view
of the group*hK!UiIe and prospects.
    CSR's bid for the 68.26 pct of Pioneer's 99.80 mln issued
shares it does not already hold values the entire grop_j9culd
make an alternative share offer but has not yet announced
terms.
    Pioneer recommended in a statement that shareholders retain
their stock, pending the board's response once it receives full
details of the CSR offer.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12822>
Altex Industries Inc said it has agreed
in principle to buy 82 pct of two privately-held affiliated
computer retail companies for an undisclosed amount.
    Altex said the Denver-based companies had revenues of over
seven mln dlrs last year. They are Integrated Management Data
Systems Inc, which sells accounting software systems to the oil
and gas industry, and Integrated Management Systems Micro
Distribution Division Inc, which distributes micro-computer
products.
    Altex said it expects to close the transaction, which is
subject to financing, in July.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12827>
Santa Fe Southern Pacific Corp may have
more difficulty combining its two railroads than fending off a
possible takeover by Henley Group &lt;HENG>, which has accumulated
almost a five pct stake in the real estate and railroad
conglomerate, analysts said.
    Takeover speculation has surrounded Santa Fe since Henley
disclosed its stake in the company earlier this week, but
analysts and a Santa Fe official were skeptical a takeover is
its intention.
    Analysts also said the company has strong defenses that
would easily deter any suitor - one of those being its problems
combining its two railroad properties, which hang in regulatory
limbo.
    Richard Fischer of Merrill Lynch and Co Inc said that Santa
Fe at December 31 had 580 mln dlrs in cash and cash
equivalents, while its long-term debt to capital was just over
25 pct. "This gives them plenty of borrowing power," he said,
which could be used against an unwanted suitor.
    Henley Group's Chairman Michael Dingman has said he wants
to take major positions in undervalued natural resource
companies. He also told Reuters in an interview he is seeking
an acquisition of from two billion to eight billion dlrs.
    Santa Fe officials don't appear concerned that Henley might
launch a takeover. "I would not characterize the atmosphere
around here as one of concern," one Santa Fe executive said
about Henley.
    "I think it's wrong to assume Dingman has formed a firm
strategy with Santa Fe," said Mark Hassenberg, who covers
Henley for DLJ Securities.
    Analysts say the potential of Santa Fe's land assets are
likely to be realized slowly. They add that Santa Fe's efforts
to merge its two railroads remain in regulatory limbo,
sidetracking many of its strategic plans for the foreseeable
future.
    These realities, they said, support the Henley Group's
statement that its Santa Fe stake is only an investment.
    The more pressing problem facing Santa Fe is overcoming
difficulties in merging its two railroads, the Atchison, Topeka
and Santa Fe Railway Co and Southern Pacific Transportation Co.
The merger would create the nation's second-longest railroad.
    Last July the Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC) denied
the merger on anticompetitive grounds.
    The company since has granted trackage-sharing rights to
four western railroads to meet the ICC's concerns and persuade
it to reopen the hearings in its three-year-old struggle to
merge the lines.
    "My guess is the commission will decide in three to six
weeks whether to reopen hearings," Fischer said.
    "I believe they've made an effort to satisfy the ICC's
objections," he said. "But in doing so they haven't pleased
everyone. Before they had Burlington Northern on their side,
now Burlington is opposed to the way trackage rights are set
up."
    If the hearings are reopened, analysts predicted it will
take six to nine months for everyone to have their say, and up
to another year for the ICC to decide.
    Santa Fe is in the midst of a 50-mln-share stock buyback
program begun in 1984. It has bought back 33.7 mln shares as of
February 1, when it had 154.7 mln shares outstanding, a
spokesman said.
    Among the shares repurchased were two stakes owned by
Norfolk Southern, one of 3.4 mln shares bought in 1986 and
another of 1.7 mln shares in 1985, one analyst said.
    James Voytko at Paine Webber believes Santa Fe could fight
off the Henley Group with its cash and credit. Citing the share
buybacks from Norfolk Southern, he said one of Santa Fe's
options, if threatened, could be to buy the Henley stake.
    "It is indeed possible that Dingman sees this as a
low-risk, opportunistic investment," Voytko said.
    "People who follow Santa Fe have given me values of 45 dlrs
to 50 dlrs a share," said DLJ Securities' Hassenberg. "But I'm
certain that in Dingman's mind, the company is worth more than
that in breakup value."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12834>
&lt;Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd> said it
considered the proposed 2.20 dlrs a share cash takeover offer
announced by CSR Ltd &lt;CSRA.S> on March 31 to be too low in view
of the group*hK!UiIe and prospects.
    Pioneer recommended in a statement that shareholders retain
their stock, pending the board's response once it receives full
details of the CSR offer.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12852>
Canrad Inc said it acquired the
Measurement Systems Division of &lt;Page-Wilson Corp> for an
undisclosed amount of cash.
    Canrad said the acquisition is expected to increase its
annual revenues by about 10 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12853>
Pantera's Corp said it closed on its
agreement to acquire ten pizza restaurant locations in
southeastern Colorado.
    It said the purchase price was 1,250,000 dlrs, which was
paid by cash and stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12858>
&lt;General Partners> said it was
prepared to raise its bid for GenCorp Inc to 110 dlrs cash per
share from 100 dlrs per share.
    In a letter from General Partners to A. William Reynolds,
chairman and chief executive officer of GenCorp, the company
stated that if GenCorp could prove the company was worth more,
General Partners would be willing to consider an even higher
price.
    General Partners also left open the possibility of an
alternative to an all-cash offer.
    General Partners told GenCorp if it believed shareholders
would be better served by a smaller cash price with a security
representing a continuing long-term interest in GenCorp's
prospects, it would be willing to discuss an alternative.
    Specifically, General Partners said it was prepared to
discuss an acquisition giving shareholders a continuing
interest in Aerojet General, a valued business of GenCorp.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12866>
R.R. Donnelly and Sons Co said it
reached an agreement with Adams-Russell Co Inc &lt;AAR> to sell
Adams its Rockford, Ill., cable system for an undisclosed
price.
    R.R. Donnelly said it expects the deal to close in about
120 days, subject to regulatory approvals and other conditions.
    The cable system serves about 51,000 subscribers in the
communities of Rockford, Loves Park, Machesney Park, Cherry
Valley, Morristown and Winnebago County, Ill., R.R. Donnelly
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12883>
K mart Corp said it agreed to sell
most of the U.S. Kresge and Jupiter stores to McCrory Corp, a
subsidiary of privately held Rapid American Corp.
    It said the agreement covers 76 stores in 21 states
including inventory and fixtures. The price depends on the
amount of the inventory that will be in the stores on the
closing date.
    K mart said it will continue to operate the stores until
early June, when McCrory will take over with no interruption of
service.
    The newly acquired Kresge and Jupiter stores will be
renamed McCrory 5 and 10. McCrory currently operates 1,250
stores in 38 states.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12888>
&lt;Kleer-Vu Industries> said the
company's board authorized the sale of its Neslemur Co, its
cosmetic and toiletries company.
    The company said it is evaluating two separate proposals
and will complete the sale within 10 days.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12889>
Memory Protection Devices Inc said it
completed its acquisition of the assets and liabilities of
Bogen, a division of &lt;Lear/Siegler>, for 9,200,000 dlrs in
cash.
    Under the newly-structured company, Memory said it expects
to report consolidated sales of 18 mln dlrs to 20 mln dlrs and
should be profitable before allowing for extraordinary items
related to the acquisition.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12890>
Du Pont Co said it agreed to
sell its Cleveland chemical plant, the oldest site currently
operated by the company, to two employees.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Closing is expected in the second quarter, following
approval of definitive agreements.
    Products made at the plant represent less than 1/10 of one
pct of Du Pont's annual sales, it said. Quilon chrome complexes
and Volan bonding agents will be supplied by the plant to Du
Pont under contract.
    Established in 1866, the plant was acquired by Du Pont in
1928. The plant no longer fits the company's long-term
strategy, Du Pont said
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12900>
Gerber Products Co said it has
given management of its CWT Inc trucking subsidiary 60 days to
pursue a leveraged buyout of the subsidiary.
    It said CWT Inc, which has operations in the Midwest and
Southeast, has annual revenues of approximately 135 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12905>
N.J. Nicholas Jr., president and chief
operating officer of Time Inc, told security analysts the
company is now engaged in talks to join a consortium of cable
companies that will invest in Cable News Network.
    Nicholas declined to give any details, but said an
announcement might be ready in a few days. He also declined to
say whether the investment would be made by Time Inc or
American Television and Communications Corp, a public company
in which Time owns a majority stake.
    Cable News Network is owned by Turner Broadcasting System
&lt;TBS>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12933>
Allwaste Inc said it agreed in principle
to acquire all outstanding stock of a company in the industrial
service business for 1.98 mln dlrs in common stock.
    It did not identify the company to be acquired.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12937>
Soo Line Corp said it agreed to sell
its Lake States Transportation Division to the newly formed
Wisconsin Central Ltd.
    The division conducts rail operations over about 2,000
miles of railroad in Minnesota, Wisconsin, Michigan and
Illinois. Soo Line said in January it was seeking bids for the
property.
    Terms were withheld, but Soo has estimated that the
transaction will result in a one-time after-tax loss of 8.0 to
15.0 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12956>
Stars to Go Inc said it completed
its acquisition of 650 video centers previously owned by CVS
International Inc and located in Circle K Corp &lt;CKP> stores.
    In conjunction with the acquistion, Circle K also granted
it the exclusive right to install video cassette rental centers
in all existing 3,500 Circle K stores, as well as in future
stores, for a period of seven years, Stars to Go said.
    The company also said it currently has a total of 4,650
centers in operation and expects to increase the total to 6,000
by June 30.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12965>
Warburg, Pincus Capital Co L.P., an
investment partnership, said it told representatives of Symbion
Inc it would not increase the 3.50-dlr-per-share cash price it
has offered for the company.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Warburg Pincus said one of its top executives, Rodman Moorhead,
who is also a Symbion director, met April 1 with Symbion's
financial advisor, L.F. Rothschild, Unterberg, Towbin Inc.
    In a discussion of the offer, Warburg Pincus said Moorhead
told the meeting there are no plans to raise the 3.50 dlr bid.
    Moorhead told the Rothschild officials that Warburg Pincus
considers the offered price to be a fair one, Warburg Pincus
said.
    Last Month Warburg Pincus launched a tender offer to buy up
to 2.5 mln Symbion common shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12973>
PBS Building Systems of America Inc,
an Anaheim, Calif., company, told the Securities and Exchange
Commission it has acquired 150,000 shares of Modulaire
Industries, or 5.0 pct of the total outstanding common stock.
    PBS, whose subsidiaries design, make, sell and lease
nonresidential relocatable modular buildings, said it bought
the stake for 855,768.75 dlrs "to acquire an equity interest in
Modulaire, while it evaluates Modulaire."
    Depending on several factors, PBS said it may decide to buy
additional Modulaire common shares.
                                
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12974>
Boise Cascade Corp said it
completed the previously announced sale of its Consumer
Packaging Division to Sonoco Products Co &lt;SONO> for
approximately 175 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12981>
Allied-Signal Inc said it
agreed to sell its Amphenol Products unit to a subsidiary of
LPL Investments Group &lt;LPLI>, a Wallingford, Conn., investment
company, for 430 mln dlrs cash.
    Closing is expected soon, pending appropriate approvals,
the company said. LPL indicated that at closing, warrants will
be sold which, when exercised, will reduce its stake in the
subsidiary, Amphenol Acquisition Co, to 60 pct, the company
said.
    Lisle, Ill.-based Amphenol had 1986 sales of about 500 mln
dlrs. It makes brand name interconnection products.
    LPL also said Merrill Lynch and Co has committed to buy 175
mln dlrs of subordinated and preferred debt in the new LPL
unit, according to Allied-Signal. Canadian Imperial Bank of
Commerce has committed up to 340 mln dlrs in senior debt
financing, it said.
    Allied-Signal said in December it was offering for sale
Amphenol and six other operating units in its electronics and
instrumentation sector.
    Merrill Lynch, Needham and Co and Lazard Freres served as
financial advisors, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12988>
Occidental Petroleum Corp's
Occidental Chemcial Corp said it sold the Process chemicals
division it acquired as part of the September 1986  purchase of
Diamond Shamrock Chemicals to Henkel KGAA of Dusseldorf, West
Germany.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    The division makes specialty industrial chemicals, it said.
    Later, industry sources said the division, which had
worldwide sales of some 160 mln dlrs last year, was sold for
just under 200 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12995>
Lloyds Investment Managers Ltd, a
London-based investment firm, said it raised it stake in Italy
Fund to 760,500 shares, or 12.0 pct of the total outstanding
common stock, from 466,000 shares, or 7.4 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Lloyds said it bought the additional 294,500 Italy Fund common
shares since November 7 for a total of 3.3 mln dlrs. Another
70,000 shares of the stake are held by an affiliate, it said.
    It said its dealings in Italy Fund stock are for investment
purposes only and that it has no current plans to increase or
decrease its current stake.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12996>
Arthur Appleton, a Chicago investor,
told the Securities and Exchange Commission he has acquired
39,000 shares of Sage Drilling Co Inc, or 5.1 pct of the total
outstanding common stock.
    Appleton said he bought the stock for 116,554 dlrs for
investment purposes.
    Depending on several circumstances, Appleton said he may
buy more Sage common shares, or sell some or all of his current
stake.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13005>
CIS Technologies Inc said it
executed a formal share purchase agreement with Swiss
Reinsurance Co of Zurich, Switzerland.
    Under terms of the agreement, Swiss Re will acquire 5.5 mln
newly issued CIS stock at 2.50 dlrs a share, or 13.8 mln dlrs.
This purchase represents 30 pct of the outstanding shares.
    Swiss Re will acuqire 500,000 of the shares immediately and
remaining shares will be bought after a due diligence report is
completed by auditors.
    The transaction is expected to be complete by June 11.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13011>
Beneficial Corp said the sale of its
American Centennial Insurance Co subsidiary to &lt;First Delaware
Holdings Inc> was approved by the Delaware Insurance
Department.
    Under the transaction, American Centennial will receive a
cash infusion of 200 mln dlrs, including the settlement of tax
sharing agreements with Beneficial Corp, Beneficial said.
    It will also receive 25 mln dlrs from Beneficial
International Insurance Co, another Beneficial subsidiary being
purchased by the management-led group of First Delaware, the
company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13021>
The United Food And Commercial
Workers said that more than 1,000 rank-and-file members of the
union will demonstrate Monday at Dart Group Corp's headquarters
protesting Dart's proposed 1.73 billion dlr takover of
Supermarkets General &lt;SGL>.
    Supermarkets is best known for its Pathmark chain of
supermarket drug stores in the New York and New Jersey area and
also owns Rickels home centers.
    The union said that it is firmly against the Dart bid
because "workers have always ended up with a raw deal in the
current takeover mania."
    A Union statement said: "We do not intend to allow our
members to pick up the tab for Supermarket General's executives
and the bankers or the Dart Group who stand to make millions."
    Dart is controlled by the Haft family of Washington, which
last year made a bid for California-based Safeway Stores Inc.
The Hafts lost, but walked away with at least 100 mln dlrs in
profits, analysts estimate.
    The union said that Dart's Safeway bid forced a major
restructuring at Safeway to pay the Hafts and their lawyers and
caused a loss of thousands of jobs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13023>
FCS Laboratories Inc said merger
discussions with an unnamed privately-held company in the
health care field have ended without an agreement.
    The previously announced negotiations began last August,
the company said.
    "It's disappointing to spend so much time on these
negotiations and have them fail," said FCS chairman Nicholas
Gallo III. "But the discussions could not produce a deal
acceptable to our board in the context of the company's
stronger financial position today as compared to six months
ago."
    Gallo said FCS will stop actively seeking potential merger
partners, but will respond to serious inquiries.
    "We are determined to follow our plan to restore this
company to profitability," he said. "To continue actively
searching for potential acquirers inherently forces us to
postpone the implementation of critical decisions which are
part of the plan."
    The company, which has 4,475,930 common shares outstanding,
reaffirmed it expects to be profitable in the second half of
the fiscal year ending September 30, 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13036>
Mid-State Federal Savings and Loan
Association said it and First Federal Savings and Loan
Association of Brooksville &lt;FFBV> reached a definitive merger
agreement.
    As previously announced, Brooksville shareholders will get
cash and stock in exchange for their shares. The transaction is
expected to be completed during the summer 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13037>
&lt;Memotec Data Inc> said it completed
the previously announced 488.3 mln dlr acquisition of Teleglobe
Canada from the federal government.
    Memotec Data said Teleglobe, which has provided Canada's
overseas telecommunications services since 1950, now becomes
Teleglobe Canada Inc, a unit of Memotec.
    Teleglobe president and chief executive Jean-Claude Delorme
will continue in the same post, the company said.
    In addition to the sale price, the government will receive
Teleglobe's accumulated cash of 102 mln dlrs and a special 18
mln dlr dividend, making total proceeds 608.3 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13041>
Ameron Inc said its board
adopted a rights plan designed to protect shareholders from
potentially unfair takeover tactics.
    The plan calls for distribution of one right for each of
its outstanding common shares and each right entitles the
holder to buy one/one-hundredth of a share of newly authorized
Series A Junior Participating cumulative Preferred stock at an
exercise price of 55 dlrs, Ameron said.
    It said the rights are exercisable if a group acquires 20
pct or more of its common stock or announces a tender offer for
30 pct or more of its shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13043>
FCS Laboratories said its merger
talks with another unidentified company in the health care
field ended without agreement.
    The talks began last August, the company said.
    The company also said it will no longer actively seek out
potential merger partners, but will respond to serious
inquiries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13054>
SciMed Life Systems Inc &lt;SMLS> said
Bristol-Myers Co is analyzing the pending lawsuit brought
against SciMed by &lt;Advanced Cardiovascular Systems Inc> to
determine whether to consummate its previously announced plans
to merge with SciMed.
    The company said its was served the suit in Minneapolis on
March 31, the day after it announced its definitive merger
agreement with Bristol-Myers.
    SciMed said the suit, which alleges that SciMed infringed
on Advanced Cardiovascular patents, is without merit.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13060>
Bell Petroleum Services Inc said it
agreed to begin talks with Regal International Inc to form a
plan of reorganization under which Bell would become a
subsidiary of Regal.
    The plan would be subject to Bankruptcy court approval due
to Bell's status as a debtor-in-possesion under Chapter 11. the
company's expect to file a plan by the end of May.
    This agreement terminates litigation between the companies
concerning previous attempts at a plan of reorganization..
    Bell is also free to continue talks with any third parties
interested in an acquisition, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13072>
The Securities and Exchange
Commission reminded corporate raiders and others tendering for
the shares of companies that they must extend the period their
offers are open if key conditions are changed.
    Specifically, the agency said those making tender offers
for companies' stock must extend the offers if they decide to
eliminate conditions requiring a minimum number of shares to be
tendered in order for the offers to be valid.
    Tender offers typically include minimum share conditions.
As a result, a purchaser would not be bound to buy the shares
that were tendered if the minimum level were not reached.
    In an interpretation of current rules, which officials said
clarifies the SEC's present position, the agency said a tender
offer must be extended if a minimum share condition is waived,
even if the purchaser reserved the right to do so.
    The interpretation makes clear that waiving a minimum share
condition is a "material change" of the tender offer under U.S.
securities law, SEC officials said.
    The SEC has already said that other specific material
changes, such as changes in the percentage of securities being
sought or the price being offered, made during the course of a
tender offer require a 10-day extension of the offer.
    The length of the extension, which is aimed at giving
shareholders an adequate chance to assess revisions of a tender
offer, was not specified in cases where the minimum share
conditions were waived.
    SEC officials said the length of the extension in such
cases would depend on the facts and circumstances surrounding
each case, but would generally be between five and 10 days.
    The agency cited two recent tender offers in which waivers
of a minimum share conditios were tried on the last day of each
offer, denying shareholders the chance to react to the new
information. Officials declined to identify the two offers.
    "If a bidder makes a material change near or at the end of
its offer, it will have to extend the offer to permit adequate
dissemination," the SEC said.
    Federal securities law requires that all tender offers
remain open for at least 20 business days.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13077>
GenCorp said its RKO General Inc
subsidiary completed the sale of WOR-TV to MCA Inc &lt;MCA> for
387 mln dlrs.
    The Federal Communications Commission approved the sale
last December, GenCorp said. The closing was delayed because
that decision was appealed by four parties to the U.S. Court of
Appeals, GenCorp explained.
    WOR-TV is based in  Secaucus, N.J., GenCorp said.
    Earlier today, &lt;General Partners> said it was prepared to
raise its bid to 110 dlrs per share, or even more, in its bid
for GenCorp.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13085>
Snyder Oil Partners L.P. told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it made an exchange offer to
Cenergy Corp that would allow Snyder to acquire up to 49.9 pct
of the company's common stock.
    Under the exchange offer, which was proposed yesterday to
Cenergy's officers and directors, each share of Cenergy common
stock could be exchanged for 8.50 dlrs in market value of
Snyder's limited partnership units, Snyder said.
    Under the proposal, Snyder, which already holds 1,170,400
Cenergy common shares, or 12.0 pct of the total, could boost
its Cenergy stake to a total of 49.9 pct, it said.
    Snyder did not say whether it has received any response to
its proposal from Cenergy.
    If it acquires the 49.9 pct stake, Snyder said in its SEC
filing it would use the stock to "obtain a proportionate
beneficial interest" in the company's assets and liabilities.
    It said it has not decided its next move it the exchange
proposal does not lead to negotiations with Cenergy.
    Snyder said it may boost its stake or sell some or all of
its current holdings. It repeated a statement made in its
initial SEC filing last month that it is considering several
alternatives, including seeking control of Cenergy.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13089>
Harleysville Group Inc said it
was in talks to acquire Atlantic Mutual Fire Insurance Co, a
property and casualty insurer licensed in five southern states.
    The company said it believes an acquisition could be
completed by June 30, subject to approval by regulatory and
Atlantic Mutual policyholders.
    Harleysville plans to invest about four mln dlrs in the
business if the deal is completed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13090>
Kroger Co said it agreed to buy nine 
retail food stores from the Dallas division of &lt;Safeway Stores
Inc>, which announced it was closing the 141-store division as
part of a restructuring.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Kroger expects to take over operation of the stores, one of
which is under construction, in late April. The addition of the
stores will bring Kroger's Dallas division to 75 stores, it
said.
    It operates more than 1,300 stores in 20 states.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13095>
&lt;Carburos Metalicos> of Spain has bid
2,205 francs a share for French chemicals group &lt;Duffour et
Igon>, rivalling the 2,100 franc bid announced yesterday by
Union Carbide France, the French subsidiary of the U.S.
Chemical giant Union Carbide Corp &lt;UK.N>, the stockbrokers'
assocation (CSAC) said here.
    Duffour et Igon's capital is comprised of 133,100 shares
with a nominal value of 100 francs each. Shares were last
quoted at 856 francs on January 9.
    Banque Paribas will act for Carburos Metalicos, while Union
Carbide France's bid is being led by Rothschild et Associes
Banque.
    Duffour et Igon shares will be suspended on April 6 and 7
and will resume trading on April 8.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13103>
&lt;Metromedia Co> said it
purchased from Time Inc's &lt;TL> Home Box Office Inc a warrant to
purchase 800,000 shares of common stock of Orion Pictures Corp
&lt;OPC>.
    The price for the warrant was 10 mln dlrs, Metromedia said.
It added that it now owns 16.4 pct of the outstanding common
stock of Orion.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13124>
E.F. Hutton LBO Inc is still interested
in an acquisition of Purolator Courier Corp, and is examining
the possibility of raising its 35 dlr per share offer, an E.F.
Hutton spokesman said.
    Hutton's offer was topped by a 40 dlr per share offer from
Emery Air Freight Corp &lt;EAF> earlier this week.
    "We're definately not out of it at this point," the Hutton
spokesman said.
    "We want to see what the offer is completely and understand
it fully, and then fashion our response," the spokesman said.
    After Emery made its offer, Hutton extended the deadline on
its offer to Monday. The offer was to have expired Wednesday.
    Analysts said it might be difficult for Hutton to raise the
offer since Emery, an overnight courier, might have an easier
time justifying a lofty price since it would realize cost
savings by combining its business with those of Purolator.
    Purolator, a New Jersey-based overnight courier, has
declined comment.
    Purolator had traded above the Hutton offer price on
speculation a new bidder would emerge. It was up 1/8 today at
40-3/8, above the Emery offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13139>
Bayou International Ltd said it
acquired 19.9 pct of &lt;Amalgamated Equities Ltd> of Australia
for 710,000 dlrs.
    Bayou is 55.2 pct owned by &lt;Australia Wide Industries Ltd>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13151>
Iroquois Brands Ltd said it has
been sued by Lyon Food Cos Inc which is seeking 2.3 mln dlrs in
damages in connection with the April 1986 nine mln dlrs
purchase of Iroquois' former specialty food products segment.
    Iroquois said that based upon the defenses it will assert,
it does not believe that any charge against income is required
as a result of the claim.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13163>
Texas American Bancshares Inc
said three of its Texas American banks will be merged into
Texas American Bank/Galleria.
    The corporation said the Spring Branch, Fonderen and
Gulfway Texas American banks will become separate banking
offices of TAB/Galleria.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13168>
The U.S. Energy Department issued a
request for proposals to buy the Snettisham Hydroelectric
project, a major part of the Alaska Power Administration.
    It said invitations were sent to two Alaskan electric
utilities, the city and borough of Anchorage and the state of
Alaska.  It did not cite a possible purchase prices.
    The requests were limited to Alaskan entities because the
purpose of privatization of the administration was to put the
local utility into the hands of a local body, the DOE said.
    It added that proposals are due back by August three.
    The DOE said it then had 120 days to select a proposal that
it would recommend to Congress, which then would vote the
recommendation up or down.
    Proposals to buy the other major part of the Alaska Power
Administration, the Eklutna project, was expected to be issued
in early June, it said.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13175>
Fortune Systems Corp and SCI
Systems Inc said they signed a letter of intent covering the
purchase of Fortune's microcomputer business assets for an
unspecified amount of cash.
    Fortune Systems makes a desktop computer systems.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13182>
A group of New York investors said it
lowered its stake in Rospatch Corp to 170,250 shares, or 7.0
pct of the total outstanding common stock, from 202,108 shares,
or 8.3 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group said it sold a net 31,858 shares of Rospatch common
stock between February  2 and March 31 at prices ranging from
21.50 to 25.13 dlrs a share.
    The group includes Brookehill Equities Inc, a brokerage
firm, and Moore, Grossman and deRose Inc, an investment
advisor.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13188>
CYACQ Corp said it terminated its
February six tender offer for Cyclops Corp.
    CYACQ was unsuccessfully bid against Dixons Group Plc for
control of Cyclops. As of March 27, Dixons Group Plc had
acquired more than 80 pct the stock under an increased tender
offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13189>
Leonard Chavin, a Chicago real estate
developer who has said he is considering seeking control of
L.E. Myers Co Group, said he raised his stake in the company to
273,100 shares, or 12.1 pct, from 219,600, or 9.7 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Chavin said he bought 53,500 Myers common shares between March
10 and 31 at prices ranging from 5-1/2 to six dlrs a share.
    Last January, Chavin said he retained investment banker
R.G. Dickinson and Co to advise him on his Myers stock
dealings. He has also said he would be unable to seek control
of Myers unless he gets financing.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13194>
Michael Krupp, a Golden, Colo.,
businessman and major shareholder of Kappa Networks Inc, said
he and Kappa's management are considering seeking a merger
between Kappa and Radiation Systems Inc.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Krupp said companies he controls and Kappa acquired a combined
292,000 Radiation System shares, or 5.25 pct of the total.
    Krupp, who has a 24.4 pct stake in Kappa, said he and Kappa
management believe a Kappa-Radiation Systems combination would
be good for both companies. But no decision has been made on
whether or how to proceed with a merger attempt, he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13195>
Olin Corp's Olin Hunt
Specialty Products Inc said it acquired Image Technology Corp
for undisclosed terms.
    Image Technology makes chemicals for the semiconductor
industry.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13196>
Key Centurion Bancshares Inc
said it reached an agreement in principle to acquire Central
National Bank of Buckhannon, in W. Virginia.
    Terms call for an exchange of 2.75 shares of Centurion
shares for each share of Central National. The transaction is
valued at 16.2 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13197>
Sturm, Ruger and Co Inc said it
submitted a bid in excess of 60 mln dlrs for Smith and Wesson,
a manufacturer of law enforcement firearms, and a unit of Lear
Siegler.
    Smith and wesson is among a number of companies being sold
by Forstman and Little after its recent acquisition of Lear
Siegler.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13199>
Freedom Savings and Loan Association
said it may seek a possible sale or merger of the association
as it reported a net loss of 112.7 mln dlrs or 31.09 dlrs a
share for 1986.
    The loss included a number of charges, including additions
to its loan loss provision of 68 mln dlrs and write-downs on
the value of its real estate of 13 mln dlrs.
    It said it is continuing to work with investment bankers to
find sources of new capital, return its non-performing assets
to earning status, and reduce operating expenses and
liabilities, among other things.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13205>
Publishers Equipment Corp said it reached
an agreement to incorporate flexo printing technology into The
Tentonian, an Ingersoll newspaper in Trenton, N.J.
    It said that mid-1988 will be the target date for start-up
for the new equipment which will double the size of its present
press.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13206>
A group led by New York investor
Mario Gabelli told the Securities and Exchange Commission it
cut its stake in Gencorp Inc to 1,410,184 shares, or 6.3 pct of
the total, from 1,626,233 shares, or 7.3 pct.
    The Gabelli group said it sold 216,049 Gencorp common
shares between March 20 and 30 at prices ranging from 108.75 to
114.75 dlrs a share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13210>
Mario Gabelli, head of New York
investment firm Mario Gabelli and Co, said he sold some shares
of GenCorp Inc &lt;GY> as part of a "portfolio rebalancing"
process to meet the needs of his more than 600 clients.
    He said as the stock moved up following acquisition
proposals from a group formed by AFG Industries Inc &lt;AFG> and
Wagner and Brown, some of his clients were overweighted.
    Regarding the company's shareholders meeting Tuesday,
Gabelli told Reuters, "there was nothing said that caused me to
sell or buy." He still thinks "values are 140 dlrs per share or
more" and has clients that asked to buy more.
    Gabelli said he amended certain filings with the Securities
and Exchange Commission because his clients are now passive
investors. "We wanted to remove our clients from the process
unfolding between GenCorp and Wagner and Brown," he said.
    He said he was pleased that chairman A. William Reynolds
stated at the meeting that he found the concept of greenmail to
be "repugnant." Greenmail refers to a corporation buying out a
shareholder at a premium not available to others.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13211>
Poul Erik Moller, a Santa Monica,
Calif., investor said he raised his stake in First Western
Financial Corp to 412,000 shares, or 6.5 pct of the total
outstanding common stock, from 347,000 shares, or 5.5 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission
Moller said he bought 65,000 First Western common shares
between Jan 20 and March 26 at prices ranging from 10.000 to
10.625 dlrs a share.
    Moller said he bought the stock as a long-term investment
and may buy more, but has no plans to seek control of the
company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13212>
Poul Erik Moller, a Santa Monica,
Calif., investor said he raised his stake in First Western
Financial Corp to 412,000 shares, or 6.5 pct of the total
outstanding common stock, from 347,000 shares, or 5.5 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission
Moller said he bought 65,000 First Western common shares
between January 20 and March 26 at prices ranging from 10.000
to 10.625 dlrs a share.
    Moller said he bought the stock as a long-term investment
and may buy more, but has no plans to seek control of the
company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13265>
&lt;The Australian Gas Light Co> (AGL) said it
will offer one share plus one dlr cash for every two shares in
oil and gas producer &lt;TMOC Resources Ltd> in a counter-bid to
the previously reported takeover offer by Santos Ltd &lt;STOS.S>.
    The offer values TMOC shares at 4.75 dlrs each, based on
AGL's closing price of 8.50 dlrs on Friday. TMOC shares jumped
to 4.60 dlrs on the announcement from its Friday closing price
of 4.15.
    The AGL offer, the third to be made for TMOC this year,
compares with the Santos cash offer of 4.00 dlrs a share.
    Based on TMOC's issued capital of 62.08 mln shares, the AGL
offer values the entire company at 249.9 mln shares.
    AGL said in a statement that it already holds 10.5 pct of
TMOC's issued capital. This compares with the Santos stake of
3.1 pct when it announced its bid in March 23.
    &lt;Elders Resources Ltd> began the auction for TMOC about
three months ago with an unsuccessful 2.55 dlrs a share
on-market offer that has since lapsed.
    AGL said its offer is above the upper end of the range of
values placed on TMOC by its advisers in the company's response
urging rejection of the Elders Resources bid.
    AGL said it will make the same offer for TMOC's convertible
notes. Accepting share and note holders will participate in
AGL's planned one-for-one bonus issue.
    It said TMOC is already a partner with AGL in the Alice
Springs to Darwin gas pipeline and has a number of businesses
complementary with those of AGL.
    AGL is the New South Wales natural gas utility while TMOC
has extensive onshore holdings, mainly in Queensland where it
owns the Moonie oil field and in the Northern Territory where
it operates and holds 43.75 of the Mereenie oil-gas field. It
also has interests in a number of gas or oil pipelines.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13393>
Tesco Plc &lt;TSCO.L> said it was extending
its 151 mln stg contested bid for &lt;Hillards Plc> until May 1.
    It said it now controlled 9.8 pct of Hillards shares,
comprising acceptances of the offer for 1.5 mln, or 3.1 pct,
and 3.2 mln, or 6.7 pct, owned by itself, its pension fund or
its associates.
    It also controlled 23,250 convertible preference shares, or
0.2 pct.
    Hillards shares were unchanged at 313p while Tesco was two
pence firmer at 475p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13532>
Fire protection and security group
Wormald International Ltd &lt;WOIA.S> said British-listed &lt;Holmes
Protection Group Inc> has agreed to issue it with 6.15 mln
common shares of one U.S. Cent par-value at 1.72 stg each.
    The two groups have also begun exploratory talks on a
possible merger of the Holmes business with the compatible
businesses of Wormald, comprising some or all of its fire
protection and security businesses in the Americas and Europe,
Wormald said in a statement.
    The issue of shares in the New York-based Holmes is
conditional upon shareholder approval at a general meeting.
    Wormald said its stake will represent 9.99 pct of Holmes'
existing issued shares and 9.09 pct of the enlarged capital.
    The issue will raise 10.6 mln stg which will be used for
further development of the Holmes business.
    Wormald said the businesses of the two groups are largely
complementary in terms of both geographical spread and the
nature of their activities, with Holmes concentrating on
burglar alarms and Wormald on fire systems.
    Holmes's operations are concentrated in and around New York
amd Miami. It earned 11 mln U.S. Dlrs pre-tax in its last
reported full year, 1985, and 6.0 mln in first half 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13704>
Whittaker Corp said it has completed
the previously-announced sale of its wholly-oiwned Whittaker
General Medical Corp subsidiary to R.A.B. Holdings Inc for
undisclosed terms.
    Whittaker General Medical has annual revenues of about 450
mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13711>
Enterra Corp said it has completed the
sale of its Hale Fire Pump co and Macomson Machine Co
subsidiaries to a company formed by Los Angeles investment firm
McBain, Rose Partners for about 27 mln dlrs in cash.
    Both Hale and Macomson make fire pumps and related
equipment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13714>
FMD Inc said it has agreed to acquire
Bankers Protective Financial Corp for 28,836,000 common shares,
subject to approval by the Texas State Board of Insurance.
    Bankers Protective is a life insurance company based in
Texas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13753>
Bow Valley Industries Ltd said
it agreed to sell its wholly owned Norwegian subsidiary to Elf
Aquitaine Norge A/S of Stavanger, Norway for 13 mln Canadian
dlrs.
    The principal asset of the subsidiary, Bow Valley
Exploration Norge A/S, is  an eight pct interest in the Heimdal
gas and condensate field offshore Norway.
    The sale is expected to conclude by the middle of April,
Bow Valley said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13787>
&lt;Noranda Inc> said it agreed to buy an
initial 1,000,501 treasury shares of &lt;Sanivan Group Inc> at
5.25 dlrs per share.
    Noranda also has an option until June 30, 1988, to acquire
an additional 1,000,501 Sanivan treasury shares at 5.75 dlrs
per share.
    Sanivan is the largest hazardous waste management company
in Canada.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13790>
Emery Air Freight Corp said it has
entered into an agreement with E.F. Hutton Group Inc EFH under
which Hutton will terminate its merger agreement with Purolator
Courier Corp and its pending 35-dlr-per-share tender offer,
effective April 13.
    Under its merger agreement, Hutton has the right to
unilaterally terminate the merger agreement under certain
circumstances, including its receipt of less than 66-2/3 pct of
Purolator shares or the start of a higher competing tender
offer, such as Emery's competing 40 dlr per share offer for
Purolator stock.
    Yesterday, Hutton's PC Acquisition Corp subsidiary extended
its tender offer, which was to have expired at midnight, for
two more days.  It said it only about 450,000 shares, or 6.5
pct, of Purolator shares had been tendered and not withdrawn,
down from an 11.5 pct interest held earlier.
    Emery's bid expires April 28.
    Emery said pending the termination of PC Acquisition's
merger agreement, PC has released Purolator from an agreement
not to discuss Emery's acquisition proposal with Emery. Emery
said as a result it is renewing its request that Purolatr enter
into merger negotiations with it.
    Emery said if it were to acquire 51 pct of Purolator shares
or control of the Purolator board, it has agreed not to dispute
PC Acquisition's right to receive fees that Purolator agreed to
pay if PC were unsuccessful in acquiring control of Purolator
due to the acquisition of control by another party.
    The company said it has also agreed to let Purolator pay
all of PC Acquisition's documented expenses in connection with
the merger agreement up to three mln dlrs and Emery has agreed
to pay the amounts itself should Purolator fail to do so.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13870>
Carolyn Bean Publishing Ltd said
it has completed the acquisition of greeting card company
Millen Cards, which had sales of over 1,500,000 dlrs in 1986,
for undisclosed terms.
    The company said 90 pct of Millen's cards have been sold in
the northeast and mid-Atlantic states, but Bean expects to
increase sales to 2,500,000 dlrs this year by distributing the
line nationally.
    Millen specializes in Jewish religious cards and also sells
traditional greeting cards.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13874>
Chesapeake Corp said it has
retained Salomon Inc &lt;SB> to help it sell Plainwell Paper Co
Inc, a maker of premium coated and uncoated printing papers and
technical specialty papers with a capacity of 85,000 short tons
a year.
    The company said it has decided to sell Plainwell in ordfer
to focus on the production of kraft and tissue products,
containers and treated wood products.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14028>
American sports Advisors Inc
said it has agreed to sell its sports handicapping and
publication business to Professor Enterprises for about
1,650,000 dlrs and intends to liquidate after closing.
    The transaction is subject to shareholder approval.
    Professor is owned by American Sports president Edward C.
Horowitz and Mike Warren, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14099>
Knight-Ridder Inc &lt;KRI> said its TKR Cable
Co joint venture with Tele-communications Inc has signed a
letter of intent to acquire cable television systems with
55,000 basic subscribers in Wildwood, N.J., and Ramapo and
Warwick, N.Y., from Tele-Communications for undisclosed terms.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14131>
The New York brokerage firm of Spear,
Leeds and Kellogg told the Securities and Exchange Commission
it had increased its preferred stock in Allegheny International
Inc to 8.6 pct, from 7 pct.
    It said it may buy additional shares, but had not decided
whether to offer its shares in response to a tender offer by
Sunter Acquisition Corp, a unit of First Boston Inc.
    The brokerage firm said it bought the Allegheny shares
March 30-April 2 for 86.50-87.25 dlrs each.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14154>
Corroon and Black Corp said it
completed the acuqisition of &lt;Contractors Planning Group Inc>
in an exchange of shares.
    Contractors is headquartered in Garden City, N.Y., and has
branch offices in Philadelphia, Boston, and Cheshire, Conn.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14156>
Colonial BancGroup said it and
The Liberty Bank of Pensacola, Fla., signed a letter of intent
for Colonial to acquire Liberty.
    Terms of the acquisition were not dislcosed.
    Colonial said the acquisition was its first move toward
acquiring and out-of-state bank under Alabama's regional
interstate banking law.
    Liberty has total assets of 35 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14177>
&lt;Golden Rule Resources Ltd> and
Goldsil Resources Ltd said they had agreed to merge.
    The merged company will issue to each Golden Rule
shareholder 1-1/2 shares and one warrant. The warrant will be
for a term of two years. Payment of 3.10 dlrs and delivery of
two warrants will entitle the shareholder to one additional
share of the merged company, the companies said.
    Each Goldsil shareholder will receive one share and
one-half warrant. The warrant will be for a term of two years.
Payment of 3.10 dlrs and delivery of two warrants will entitle
the shareholder to one additional share of the merged company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14201>
Two New York management investment
firms told the Securities and Exchange Commission they had
increased their holdings in Purolator Courier Corp to 7.2 pct,
from 6.2 pct.
    Mutual Shares Corp and Mutual Qualified Income Fund Inc
said they were weighing offers to buy Purolator shares from PC
Acquisition Inc, a unit of E.F. Hutton LBO Inc, for 35 dlrs a
share, and from EAF Acquisitions Corp Inc, a unit of Emery Air
Freight Corp. at 40 dlrs
    They told the commission they had bought their new
Purolator shares March 25-27 for 34.875-35.250 dlrs each.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14263>
Acme Precision Products Inc said it set
its annual meeting for May 14 for shareholders to vote on the
proposed management-led leveraged buyout of the company.
    The record date for the meeting will be April 16, with
proxy materials to be sent to shareholders on or before April
20.
    The buyout proposal, which was previously announced, will
be structured as a one for 100,000 reverse stock split. It must
be approved by a majority of shareholders. Acme Precision has
1,008,857 shares outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14298>
Family Health System Inc said
The Federal Bankruptcy Court in Fort Worth, Texas has approved
its offer to purchase &lt;Sheppard Dental Centers Inc's> assets
from a Chapter 7 bankruptcy proceeding for about 300,000 dlrs.
    FHS administers and markets multiple office dental
practices in the Dallas metropolitan area as well as dental
offices in the Dallas Metroplex.
    The company said it plans to open 12 locations in Dallas by
the end of 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14315>
North-West Telecommunications Inc
said it acquired the assets and customer base of Com-Tel
Systems Inc, a telephone interconnect firm that operates in La
Crosse and Stevens Point, Wis. and Rochester, Minn.
    It said the purchase only includes the businesses in La
Crosse and Rochester.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14394>
Parsow Partnership Ltd, an Elkhorn,
Neb., investment partnership, said it bought a 5.1 pct stake in
Orange-Co Inc common stock as an investment.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Parsow said it had bought all its 220,000 Orange-Co shares in
the open market with funds from its working capital.
    The partnership, whose sole general partner is Elkhorn
investor Alan Parsow, said it "has no present intention of
effecting any change in the control of Orange-Co Inc."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14423>
Textron Inc said it plans to
sell its Avco Specialty Materials Division as part of its debt
reduction and restructuring.
    The company said it will use proceeds from the sale to
reduce the debt incurred by its acquisition of Ex-Cell-O Corp
last year.
    Textron said Morgan Stanley and Co will represent it in the
sale.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14485>
Avon Products Inc said it reached an
agreement in principle to purchase &lt;Giorgio Inc>, a fragrance
company, for 185 mln dlrs in cash.
    Giorgio's annual revnues are more than 100 mln dlrs, Avon
said. The acquisition has been approved by Avon's board, with
the closing set for May 7.
    The transaction would have no impact on Avon's current
dividend rate, it said.
    Giorgio's boutique in Beverly Hills, Calif., will be sold
back to Fred Hayman, one of the shareholders, who will continue
to operate it independently, Avon said.
    Avon said it identified Giorgio more than a year ago as a
preferred acquisition candidate. It said it is launching a
prestige fragrance developed in conjunction with Catherine
Deneuve this spring.
    Giorgio will be operated as a separate subsidiary, Avon
said, and would not compete with Avon's direct selling beauty
products business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14504>
GenCorp Inc said the decision by
General Partners, comprised of AFG Industries and Wagner and
Brown, to end its hostile offer for the company supports its
belief that the buy back offer it announced yesterday was a
"financially superior alternative."
    GenCorp said it would annouce details of its plans to buy
back 54 pct of its stock for 1.6 billion dlrs, or 130 dlrs a
share, later this week. GenCorp's buy back was made to fend off
the hostile 2.3 billion dlr, 100-dlr-a-share, tender offer by
AFG and Wagner and Brown.
    Earlier today AFG and Wagner and Brown said that without
the benefit of additional information available to GenCorp's
management, it cannot compete economically with GenCorp's
proposal.
    The group said it is ending its tender offer for GenCorp
and promptly return to tendering shareholders all shares
tendered pursuant to its offer.
    The group owns 9.8 pct, or 2,180,608 shares, of GenCorp's
outstanding shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14506>
Berry Petroleum Co said its board
and the Norris Oil Co board approved a merger agreement that
calls for Norris to become a wholly-owned Berry subsidiary.
    Berry, a privately-owned company which already owns 80.6
pct of Norris Oil's stock, said the agreement calls for Norris'
public shareholders to receive 0.0333 Berry common shares for
each Norris share held.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14542>
Cannon Group Inc said it agreed in
principle to sell its 50 pct interest in the HBO/Cannon Video
joint venture to the Home Box Office unit of Time Inc &lt;TL>.
    The company said it is making the sale because in the near
future all of its video products will be licensed in the United
States and Canada to either the Warner Brothers unit of Warner
Communications Inc &lt;WCI>, or to Media Home Entertainment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14563>
(Sportscene Restaurants Inc) said it
acquired (Cafe Christophe Van Houtte Inc), a cafe chain with
ten franchises and one corporate restaurant, for an unspecified
amount of cash and Sportscene shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14582>
Manufacturers Hanover Corp said its OFP
Inc unit acquired a Dallas office building through foreclosure.
    The company said it foreclosed on the Allied Bank Tower, a
1.2 mln-square-feet office building at One Fountain Place,
Dallas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14587>
Coca-Cola Bottling Co
Consolidated said it terminated negotiations with the proposed
purchaser of its wholly owned subsidiary headquartered in
Vancouver, B.C.
    The company said it is vigorously continuing its efforts to
sell its Canadian operations, substantially on the terms and
conditions previously announced.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14604>
CarePlus Inc said it will seek shareholder
approval of its proposed acquisition of certain assets and
assumption of certain liabilities of Professional Care Inc
&lt;PCI>.
    In connection with the acquisition, shareholders will be
requested to approval the merger of CarePlus into its newly
formed Delaware subsidiary, CarePlus said.
    CarePlus said its board has tentatively determined that its
stock would be exchanged for common stock of the new
corporation at the rate of seven for one.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14619>
An investor group including Bessemer
Securities Corp and Cilluffo Associates told the Securities and
Exchange Commission it asked federal antitrust regulators for
advance clearance to hold more than 30 mln dlrs of Intermedics
Inc common stock.
    The group said it currently holds 1.8 mln shares or 17.6
pct of the total outstanding following purchases of 84,300
shares March 18-April 1. A group spokesman would not disclose
the total purchase price of its current holdings.
    The group has said it is accumulating Intermedics stock for
investment purposes.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14623>
An investor group led by Dart
Container Corp, a Sarasota, Fla., plastic utensil maker, told
the Securities and Exchange Commission it raised its stake in
Texstyrene Corp to 420,500 common shares or 11.7 of the total
outstanding.
    The group said it bought the shares for investment and
intends to continue to buy Texstyrene stock in the future.
    The group said its most recent purchases included 106,000
shares bought March 10-31 in ordinary brokerage transactions.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14626>
Enro Holding Corp said it acquired Enro
Shirt Co and Foxcroft Ltd from Wilson Bros for 30 mln dlrs.
     Enro Holding is owned 50 pct by investors and 50 pct by
management and others. The investor group bought 50 pct of the
common equity and supplied five mln dlrs in mezzanine
financing. Management bought the other 50 pct. Congress
Financial Group supplied 28 mln dlrs in senior financing and
the seller took back a note for 12.1 mln dlrs.
    Enro Shirt has annual sales of about 42 mln dlrs and
Foxcroft has sales of about 13 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14679>
American Dynamics Corp and
&lt;Meridian Reserve Inc> said they signed a definitive agreement
under which Meridian will buy 81.9 mln shares, or 51 pct, of
American Dynamics' common stock.
    Under terms of the agreement, Santa Ana, Calif.-based
Meridian said it will pay Columbus-based American Dynamics one
mln dlrs in cash and notes over five years and about 500,000
shares of its common stock.
    Meridian said it has the option to issue an additional
1,500,000 shares of its common over the next two years in
payment of certain of the notes.
    Meridian, an oil and gas company whose operations are
primarily in Oklahoma, said the acquisition will increase its
its consolidated assets to 30 mln dlrs and its contractually
committed gas reserves to more than 40 mln dlrs at discounted
present value.
    American Dynamics is engaged in gas gathering, transmission
and liquids extraction, also in Oklahoma.
    The companies said they have five extracting plants and
about 525 miles of transmission lines in five adjoining
Oklahoma counties.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14715>
Amoskeag Bank Shares Inc and
&lt;Portsmouth Savings Bank> said they will file motions for a
rehearing with the New Hampshire Supreme Court of its March 30
ruling that overturned state regulatory approval of Amoskeag's
acquisition Portsmouth.
    "The ramifications of this decision, we believe, go well
beyond the affiliation of Amoskeag and Portsmouth Savings
Bank," said Amoskeag chairman William S. Bushnell.
    The transaction was opposed by a group of Portsmouth
investors who wanted the bank to remain independent, according
to press reports.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14736>
Allegheny International Inc, which has
agreed to a merge with a jointly-formed First Boston Inc
affiliate in a deal worth 500 mn dlrs, said shareholders of its
preferred stock have filed a class action complaint against the
company.
    The complaint alleges, among other things, that the company
and its board agreed to pay First Boston an illegal seven mln
dlr topping fee if it received a higher offer for the company
prior to the buyout.
    The suit contends that this fee hampers Allegheny's ability
to attract other offers or take other actions that would
benefit holders of preferred stock. The complaint also alleges
federal securities laws violations and breach of fiduciary
duty.
    The suit requests an injunction against proceeding with the
pending offer being made by Sunter Acquisition to acquire
Allegheny. Sunter Acquisition Corp and Sunter Holdings Corp
were formed by First Boston and Allegheny.
    Allegheny said it and the Sunter concerns intend to
vigorously defend the complaint's charges.
    The complaints were filed by Robert Moss and other parties
who are believed to own about 230,000 shares of Allegheny's
preferred stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2010>
Five consortia have applied to buy the
French state-owned telephone equipment manufacturer &lt;Cie
Generale de Constructions Telephoniques (CGCT)>, which will
give the owners control of 16 pct of the French telephone
switching market, sources close to Finance Minister Edouard
Balladur said.
    The French government has given itself until the end of
April to decide which applicant will be accepted, they added.
    While several foreign groups have said they want to gain a
foothold in the French market, their potential stake in CGCT is
limited to 20 pct under privatisation laws passed last year,
with 80 pct to be left in French hands.
    The Finance Ministry sources gave no details of the groups
interested in CGCT, but several have publicly announced their
candidacies.
    U.S. Telecommunications giant American Telephone and
Telegraph Co &lt;T.N> which has been at the centre of the two-year
battle for CGCT, has teamed up with the Dutch-based &lt;Philips
Telecommunications Industrie B.V.>, a subsidiary of NV Philips
Gloeilampenfabriek &lt;PGLO.AS> and &lt;Societe Anonyme de
Telecommunications> (SAT) to present a joint bid, in
association with holding company Cie du Midi SA &lt;MCDP.P> and
five French investment funds.
    A second bid has come from the West German electronics
group Siemens AG &lt;SIEG.F>, which hopes to take a 20 pct stake
in CGCT, with the French telecommunications &lt;Jeumont-Schneider>
taking the remaining 80 pct.
    Sweden's &lt;AB LM Ericsson> has also submitted a bid for the
maximum 20 pct permitted, in association with French defence
electronics group &lt;Matra>, which would hold between 40 and 49
pct, and construction group &lt;Bouygues>.
    Matra has already acquired CGCT's private telephone
business.
REUTER...
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2013>
The &lt;Sterling Grace Capital Management
L.P.> group said it is confident financing can be arranged if
The Japan Fund's board recommend's the group's acquisition
proposal.
    The group, which also includes &lt;Anglo American Security
Fund L.P.> and T.B. Pickens III, Tuesday proposed an entity it
controls acquire for cash all the assets of Japan Fund for 95
pct of the fund's aggregate net asset value.
    The group said it has had a number of meetings over the
past few days with domestic and overseas financial institutions.
    The Sterling Grace Capital group said certain of these
institutions have expressed serious interest in providing
financing for the proposed acquisition of Japan Fund, "adding
we are reasonably confident that the financing can be quickly
arranged if the Japan Fund's board of directors is willing to
recommend the transaction to shareholders."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2024>
E.F. Hutton Group Inc said it has
started its previously announced offer to purchase up to
6,332,471 common shares of Purolator Courier Corp at 35 dlrs
each.
    In a newspaper advertisement, the company said the offer,
proration period and withdrfawal rights will expire April One
unless extended.  The offer is conditioned on receipt of at
least 5,116,892 Purolator shares, or a 66.7 pct interest, and
is the first step in a merger agreement that has been approved
by the Purolator board.
    Hutton said it reserves the right to buy more than
6,332,471 shares but has no present intention of doing so.  It
said it may waive the condition that at least 5,116,892 shares
be tendered as long as it received at least a 50.1 pct
interest.  If it were to receive fewer shares than that, it
said it would only purchase sharesd with the consent of
Purolator.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2027>
Orange-Co Inc said its
largest shareholder, &lt;Summit Resoureces Inc>, has increased its
stake to 15 pct from 14 pct and now owns 644,727 shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2039>
Trimedyne Inc said it will
distribute one Class B common share of &lt;Automedix Sciences Inc>
for each four Trimedyne shares held of record on March Nine.
    The company said in the spinoff it is distributing its
entire 44 pct interesdt in Automedix.  The spun-off stock will
not be saleable for 13 months, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2054>
Mannesmann AG &lt;MMWG.F>, the
diversified engineering and pipe-making group, is interested in
taking a stake in a U.S. Company or companies but has not yet
found a suitable firm, a spokesman said in reply to questions.
    Mannesmann managing board chairman Werner Dieter told the
business weekly Wirtschaftswoche in an interview that
Mannesmann wanted to invest in a U.S. Company in order to
strengthen its presence on the U.S. Market.
    Dieter said Mannesmann would act quickly when and if it
found a firm in which it wanted to take a stake.
    The Mannesmann spokesman declined to say in which
industrial sector the group may make a U.S. Acquisition or how
big the acquisition might be.
    He also said the group had not yet completed taking over a
stake in car components firm &lt;Fichtel und Sachs AG>.
    Mannesmann had said in January it hoped to take a 37.5 pct
stake in Fichtel und Sachs's holding company, Sachs AG, in the
first quarter. The spokesman said Mannesmann had a letter of
intent on the takeover from the heirs of the company's late
owner but completion has been delayed by legal questions
concerning the inheritance.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2080>
Comdata Network Inc said
it has entered into a letter of intent with a limited
partnership managed by Welsh, Carson, Anderson and Stowe (WCAS)
to merge Comdata into a corproration to be formed by WCAS.
    Comdata said in the merger each share of the company's
stock would be converted at the holders election into either 15
dlrs in cash or a combination of 10 dlrs in cash and a unit of
securities including common stock.
    Comdata said the terms are subject to the condition that
WCAS' affiliate investors would own a minimum of 60 pct of the
fully diluted stock of the new entity.
    Comdata said WCAS and its affiliate investors would commit
50 mln dlrs to buy the securities comprising the new entities
units of securities resulting from the merger in the same
proportions and at the same price as the company shareholders.
    Comdata said the move is subject to execution of definitive
agreement and approval by Comdata shareholders as well as
obtaining up to 200 mln dlrs in debt financing.
    WCAS told Comdata it believes that it can get commitments
for this financing.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2097>
BankAmerica Corp said it agreed to
sell &lt;Bankhaus Centrale Credit AG>, its German consumer banking
subsidiary, and German credit card operations to &lt;Banco de
Santander> of Spain.
    Terms were not disclosed. The deal is expected to close in
the second quarter, the bank holding company said.
    Bankhaus Centrale Credit, with 31 branches, had total
assets of 927 mln marks at year-end 1986. The credit card
operation services 115,000 Visa card holders and 35,000
merchants in Germany, it said.
    Reached later, a BankAmerica spokesman said the company
would record a pretax gain of 45 mln dlrs from the
transactions.
    The spokesman declined, however, to disclose the price paid
for the operations by Banco de Santander or other terms of the
deal.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2102>
Ryder System Inc said it has acquired
Caledonian Airmotive Ltd from &lt;British Caledonian Group PLC>
for undisclosed terms.
    Caledonian Airmotive repairs and rebuilds aircraft engines.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2107>
Swedish tyres, process equipment and
components firm &lt;Trelleborg AB> said it was taking a larger
stake in mining and metals concern Boliden AB &lt;BLDS.ST> than it
had originally intended.
    Trelleborg had previously announced it was exercising an
option to acquire up to 65 pct of Boliden's voting rights.
    In a statement, the company said they had received offers
of up to 68 pct of the rights, and that they would accept all.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2114>
General Refractories Co said it
agreed to sell its European refractories and building products
operations for about 62 mln dlrs to an Austrian investor group.
    The European operations had sales of 186 mln dlrs in 1985,
the last year for which results have been released, the company
said.
    The sale, to a group headed by Girozentrale Bank of
Austria, is subject to shareholder approval by April 24, 1987,
it said. Its board has approved the deal, it said.
    General Refractories' mineral operations are not affected.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2118>
Securities and Exchange Commission
chairman John Shad said progress was being made in stopping
insider trading, but the chairman of a House subcommittee with
jurisdiction over securities laws said he was concerned about
conditions on Wall Street.
    "Greed has created a feeding frenzy on Wall Street and in
the process laws are broken and multi-billion dlr corporations
have become easy prey," Rep. Edward Markey, D-Mass, the
chairman of the Telecommunications and Finance said at the
start of a hearing on SEC activities.
    "Congress is understandably nervous. We perceive the
current scandals as a warning of even worse things to come,"
Markey said. "The frenzy and disruption created by merger mania
is particularly distressing."
    Shad said the recent cases involving Ivan Boesky, Dennis
Levine and others was a warning that those who engage in
insider trading were taking a heavy risk of imprisonment, high
fines and disbarment from the securities industry.
    "Insider trading has not been eradicated, but it has been
inhibited and multimillions of dollars of profits that Boesky
and others have been siphoning off the markets are now flowing
through to legitimate investors and traders," Shad said in his
statement.
    Shad said insider trading cases involved only 10 pct or
less of SEC enforcement actions in recent years but they have
increased significantly to 125 cases brought during the past
five years compared to 77 cases in the preceeding 47 years.
    Markey said he did not favor banning takeovers but thought
the tender offer process needed reform including earlier
disclosure of takeover attempts.
    N.J. Rep. Mathew Rinaldo, the senior subcommittee
Republican, said he was introducing legislation to create a
five member commission to study the securities industry for a
year and report its findings and recommendations to Congress.
Commission members would be appointed by the SEC.
    "Its primary mission would be to analyze the extent of
illegal trading on insider trading and to assess the adequacy
of existing surveillance systems and government oversight
operations. The commission would advise Congress as to what
additional resources or civil or criminal remedies are needed
to combat fraud and improve compliance with federal laws,"
Rinaldo said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2126>
Perkin-Elmer Corp said it
acquired &lt;Atomika Technische Physik>, based in Munich, West
Germany, a high technology concern specializing in surface
science instruments.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed.
    It said Atomika will became a part of its Physical
Electronics Division, based in Eden Prairie, Minn., The
division is part of its Materials Surface Technology Group.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2128>
The U.S. Department of Transportation
said it gave final approval to USAir Group's proposed 400 mln
dlr acquisition of Pacific Southwest Airlines.
    The department said the acquisition is not likely to
substantially lessen competition and would not harm the public
interest.
    The department had given its tentative approval of the
acquisition in January.
    The department said it decided to make final its tentative
decision after reviewing the public response to it.
    The agency said it rejected an assertion by Air North
America, which currently is not operating but plans to start
service to some of the cities served by USAIR and PSA, that the
acquisition would lessen chances of new entry into those
markets by other carriers.
    The agency said Air North America provided no support for
its claim that the transaction would give the two carriers
monopoly power in some markets.
    The transportation agency said Air North America also
failed to show that there are barriers that would prevent new
entrants into those markets or prevent other carriers from
increasing their service.
    The agency noted in its final order that PSA operates
exclusively in the West and Mexico while USAir serves the West
for the most part with some long-haul flights from the East and
Midwest.
    The two carriers serve five point in common; Los Angeles,
San Diego, San Francico, Phoenix and Tucsonm, the agency said.
     The transportation department also rejected a request by
the Teamsters Union, which represents some PSA workers, to
require protections for PSA workers.
    The agency noted that USAir has promised to give protective
benefits to PSA workers and that unions representing PSA
workers have collective bargaining agreements that provide such
protections.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2151>
Triumph Capital Inc said it has signed a
letter of intent to acquire First Securities Transfer Systems
Inc of Pompano Beach, Fla., for undisclosed terms.
    The company said it is also entering the commercial finance
business through the formation of Triumph Financial corp.
    It said the new wholly-owned unit has extended a 350,000
dlr secured line of credit to Micro Designs Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2159>
Bell Petroleum Services Inc said
Regal International Inc has doubled its offer for Bell stock to
one Regal share for each Bell share from half a share
previously.
    The company said it is seriously considering the new offer
but has also received an expression of interest for a possible
merger into a Fortune 500 company it did not identify that will
be investigated at meetings to be held later this week.
    It said it will explore all possibilities before
recommending a final course of action.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2193>
Corning Glass Works' subsidiary
Corning International Corp said it agreed to transfer 55 pct of
its capital stock of an Argentine glass manufacturer to a
European group.
    It said it will transfer the capital stock of Rigolleau,
S.A., to the group controlled by Camillo Gancia, an Argentine
industrialist.
    The company said the transaction would reduce Corning's
ownership in Rigolleau to approximately 20 pct. The company
said the change will not impact on its net income for th year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2195>
The National Farmers Union, NFU, remains
concerned about the future ownership of British Sugar despite
last week's decision by the government to block bids from
Italy's Gruppo Ferruzzi and Britain's Tate &amp; Lyle Plc.
    The union's sugar beet committee met yesterday to consider
the implications of a government Monopolies and Merger
Commission, MMC, report issued last week. "We are still
concerned about S and W Berisford being long-term owners of
British Sugar," a spokesman said. "We do not view Berisford as
providing the long-term stability we want."
    The Trade and Industry Secretary accepted a recommendation
last week by the MMC that it block a bid by Tate and Lyle for S
and W Berisford Plc and stop Gruppo Ferruzzi buying a majority
of British Sugar, owned by Berisford.
    Union officials believe a new bid for the monopoly beet
processor is now likely. "We are looking again at the
undertakings that we have demanded of existing bidders and
which we would seek of any future bidders," the spokesman said.
The NFU, which represents Britain's 11,500 sugar beet growers,
is also taking legal advice on particular paragraphs in the MMC
report which it says need further explanation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2202>
&lt;Banco Santander> signed a letter of
intent with Bank of America &lt;BAC> to purchase its West German
affiliate &lt;Bankhaus Centrale Credit AG>, CC-Bank, the bank said
in a statement amplifying an earlier report from Frankfurt.
    "The incorporation of CC-Bank in our group will provide a
major boost...For chanelling investment between Spain and the
European Community," the statement said.
    "This operation enables us to take up a solid position in
West Germany ahead of Spain's full integration into the EC's
financial system in five years' time."
    The deal included the license for Visa credit cards.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2219>
Michael Landes, a major stockholder
in Unitel Video Inc, said he has asked the company to consider
liquidating, or selling some or all of its assets.
    "Mr. Landes has requested the company to implement a
program to maximize shareholder values, which might include a
sale of all or part of the company or a liquidation," he said
in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
    Landes and another Unitel Video investor, Albert Schwatz,
have formed a shareholder group and together hold 329,225
common shares, or 15.2 pct of the total outstanding common
stock.
    Landes and Schwartz had reached an agreement in principle
with the New York video tape service company on a 12.50 dlr a
share takeover proposal last September, but subsequent merger
talks broke down in October.
    The investors told the SEC they are continuing to review
their positions company and may acquire more shares or sell
some or all of their current stake.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2224>
Halcyon Investments, a New York
investment partnership that deals mainly in risk arbitrage and
stock trading, said it raised its Purolator Courier Corp stake
to 726,700 shares, or 9.5 pct, from 474,900, or 6.2 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Halcyon, whose managing partner is Alan B. Slifka and Co, said
it bought 201,800 Purolator common shares between Feb 3 and
March 2 at prices ranging from 28.689 to 34.811 dlrs each.
    Halcyon, which said it has spent 20.1 mln dlrs for its
Purolator common shares, said it also acquired options on Feb
27 giving it the right to buy 50,000 shares for 1.8 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2225>
Aetna Life and Casualty Co said
its Aetna Life and Casualty of Canada Ltd subsidiary has agreed
in prnciple to sell its casualty-property subsidiary, Aetna
Casualty Co of Canada to &lt;Laurentian Group> of Montreal for
undisclosed terms.
    The company said the agreement is subject to Canadian
government approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2237>
Amoskeag Bank said it signed an
agreement to acquire &lt;Entrepo Financial Resources Inc>, a
Philadelphia-based company which leases and remarkets high
technology equipment.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed.
    It said Entrepo has assets of 20 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2240>
Community Bank Systems Inc and
the &lt;Nichols National Bank> said they have signed a definitive
agreement for Nichols to become a member of the CBSI Group of
banks for an exchange of stock worth 2.8 mln dlrs.
    CBSI said it expects to complete the deal, pending Nichols'
shareholder and regulatory approval, later this year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2247>
Securities and Exchange Commission
Chairman John Shad said the SEC favors shortening the current
10-day period for disclosing takeover attempts but opposes
putting restrictions on the use of so-called junk bonds.
    "We favor shortening the disclosure period to two days,"
Shad told members of the House Telecommunications and Finance
subcommittee when asked for his recommendation.
    He said the SEC's responsibility was to provide full
disclosure for securities, including junk bonds, and not to
make decisions based on merit. He said junk bonds had some
value because of their liquidity.
    Shad said he opposes proposals to require those attempting
takeovers to file a statement on the impact the takeover would
have on the communities involved.
    "We've opposed it in the past. It goes far beyond investor
protection," Shad said.
    He said he had no comment on a proposal by House Speaker
Jim Wright, D- Texas, to tax securities transactions.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2251>
Hughes Tool Co Chairman W.A. Kistler
said its counter proposal to merge with Baker International
Corp was still under consideration and that a merger was in the
best interests of both companies.
    "Our hope is that we can come to a mutual agreement that is
good for both companies," Kistler said of the proposed merger
that would result in a 1.2 billion dlr oil field service
company. "We're working very hard on this merger."
    Hughes' board today again adjourned a shareholders meeting
to vote on the proposed merger and rescheduled it for March 11
to give Baker more time to consider the counter proposal.
    The Hughes board, which had previously expressed concern
about a U.S. Department of Justice consent decree that would
require Baker to sell its drilling bit operations and
submersible pump business, met yesterday and threatened to
terminate the proposed merger.
    The Hughes board made a counter proposal that the two
companies first find acceptable buyers for the businesses
before signing the decree.
    The directors of Baker immediately after receiving the
counter proposal filed a law suit in Texas in a Texas state
court to force to Hughes to complete the merger.
    "The uncertainty as to the price and conditions that might
be imposed by the Department of Justice makes us very nervous
about what the outcome might be," Kistler said, in explaining
why Hughes had made the counter proposal.
    "We need additional time to understand why Baker did not
accept our proposal."
    Kistler also said that the law suit filed by Baker "was not
a factor" in the board's decision to keep its merger proposal
on the table.
    He declined to comment on the allegations in the lawsuit.
    Kistler said Hughes would be willing to consider a
compromise counter proposal, but declined to be more specific.
    The Justice Department in January said it would block the
Hughes and Baker merger on anti-trust grounds unless both
companies agreed to sign a consent decree that would provide
for the sale of the assets after the merger took place.
    The Hughes board said it would not sign the decree because
its was too "unreasonable." Hughes said that Baker should
instead complete the sale of the disputed assets before the
merger is finalized and given government approval.
    Under the decree, if Baker is unable to find acceptable
buyers within a specified period of time after the decree is
approved, a federal trustee would become responsible for
finding a buyer.
    Kistler said that under those terms, the trustee could take
up to 10 years to complete the sales.
    He also expressed concern that the combined companies might
be required by the government's conditions to license some of
its technology to any purchaser of the assets.
    Baker said last night in a statement that the required
assets to be sold would reduce revenues by about 65 mln dlrs,
representing about three pct of the revenues of the combined
companies.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2257>
The French government is to
sell to the public its 47.42 pct direct holding in Societe
Generale &lt;STGN.PA>'s regional bank subsidiary &lt;Societe Generale
Alsacienne de Banque>, SOGENAL, from next Monday, SOGENAL
officials said.
    SOGENAL, founded in 1881 and nationalised in 1982, is the
leading French regional bank and has branches in Austria,
Belgium, Luxembourg, East and West Germany and Switzerland.
    Chairman Rene Geronimus told a news conference the share
offer price, expected to be announced tomorrow by Finance
Minister Edouard Balladur, would be between 110 and 130 francs.
    Societe Generale, which will itself be privatised later
this year, will retain its 52.58 pct majority holding in the
bank, Chairman Marc Vienot said.
    SOGENAL officials said they forecast 1987 consolidated
group profit of around 170 mln francs after an estimated 160
mln this year and 159 mln in 1985.
    SOGENAL's privatisation will be preceded by a capital
increase to 320 mln francs from 263 mln, earning about 250 mln
francs in new funds. Its shares will be divided by eight,
giving a capital of 12.8 mln shares of 25 francs nominal.
    The bank will be listed on the Nancy stock exchange, in
line with the Finance Ministry and government's aim of a
regional operation, Geronimus said.
    He said he was hoping for shareholders to total around
30,000 to 35,000 against the 12,500 before nationalisation. Ten
pct of the capital to be floated will be reserved for employees
with the rest offered to the public. There will not be a share
reserved for foreign investors. "This is too small an operation
and anyway they will be able to buy shares in France," he said.
    Stockbroker sources said that a likely share offer price of
120 francs would value SOGENAL at 1.5 billion francs.
    Geronimus said the bank's future aim would be to reinforce
its existing strong points, with no major projects planned
apart from the opening soon of a Basle branch.
    SOGENAL is the only French bank in Austria, it set up the
first foreign exchange dealing room outside Paris at its
Strasbourg headquarters in 1985, and is the only foreign
banking subsidiary to be a broker on the Zurich Bourse.
    The government's banking adviser for the operation was
&lt;Banque Privee de Gestion Financiere>, BPGF, owned by French
financier Pierre Moussa's &lt;Pallas> group, assisted by Britain's
&lt;Hambros Bank Ltd>.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2268>
Wilshire Oil Co of Texas, which has a
9.8 pct stake in Jacobs Engineering Group Inc, said its
chairman, Siggi Wilzig, was appointed to the Jabobs board.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Wilshire, which holds 417,100 Jacobs common shares, said Wilzig
was appointed to the Jacobs board of directors on March 3 after
the company's annual shareholder meeting.
    Wilshire also said that Jacobs Chairman Joseph Jacobs has
agreed to recommend a second Wilshire nominee for election to
the board if the person was found to be qualified.
 
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2271>
Eastman Kodak Co said it has
acquired an 18.7 pct equity interest in Enzon Inc, a
pharmaceutical company specializing in protein therapy.
    Kodak said it secured worldwide marketing rights for three
of Enzon's PEG enzymes used in the treatment of oxygen toxicity
disorders, hyperuricemia and gout.
    The company said it acquired two mln Enzon shares for 15
mln dlrs, with loans to Enzon of two mln dlrs and interest of
30,000 dlrs credited against the purchase price.
    Kodak said the drugs covered by the marketing rights are in
initial stages of the U.S. Food and Drug Administration
approval process.  It said the investment should provide the
necessary capital to complete the FDA review process and
provide a marketing outlet for the drugs.
    The drugs are PEG-superoxide disdmutase and PEG-catalase,
for use against oxygen toxicity disorders that cause the
often-fatal tissue damage associated with severe burns, organ
transplants, heart attacks and trauma, and PEG-uricase, for
treatment of gout and other conditions caused by the buildup of
high levels of uric acid in the body.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2281>
Harris Associates L.P., a Chicago
investment advisory partnership, said it lowered its stake in
Triad Systems Corp to 1,355,296 shares, or 17.9 pct of the
total outstanding, from 1,463,962 shares, or 19.3 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Harris said it sold a net 108,666 Triad common shares between
Dec 16 and Feb 23 at prices ranging from 10.00 to 14.25 dlrs a
share.
    It said its dealings in Triad common stock were done on
behalf of its advisory client.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2291>
IDEA Inc said it signed a
letter of intent to buy privately-held Structural
Instrumentation Inc.
    The purchase, for an undisclosed sum, will be made mostly
with IDEA common stock, the company said.
    IDEA said the purchase will add about 32 cts per share to
its fiscal 1988 earnings.
    IDEA reported earnings of four cts per share for the
quarter ended October 31, 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2297>
Ducommun Inc said it sold its
Airdrome Parts Co division to a group of investors headed by
Airdrome's management for a cash price of 12 mln dlrs.
    Ducommun said the sale, coupled with its sale last month of
Metermaster, were steps taken to improve the company's balance
sheet and that no further sales are being contemplated.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2301>
Texon Energy Corp said it has entered
into a preliminary agreement to purchase an 80 pct interest in
a privately-held specialty plastics manufacturing company it
did not name.
    Texon said completion of the acquisition is subject to the
consent of banks and third parties and the acquisition would be
made for promissory notes and common stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2322>
Unicorp American Corp said it has
signed a definitive agreement for the previously-announced
acquisition of Lincoln Savings Bank.
    The company said the transaction is still subject to
regulatory approvals.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2323>
First Eastern Corp said it has
completed the acquisition of Peoples Bank of Nanticoke, Pa., in
an exchange of 11 First Eastern shares for each Peoples share.
    Peoples has assets of about 24 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2325>
Bishop Graphics Inc
said it completed the sale of its Newport Beach Art Supply
Center to Standard Brands Paint Co's &lt;SBP> Art Store unit.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Bishop also said it has opened a new sales and service
office in Irvine, Calif.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2344>
Stanley Works said it has acquired Acme
Holding corp, a maker of sliding and folding door hardware, and
the designs, patents and other righs of Plan-A-Flex Designer
Co, which provides kits for home design and remodeling
projects.
    It said Acme had 1986 sales of over 50 mln dlrs.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2365>
First Union Corp said it has
agreed to acquire First State Bancshares Inc of Pensacola,
Fla.,  and its First State Bank of Pensacola subsidiary for
about 457,000 common shares.
    First State has assets of about 110 mln dlrs.  The
acquisition, expected to be treated as a pooling of interests,
is expected to be completed in the third quarter of 1987
subject to approval by regulatory agencies and First State
shareholders.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2374>
The 20 pct stake in Moulinex SA &lt;MOUP.PA>
sold by &lt;Scovill Inc> of the U.S. Was spread among at least 50
institutional investors worldwide, a spokesman for brokers
James Capel said. Capel handled the deal.
    The buyers were based in centers ranging from Europe to
North America and Japan, he added.
    Moulinex's capital is split among Jean Mantelet, president
of the company, with 42 pct, along with private investors
holding 38 pct and the 20 pct which has just been sold, company
sources said earlier in Paris.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2375>
Carl Icahn's bold takeover bid for
USAir Group &lt;U> has clouded the fate of Piedmont Aviation Inc,
which was being courted by USAir.
    Yesterday, Icahn's Transworld Airlines Inc &lt;TWA> made a 1.4
billion dlr offer for USAir Group. The move complicated a USAir
takeover offer for Piedmont, which was believed to be close to
accepting the bid.
    Today, USAir rejected Icahn's 52 dlr per share offer and
said the bid was a last-minute effort to interfere in its
takeover of Piedmont. Icahn was unavailable for comment.
    Piedmont fell one to 68-5/8 on volume of 963,000. TWA was
off 3/8 to 31-1/2. USAir fell 1-3/8 to 47-3/4 as doubt spread
it would be taken over.
    Analysts and market sources view the TWA bid as an attempt
to either trigger a counter offer from USAir or to attract a
suitor who might want both airlines once they merged.
   "The next move is either Icahn starts a tender offer or
Piedmont and USAir announce a deal," speculated one arbitrager.
    Some arbitragers said there is now some risk in the current
price of Piedmont since it is not clear that USAir's bid will
succeed.
    Piedmont's largest shareholder and other suitor, Norfolk
Southern Corp &lt;NSC> has offered 65 dlrs per share for the
company. USAir offered 71 dlrs cash per share for half of
Piedmont stock, and 73 dlrs per share in stock for the balance.
    Some arbitragers, however, believe the depressed price of
Piedmont offers a buying opportunity since the airline is
destined to be acquired by someone. USAir, they said, is the
least likely to be bought.
    Icahn, who has long talked about further consolidation in
the airline industry, also offered USAir the alternative of a
three-way airline combination, including TWA and Piedmont.
    But Wall Street has given little credibility to Icahn's
offer, which lacked financing and was riddled with
contingencies.
    Still, he has succeeded in holding up a merger of two
airlines - both of which analysts said would fit well with TWA.
    "You can't discount him," said one arbitrager.
    Analysts, however, said Icahn would have to prove he is
serious by following through with his threats or making a new
offer. In making the offer for USAir, Icahn threatened to go
directly to shareholders for 51 pct of the stock at a lower
price if USAir rejected his offer.
    "It's clear Icahn wants to sell and he's bluffing," said
one arbitrager.
    Analysts said the 52 dlr per share offer was underpriced by
about six dlrs per share.
    Some analysts believe Icahn's proposed three-way airline
combination might face insurmountable regulatory hurdles, but
others believe it could be cleared if the companies are
acquired separately.
    "TWA would have to be the surviving company for the deal to
work," said one analyst.
    Analysts said such a merger would be costly and
complicated. TWA has the best cost structure, since Icahn
succeeded in winning concessions from its unions.
    In order for the other carriers to come down to TWA's wage
scale in a merger, TWA would have to be the surviving entity,
analysts said.
    Such a move does not necessarily free Icahn of TWA, they
said. They said he showed skill in reducing Ozark Airlines'
costs when he merged it into TWA last year, and he might be a
necessary ingredient for a merger to work.
    However, other analysts speculated the managements of
Piedmont and USAir would not tolerate Icahn as head of a new
company. They said a USAir acquisition of TWA might be a way
for him to exit the company if USAir's airline is then merged
into TWA.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2376>
Baker International Corp treasurer Eric
Mattson said the company hoped to iron out snags in a proposed
merger with Hughes Tool Co &lt;HT> but declined to say if or what
compromises might be acceptable to it.
    The proposed merger that would create a 1.2 billion dlr
oilfield services company was thrown into limbo yesterday when
Hughes management, balking at the terms of a government consent
decree, offered a counter-proposal to Baker.
    Earlier today, Hughes adjourned a shareholders meeting
called to vote on the proposed merger until March 11 and said
it hoped to resume negotitations with Baker.
    Hughes chairman W.A. Kistler told reporters that Hughes did
not want to sign the Department of Justice consent decree until
after Baker's submersible pump and drilling bit operations were
sold.
    Mattson told Reuters that Baker still believed a merger was
possible between the two giant oilfield service companies.
    "The company's position is we would like to see the merger
be completed, which is in the best interests of our
shareholders and their shareholders," Mattson said.
    "Our goal is for a merger to occur. Because of the
litigation, I can't go any further than that," he said.
    Baker filed a lawsuit in Texas state court late yesterday
to force Hughes to abide by terms of the proposed consent
decree.
    Mattson also declined to comment on whether the directors
of Baker and Hughes have scheduled any meetings to discuss the
merger.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2410>
Pitt-Des Moines Inc said it will
acquire &lt;Chicago Steel Corp> in exchange for a portion of its
stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2419>
Rexcom Systems Corp said it agreed to
buy all the assets of Postech Inc from Comtech Group
International Ltd, a Canadian computer service company, for 70
pct of Rexcom's voting shares.
    The purchase will be for Rexcom common and preferred stock.
    Postech, the Canadian firm's U.S. marketing arm, sells
computerized restaurant management systems and security systems
in the U.S.
    The deal is subject to approval by the boards of Postech
and Rexcom.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2434>
Lone Star Industries Inc said
it has agreed to acquire ready-mixed concrete and aggregates
businesses from &lt;Riedel International Inc> of Portland, Ore.,
for an undisclosed amount of cash.
    Lone Star's one sentence statement gave no further details
and company spokesmen were not available.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2447>
Financial Corporation of
America's American Savings and Loan Association unit said it
signed a definitive agreement to buy three retail savings
branches from Gibraltar Financial Corp's &lt;GFC> Gibraltar
Savings unit.
    The purchase, which must be approved by the Federal Home
Loan Bank and the California Department of Savings and Loans,
would increase American Savings' deposits by about 40 mln dlrs.
    The branches are in La Jolla, La Mesa and San Juan
Capistrano, Calif.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2462>
Unicorp American Corp said it signed a
definitive agreement to acquire Lincoln Savings Bank FSB.
    Under terms of the agreement announced in January, Lincoln
would be acquired by a unit of Unicorp which is minority-owned
by Lincoln president Alton Marshall.
    The acquisition will take place through a voluntary 
conversion of Lincoln to a federally chartered stock savings
bank from a mutual federal savings bank.
    In connection with the conversion, Unicorp will contribute
150 mln dlrs in cash to Lincoln.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2470>
Humana Inc said its board
approved a shareholder rights plan, or so-called poison pill
plan, to ensure its shareholders receive fair treatment in the
event of a proposed takeover.
    Humana said it is now aware of any effort to gain control
of the company.
    Under the plan its board declared a dividend distribution
of one right for each outstanding common share held as of March
16. It said each right entitles holders to purchase a unit of
1/100 of a share of newly authorizes series A participating
preferred at 75 dlrs per unit.
    Humana said the rights become effective after an entity
acquires 20 pct or more of its outstanding common or tenders
for 30 pct of its stock. After such an acquisition, then each
right entitles holders to purchase securities of the company or
an acquiring entity having a market value of twice the right's
exercise price.
    Humana said the rights expire March 4, 1997, unless
redeemed earlier. It said the rights may be redeemed by the
company for one ct per right at any time prior to 10 days
following a public announcement that a 20 pct position has been
acquired.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2474>
Great Western Financial
Corp's subsidiary Great Western Bank said it will purchase
three retail banking branches in south Florida with total
deposits of 90 mln dlrs.
    Great Western said it will purchase branches in Deerfield
Beach and Hollywood with approximately 80 mln dlrs in deposits
from Guardian Savings and Loan Association, and one in Palm
Beach with approximately 10 mln in deposits from Goldome
Savings Bank.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2475>
A one billion dlr lawsuit pushed
Hughes Tool Co into an about-face on its rejection of a
proposed merger with Baker International Corp &lt;BKO>, Wall
Street analysts said.
    Last night, Hughes said the planned merger with Baker was
off. Baker then filed a suit seeking punitive damages from
Hughes for calling off the merger. At midday today Hughes said
it was still interested in the merger.
    The analysts also said Hughes may be worried that its
troubles could make it a takeover candidate.
    There was speculation today that Harold Simmons, the Dallas
investor, might try to acquire Hughes, but Simmons told Reuters
he is not interested.
    Simmons said he intends to file a 13-D with the Securities
and Exchange Monday reporting a stake of five pct or more in
some publicly traded company. He declined to identify the
target other than to rule out Hughes.
    One analyst said another factor in the latest Hughes
turnabout was Borg-Warner Corp &lt;BOR>, which owns 18.5 pct of
Hughes. Borg-Warner ex-chairman J.F. Bere, who serves on the
Hughes board, is believed to favor the merger with Baker.
    Despite the Hughes statement that it is interested in a
merger, and Baker's response that a merger is still possibile,
analysts said no one could be certain where the situation was
going.
    "I think the merger is not going through," said Phil Pace,
analyst at Kidder, Peabody and Co. He said the merger "lost a
lot of its appeal" when the U.S. Department of Justice required
that Baker sell off its Reed Tool Co operation.
    Although the Reed operation is relatively small in view of
the total size of a combined Baker-Hughes, Pace said "30 to 40
pct of the cost savings are tied up in that."
    "They (Hughes) are obviously concerned about the lawsuit,"
said James Crandell, analyst at Salomon Brothers Inc.
"Apparently they are willing to continue discussions but
whether they will alter their position, I don't know.
    "It's getting a little confusing," said James Carroll,
analyst at PaineWebber Group Inc. He said the arguments cited
by Hughes yesterday for not doing the merger "tend to be weak."
Hughes said yesterday that as a condition of the merger it
wanted Reed Tool and other businesses sold prior to April 22,
the projected merger date. A government decree allowed a longer
period of time.
    Hughes contended it was better to formally combine the
companies with the status of Reed already settled. Baker
apparently sees no reason to speed up the sale.
    Carroll said Baker had previously estimated 110 to 130 mln
dlrs in savings if the companies were combined without selling
Reed. But he said Baker now thinks 75 to 85 mln dlrs will be
saved while Hughes sees a saving of only 50 to 60 mln dlrs.
    Carroll also noted that since the merger accord was first
signed "the outlook for the industry has improved materially."
Hughes may simply feel the pressure on the oil service industry
is lifting.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2476>
Armtek Corp, formerly known as
Armstrong Rubber Co, said it signed agreements with &lt;Condere
Corp> for the sale of its Natchez, Miss. tire plant and its S
and A Truck Tire Sales and Services Corp.
    Terms were not disclosed. Armtek spokesman John Sievers
said S and A is a 50 mln dlr business.
    Earlier this week, Armtek announced the sale of its
industrial tire and assembly business division to Dyneer Corp
of Scotsdale, Ariz.
    Cash proceeds from both sales will be used to reduce
outstanding debt.
     Under a long term supply agreement with Condere, it is
anticipated that truck tires produced at the Natchez plant will
be supplied to the Armstrong Tire Co, an Armtek operating
company, the company said.
    The closing is scheduled to be concluded by March 31, it
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2491>
Alpha Health Systems Corp, a
wholly-owned subsidiary of Pesch and Co, said it submitted a
merger proposal to the board of REPH Acquisition Co, the parent
company of Republic Health Corp, which is 64 pct owned by Pesch
interests.
    The balance of REPH's common stock is owned by members of
Republic management, McDonnell Douglas Corp &lt;MD>, Donaldson,
Lufkin and Jenrette and Pacific Asset Holdings L.P.
    Republic currently owns 44 hospitals and manages 46 other
facilities, in 25 states.
    Details of the proposal were not disclosed.  Company
representatives were not immediately available.
    The proposal provides that REPH would become a wholly-owned
subsidiary of Alpha and that the existing REPH common
stockholders would become stockholders of Alpha, it said.
    REPH's board has appointed a special committee to negotiate
terms of the proposed merger, Pesch said.
    Last year, Republic was acquired by REPH in a leveraged
buyout transaction led by Dr. LeRoy Pesch, the principal
shareholder of Pesch and Co.
    Alpha recently submitted a second offer to acquire the
stock of American Medical International Inc (AMI) at 22 dlrs a
share in cash and securities, which is still being considered
by American Medical's board, Pesch said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2500>
ChemLawn Corp said its board
rejected Waste Management Inc's 27 dlr-per-share tender offer
and urged its shareholders not to tender their shares.
    ChemLawn said its board asked management and its financial
advisor, Smith Barney, Harris Upham And Co Inc, to seek other
purchasers of the company to maximize shareholder value.
    ChemLawn also said it adopted a shareholder rights plan, or
"poison pill," during a 120-intermin safeguard period its board
adopted to deter attempts to acquire the company through any
means other than an all-cash tender offer while it seeks other
purchasers.
    ChemLawn also said it began litigation against Waste
Management in federal court in Columbus, seeking injunctive and
other relief.
    The suit alleges, among other things, that certain Waste
Management officers and directors purchased ChemLawn's stock
before making the tender offer. ChemLawn claimed such purchases
possibly violated the officers' fiduciary duties and the
Securities and Exchange Commission's insider trading rules.
    Last week, Waste Management made a tender offer to acquire
ChemLawn for 27 dlrs per share or 270 mln dlrs.
    ChemLawn said its board was determined that Waste's offer
was inadequate and not in the best interest of shareholders,
and could "adversely affect" the interests of its employees,
suppliers, creditors, and customers.
    "Our board carefully reviewed Waste Management offer and
concluded that it does not fully reflect the value of the
company. We strongly urge our shareholders not to tender their
shares to Waste Management," said Chairman L. Jack Van Fossen.
    ChemLawn said its rights plan is designed to protect
shareholders against abusive tactics, such as "market
accumulations by Waste Management or others."
    Under the plan, one comon stock purchase right will be
distributed as a dividend on each outstanding share of ChemLawn
common.
    ChemLawn said its rights holders can buy a share of its
common for one dlr if any entity acquires 25 pct or more of its
commmon, other than by an all cash tender offer for all its
shares or an approved acquisition agreement by its board.
    It said the rights expire July three 1987, or 60 days after
they become exercisable if later than that date. It said its
board may redeem the rights for five cts per right any time
prior to their exercise date.
    ChemLawn said the plan will not be triggered by purchases
purusant to Waste Management's present tender offer.
    It said the dividend will be paid to shareholders of record
March 20.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2505>
ConAgra Inc agreed to acquire
Monfort of Colorado Inc in a stock transaction, both companies
said.
    According to the letter of intent signed by the companies,
ConAgra will acquire all of Monfort's 4.3 mln outstanding
shares for 10.75 mln of its own shares.
    Based on ConAgra's closing price of 34 dlrs today, the
transaction is worth about 356.5 mln dlrs. The merger is
expected to be completed in June, they said.
    The companies said the acquisition will result in a
restatement of ConAgra's earnings for the fiscal year ending
May 31, but the restatement is not expected to materially
change the previously reported, or upcoming, fiscal year-end
earnings. In fiscal 1986, ConAgra had net income of 105.3 mln
dlrs on sales of 5.9 billion dlrs.
    For its fiscal year ending August 1986, Monfort reported
25.1 mln dlrs in earnings on sales of 1.6 billion dlrs. The
company is one of the largest lamb and beef producers in the
U.S., producing, transporting and selling the products
domestically and internationally.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2512>
McDonnell Douglas Corp, which has a five
mln dlr investment in Republic Health Corp &lt;REPH>, said it has
not been approached to sell its shares in Republic Health.
    Earlier, Alpha Health Systems Corp, a unit of Pesch and Co,
said it submitted a merger proposal to the board of REPH
Acquisition Co, the parent of Republic Health. LeRoy A. Pesch
is the principal stockholder of Pesch.
    "We have not been approached by Mr. Pesch or anybody else
with respect to our holdings" in Republic Health, a McDonnell
Douglas spokesman told Reuters.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2520>
Santa Fe Southern Pacific Corp will
later today formally ask the U.S. Interstate Commerce
Commission (ICC) to reconsider its earlier rejection of the
merger of the holding company's railroad assets, a company
spokesman said.
    "We expect to file papers late tonight" asking the ICC to
reopen the rail merger case, spokesman Rich Hall said in a
telephone interview from the company's Chicago headquarters.
    The ICC had rejected in July, on grounds it would reduce
competition, the merger of the Santa Fe and Southern Pacific
Railroads.
    The deadline for seeking ICC reconsideration of the merger
plan is midnight tonight.
    Santa Fe Southern Pacific owns the Santa Fe railroad and
holds the Southern Pacific railroad assets in trust while
awaiting federal approval of the merger plan.
    The ICC had ordered the holding company to divest one or
the other railroad but stayed its ruling pending a decision on
the request for reconsideration.
    If the ICC ultimately decides not to reopen the case, it is
expected to reinstate the divestiture order.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2526>
&lt;Enfield Corp Ltd> said it planned to
issue 60 mln dlrs principal amount of notes and 1.6 mln class E
preferred shares at 25 dlrs a share.
    The notes would bear 8 pct yearly interest, mature March
31, 2002 and be convertible to common shares on either March
31, 1997 or the business day before a fixed redemption date at
13.50 dlrs a share, Enfield said.
    It said each preferred share would be convertible to 1.85
common shares on either March 31, 1997 or the business day
before a fixed redemption date. Gordon Capital Corp and
Dominion Securities Inc agreed to acquire the issues, it said.
    Enfield said it would use proceeds to retire short-term
bank debt and boost its 22 pct stake in &lt;Consumers Packaging
Inc> and its interest in &lt;Federal Pioneer Ltd> through open
market purchases.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2528>
Wichita Industries Inc said it
agreed to buy Fountain Oil and Gas Inc.
    Wichita said it it will acquire all of the outstanding
shares of Fountain in an exchange for about 11 mln newly issued
Wichita common shares. Wichita presently has about 3.6 mln
shares outstanding.
    The transaction calls for the issuance of 1-1/2 shares of
Wichita common for each outstanding Fountain share.
    Wichita also said it made a number of refinancing
agreements in connection with the acquisition.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2532>
REPH Acquisition Co said its board
appointed a special committee to negotiate the terms of an
offer made earlier today by &lt;Pesch and Co> to merge with its
Republic Health Corp &lt;REPH> unit.
    Pesch, through its Alpha Health Systems Corp unit, offered
to acquire the 36 pct of Republic Health stock that it does not
already own.
    Terms of Pesch's offer have not been disclosed.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2534>
An investor group led by members of
the Hunt family of Dallas, Texas, told the Securities and
Exchange Commission it has acquired a 6.2 pct stake in Comdata
Network Inc &lt;CDN> and may try to influence company policy.
    The investor group, led by Rosewood Financial Inc, said it
opposes a company recapitalization plan worked out between
Comdata and Mason Best Co, a Texas investment firm, which last
reported holding about 9.5 pct of the company's stock.
    The Hunt group said it offered on March 3 to buy the entire
5.3 pct stake held by dissident shareholder Donald Carter at 14
dlrs each, but has received no reply as of yesterday.
    Rosewood, which is owned by the Caroline Hunt Trust Estate,
whose trustees include Margaret Hunt Hill, also said it has
notified the Federal Trade Commission of its intent to buy
between 15 and 25 pct of Comdata's common stock.
    Under federal law, it cannot buy more than 15 pct of
Comdata's stock until a 15 to 30 day waiting period is over,
unless the FTC gives it early approval.
    Under the proposed Comdata recapitalization plan, the
company would buy up to 10 mln of its common shares at 13.25
dlrs each.
    Mason Best, which belongs to CNI Parnters, a Texas
partnership, would not tender any of its stake under the plan,
but would instead buy another one mln Comdata common shares and
would get representation on the company's board.
    The Hunt group said it has told Comdata that it considers
required payments under the plan, such as a 1.5 mln dlr fee and
the issuance of a warrant to buy 500,000 common shares to be a
waste of the company's assets.
    The Hunt group, which also includes securities Texas firms
Cypress Partners L.P and Driftwood Ltd, said it spent 15.2 mln
dlrs on its 1,197,700 Comdata common shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2538>
Santa Fe Southern Pacific Corp will
later today formally ask the U.S. Interstate Commerce
Commission (ICC) to reconsider its earlier rejection of the
merger of the holding company's railroad assets, a company
spokesman said.
    "We expect to file papers late tonight" asking the ICC to
reopen the rail merger case, spokesman Rich Hall said in a
telephone interview from the company's Chicago headquarters.
    The ICC had rejected in July, on grounds it would reduce
competition, the merger of the Santa Fe and Southern Pacific
Railroads.
    The deadline for seeking ICC reconsideration of the merger
plan is midnight tonight.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2540>
A group led by GFI Nevada Inc, a
subsidiary of General Felt Industries, a Saddlebrook, N.J.
carpet maker, said it cut its stake in Allied Products Corp to
169,888 shares, or 3.4 pct, from 288,652 shares, or 5.8 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
GFI said it sold 114,000 Allied Products common shares on March
3 at 42 dlrs each and donated another 4,746 shares to two
universities.
    It said its dealings in the company's common stock were for
investment purposes only.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2543>
Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc, the
brokerage subsidiary of American Express Co &lt;AXP>, said it has
acquired 131,300 shares of Chicago Milwaukee Corp, or 5.4 pct
of its total outstanding common stock.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Shearson said it bought the stake for 18.8 mln dlrs for
investment purposes and has no intention of seeking control of
the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2546>
Trans World Airlines Inc said it filed
suit in Delaware Chancery Court against USAir Group Inc and its
board of directors seeking to invalidate its "poison pill"
anti-takeover plan.
    TWA vice president and general counsel Mark Buckstein said
TWA also sought a declaratory judgement from the court that its
52 dlr per share takeover offer for USAir would in no way
interfer with USAir's possible buyout of Peidmont Aviation Inc
&lt;PIE>.
    Buckstein said TWA asked the court to enjoin the
enforcement of USAir's shareholder rights plan, or "poison
pill." Such provisions, which typically allow for the issue of
securities to shareholders in the event of a hostile takeover
bid, are aimed at deterring takeovers by making them more
expensive.
    USAir earlier today rejected TWA's offer, saying TWA's bid
was an attempt to interfer with its buyout of Piedmont.
    USAir also had said its counsel would investigate the
matter. Tonight, a spokesman for USAir said the airline had no
comment on TWA's lawsuit.
    USAir did respond, however, to a TWA request to the
Department of Transportation for permission to buy up to 51 pct
of USAir stock and place the stock in a voting trust pending
approval of a takeover.
    USAir said the request was "hastily pasted together in
order to take advantage of a regulatory anamoly that would
allow TWA to accomplish in a regulated environment actions that
would be impermissable in the non-regulated economy at large."
    USAir called on the transportation department to reject
TWA's request.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2551>
A shareholder group led by a Swedish
investment firm and a Norwegian investor said it raised its
stake in the Scandinavia Fund Inc to 2,165,300 shares, or 33.3
pct of the total, from 1,978,900 shares, or 30.5 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group, which includes Ingemar Rydin Industritillbehor AB,
the firm, and investor Erik Martin Vik, said it bought the
additional shares between Feb 24 and March 9.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2552>
VBI Corp, an offshore-based
investment firm, told the Securities and Exchange Commission it
raised its stake in the France Fund Inc &lt;FRN> to 681,800
shares, or 9.1 pct of the total, from 551,000, or 7.4 pct.
    VBI, which is based in Turks and Caicos Islands, the
British West Indies, said it bought the additional shares
between Feb 24 and March 4.
    It has said it bought its France Fund stake for investment
purposes only.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2570>
McAndrews and Forbes Holdings Inc said
it will offer 18.50 dlrs per share for all of Revlon Group
Inc's &lt;REV> outstanding common stock.
    McAndrews said terms of the acquisition have not been
determined and are subject to the acquisition of financing.
    Revlon closed yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange at
14-3/4.
    The company said it would bid for all stock it or its
affiliates do not already own.
    McAndrews and Forbes said it informed the board of
directors of Revlon that it expects to make a formal proposal
in the near future. It also said there can be no assurance as
to the terms of the proposals or that the deal can be
concluded.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2574>
&lt;Borealis Exploration Ltd> said
it entered into an agreement with &lt;Faraway Gold Mines Ltd> of
Vancouver, British Columbia, under which Faraway will acquire
an interest in Borealis's Whale Cove Gold Property in the
Keewatin district of the Northwest Territories.
    Faraway will spend 1.5 mln dlrs on exploration over three
years and will hold 50 pct of the property until all expenses
are paid out, when the interest will drop to 40 pct.
    Also, Borealis and Faraway will issue treasury shares to
each other and Faraway will buy 575,000 Borealis shares from
Borealis president Lorne Spence.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2577>
IMRE Corp said it has received
commitments for a group of European institutions to buy about
400,000 IMRE shares for 2,500,000 dlrs, with closing expected
on March 16.
                                                   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2578>
Finland's medical group Instrumentarium
Oy &lt;INMR.HE> said it has acquired electronics components
importers and marketers &lt;Ferrado Oy> and &lt;Insele Oy>,
subsidiaries of Finland's electronics group Nokia Oy &lt;NOKS.HE>.
    It said in a statement Ferrado and Insele will be merged
into Instrumentarium's Professional Electronics and Information
Systems Division.
    It did not disclose a price for the acquisitions but said
it had issued 30,000 restricted B shares as partial payment to
Nokia.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2583>
Commonwealth Mortgage Co said
it purchased Westfiar Funding Corp of Armonk, N.Y., for an
undisclosed amount of cash.
    Commonwealth said Westfair originated 60 mln dlrs of
residential mortgage loans during 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2596>
Dome Petroleum Ltd's 23.2 pct stake of
gold producer Dome Mines Ltd continues to be for sale "at the
right price," spokesman David Annesley said in response to an
inquiry.
    Reaffirming remarks made last year by chairman Howard
Macdonald, Annesley said the company is considering selling its
stake in Dome Mines.
    Concerning Dome Petroleum's 42 pct stake in &lt;Encor Energy
Corp Ltd>, Annesley said "Encor is a strategic investment for
Dome, and we have no intention of selling it."
    Dome spokesman Annesley said in answer to a question that
he was not aware of any negotiations now under way toward the
sale of Dome Petroleum's 20.9 mln Dome Mines shares.
    He also declined to specify at what price the company would
consider selling it shares.
    "Clearly today's prices of more than 15 dlrs a share (of
Dome Mines stock) are very attractive," Annesley commented.
    "We were considering the sale 'at the right price' at a time
when the shares were priced around nine to 10 dlrs," he added. A
price of around 15 dlrs a share would be considered "fairly
attractive," Annesley said.
    Annesley also Dome Petroleum may be able to sell its Dome
Mines' shares at a premium to market prices. "There might be an
opportunity to pick up a premium on that because it would be
virtually a control block in Dome Mines," he said.
    Dome Mines shares traded earlier at 15-1/4 dlrs, off 1/4 on
the Toronto Stock Exchange.
    Dome Petroleum is now negotiating a plan to restructure
debt of more than 6.1 billion Canadian dlrs with a group of 56
major creditors, which includes Dome Mines and Encor Energy.
    The company previously said it expects to detail the plan
to lenders early next week.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2604>
Stone Container Corp said it and
Southwest Forest Industries Inc &lt;SWF> completed all waiting
period requirements under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Anti-Trust
Improvements Act of 1976.
    Stone said it will proceed with its previously proposed
acquisition of Southwest.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2609>
Southwest Forest Industries said
it and Stone Container Corp have complied with all federal
waiting period requirements for Stone's proposed 32.25 dlr per
share cash acquisition of Southwest.
    Southwest currently has 12.3 mln shares outstanding. The
companies entered into a merger agreement on January 27, and
made their initial findings with the Department of Justice and
the Federal Trade Commission on February three.
    Southwest said the waiting period expired on March 5,
without receiving a formal second request for information.
   
REUTER...^M
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2637>
&lt;Hawker Siddeley Group PLC>'s offer of
74 dlrs a share for all of Clarostat Mfg Co Inc's stock was
scheduled to expire at 2400 EST yesterday.
    Company officials were unavailable for comment as to why
the American Stock Exchange had stopped trading in Clarostat's
stock for a pending news announcement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2638>
Narragansett Capital Inc &lt;NARR>
said it and Dudley S. Taft have requested a response from Taft
Broadcasting Co by March 12.
    Earlier today, Taft Broadcasting said Taft, the company's
vice chairman, and Narragansett had offered 145 dlrs for each
of Taft's 9.2 mln outstanding shares.
    The company said the offer is conditioned on approval of
its board, but a spokesman declined comment on whether or not
the board has scheduled a meeting.
     The Narragansett/Taft group will provide the equity portion
of the offer by contributing at least 125 mln dlrs in cash and
Taft Broadcasting common, Narragansett said.
    It said the group has been advised by First Boston Inc's
&lt;FBC> First Boston Corp that the investment banker is "highly
confident that financing for the acquisition can be
consummated."
    Narragansett said the offer is subject to negotiation of a
definitive merger agreement and definitive financing agreements
as well as approval by regulators, Taft's board and Taft's
stockholders.
    The Narragansett/Taft group said its letter to Taft's board
states the group intends to return control over a significant
portion of the company's equity to the Taft family while
providing other stockholders with a means of realizing a very
attractive value for their shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2647>
Santa Fe Southern Pacific Corp said it
filed a petition asking the U.S. Interstate Commerce Commission
to reconsider its earlier rejection of the merger of the
holding company's railroad assets.
    The ICC had rejected in July the merger of the Santa Fe and
Southern Pacific Railroads on the grounds that it would reduce
competition.
    Santa Fe in its petition outlines an array of
pro-competitive agreements with other railroads which would
preserve the economic benefits of the merger for the merged
railroad and the public.
    If the commission agrees that public benefits and
competitive enhancements will result, it can vote to reopen the
merger case. Interested parties have until March 25 to file
statements in response to the supplemental petition.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2650>
Monfort of Colorado Inc soared 21-1/2
to 75 in over-the-counter trading, responding to an
announcement late yesterday that the firm will be acquired by
Conagra Inc &lt;CAG>.
    According to a letter of intent signed by both companies,
Conagra will offer 2.5 of its own shares for each of Monfort's
4.3 mln outstanding shares.
    Conagra fell one to 33 on the New York Stock Exchange.
Monfort is an integrated beef and lamb producer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2652>
Sweden's &lt;Nordbanken> banking group
said it would sell the 4.2 mln B free shares deposited as loan
collateral by Fermenta AB's &lt;FRMS.ST> founder and former chief
executive Refaat el-Sayed and it planned to buy them up itself.
    The bank said the sale - by public auction on March 16 --
was because of a debtor's inability to repay an overdue loan.
    The B free shares closed at 16.50 crowns on the bourse's
unofficial list -- down from a peak of 300 in January 1986.
Nordbanken said it did not exclude accepting a suitable bid for
the shares although it expected to buy them back itself.
    The statement said the sale did not represent any
withdrawal from Nordbanken's undertakings towards the Fermenta
group and that it had been sanctioned by the other main
shareholders.
    Nordbanken is Fermenta's third largest creditor with loans
of 155 mln crowns. It was one of the four Swedish banks which
last month agreed to advance the group 110 mln crowns to solve
its immediate liquidity problems. Together with two other main
shareholders, it also advanced Fermenta an additional 65 mln
crowns until a new equity issue could be made.
    Fermenta is due to hold an extraordinary shareholders'
meeting on Tuesday to approve the planned equity issue.
    Nordbanken had to make a provision against a 200 mln crown
loan to el-Sayed in its 1986 results.
    Fermenta's new management originally hoped to raise 160 mln
crowns through the new one for four rights issue and an extra
170 mln from an issue to Nordbanken, another major creditor and
shareholder &lt;Gotabanken> and the group's new majority owner
&lt;Industrivarden AB>.
    The share price was to be 20 crowns. But there has been
doubt over the plans since the stock fell below this level this
week after Fermenta's former chairman Kjell Brandstrom said the
company was in a much worse state than he thought.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2660>
Mine Safety Appliances Co said it
agreed to sell its filter products division to Donaldson Co Inc
&lt;DCI> for undisclosed terms.
    It said the filter products unit will be relocated from its
plant in Pennsylvania to a Donaldson facility in Illinois. It
said it expects a number of the unit's 100 employees will be
offered positions with Donaldson.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2672>
Donaldson Co Inc said it reached an
agreement to buy the assets of the Filter Products Division of
Mine safety Appliances Co for undisclosed terms.
    It said Filter Products will operate as part of Donaldson's
Industrial Group and its manufacturing operations will be
relocated to Dixon, Ill., from Evans City, Pa.
    Donaldson said the acquisition complements its
microfiltration business and internal research and development
efforts.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2699>
The investor group owning about 42 pct
of the outstanding capital stock of &lt;The First Women's Bank>
said a cash tender offer for the bank's remaining outstanding
shares at 11 dlrs per share expired on March three.
    The investors said about 132,000 shares, or about 20 pct of
the outstanding, had been tendered.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2714>
Universal Furniture Ltd said in a
filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that it had
increased its stake in Bench Craft Inc common stock to
2,548,975 shares or 45.3 pct of the total outstanding.
    Universal said its Universal Furniture Industries N.V. unit
bought 235,750 Bench Craft shares March 4 in the
over-the-counter market.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2728>
Bancroft Convertible Fund Inc, the
target of an unfriendly cash offer by &lt;Zico Investment Holdings
Inc>, said its shareholders approved proposals requiring a
66-2/3 pct affirmative vote of all outstanding shares before
fundamental changes in its status could be made.
    Previously, only a simple majority of outstanding shares
was needed to change Bancroft's investment status from a
diversified to a non-diversified fund, among other things.
    Bancroft said its board continues to recommend that
stockholders not tender their shares to Zico, a British Virgin
Islands company which it said had ties to South Africa.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2737>
&lt;BOC Group Inc>'s Airco
Distributor Gases finalized the sale of its Virginia-based gas
appaturs business to &lt;Controls Corp of America>, a newly formed
investment group organized by former Airco employees.
    Under the terms of the sale, Airco said Controls will
continue to make the gas apparaturs product line under the
Airco brand name, marketing the products exclusively through
the Airco's distributor network.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2763>
Insituform Group Ltd of Guernsey,
Channel Islands, said it has exercised an option to convert a
250,000 stg loan to affiliate Insituform Permaline Ltd to
common shares, raising its stake in the unit to 75 pct from 50
pct.
    The remainder is held by Permaline's management and an
investment group.
    Insituform also said James Colclough has resigned from its
board for health reasons and secretary Scott Saltpeter has
resigned, effective June Five.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2768>
Chicago Milwaukee Corp said it welcomed
an investment by Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc in its company.
    Yesterday, Shearson Lehman, a subsidiary of American
Express Co (AXP), disclosed in a Securities and Exchange
Commission filing that it holds a 5.35 pct interest in Chicago
Milwaukee.
    Chicago Milwaukee's stock edged up 2-1/8 to 138 on turnover
of 8,100 shares, as one of the biggest gainers on the NYSE. The
stock has been trading in a 154 to 128 range for the last 52
weeks.
    Edwin Jacobson, Chicago Milwaukee president, declined to
comment on movement of the company's stock but said,"From an
investment point of view, we are pleased to have Shearson,
Lehman as a substantial investor."
    Shearson, Lehman purchased the shares for investment
purposes and may continue buying shares depending on market
conditions, according to the filing.
    Chicago Milwaukee, which sold its railroad interests to Soo
Line Railroad Co (SOO) in February 1985, currently manages and
sells its real estate which consists of 28,000 parcels in 11
states.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2769>
Dauphin Deposit Corp said it has
signed a letter of intent to acquire Colonial Bancorp Inc of
New Holland, Pa., in an exchange of 3.6 to 4.4 Dauphin shares
for each colonial share, depending on the market value of
Dauphin shares just before the merger takes place.
    The company said the acquisition is subject to approval by
Colonial shareholders and regulatory authorities.  Colonial had
assets at year-end of about 150 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2783>
Telecom Plus International Inc
said &lt;Siemens AG>'s Siemens Information Systems wants to amend
its agreement to purchase Telecom's 65 pct interest in Tel Plus
Communications to delay payment of 25 mln dlrs for 11 months.
    Telecom's shareholders are scheduled to vote on the 165 mln
dlr transaction Monday.
    Telecom said it advised Siemens it intends to close the
transaction on March 16, as scheduled, if it is approved by
shareholders. A spokesman said this means Telecom will decide
before the 16th whether or not to accept the proposed change.
    Explaining its request for the amendment, Siemens informed
Telecom it had recently become aware of information causing
concern with respect to certain accounting and other matters.
    Siemens said it will therefore need to continue its review
beyond March 16 to determine whether certain representations
and warranties are true.
    Telecom said it advised Siemens it knows of no information
which would make its representations and warranties untrue.
    Siemens already owns the remaining 35 pct of Tel Plus. The
65 pct represenmts Telecom's principal operating asset.
    A Telecom spokesman said the agreement calls for payment of
all but 29 mln dlrs of the price at closing. Of this, 21 mln
dlrs was to be paid 11 months later and two mln dlrs per year
on the anniversary date of the transaction.
    He said Siemens is now proposing that 25 mln dlrs be added
to the 21 mln dlrs to be paid in 11 months.
    Telecom said the proposed amendment would also permit
Siemens to defer repayment of up to an additional 50 pct of
certain intercompany debt until completion of the review.
Telecom said it estimates this to ba about 15 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2791>
Lucky Stores Inc said it and
investor Asher Edelman agreed on a settlement that prohibits
Edelman and his group from taking specified actions to obtain
control of the company and that limits the Edelman group's
ownership of Lucky's stock to less than five pct of any voting
securities.
    The arrangement also provides for the dismissal of pending
litigation between the parties, Lucky Stores said.
    The settlement also calls for the withdrawal of Edelman's
motion to intervene in pending shareholder actions against
Lucky Stores and its directors, the company said.
    In addition, the standstill provisions also apply to
Hancock Fabrics after it is spun off to Lucky stockholders, the
company said.
    Lucky Stores said the arrangement also calls for the
company to submit to stockholders at a special meeting set for
December 31 a proposal from Edelman seeking their views
concerning repeal of a charter provision that limits the voting
power of substantial Lucky stockholders.
    Edelman, who owns about five pct of Lucky Stores' stock,
last year was rebuffed in his effort to acquire the company.
    Last October Lucky Stores implimented a restructuring
program that included the repurchase of 28 pct of its own
common shares and reincorporation in Delaware.
    The spinoff of Hancock Textile Co, a chain of 324 retail
stores, was one of the key parts of the restructuring program.
    Edelman and his Plaza Securities Co partnership
subsequently sued in an attempt to block the proposed
reincorporation, which was a condition of the repurchase and
restructuring plan.
    Under this latest arrangement, Lucky Stores said it agreed
to reimburse the Edelman group for 2.8 mln dlrs of
out-of-pocket expenses, which include litigation and other
costs.
    "This agreement serves the interests of Lucky stockholders
by avoiding the significant cost of continued litigation and
the accompanying demands on management time," Lucky Stores
chairman John Lillie said in a statement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2799>
Trans World Airlines Inc said it owns
more than four mln USAir Group shares or about 15 pct of the
total outstanding.
    TWA said it may acquire additional shares in the open
market, in private transactions, through a tender offer or
otherwise, subject to Department of Transportation approval.
    TWA has offered 52 dlrs per share for USAir Group. USAir
rejected the offer yesterday, calling it a last-minute attempt
to interfere with its takeover of Piedmont Aviation Inc.
    A TWA spokesman said the company has filed an application
for approval on its offer to buy USAir with the Department of
Transportation, and later today it will file a response to
USAir's motion with the DOT to dismiss the TWA application.
    TWA said it made the statement today on its stock position
in USAir in response to inquiries.
    Traders said they believed TWA Chairman Carl Icahn was the
buyer of an 855,000 share block crossed today by Salomon
Brothers.
    USAir stock was trading at 50-3/4, up 2-1/4 on heavy volume
of 3.1 mln shares. TWA stock fell 3/8 to 30-5/8.
    While analysts and arbitragers have speculated that Icahn
may have made the offer for USAir in order to trigger the
acquisition of his own airline, Wall Street today began to take
Icahn's effort more seriously.
    "I think he's going to be the next Frank Lorenzo of Wall
Street," said one market source. Lorenzo, chairman of Texas
Air, has added to his airline with the acquisitions of Eastern
Airlines and People Express Airlines.
    There was also speculation that Icahn would like to buy
USAir and then sell TWA as a merged company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2802>
An investor group led by New York
investor George Soros said it was dissatisfied with Fairchild
Industries Inc management and was considering boosting its
holdings to as much as 49.9 pct of the aerospace and aviation
company's outstanding stock.
    The group already controls 1,647,481 Fairchild Industries
shares or 11.5 pct of the total outstanding.
    The group said it filed on Wednesday with federal antitrust
regulators for advance clearance to buy enough additional
shares to increase its total stake to up to 49.9 pct of the
total outstanding stock.
    The group said its representatives had met with Fairchild
Industries officials to inform them "that they do not believe
management has been successful in enhancing or protecting
shareholder values."
    It said it was considering the additional share purchases
to enable it to "assert a greater degree of influence over the
future management and policies of the issuer."
    It said a decision on the specific level of share ownership
it would seek depended on market prices, future changes in
management policies, available financial resources and other
factors.
    The group said it also reserved the right to pursue other
measures intended to influence Fairchild management and
policies, either alone or in concert with other investors.
    The group includes Soros and Quantum Fund, an offshore
investment firm headquartered in Curacao, Netherlands Antilles
that is advised by Soros.
    The group said that since its last SEC filing, made Jan. 2,
it had purchased no additional Fairchild shares and had sold
6,700 shares on the New York Stock Exchange Jan. 19.
    A Fairchild Industries official later said Soros had told
the company he was not dissatisfied with its management.
    "Contrary to the filing, Mr. Soros has told the company
today that he is not dissatisfied with management," Fairchild's
Bill Fulwider told Reuters.
    However, Fulwider said the company would have nothing to
say at this time about Soros' disclosure that he may buy up
enough additional Fairchild shares to hold as much as 49.9 pct
of the company's outstanding stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2810>
SouthTrust Corp, a 5.1 billion
dlr multibank holding company, said it entered into agreements
to acquire four Florida banks with assets totalling more than
233.2 mln dlrs.
    Terms of the agreements were not disclosed.
    The four banks are: Central Bank of Volusia County, with
assets of 59.3 mln dlrs, Bank of Pensacola with assets of 63.8
mln dlrs, and Vista Bank, which operates Vista Bank of Volusia
County with assets of 37.8 mln dlrs and Vista Bank of Marion
County with assets of 72.3 mln dlrs.
    It said the agreements are subject to regulatory approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2813>
Hughes Tool Co rose one to 12-1/4 on
1,658,000 shares, apparently reflecting a belief that Baker
International Corp &lt;BKO> will be able to persaude Hughes to go
along with a previously announced merger, analysts said.
    This week Hughes seemed to back out of the merger but then
said it was still interested in talking.
    "It sounds like Baker wants it and if people are convinced
a deal is going to go through the stock goes up," said analyst
Phil Pace of Kidder, Peabody and Co. Holders of Hughes would
get 0.8 share of Baker for each Hughes share. 
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2815>
Aetna Life and Casualty Co said
it reached an agreement to acquire a 49 pct interest in
Universal Life and General Insurance Sdn Bhd &lt;ULG>, a Malaysian
composite insurance company.
    The company said the 51 pct balance will continue to be
owned by Malaysia Apera Group of private investors.
    The transaction is valued at approximately 37.8 mln dlrs
and is expected to be completed by March 31, 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2818>
Carling O'Keefe Ltd said it sold its
Star Oil and Gas Ltd unit to United Coal (Canada) Ltd for about
57 mln dlrs cash.
    Carling said it will record an extraordinary gain of about
two mln dlrs after tax, or nine cts a common share resulting
from the sale.
    The company did not elaborate further on financial terms.
    A Carling official later said in reply to an inquiry that
Carling would record the extraordinary gain in its fourth
quarter ending March 31.
    The move came after Carling's 50 pct-owner &lt;Rothmans Inc>
agreed last week to sell its Carling stake to &lt;Elders IXL Ltd>,
of Australia, for 196.2 mln Canadian dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2833>
Dome Petroleum Ltd is under pressure
from one of its largest creditors, &lt;Canadian Imperial Bank of
Commerce>, to sell its 42 pct stake in &lt;Encor Energy Corp Ltd>,
energy industry analysts said.
    Dome has pledged its 42.5 mln Encor shares as security for
part of its debt to Commerce Bank, estimated last year at 947
mln Canadian dlrs, and the bank wants Dome to sell the stock to
pay down debt, analysts said.
    "The Commerce has been slowly but surely moving Encor in the
direction that might make it a saleable asset," said one analyst
who asked not to be named.
    Dome earlier said it was not considering selling Encor
Energy, but reaffirmed the company's 23.3 pct interest in
Canadian gold producer Dome Mines Ltd &lt;DM> is up for sale "at
the right price."
    Dome, now negotiating a plan to restructure more than 6.10
billion dlrs in debt, sees Encor as a strategic investment that
it does not intend to sell, spokesman David Annesley said. The
Encor shares do not pay dividends.
    A Commerce Bank spokesman also declined comment when asked
whether it is pressing Dome to sell its Encor stake.
    At current market prices, Dome's stake in Encor would be
valued at about 308 mln dlrs, while its 20.9 mln Dome Mines
shares would be worth about 319 mln dlrs.
    Recent strength in the price of Encor shares may also
prompt Commerce Bank to press Dome to divest its holding in the
Canadian oil and gas producer, analysts said.
    "Encor's stock price has improved quite substantially in
recent weeks with a runup in crude prices," Peters and Co Ltd
oil analyst Wilf Gobert commented.
    "The possibility is that Commerce Bank would like to see it
sold at these levels because they can get more for it now than
they have been able to in recent years," he added.
    Encor traded earlier on the Toronto Stock Exchange at
7-1/8, near its 52-week high of 7-1/2 and up from around six
dlrs in early February.
    The company also recently set up its own operating
management, which was previously carried out by Dome Petroleum,
Maison Placements Canada Inc analyst Denis Mote commented.
    Dome and Encor "are actually going to get farther apart. So
(the sale) does make a lot of sense," Mote said.
    However, analysts said Dome will resist any moves to divest
Encor in favor of retaining the operating assets since sale
proceeds would likely go directly to pay down Dome's debt to
Commerce Bank.
    "I think they'll probably try to hang onto Encor as long as
they can," said Bache Securities Inc analyst Doug Weber.
    Some of Dome's group of 56 major creditors might move to
block such a sale, arguing they have a claim on company assets.
    "Other creditors generally all want to make sure that
something they might be able to get a piece of is not being
sold out from under them," said analyst Gobert.
    Another stumbling block would be Encor's 225 mln dlr joint
liability in loans to Dome Petroleum advanced by Arctic
Petroleum Corp of Japan for Beaufort Sea exploration.
    Analysts said a similar hurdle could also hinder the
possible sale of Dome Petroleum's interest in Dome Mines.
    Dome Mines has guaranteed 225 mln dlrs of Dome Petroleum's
debt and has a "right of consent" to the sale of Dome Petroleum's
holding.
    Presumably, a potential buyer of the Dome Mines shares
would seek some type of relief on the company's debt
obligations connected with Dome Petroleum, Gobert said.
    Dome spokesman Annesley earlier declined to specify at what
price the company would consider selling its Dome Mines shares,
but said current prices of more than 15 dlrs a share "are very
attractive."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2847>
Landmark Savings Association said it
completed the sale of its Whitehall, Pa., office, including
deposits of about 31 mln dlrs, to Parkvale Savings Association.
    Landmark said it realized a gain of about 1.1 mln dlrs on
the sale. The price was not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2867>
Bell and Howell Co said it
completed the sale of its computer output microfilm business to
COM Products Inc, a unit of privately-held &lt;LeBow Industries
Inc>.
    The sum of the deal was not disclosed.
    The unit makes a device that prints data directly from a
computer onto microfilm.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2884>
DTD Enterprises Inc said it filed an
8-K report indicating that &lt;EaglesLair Development Corp> had
assumed control of the company under a reorganization plan
signed last month.
    The company said D. Gerald Lach, president of EaglesLair,
was named president and a director of DTD.
    In addition, DTS's board resigned and EaglesLair appointed
new directors, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2896>
(Dumez Investments I Inc) said 94.7 pct
of Westburne International Industries Ltd's outstanding common
shares have been deposited under its takeover bid.
    It said it has received about 11,070,000 shares under its
22.50 dlrs per share offer which expired yesterday.
    Dumez said it will proceed to acquire the remaining common
shares to give it 100 pct ownership of Westburne.
    Dumez is a private company owned jointly by (Dumez S.A.)
and (Unicorp Canada Corp).            
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2897>
&lt;Canadian Natural Resources
Ltd> said it agreed in principle to sell 80 pct of its working
interest in certain producing and non-producing natural gas
properties located in southwestern Saskatchewan.
    The transaction is expected to close on April 1, 1987, the
company said. It did not identify the buyer nor give the
selling price.
    Proceeds will be used to satisfy a February 1987 repayment
demand by one of the company's lenders. Any excess proceeds
will be added to working capital, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2898>
&lt;Malrite Guaranteed Broadcast Partners
L.P.> said it bought WTRK Inc from &lt;Cox Enterprises Inc> for
13.8 mln dlrs in cash.
    It said WTRK owns and operates WTRK-FM, a Philadelphia
radio station. Transfer of the license for the sation has been
approved by the Federal Communications Commission.
    Malrite Guaranteed said it is a limited partnerhip formed
to acquire and operate radio and tv stations. It said Malrite
Communications Group Inc &lt;MALR> is the general partner.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2902>
Cyacq Corp said it extended its 80
dlr a share tender offer for Cyclops Corp to March 20 from
today.
    Cyacq was formed by Citicorp Capital Investors Ltd and
Audio Video Affiliates INc &lt;AVA> to acquire Cyclops. THe tender
offer began on February six.
    The offer is conditioned upon at least 80 pct of the
outstanding shares and at least 80 pct of the voting securities
being tendered before expiration of the offer.
    As of March six, only 353 shares of Cyclops' 4.1 mln
outstanding shares had been tendered.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2907>
&lt;Mono Gold Mines
Inc> said &lt;NIM and Co Ltd> Partnership agreed to buy
flow-through shares with an aggregate purchase price of up to
300,000 dlrs.
    It said, subject to fulfillment of certain conditions, the
price of the shares to NIM will be 79.6 cts per share, and said
it will issue 376,955 shares to the partnership.
    Mono also said options to buy up to 300,000 dlrs of its
capital stock at 65 cts per share expire March three. It said
39,000 options have been exercised to net the company 25,530
dlrs to be added to working capital.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2917>
USAir Group said it sought the help
of the U.S. Department of Transportation in its takeover fight
with Trans World Airlines Inc, asking the Department to order
TWA to sell its USAir shares.
    "What they have done is in direct violation of the Federal
Aviation Act," USAir said.
    It said TWA week filed a cursory application with the
Department of Transportation for approval of its proposed 1.65
billion dlr takeover of USAir.
    USAir rejected the offer and said it asked the Department
of Transportation to dismiss the application.
    USAir said it requested the dismissal because TWA avoided
pre-merger notification requirements, and also did not provide
a competitive and public interest analysis required under
regulations.
    USAir said if the application is dismissed, TWA would be
limited to buying only 1.5 pct of its 31.7 mln outstanding
shares. If the application is approved, TWA could buy up to 10
pct, it said. TWA has said it owns less than 10 pct of USAir's
stock.
    TWA today revealed that it has increased its holdings to
more than four mln USAir shares, 15 pct of the outstanding.
    TWA vice president general counsel Mark Buckstein said the
company had made appropriate filings with the DOT and was in
compliance with the law.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2924>
A proposed buyout of Taft Broadcasting
Co by Dudley Taft and other investors includes a plan to sell
the company's Entertainment Group, according to one of the
investors.
    Jonathan Nelson, managing director of Narragansett Capital
Corp &lt;NARR>, which is participating in the buyout plan,
declined to say if buyers have already been lined up for the
Entertainment Group. "We are considering selling the group,"
Nelson said. Wall Street analysts said any of the Hollywood
film studios which might be interested.
    Taft Broadcasting Co did not comment on the 145 dlr per
share offer. Taft has 9.2 mln shares outstanding, of which 12
pct are owned by the Taft and Ingalls families.
    Dudley Taft relinquished the title of president in July but
continues as vice chairman of the company.
    Taft-Narragansett requsted a response to its proposal by
March 12.
    If the plan is accepted, Taft would be a private company
financed by high yield bonds and bank debt, Nelson said.
Narragansett is an investment management company specializing
in leveraged buyout transactions.
    Taft shares climbed 19 to 151-1/2, causing arbitrageurs to
say investors believe the bidders may raise their price.
    Robert M. Bass, who controls 25 pct of the stock, and
American Financial Corp, holder of 15 pct, did not return
telephohe calls seeking comment.
    But Dennis McAlpine, analyst at Oppenheimer and Co, said "I
don't think it's worth 150 dlrs." He noted Taft recently agreed
to sell a group of independent television stations at a loss.
He said the entertainment group, which includes the
Hanna-Barbara animation studios, is currently hampered by a
glut of animated product.
    Taft Broadcasting has never commented on reports that its
major stockholders met recently to discuss a break-up of the
company.
    MacAlpine said there are lots of options for reshaping the
company with a distribution of various pieces to the major
shareholders among the possibilities.
    Analyst Alan Gottesman of L.F. Rothschild, Unterberg Towbin
Inc said the Bass group has been increasing its stake in the
belief the company would be worth more with a change in its
strategy. He said Bass pushed for sale of the independent
television stations because the company paid too much.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2926>
Sandoz Corp's Northrup King Co said
it bought Stauffer Seeds, a unit of Stauffer Chemical Co.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2927>
Energen Corp said it has
acquired the distribution system of the City of Clanton, Ala.
for about 1.2 mln dlrs.
    The 1,800 customer system is the fourth municipal system
acquired by Energen's Alabama Gas subsidiary since October
1986, adding a total of 9,600 customers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2933>
Monoclonal Antibodies Inc
said it signed an agreement in principle to buy &lt;Genesis Labs
Inc> for about 10 mln dlrs of common stock.
    The agreement is subject to shareholders approval and other
conditions.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2945>
Continental Federal Savings and
Loan Association said it was told that an estate holding 38 pct
of its stock plans to sell its stake at a premium over the
current stock price.
   Continental said the estate of Harold Vernon and certain
parties have signed a letter of intent to sell the stock for
12.25 dlrs a share, for a total of about 6,538,000 dlrs.
Continental's stock closed at seven in over-the-counter
trading.
    The thrift said the buyer is &lt;BAC Inc>, a corporation
acting for certain unindentified parties.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2946>
Broker's Choice Capital Inc said
it signed a letter of intent to buy Rubbertech Inc.
    If approved by shareholders, Broker's Choice will issue
about 71 mln shares of authorized, but unissued shares of
restricted common stock to Rubbertech Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2948>
The U.S. Department of Transportation
(DOT) said it dismissed on technical grounds an application by
Trans World Airlines Inc for DOT approval for it to take
control of USAir Group.
    The DOT added, however, that TWA was free to refile when it
could put together an application for control that met the
agency's procedural requirements.
    The DOT acted shortly after the U.S. Department of Justice
disclosed that it supported dismissal of the TWA application.
    It was not immediately clear what impact the denial would
have on TWA's bid to take over USAir.
    In its control application, TWA had acknowledged that
additional documentation was required to meet DOT rules and
said it would file more material on the morning of March 9.
    But the DOT said it would not wait.
    "We have determined to dismiss TWA's application for
approval of the acquisition of USAir," it said in an order
issued late Friday.
    "TWA's application clearly fails to comply with the filing
requirements of our regulations...and TWA has provided no
reason why we should accept such a deficient filing," it added.
    "Accordingly, we will dismiss the application. TWA, of
course, may refile it when it is able to comply with our
procedural rules," the DOT said.
    The agency added that it would continue to consider a
separate TWA request for federal clearance to purchase USAir
stock through a voting trust.
    USAir had said earlier today that it asked the DOT to
dismiss the TWA control application, on grounds the TWA filing
did not meet DOT requirements.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2950>
Transworld Airlines Inc plans to refile
an application Monday with the Department of Transportation for
approval to acquire USAir Group &lt;U>.
    The DOT late today dismissed TWA's application to acquire
USAir.
    "When the DOT opens for business on Monday morning, we will
be refiling a perfected and completed section 408 application,"
said TWA general counsel Mark Buckstein.
    Buckstein said the DOT ruled the application, which was
filed Wednesday, was incomplete. He said he did not yet know
why the agency objected.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2951>
The Justice Department told the
Transportation Department it supported a request by USAir 
Group that the DOT dismiss an application by Trans World
Airlines Inc for approval to take control of USAir.
    "Our rationale is that we reviewed the application for
control filed by TWA with the DOT and ascertained that it did
not contain sufficient information upon which to base a
competitive review," James Weiss, an official in Justice's
Antitrust Division, told Reuters.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2953>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board
(FHLBB) announced the acquisiton of South Bay Savings &amp; Loan
Association in Gardena, Calif., By Standard Pacific Savings of
Costa Mesa, Calif.
    The FHLBB said South Bay had assets of 62.5 mln dlrs and
Standard Pacific had 312.8 mln dlrs in assets.
    It was the fourth federally-assisted merger or acquisition
of a troubled savings institution this year, the FHLBB said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2956>
Malaysia's central bank said it
acquired a 59.2 pct stake in ailing &lt;United Asian Bank Bhd>
(UAB), the sixth largest commercial bank in the country, to
rebuild public confidence in it.
    UAB called for a rights issue last November to raise 152.49
mln ringgit to rectify its capital deficiency following an
accumulated loss of 107.61 mln ringgit at end-1985, the central
bank, Bank Negara, said in a statement.
    But only 16.99 mln ringgit in shares was taken up by
shareholders, mainly local Indian and Malay businessmen and the
Indian Government.
    Bank Negara said it subsequently took up the unsubscribed
shares, totalling 135.5 mln of UAB's new paid-up capital of
228.74 mln ringgit.
    It said the shares, held in trust, will be eventually sold.
    The central bank early this week also announced that it had
bought 49.4 pct stake in another troubled commercial bank,
&lt;Perwira Habib Bank Malaysia Bhd>, after the latter raised its
capital to 405 mln ringgit from 105 in mid-January this year.
    Bank Negara said it does not intend to hold on to the
shares of the two banks.
    "The injection of capital in PHB and in UAB including the
recamp of management in these banks are some of the measures
taken by the bank to strengthen public confidence in the
stability of the these banks," it added.
    The central bank said it is invoking Section 39A of the
Banking (Amendemnt) Act 1986 empowering it to grant loans to an
ailing bank or to buy a stake in it.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2999>
Imperial Chemical Industries Plc &lt;ICI.L>
said it had today placed its 19.4 pct stake in Lister and Co
Plc with L Messel and Co and that it had now been placed widely
among institutions.
    Lister is a manufacturer, dyer and finisher of cotton, silk
wool and man-made fibres.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3009>
Standard Pacific LP said it
has acquired substantially all of the assets and liabilities of
South Bay Savings and Loan Association of Newport Beach.
    The firm said over the weekend that it will conduct its
savings and loan activities through Standard Pacific Savings
FA, a Federal stock association.
    On Friday, the Federal Home Loan Bank Board in Washington
said it approved the acquisition of South Bay S and L, a 62.5
mln dlr state-chartered stock association, by Standard Pacific,
which has 312.8 mln dlrs in assets.
    The Bank Board said that the Federal Savings and Loan
Insurance Corp will make a cash contribution, provide capital
loss coverage and indemnify Standard Pacific against
undisclosed liabilities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3013>
USAir Group Inc said Piedmont Aviation
Inc has agreed to be acquired for 69 dlrs per share.
    The company, in a newspaper advertisement, said it has
started a tender offer for all Piedmont shares at that price,
and the Piedmont board, with two directors absent, has
unanimously approved the bid.  The offer and withdrawal rights
are to expire April Three unless extended, and the bid is to be
followed by a merger at the same price.
    USAir said Piedmont has granted it an irrevocable option to
buy up to 3,491,030 new shares under certain circumstances.
Piedmont now has about 18.6 mln shares outstanding.
    USAir said the tender is conditioned on receipt of enough
shares to give USAir at least a 50.1 pct interest in Piedmont
on a fully diluted basis and approval by the U.S. Department of
Transportation of a voting trust agreement permitting USAir to
buy and hold shares pending review of its application to gain
control of Piedmont.
    The company said its merger agreement with Piedmont
provides that the offer is not to be amended without Piedmont's
prior written consent in any way that would be adverse to
Piedmont shareholders, but it said it could cut the number of
shares to be bought without Piedmont's consent.
    USAir said it could reduce the number of Piedmont shares to
be purchased in the offer to no less than the minimum number
needed to cause the voting trust condition of the bid to be
satisfied.
    In that case, it said if more than that minimum number of
shares were tendered, it would buy shares on a pro rata basis.
    In February USAir had offered to pay 71 dlrs per share in
cash for 50 pct of Piedmont's stock and 1.55 to 1.90 USAir
shares for each remaining Piedmont share.
    Last week, Carl C. Icahn-controlled Trans World Airlines
Inc &lt;TWA> made a conditional offer to acquire USAir for 52 dlrs
per share, a bid that was rejected by the USAir board.
    The Transportation Department on Friday rejected TWA's
application to acquire USAir on the grounds that the
application failed to comply with department regulations by
omitting necessary information.  TWA said it would refile
today, providing the information needed.
    On Friday TWA said it had already acquired four mln shares
or 15 pct of USAir.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3023>
&lt;MTS Acquisition Corp>, a company
formed by Martin T. Sosnoff, said it has started a tender offer
for all shares of Caesars World Inc at 28 dlrs each.
    In a newspaper advertisement, MTS said the offer and
withdrawal rights expire April Three unless extended.
    Sosnoff, a New York investor, already owns about four mln
of Caesars' 30.3 mln shares outstanding, or about 13.3 pct, and
is Caesars' largest shareholder.  Caesars owns casino hotels in
Nevada and honeymoon resorts in Pennsylvania's Pocono
Mountains.  It also controls Caesars New Jersey Inc &lt;CJN>,
which owns an Atlantic City, N.J., casino hotel.
    For the second quarter ended January 31, Caesars World
earned 12.6 mln dlrs on revenues of 190.4 mln dlrs, up from
earnings of 7,500,000 dlrs and revenues of 163.8 mln dlrs a
year before.  For all of fiscal 1986, the company earned 41.0
mln dlrs on revenues of 694.4 mln dlrs.
    MTS said the offer is conditioned on receipt of at least
enough shares to give Sosnoff a majority interest on a fully
diluted basis, the arrangement of sufficient financing to buy
all Caesars shares not already owned and pay related costs and
approval by the New Jersey Casino control Commission and the
NEvada Gaming Commission and State Gaming Control Board.
    MTS said Marine Midland Banks Inc &lt;MM> has committed to
lend it 100 mln dlrs for the acquisition and use its best
efforts to syndicate another 400 mln dlrs in senior financing
for the transaction.
    It said its financial adviser, PaineWebber Group Inc &lt;PWJ>,
has stated in writing that subject to market conditions, it is
highly confident that it can arrange commitments for up to 475
mln dlrs in "mezzanine" financing.
    MTS said it does not expect problems in obtaining New
Jersey and Nevada regulatory approval for the acquisition,
since ownership in a Caesars stake has already been cleared.
    In June 1986, Sosnoff requested a seat on the Caesars World
board, a request that has not yet been granted.  In September
1986, Sosnoff, who is chairman of &lt;Atalanta/Sosnoff Capital
Corp>, filed for clearance under U.S. antitrust laws to raise
his interest in Caesars World to 25 pct.
    Sosnoff said, in a letter to Caesars World chairman and
chief executive officer Henry Gluck, that "The decision to go
directly to the shareholders was made at the urging of may
financial and legal advisors, who repeatedly stressed to me the
lack of responsiveness of the management in the past."
    Sosnoff, who said he has made numerous efforts to express
his views to management on ways of maximizing shareholder
values, said Caesars twicce refused his request for a board
seat.  "My advisers felt that, had I given you advance notice,
you would have used the time to throw up obstacles to my offer
rather than giving it serious consideration," he said.
    Sosnoff said he hopes that Caesars World management will be
willing to negotiate an acquisition agreement with him.
    "As I have indicated publicly in the past, I believe
operating management of the company has performed well and that
appropriate consideration should be given to a significant
equity interest for them in the company following the
acquisition," Sosnoff said in the letter to Gluck.
    MTS said Sosnoff has asked the company to fix March 27 as
the record date for the determination of shareholders entitled
to authorize action without a meeting -- including the election
or removal of directors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3025>
Casino owner and real estate developer
Donald Trump has offered to acquire all Class B common shares
of Resorts International Inc, a spokesman for Trump said.
    The estate of late Resorts chairman James M. Crosby owns
340,783 of the 752,297 Class B shares.
    Resorts also has about 6,432,000 Class A common shares
outstanding. Each Class B share has 100 times the voting power
of a Class A share, giving the Class B stock about 93 pct of
Resorts' voting power.
 More
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3038>
Applied Circuit Technology Inc
(ACT) said it has agreed in principal to sell its primary
computer electronics business to the &lt;Sanpao Group> of San
Francisco.
    ACT said it has not disclosed the deal's terms, but added
that 50 pct of the sale price is in cash, with the remainder to
be paid over a two year period.
    The deal is expected to close on March 31, ACT said.
    ACT said it made the move to concentrate resources on its
pharmaceuticals subsidiaries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3039>
USAir Group Inc said it has
acquired 2,292,599 Piedmont Aviation Inc shares, about 9.9 pct
on a fully diluted basis, from Norfolk Southern Corp &lt;NSC>.
    The acquisition of Piedmont by USAir has been approved by
the directors of both companies.
    USAir said it has been advised by Norfolk Southern that the
company supports the proposed merger and intends to tender all
of its remaining 1,477,829 Piedmont common shares in response
to USAir's tender offer which began today. This total includes
shares issuable upon conversion of Piedmont preferred, USAir
noted.
    USAir said Piedmont has about 23.1 mln common shares on a
fully diluted basis, adding its offer is conditioned on the
tender of at least 9,309,394 shares, representing 40.2 pct of
the oustanding shares on a diluted basis.
    USAir said the 3,491,030 new shares it has an option to buy
represent 18.5 pct of Piedmont's currently outstanding shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3042>
Nationwide Cellular Service
Inc said it has completed the previously-announced acquisition
of privately-held Nova Cellular Co, a Chicago reseller of
mobile telephone service with 1,800 subscribers, for about
65,000 common shares.
    Nova Cellular has an accumulated deficit of about 650,000
dlrs and had revenues of about 2,600,000 dlrs for 1986, it
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3053>
McDowell Enterprises Inc said
it has signed a definitive agreement to acquire an 80 pct
interest in privately held Interpharm Inc for a 19.9 pct
interest in McDowell.
    The company said subject to contigencies, including future
sales and profit levels, McDowell could over a four-year period
acquire 100 pct of Interpharm in exchange for up to 51 pct of
McDowell's voting stock.
    It said the transaction is expected to be completed within
60 days, at which time the McDowell board would be restructured
to include Interpharm management. 
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3056>
Regie Nationale des Usines Renault
&lt;RENA.PA> said it and Chrysler Corp &lt;C> have signed a letter of
intent in which Chrysler plans to buy American Motors Corp
&lt;AMO.N>, 46 pct owned by Renault.
    Renault President Raymond Levy said in a statement issued
by the French state car group the agreement was an important
stage in Renault's redeployment. "It will allow Renault to
continue its export programme to the U.S. And also opens a
perspective of cooperation with a major American constructor,"
the statement said. Under the terms of the letter of intent,
Chrysler will purchase Renault's stake held in the form of
bonds and shares.
    The Renault statement quoted Chrysler Chairman Lee Iacocca
as saying, "We welcome AMC shareholders into the Chrysler
family."
    He added that the accord would allow Renault and Chrysler
to study the development of future products destined to be
distributed by Renault and Chrysler in the North American and
world markets.
    "Renault is a leader in our industry and I am happy to be
working with them," Iacocca was quoted as saying.
    Chrysler will pay for Renault's AMC interests held in bonds
by a 200 mln dlr bond and will pay up to 350 mln dlrs for
Renault share interests, depending on AMC sales and future
profits, the Renault statement said.
    The statement said the agreement in principle gave each
side 30 days to put together a definitive accord. Approval
would also be necessary from the Renault, Chrysler and AMC
boards, from AMC shareholders and the relevant government
authorities.
    If the deal goes ahead, the statement said, AMC
shareholders other than Renault will receive Chrysler shares
for each of their shares valued at four dlrs.
    AMC shareholders with convertible preferential shares will
have the possibility to exchange them for Chrysler shares on
the same conditions as those they would have had in exchanging
them for AMC shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3063>
Sweden's Stora Kopparbergs Bergslags
AB &lt;SKPS ST> said it had now acquired 90 pct of shares in rival
pulp and paper makers Papyrus AB, thus passing the threshold
above which it can compulsorily buy the rest of the company.
    Remaining shareholders would have until later this month to
sell their shares to Stora, the company said in a statement.
    Stora announced last September it would acquire Papyrus at
a price of 5.8 billion crowns, thus forming Europe's second
largest forest group after London-based Reed International Plc
&lt;REED L>.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3069>
White Engine, a manufacturer of
industrial and automotive diesel and gasoline engines with more
than 100 mln dlrs in sales, said it has been sold to a group of
group investors.
    White Engine said the purchase is led by Donald Stewart, a
private investment banker, along with White senior executives.
    A source close to the transaction said the purchase prices
is being set at more than 55 mln dlrs.
    The company said it will change its name to Hercules
Engines Inc, and Stewart will be the majority interest owner,
as well as the president and chief executive officer.
    In addition, John Lennon, current chairman and chief
executive officer, will remain as chairman, he company said.
And Joseph G. Scheetz, currently president, will be vice
chairman, according to the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3071>
Sweden's Stora Kopparbergs Bergslags
AB &lt;SKPS.ST> said it has now acquired 90 pct of shares in rival
pulp and paper makers Papyrus AB, thus passing the threshold
above which it can compulsorily buy the rest of the company.
    Remaining shareholders would have until later this month to
sell their shares to Stora, the company said in a statement.
    Stora announced last September it would acquire Papyrus at
a price of 5.8 billion crowns, thus forming Europe's second
largest forest group after London-based Reed International Plc
&lt;REED L>.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3072>
Allegheny International Inc said it
has entered into an agreement to merge with an affiliate of
First Boston Inc's &lt;FPC> First Boston Corp in a transaction
valued at about 500 mln dlrs.
    Allegheny said the agreement calls for holders of its
common to receive 24.60 dlrs a share. Holders of the company's
2.19 dlrs cumulative preference shares will receive 20 dlrs a
share and those owning its 11.25 dlrs convertible preferred
will receive 87.50 dlrs a share.
    Allegheny International said the agreement calls for the
First Boston affiliate to start a cash tender offer for all
outstanding shares of Allegheny's common, cumulative preferred
and convertible preferred.
    The company said First Boston has committed to provide all
financing necessary to acquire such securities in the tender
offer which is estimated to be about 500 mln dlrs.
    It said the agreement is also subject to the waiver by
March 13 of certain conditions under the company's existing
bank credit agreement.
    Allegheny International's statement did not name or
describe the First Boston affiliate involved in the agreement.
    It did say the offer for the company's stock will be
conditioned also on the valid tender of securities representing
at least a majority of the voting power for the election of
directors of the company and the valid tender of at least two
third's of the outstanding cumulative preferred and convertible
preferred shares.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3085>
BSN Corp said its agreement to sell
1,750,000 new common shares, or a 25 pct interest, to 31
unaffiliated European institutional investors for 30.4 mln dlrs
has become definitive.
    The company said closing is expected shortly after the
filing of a registration statement with the Securities and
Exchange Commission, which is expected to be made this month.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3086>
Gencorp said its RKO General
subsidiary agreed to sell KHJ-TV in Los Angeles to Walt Disney
Co &lt;DIS> for 217 mln dlrs cash plus working capital and other
adjustments at closing.
    The company said under the agreement in principle, RKO's
application to renew the station's broadcast license would be
dismissed and the competing application of Fidelity Television
would be granted. Disney would then acquire privately held
Fidelity for about 103 mln dlrs and other adjustments.
    Renewal of the KHJ-TV license has been challenged in
regulatory proceedings for more than 20 years.
    The deal is subject to prior approval by the Federal
Communications Commission, the company said.
    Late in 1985, Gencorp cut a deal with Fidelity, a Los
Angeles investor group, and Westinghouse Electric Corp &lt;WX> to
settle the license proceedings and sell KHJ-TV for 313 mln
dlrs, 70 pct of which would go to Westinghouse and the
remainder to Fidelity. But on Jan 28, 1987, Westinghouse
withdrew from the deal because the FCC would not approve it.
    In early 1986, Gencorp and RKO agreed to sell WOR-TV in
Secaucus, N.J., to MCA Inc &lt;MCA> for 387 mln dlrs. The FCC has
approved the transaction, but several parties have appealed.
    The FCC has not said when it would rule on the appeals,
according to a spokemsan for Akron, Ohio-based Gencorp.
    Fidelity Television originally filed a competing
application for the RKO license for KHJ, an independent
station, in 1965.
    In 1980, the FCC disqualified RKO as licensee of WNAC-TV in
Boston, citing anti-competitive trade practices and inaccurate
financial reporting to the agency, causing renewals previously
granted to RKO in New York, for WOR, and Los Angeles, for KHJ,
to be denied.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3089>
Imatron Inc said
Mitsui and Co Ltd of Japan has purchased a two mln dlr equity
interest in Imatron at market price and was granted a 120-day
option to make another two mln dlr investment at the same price.
    Imatron said Mitsui, the exclusive importer of Imatron's
Ultrafast computed tomography scanners into Japan, is scheduled
to take delivery of its first scanner next month for
installation in a large cardiology center.
    It said it has entered into preliminary discussions with
Mitsui on the formation of a joint venture to finance the
accelerated development of Imatron's technology and its
commercialization in Japan.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3093>
Control Data Corp said it
agreed to acquire Unisys Inc's &lt;UIS> 13 pct stake in &lt;Magnetic
Peripherals Inc>.
    The letter of intent provides that Unisys converts from an
owner in Magnetic Peripherals to a customer of Control Data's
data storage products group over a two year period.
    Under the agreement, Control Data will continue to furnish
disk drives to Unisys, it said.
    No other details of the proposed agreement were available.
    Magnetic Controls, managed by the data storage products
group of Control Data, was founded in 1975 as a joint venture
to maintain a technological base in data storage, and supply
peripheral equipment for the computer systems of its owners.
    The venture has become a developer and manufacturer of high
performance, high-capacity data storage products sold by
Control Data to computer systems manafacturers worldwide, it
said.
    After conversion of the Unisys interest, Control Data will
own 80 pct, Honeywell Inc &lt;HON>, 14 pct and Bull S.A. of
France, six pct, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3094>
Casino hotel operator and real estate
developer Donald Trump said he has agreed to purchase the Class
B common stock of Resorts International Inc held by the family
and estate of late Resorts chairman James Crosby for 135 dlrs
per share.
    Trump said he is also considering a tender offer for
remaining Class B shares at the same price but has no interest
in Resorts' Class A shares.
    Trump said the shares he has agreed already to buy
represent a 78 pct interest in the Class B stock. The estate
itself owns 340,783 of the 752,297 Class B shares. There are
also about 6,432,000 Class A shares outstanding, but Trump said
"I have no interest in the Class A shares."
    Each Class B share has 100 times the voting power of a
Class A share.
    In Atlantic City, Resorts said in a statement that the
Class B shares being sold to Trump represents 73 pct of the
combined voting power in Resorts.
    It said closing is dependent on receipt of necessary
regulatory approvals and other matters, and after closing,
Trump will tender for remaining Class B shares at the same
price.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3095>
USAir Group Inc said a U.S. District
Court in Pittsburgh issued a temporary restraining order to
prevent Trans World Airlines Inc from buying additional USAir
shares.
    USAir said the order was issued in response to its suit,
charging TWA chairman Carl Icahn and TWA violated federal laws
and made misleading statements.
    TWA last week said it owned 15 pct of USAir's shares. It
also offered to buy the company for 52 dlrs a share cash or 1.4
billion dlrs.
 More
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3096>
Grease Monkey Holding Corp said it has
received and rejected an unsolicited merger offer from Jiffy
Lube International Inc &lt;LUBE>.
    The company said the proposal involved an exchange of
Grease Monkey common stock for a combination of Jiffy Lube
securities with an estimated current value substantially below
Grease Monkey's current market
 price.
    It said it will not disclosed details.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3100>
Chrysler Corp said it agreed in
principle with French state-owned Renault to acquire American
Motors Corp., in which Renault is controlling shareholder,
under a deal in which AMC stockholders other than Renault would
receive Chrysler common stock with a market value of four dlrs
for each AMC common share they hold.
    Chrysler said the letter of intent for the deal, which
needs government and AMC shareholder and board approval,
provides that AMC holders will receive not more than .0840 or
less than .0687 of a share of Chrysler common for each share of
AMC common they hold.
 more
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3107>
Dixie Yarns Inc and &lt;TI-CARO
Inc> jointly said they signed a merger agreement calling for
Dixie to acquire all TI-CARO's stock in exchange for three mln
of Dixie's common.
    The companies said the previously announced merger has been
approved by TI-CARO's board and is expected to close by early
April.
    They said the revenues of the combined companies will be
over 600 mln dlrs, and Dixie said the merger will not dilute
its 1987 results. TI-CARO was taken private in 1984 in a
management led leveraged buy-out.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3120>
PPG Industries Inc said a group of
investors led by &lt;Sterling Group> of Houston said it has agreed
to acquire PPG's ethylene products business, including its
inteest in an ethylene glycols joint venture with du Pont Co
&lt;DD> in Beaumont, Texas, for undisclosed terms.
    The company said completion is expected in the second
quarter.
    It said the business had sales of over 50 mln dlrs in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3129>
Norcros &lt;NCRO.L> Plc said it has no
intention of proceeding any further with talks on Williams
Holdings Plc's suggestion that there would be benefits arising
from a merger between the two groups.
    Norcros said any such benefits could be achieved through
normal trading and did not warrant a closer formal association.
    Norcros shares firmed 30p to 342p after the news on
investor speculation of a possible hostile bid from Williams,
dealers said. Williams rose 2p to 742.
    Williams earlier informed Norcros that it holds some
2,890,000 of its ordinary shares or 2.2 pct of those issued.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3139>
American Motors Corp said it
is studying a proposed merger with Chrysler Corp.
    American Motors said it received a letter from Chrysler
Corp "advising us of their proposal to enter into a merger
transaction with American Motors Corp."
    In a brief statement, the company said, "We are studying
the proposal. We will have further comment when it is
appropriate."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3142>
American Express Co's stock fell
sharply, reflecting, in part, investors' disappointment that
the company did not make an announcement about its plans for
brokerage unit Shearson Lehman Brothers, traders said.
    The company has said it is studying options for its
Shearson unit. Traders said many investors anticipated an
announcement this weekend that it would spin off Shearson
Lehman. Also, they said, a flurry of arbitrage related sell
programs that pounded the general market today accelerated the
selloff of American Express, a component of the Dow Industrial
Average. American Express fell 3-1/8 to 77-3/8.
    "It was part programs and part that there was anticipation
of an announcement of a spinoff or something with Shearson this
weekend, and that announcement never happened," one trader
said.
    In the last few minutes of trading on Friday, another
trader said, the stock jumped to close up 3-3/8, largely on
anticipation that the company would make a weekend
announcement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3152>
The United Auto Workers &lt;UAW> union said
it supports Chrysler Corp's proposal to buy American Motors
Corp as creating "a good match that potentially points the way
to a more secure future for workers at both companies."
    "We believe our members' interests can be well served
within the Chrysler family, and we are committed to making that
happen," UAW president Owen Bieber and vice president Marc
Stepp said in a statement.
    "We believe Chrysler's purchase is a logical and sound step
for all concerned," the union said.
    The UAW is negotiating with AMC over the carmaker's demand
for economic concessions covering workers at its Wisconsin
operations, without which AMC has said it would cease vehicle
production at its Kenosha, Wisconsin, assembly plant by 1989.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3153>
A Transworld Airlines Inc official said
the airline has no comment on USAir Group Inc's planned buyout
of Piedmont Aviation Inc.
    TWA, however, has pursued its application with the
Department of Transportation for a takeover of USAir, according
to Mark Buckstein, TWA general counsel and vice president. TWA
filed a revised application today, following the DOT's
rejection Friday of an incomplete application filed last week.
    Earlier USAir said it agreed to buy Piedmont for 69 dlrs
cash per share.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3154>
Moody's Investors Service Inc said it
may downgrade 120 mln dlrs of debt of Piedmont Aviation Inc
because of the airline's agreement to be acquired by USAir
Group Inc &lt;U>.
    The rating agency said its review would focus on the effect
of the acquisition on Piedmont's financial leverage and its
debt-service requirements. Moody's said it is also examining
the potential use of the airline's borrowing capacity to
finance the merger.
    Piedmont currently carries Baa-2 preferred stock and
Prime-2 commercial paper.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3157>
Moody's Investors Service Inc said the
212.75 mln dlrs of debt of USAir Group Inc and its USAir Inc
unit remain under review for possible downgrade.
    The rating agency cited USAir Group's proposed acquisition
of Piedmont Aviation Inc &lt;PIE>, as well as Trans World Airlines
Inc's &lt;TWA> proposed cash merger with USAir.
    However, the status of TWA's bid for USAir Group is
currently uncertain. The U.S. Transportation Department has
rejected TWA's application to acquire USAir on deficiency
grounds, but TWA has said it will file a revised application,
Moody's noted.
    Under Moody's review for possible downgrade are USAir
Group's Baa-1 senior debt and Baa-2 subordinated debentures,
along with the USAir unit's A-3 senior debt and Baa-1
subordinated debentures.
    Moody's said it would examine the effects of the proposed
mergers on USAir Group's financial measurements, as well as
potential damage to the company's financial flexibility because
of the probability of increased debt-service requirements.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3166>
An appeal by Buitoni SpA against a court
ruling that an accord under which it was to acquire Italian
state food firm SME - Societa Meridionale Finanziaria was not
contractually binding has been rejected, court officials said.
    An appeal court rejected Buitoni's claim that the 497
billion lire accord with the state industrial company IRI -
Istituto per la Ricostruzione Industriale was a binding
contract. The decision upholds a court ruling of last July.
    Buitoni is controlled by CIR - Compagnie Industriali
Riunite, an investment company itself controlled by Ing C
Olivetti EC SpA (OLIV.MI> chairman Carlo De Benedetti.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3168>
Allegheny International Inc,
the consumer products concern that today announced a merger
agreement with a First Boston Corp &lt;FBC> affiliate in a deal
worth about 500 mln dlrs, said it intends to divest more units
as a way to increase profits.
    "We're going to reduce AI to a size consistent with our
financial resources," said Chairman Oliver S. Travers.
    "We have made a conscious, strategic choice to become a
smaller, financially sound, consumer products company which
operates predominantly in the stable political and economic
environment of North America," he said.

</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3174>
Graham-McCormick Oil and Gas
Partnership said it completed the sale of interests in two
major oil and gas fields to &lt;Energy Assets International Corp>
for 21 mln dlrs.
    The company said it sold about one-half of its 50 pct
interest in the Oak Hill and North Rucias fields, its two
largest producing properties.
    It said it used about 20 mln dlrs of the proceeds to prepay
principal on its senior secured notes. Semi-annual principal
payments on the remaining 40 mln dlrs of notes have been
satisfied until December 1988 as a result, it said.
    The company said the note agreements were amended to
reflect an easing of some financial covenants, and an increase
of interest to 13.5 pct from 13.0 pct until December 1990.
    It said the noteholders exercise price for 1,125,000
warrants was also reduced to 50 cts from 1.50 dlrs.
    The company said Energy Assets agreed to share the costs of
increasing production at the Oak Hill field.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3176>
Advanced Tobacco Products Inc
said it has ended talks on being acquired by Sterling Drug Inc
&lt;STY> but has resumed acquisition talks with other parties.
    The company had previously announced that a "major U.S.
based company" that it did not identify was evaluating its
nicotine technology.
    Advanced said Sterling's board has decided not to enter the
nicotine product market.
    It said it received a 200,000 dlr payment to deal
exclusively with Sterling through March Six.
    Advanced said it had suspended merger talks with other
parties as a result of the exclusivity agreement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3180>
T.H.E. Fitness INc said it
agreed to buy Livingwell Inc's manufacturing unit, Powercise
INternational Inc, for 11.0 mln T.H.E. Fitness shares valued at
about 30 mln dlrs.
    This acquisition includes all of Livingwell's rights to its
recently announced Powercise fitness equipment.
    IN a separate transaction, Livingwell INc, an operator of
300 health clubs, placed a six mln dlrs order with Powercise
INternational to install the Powercise equipment in all of its
clubs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3184>
BankAmerica Corp's Bank of America
unit said it completed the previously announced sale of
BankAmerica Finance Ltd to &lt;Bank of Ireland> for an expected
pre-tax gain of 23 mln dlrs.
    BankAmerica Finance provides residential mortgages in south
east England.
    Its total assets at the end of 1986 were about 1.2 mln
dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3198>
The proposed 757 mln dlr deal under
which Chrysler Corp would acquire American Motors Corp was
described by analysts as a reasonable deal for both companies.
    Ronald Glantz of Montgomery Securities said AMC common
stock could be fairly valued at "just under five dlrs a share"
given changes brought by tax reform and that Chrysler's offer
to pay four dlrs a share of Chrysler stock to AMC holders other
than Renault as a "a good price for Chrysler.
    AMC common shares opened at four dlrs this morning after
the Renault-Chrysler announcement, up 3/8, while Chrysler
shares lost 1/4 to 52-1/4.
    Though AMC issued a statement saying that it was studying
the proposed buyout and had no other comment, Glantz said he
regarded the proposal as a "done deal" because "I can't believe
anybody else would make a bid."
    "It's a reasonable deal for both sides," the analyst told
Reuters.
    "Chrysler gets the jeep franchise and the (new AMC)
Bramalea, Ontario, plant and the (new Renault) Premier
(mid-sized car) and AMC's sales will go up because buyers will
have more confidence that the manufacturer will still be around
to service the products," Glantz said.
    Analyst Thomas O'Grady said Chrysler would be getting more
manufacturing capacity, including a brand-new plant in Canada,
for a bargain price and Renault would be getting some return
after its prolonged loss-making investment in AMC.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3205>
Supermarkets General Corp said
it received an unsolicited proposal from a third party to
acquire the company at 41.75 dlrs per share in cash.
    Supermarkets also said it retained Shearson Lehman Brothers
Inc to advise its board of directors on the proposal.
    Supermarkets General currently has about 38.5 mln shares
outstanding.
    Its stock is currently trading at 34-1/4 on the New York
Stock Exchange.
    The Woodbridge, N.J., supermarket operator of over 180
supermarkets and other specialty retail stores, convenience
food stores and drug stores.
    For the nine months ended November 30, Supermarkets
reported net income of 41.7 mln dlrs.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3216>
Sharon Steel Corp said it extended
from March six to March 31 the expiration date for its debt
exchange offer to allow time to complete the sale of its
Mueller Brass Co unit and to meet other conditions of the
offer.
    The exchange offer covers Sharon's outstanding 13.5 pct
subordinated sinking fund debentures due 2000 and its 14.25 pct
subordinated sinking fund debentures due 1990.
    Sharon said that as of March six, 31.6 pct of the 13.5 pct
notes and 20.9 pct of the 14.25 pct notes were tendered. The
Mueller sale is conditioned on receipt of 80 pct of the notes.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3223>
A small investor group led by Melvyn
Gelch, a Providence, R.I., surgeon, told the Securities and
Exchange Commission it has acquired 60,840 shares of Datarex
Systems Inc, or 5.5 pct of the total outstanding common stock.
    The Gelch group said it bought the stake for about 935,000
dlrs for investment purposes only.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3229>
Leon Greenblatt, a Chicago investor,
told the Securities and Exchange Commission he has acquired
89,450 shares of Technology Development Corp, or 5.3 pct of the
total outstanding common stock.
    Greenblatt said he bought the stock for 350,000 dlrs soley
as an investment and has no intention of seeking control of the
company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3239>
Harris Associates L.P., a Chicago
investment advisory firm, said it cut its stake in Cyclops Corp
to 437,425 shares, or 11.1 pct of the total outstanding common
stock, from 524,775 shares, or 13.3 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Harris said it sold 87,350 Cyclops common shares between Jan 6
and March 2 at prices ranging from 65.75 to 91.00 dlrs a share.
    Harris said its dealings in Cyclops common stock were made
on behalf of its advisory clients.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3241>
Chrysler Corp said it valued its
proposed buyout of American Motors Corp at 757 mln dlrs, not
counting the effect of a contingent payment that could reach
350 mln dlrs based on AMC's future profits.
    A Chrysler spokesman told Reuters that the letter of intent
signed with Renault, AMC's controlling shareholder with a 46.2
pct direct stake, includes a provision for Renault to be paid
35 mln dlrs in cash for AMC's finance subsidiary and 200 mln
dlrs in the form of an eight pct note. He said he did not know
the maturity of the note.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3242>
Dart Group &lt;DARTA> is likely seeking to
buy Supermarkets General &lt;SGL>, analysts said.
    "There's been rumors that they've taken a position in the
company, said Wood Gundie analyst Edward Comeau.
    Last year, Dart Group, owner of Auto Trak INc and Crown
Books, competed against Kohlberg, Kravis to acquire Safeway
Stores INc.
    The company later reached an accord under which it would
buy 20 pct of the company after Kohlberg Kravis completed its
leveraged buyout of the company.
    The company later sold its 20 pct stock for about 180 mln
to 200 mln dlrs, according to analysts.
     Dart Group Corp was not immediately available for comment.
    Jerry Ballan, analyst with Conner Ballan division of Edward
Viner and Co, said, "They &lt;Dart> has been rumored to be buying
some other supermarkets as well, such as Stop and Shop."
    "My guess is that Supermarkets General does not want to be
bought out," said Ballan.
    Analysts, however, said Supermarkets General is facing
problems due to its Purity Supreme and Rickels operations,
which might make it difficult to thwart a bid.
    Supermarkets General is expected to report about 1.70 dlrs
a share compared to a 1.73 dlrs a share reported for 1985 on a
post stock split basis.
    For the first quarter, Comeau predicts the company will
earn 39 cts a share from 35 cts a share a year ago, and should
earn about 2.05 dlrs for 1987.
    "But that estimation could go to a 1.80 dlrs easily, due to
Purity Supreme in New England," Comeau said.
    He said competition among supermarkets is getting heated in
that area and that the company has had difficulty with
integrating Purity Supreme with its Pathmark store operations.
    Rickels, a home center business, has faced problems due to
the state of that industry, and has reported lower returns as
an operating unit, according to analysts.
    Analysts said that if Dart buys Supermarkets General it
would probably divest the company's operations.
    Analyst Comeau said "supermarkets general may seek a
combination with another supermarket company."
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3251>
Consolidated Grandview Inc said it
acquired a 60 pct stake in &lt;All Ticket Group PLC>, of London,
for undisclosed terms. The seller was also undisclosed.
    All Ticket is a special events travel company with
exclusive European rights to UAL Inc &lt;UAL>'s United Airlines
Apollo system, booking all United Airlines flights in Britain
and Europe. All Ticket and its subsidiaries will also
co-sponsor various events this year including the British Open
golf tournament and rowing's Henley Regatta.
    Its 1986 revenues totaled 12 mln Canadian dlrs.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3252>
United Cities Gas Co said it
has acquired Lyle Propane Gas Co, a Cairo, Ga., propane gas
distributor, for undisclosed terms.
    It said Lyle has sales of about four mln gallons annually
and serves about 4,000 customers in seven counties in southwest
Georgia and north Florida.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3261>
&lt;MTS Acquisition Corp's>
28-dlr-per-share offering price for Caesars World Inc is
thought to be much too low and is likely to attract other
suitors for the hotel/casino company, industry analysts said.
    "I think someone else will probably come in, or they (MTS)
will have to raise their bid," said Marvin Roffman, an analyst
at Janney Montgomery Scott Inc.
    MTS, a company formed by Martin Sosnoff, Caesars World's
largest shareholder, today began a tender offer, valued at
725.2 mln dlrs, for all shares Sosnoff doesn't already own.
    "I think the offer is too low by at least five points,"
said Roffman, who described Caesars World as the operator of
"one of the finest casinos in the world."
    Sosnoff, a New York investor, already owns 13.3 pct of
Caesars World's 30.3 mln shares.
    Following news of the tender offer Caesars World's shares
were trading at 27-7/8, up 3-3/8.
    A Caesars World spokesman said the company was declining
comment on the Sosnoff move for the moment, but Caesars may
issue a public statement after it has studied the offer.
    Roffman said Caesars World has considerable growth
potential and he is forecasting fiscal 1988 earnings of two
dlrs per share.
    Caesars World owns casino hotels in Nevada and honeymoon
resorts in Pennsylvania's Pocono Mountains. It also controls
Caesars New Jersey Inc &lt;CJN>, which owns an Atlantic City,
N.J., casino hotel.
    For its fiscal year ended July 31 Caesars World reported
net income of 41 mln dlrs, or 1.36 dlrs per primary share.
    The company reported second quarter net income of 12.6 mln
dlrs, or 41 cts per share, compared with income of 7.5 mln
dlrs, or 25 cts per share a year earlier.
    Daniel Lee, an analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc, said
that although Sosnoff's relatively low bid may attract other
suitors willing to pay a higher price for Caesars, there is
little likelihood that a competing bid would start a battle for
the company.



</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3263>
Allegheny International Inc said its
chairman and chief operating officer will remain in their
positions following the merger of the company with an affiliate
of First Boston Corp.
   "It is expected that Oliver S. Travers will continue as
chairman, president and Chief executive officer, and Thomas J.
Albani will continue as chief operating officer," said an
Allegheny spokesman.
    Allegheny today said it agreed to a buyout from First
Boston at 24.60 dlrs per share. The transaction was valued at
500 mln dlrs. Its stock rose 8-5/8 to 24 in active trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3264>
Imperial Continental Gas Association
&lt;ICGS.L>, IC Gas, said its board is not making a recommendation
on the partial tender offfer at 710p per share announced by
&lt;Tractebel SA> and &lt;Groupe Bruxelles Lambert SA>.
    At the same time, however, the board would not recommend a
general offer for all the shares at a price of 710p, the
statement added.
    Shareholders wondering whether to tender either to the
Tractebel consortium or to the rival 700p per share partial
offer from &lt;SHV Holdings NV> should consult professional
advisers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3266>
National Heathcare Inc said it
signed an agreement to sell five rural hospitals to a private
corporation for about 18 mln dlrs, including the assumption of
six mln dlrs of debt.
    The company said it plans to complete the sales, which are
subject to various regulatory approvals, by the end of July.
    National Healthcare said it expects no material gain on
loss on the sales and that substantially all proceeds will be
used to reduce debt.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3267>
USX Corp chairman David Roderick called
for a lower value for the U.S. dollar against other currencies
to help speed a correction in the U.S. trade deficit, which
last year reached 170 billion dlrs.
    In remarks prepared for a speech before the Economic Club
of Detroit, Roderick said, "There should be total resolve that
the dollar versus other major currencies, as well as the
currencies of other nations having a substantial trade surplus
with us, must continue to decline so that the correction in our
trade deficit starts on the road to recovery."
    Roderick said the U.S. should be understanding of the
"economic pain" our trading partners experience as a result of
a falling dollar.
    But, he added, "As painful as the correction may be to our
trading partners, it is less painful than leaving the problem
uncorrected because that would lead us into an inevitable,
lengthy and steep world recession."
    Roderick said between February 1985 and December 1986 the
dollar fell by more than 40 pct in real terms against major
industrial currencies and by 30 to 35 pct against a broader
group of currencies of nearly all developing nations.
    At the end of 1986, he said, the value of foreign assets in
the U.S. exceeded the value of U.S. assets abroad by 240
billion dlrs, compared to five years ago when the U.S. had a
surplus in assets of 141 billion. A company spokesman said the
data were provided by economic consultants to USX.
    The primary reason for the trade imbalance was the 70 pct
rise of the dollar between 1980 and 1985, although other
factors were involved, Roderick said. But it is wrong, he said,
"to attribute the massive trade deficit to a fundmental
deterioration of U.S. productivity or of American product
quality."
    These areas need to be improved but they are not the root
cause of the trade gap problem, Roderick said. He urged
American manufacturers to become more competitive so they can
compete in global markets.
    In the speech, the USX chairman also called for changes in
securities laws to curb what he called abuses by corporate
raiders and speculators.
    Among his proposals, which he presented to the Senate
Banking Committee in testimony last week, were a requirement
that raiders give 24-hour notice for every one pct of stock
they acquire in a company.
    Roderick proposed that tender offers must be made for all
cash to all stockholders on equal terms and that raiders be
required to have financing in place before a tender is made.
    Further, raiders should be required to make an all-cash
tender offer once they acquire 10 pct of a target company's
stock, he said. And payment of greenmail, or a preferential
price by a target company to buy back a raider's stake, should
be prohibited under the revised laws.
    Roderick said changes were necessary to curb abuses but
that he did not want laws that would hurt the financial markets
or discourage "fair price to all" takeovers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3276>
Reading Co said it has agreed in
principle to convey properties it owns in and around the
Philadelphia Convention Center site to the city of Philadelphia
and the Philadelphia Convention Center Authority.
    It said in exchange it will receive about 23 mln dlrs in
cash, rights to acquire 22 acres adjacent to the Philadelphia
International Airport and an option to acquire the development
rights over the Gallery II shopping mall on Market Street in
downtown Philadelphia.
    Reading said it will be responsible for the demolition and
cleanup of certain of the properties, for which a portion of
the cash proceeds will be escrowed.
    The company said it will continue to own and operate the
Reading Terminal Market in Philadelphia.
    The land it is giving up amounts to about seven acrease and
includes part of the Reading Terminal Train Shed, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3277>
Montedison SpA &lt;MONI.MI> has acquired a 70
pct stake in &lt;Plant Cell Research Institute - PCRI> of
California from Atlantic Richfield Co &lt;ARC.N> for "several tens
of millions of dollars," a senior Montedison executive said.
    Renato Ugo, a member of Montedison's management committee,
told reporters that &lt;Stanford Research Institute International>
of Menlo Park, California, had acted as a partner in the
purchase, itself acquiring a stake in PCRI of under 10 pct.
    PCRI, based in Dublin, California has a biotechnology
research laboratory.
    Ugo said the price paid included outlays for the laboratory
technology and staff.
    He said other negotiations were under way with
biotechnology companies in the health care and diagnostics
sectors through Montedison's health care subsidiary &lt;Erbamont
NV>, but gave no details.
    "We hope they will be concluded by the year end," he said.
    Montedison currently invests around 30 billion lire a year
in biotechnology research and expects to increase this figure
to around 50 billion lire in the next few years.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3287>
Mathematical Applications Group
Inc said it has signed a letter of intent to sell all of its
operating business and will propose a plan of liquidation
following the sale.
    If the company is unsuccessful in obtaining the approvals
needed for the sale and liquidation, it said, the company may
be required to initiate reorganization proceedings under
federal bankruptcy law to facilitie the distribution of its
assets.
    Mathematical Applications said it tentatively agreed to
sell its direct marketing business to Pagex Inc for 400,000
dlrs plus an amount equal to the working capital of the
business at closing as well as a 1.7 mln dlr note payable in
installments over six years.
    Mathematical Applications said the business' working
capital is estimated to be about 600,000 dlrs.
    Pagex has been formed by Paul A. Goldner the owner of Pagex
Systems Inc, which is also engaged in the direct marketing
computer service business.
    Mathematical Applications said the tentative agreement
calls for Pagex to buy substantially all of the assets and
liabilities related to the direct marketing business and
continue to use the Mathematical Applications name.
    It said the sale is also subject to renegotiation of a real
estate lease and approval of a definitive agreement by the
company's board, stock holders and debenture holders.
    The company said it has obtained waivers from holders of
its six mln dlrs principal amount of debentures due March 31,
1993, to defer interest payments aggregating 270,000 dlrs
through March 31, 1987. The company said it will seek waivers
to defer these interest payments, and those due March 31, for
enough time to enable the company to accomplish the proposed
sale of its operations.
    Mathematical Applications said it is talking to debenture
holders, its landlord, a lessor of equipment to the marketing
operation and holders of other liabilities not being assumed by
Pagex to arrange distribution of assets after the proposed
sale, adding that these assets will be significantly less than
its liabilities.
    The company said it has obtained waivers from holders of
its six mln dlrs principal amount of debentures due March 31,
1993, to defer interest payments aggregating 270,000 dlrs
through March 31, 1987. The company said it will seek waivers
to defer these payments, and those due March 31, for enough
time to accomplish the proposed sale of its operations.
    Mathematical Applications said it is talking to debenture
holders, its landlord, a lessor of equipment to the marketing
operation and holders of liabilities Pages is not assuming to
arrange distribution of assets after the proposed sale, adding
these assets will be significantly less than its liabilities.
    As part of the distribution of assets, the company said, it
expects shareholders to receive an amount based on the bid
price of the company's stock, which was 1/16 on March five.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3290>
Financial Corp of America's
American Savings and Loan Association said it completed the
previously announced purchase of 16 retail savings branches
from Great Western Financial Corp's &lt;GWF> Great Western
Savings.
    American Savings said the purchases boost its deposits by
about 550 mln dlrs, but do not affect its asset base.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3295>
Johnson Products Co Inc said it
completed the sale of Debbie's School of Beauty Culture Inc and
the assets of Ultra Precise Beauty Boutique Inc to management.
    It said the sale price of 2,533,000 dlrs consisted of
700,000 dlrs cash, a secured promissory note for 1,506,000 dlrs
and the forgiveness of a debt of 327,000 dlrs owed by Johnson
Products to Debbie's School.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3298>
USAir Group Inc said it seeking two
billion dlrs in bank debt to complete its takeover of Piedmont
Aviation Inc &lt;PIE> and its pending acquisition of PS Group
Inc's Pacific Southwest Airlines.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission
that details its proposed 69 dlr a share cash tender offer for
Piedmont, USAir said Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co &lt;MHC>
"indicates its willingness" in a March 6 letter to provide up
to 500 mln dlrs of the financing.
    Manufacturers Hanover would also to act as agent for a bank
group to raise the rest of the financing, USAir said.
    USAir said a Manufacturers Hanover affiliate is currently
agent for its 400 mln dlrs revelving credit facility, which
would be replaced by the proposed two billion dlr financing.
    USAir put its total cost of completing the tender offer at
1.7 billion dlrs. Its Pacific Southwest takeover, which has
received federal approval and is due to come up for shareholder
approval later this month, is for 17 dlrs a share, or 400 mln
dlrs total.
    USAir said it has already bought 2.3 mln Piedmont common
shares, or 9.9 pct of the total outstanding from Norfolk
Southern Corp &lt;NSC> for 161.9 mln dlrs.
    The tender offer, which is being made through a USAir
subsidiary, USAG Acquisition Corp, would not be valid unless
USAir is left with more than half of Piedmont's total
outstanding common stock after the April 3 expiration.
    While negotiations on terms and interest rates of its bank
loans are not yet complete, USAir said it expects them to be in
the form of a one billion dlr two-year term loan and a one
billion dlr seven-year revolving credit facility.
    The company said it expects to repay the two-year loan
through equity, preferred and debt offerings and possibly
internal funds and the sale and/or leaseback of aircraft.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3302>
&lt;Jannock Ltd> said it acquired a 50 pct
interest in Intercon Security Ltd for five mln dlrs and
Intercon founders Brian Legge and Richard Grange will hold the
remaining 50 pct and will continue to manage the company.
    Intercon Security, employing 850 people, provides a full
range of security equipment and services, Jannock said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3309>
&lt;BCI Holdings Corp>  said its &lt;Beatrice
U.S. Food Corp> retained Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc to assist
in the sale of its national bottled water business.
    It said products of the subsidiary, based in Monterey Park,
Calif., are sold under the Arrowhead brand name in California
and Arizona, the Ozarka name in Texas and the Great Bear name
in 11 northeastern states.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3313>
Dart Group Corp said it offered to
buy Supermarkets General Corp for 41.75 dlrs per share in cash.
    Earlier Supermarkets General said an "unsolicited third
party" had made the offer. Analysts estimated the value at
about 1.6 billion dlrs, based on 38.5 mln shares outstanding.
    Kidder, Peabody and Co Inc told Dart that Kidder's
affiliate will be prepared to advance up to 750 mln dlrs on a
subordinated basis.


</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3320>
MTS Acquisition Corp said it will need
about 907 mln dlrs to acquire the 31,781,461 Caesars World Inc
shares not owned by its owner, Martin T. Sosnoff.
    The estimate came in MTS Acquisition's proxy statement to
Caesars World shareholders describing its offer of 28 dlrs a
share for their stock which was announced this morning.
    In that announcement, MTS Acquisition said its bank and
investor bankers felt they could provide financing totaling 975
mln dlrs for the offer.
    Sosnoff is Caesars World's largest shareholders with
4,217,675 of the company's shares. That is about 11.7 pct of
the outstanding stock on a fully diluted basis, the proxy said.
    Besides being the sole owner of MTS Acquisition, Sosnoff
owns 61 pct of Atalanta/Sosnoff Capital Corp's &lt;ATL> stock and
is chairman of that investment management and brokerage firm.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3336>
Theodore Cross, editor of Business
and Society Review, a business publication, said an investor
group he heads has offered to buy Harper and Row Publishers Inc
for 34 dlrs a share cash.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Cross said he proposed the takeover to the board of the New
York publishing house today.
    Cross, whose investor group includes his wife, Mary, said
they already hold 261,650 Harper and Row common shares, or 6.0
pct of the total outstanding common stock. They said they have
spent 3.5 mln dlrs on their stake so far.
    Cross said he proposed in a letter to Harper and Row that
the company be merged into a company Cross is forming.
    Suggesting that the total cost of completing the merger
would be 190 mln dlrs, Cross said he would use 20 mln dlrs of
his own money for the deal and up to 170 mln dlrs which would
be borrowed from the First National Bank of Boston under a
revolving credit facility the bank has agreed to provide.

</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3345>
Sensormatic Electronics
Corp said it upped its investment in CheckRobot Inc in the form
of 2.5 mln dlrs of convertible preferred stock, raising its
stake in CheckRobot to 42 pct from 37 pct on a fully diluted
basis.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3356>
The chiefs of Viacom International Inc
and &lt;National Amusements Inc> said they met and agreed to work
together to complete the previously announced merger of the two
companies "as expeditiously as possible."
    A spokeswoman for Viacom declined to say if the executives
had set a timetable for closing the deal.
    Viacom last week agreed to be acquired by National
Amusements for a combination of cash and stock with an
estimated value of 53 dlrs a share, or a total of about 3.4
billion dlrs.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3367>
National Distillers and
Chemical Corp said it completed the sale of Almaden Vineyards
Inc to Heublein Inc for about 128 mln dlrs.
    Heublein, a former subsidiary of RJR Nabisco Inc &lt;RJR>, was
recently acquired by &lt;Grand Metropolitan PLC>.
    Almaden, based in San Jose, Calif., makes and sells table
wines, champagnes and brandies as well as some premium wines
under the Charles Lefranc Cellars label.
 
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3372>
Prime Minister Brian Mulroney said the
government was considering selling Petro-Canada and the sale
would proceed if it were in the national interest to do so.
    Mulroney told the House of Commons assets of the huge oil
company would be examined before a decision was made, just as
other state-run companies were studied before being sold under
Ottawa's privatization program.
    "The government is going to examine assets of this nature
to ascertain if they continue to play an appropriate role in
public policy and we will make a determination as we have in
other cases," Mulroney told the daily question period.         
    Asked by opposition members to clairify Finance Minister
Michael Wilson's statement on Friday that Petro-Canada no
longer has any pubilic policy role, Mulroney said his
government has long promised to sell off companies that could
be better run by the private sector.
    Outside the House, Energy Minister Marcel Masse said
Petro-Canada would be worth between three and four billion dlrs
and, because of the size, could be difficult to sell.
    He also said he would prefer to see Canadians participating
in any privatization, but would not give any details on timing
of a sale.          
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3377>
The News Corp said the South China
Morning Post Ltd of Hong Kong become a wholly-owned subsidiary
March 7 as previously announced.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3378>
Richmond Hill Savings Bank and
&lt;Riverhead Savings Bank FSB> said they terminated their
previously announced merger negotiations.
    The banks gave no reason for ending the talks, which began
on January 14.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3381>
Ceasars Wold Inc said its board is
studying the unsolicited and conditional tender offer for all
its common shares at 28 dlrs per share from Martin T. Sosnoff.
    A company spokesman said the board expects to make a
recommendation "shortly", but could not specify a time period.
    Ceasars World Chairman Henry Gluck in a statement urged
shareholders not to take any action with respect to the offer
prior to the board's recommendation.
    Sosnoff made the offer directly to shareholders in a
newspaper advertisement through a company he formed, called MTS
Acquisition Corp. It expires April 3.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3384>
United Security Financial Corp of
Illinois said it has signed a letter of intent to buy Robert
Co. Brown and Co Inc's &lt;RCBI> MAGIC Insurance Group unit.
    Robert C. Brown and Co would receive newly issued United
Security stock. United Security said it is anticipated that
such stock would represent a substantial majority of the shares
outstanding after the merger.
    United Security's principal subsidiary is United Security
Life Insurance Co of Illinois. The MAGIC Group owns Pilgrim
Life Insurance Co of America and Middle Atlantic Life Insurance
Co.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3387>
(Warrington Inc) said it sold its shoe
divisions to Montreal-based (Taurus Footwear Inc) for
undisclosed terms.
    The divisions manufacture and distribute Greb, Hush
Puppies, Kodiak, and Santana brand shoes and had revenues of
about 69 mln dlrs last year, Warrington said. It said the sale
of the shoe divisions and the previous sale of its ski boot
businesses will result in an unspecified net gain.
    Warrington said it plans to concentrate on its Canstar
Sports Group Inc skate and athletic footwear division, the
largest ice skate manufacturer and distributor in the Western
world.
    Warrington said it decided to rationalize the balance of
its ski businesses, which is expected to result in a divestment
loss which could outweigh the net gains on the sales of its
shoe and ski boot divisions.
    Taurus said the acquisition is expected to increase its
annual sales to about 100 mln dlrs and make it Canada's largest
footwear manufacturer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3394>
A group of investment firms led by
Far Hills, N.J., investor Natalie Koether said it is seeking
information about the shareholders of Prime Medical Services
Inc, over which it has said it is seeking control.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group, which includes Shamrock Associates, included a March
6 letter to Prime which asks for a complete list of all
shareholders and their addresses.
    The group said it wants the information so it can contact
shareholders on issues, including election of an opposition
slate of directors to the board and other proxy contests.
    The Koether group's letter gives the company five days to
respond to its request. If there is no response from Prime
Medical, the group said it would consider the demand refused
and would take "other proper steps" to get the information.
    The group said it already holds 1,483,886 Prime Medical
shares, or 17.5 pct of the total. It said it has taken legal
action to try to force the company to set an annual meeting and
require all directors to stand for election.
    In a previous SEC filing, the group has said it has decided
to try to seek control of Prime Medical through a tender offer,
exchange offer, proxy contest or other ways.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3395>
Grand Metropolitan PLC said its
Grandmet USA Inc unit decided to sell its physical fitness and
exercise equipment business.
    The company said Morgan Stanely and Co Inc is advising it
on the sale of the business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3396>
Chrysler Corp's proposed acquisition of
American Motors Corp is valued at about 1.55 billion dlrs,
including the cost of acquisition and the 767 mln dlrs in
American Motor' debt that Chrysler will assume, analysts said.
    They said Chrysler's cost of acquisition was valued at  782
mln dlrs, paid in cash, notes and Chrysler shares.
    The analysts told Reuters that at a New York briefing
Chrysler treasurer Fred Zuckerman outlined his company's
agreement with Renault to assume AMC's debt as well as 332 mln
dlrs in unfunded pension liabilities, though the latter is not
included valuing the transaction.
    Analysts were generally positive on Chrysler's proposed
purchase of its much-smaller rival, but said they expected the
transaction would carry with it a short-term dilution in
Chrysler's earnings.
    A Chrysler financial source, speaking anonymously, told
Reuters that the proposed purchase price was smaller than it
would have been had a deal been struck last year because the
impact of the new U.S. tax law removes Chrysler's ability to
assume AMC's large reserve of tax-loss carryforwards
accumulated from its losses since 1980.
    "There were very serious discussions last fall but we
didn't pull it off," the source said in a reference to the
assassination in November of former Renault chairman Georges
Besse.
    "It's too bad because the tax benefits fell on the floor.
And Renault could have gotten a much better price if we'd done
it before the end of last year."
    In addition to AMC's debt and its pension liabilities, the
source said Chrysler would also assume any liability from
lawsuits over the safety of Jeeps, which he called "an overhang
to the company."
    Analysts quoted Chrysler officials as having told them that
the deal includes payment to Renault of 200 mln dlrs principal
in the form of a 10-year note at eight pct interest, 35 mln
dlrs cash for Renault's equity in AMC's finance subsidiary, 25
mln dlrs in cash for "transaction fees" in connection with the
acquisition and 522 mln dlrs worth of Chrysler stock to be paid
AMC shareholders.
    "The big number is the 767 mln dlrs in debt assumption,"
analyst Jack Kirnan of Kidder Peabody and Co told Reuters.
     Moody's Investors Service Inc said it may downgrade 12
billion dlrs of Chrysler Corp and unit debt due to the deal.
     But the Chrysler source said that in assuming AMC's
liabilities, his company will refinance at a lower rate any AMC
debt that is being carried at "non-market" rates.
    He said there were difficulties in negotiating with the
previous Renault management on the acquisition because they
were committed to the group's business plan of which AMC was an
integral part.
    "The new management didn't have that problem - AMC wasn't
their baby," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3399>
Washington National Corp's
Washington National Insurance Co said it bought the remaining
15 pct of United Presidential Corp's &lt;UPCO> outstanding shares
at 19 dlrs a share cash.
    The acquisition of the shares is part of a plan of exchange
approved by United Presidential shareholders at a special
meeting March 6.
    The purchase of the remaining United Presidential stake
follows Washington National's buying 85 pct of United
Presidential in a 19 dlrs a share tender offer which terminated
December 12.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3400>
Conagra Inc said it completed the
merger of its Sea-Alaska Products Co unit and &lt;Trident Seafoods
Corp.>
    Conagra said the new company, in which it holds a 45 pct
stake, will be called Trident Seafoods Corp. Charles Bundrant,
president of Trident before the merger, was named president of
the new company, Conagra said.
    Conagra said it also completed the previously announced
acquisition of &lt;Bristol Monarch Corp> and that Trident
completed the purchase of the remaining 50 pct stake of &lt;San
Juan Seafoods Inc.>
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3409>
Bancroft Convertible Fund Inc said it
filed a lawsuit in federal court in Newark, N.J., seeking to
block a hostile 30 dlr a share takeover offer by &lt;Zico
Investment Holdings Inc.>
    Bancroft said the suit also names Michael B. Javett,
principal officer of Zico, and First Fidelity Bancorp's &lt;FFB>
First Fidelity Bank unit, the depositary for Zico's offer.
    Bancroft said the suit also names &lt;Georgeson and Co Inc>,
Zico's information agent, and &lt;Luthie Intercontinentale Inc>, a
Panamanian corporation.
    Bancroft said its complaint alleges that Zico's tender
offer materials include false and misleading information and
that the offer violates the Investment Company Act of 1940.
    The company said its stockholders approved proposals that
will insure that it remains independent.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3413>
Financier Carl Lindner, who holds a
16.2 pct stake in Taft Broadcasting Co, told the Securities and
Exchange Commission he has discussed with the company the
possibility of seeking control of it.
    Lindner, the Cincinnati, Ohio, investor who controls
American Financial Corp, said his talks with some of Taft's
managers and directors have been aimed at "achieving an
increased ownership position" in the company.
    Lindner said his increase in ownership would be made either
by making an offer to acquire control of Taft or taking part in
a group to acquire the company.
    Lindner, who holds his Taft stake through American
Financial and its subsidiaries, said he is also considering
buying more Taft stock on the open market or in private deals.
    He did not say whether the talks with Taft officials led to
any agreements or understandings.
    But Lindner said he intends to review his investment in
Taft and may be involved in further talks or take other steps
regarding the future control and direction of Taft.
    Lindner's investor group recently raised its Taft stake to
1,489,298 shares, or 16.2 pct from 1,439,498 shares, or 15.6
pct, after buying 49,800 shares for a total of 5.8 mln dlrs.
    Although he recently received clearance from the Federal
Trade Commission to raise his stake in the company to 24.9 pct,
Lindner in previous SEC filings has always stressed that his
interest in Taft was for investment only and not was not
seeking to control the company.
    An investor group headed by members of the wealthy Bass
family of Fort Worth, Texas, also holds about 24.9 pct of
Taft's common stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3415>
An investor group that includes T.
Boone Pickens III said it set a deadline of 1600 EST on March
11 for its offer to acquire Japan Fund Inc.
    The group, which also includes &lt;Sterling Grace Capital
Management Inc LP> and &lt;Anglo American Security Fund LP>, said
it was willing to deposit in escrow 100,000 Japan Fund shares,
worth about two mln dlrs, to insure its ability to obtain
financing if Japan Fund approves its offer.
    The group said Japan Fund has not responded to its offer,
worth about 525 mln dlrs at current market prices.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3416>
A group of affiliated firms led by
Warburg, Pincus Capital Co L.P., a New York venture capital and
investment partnership, said it has acquired 1,920,527 shares
of Symbion Inc, or 25.5 pct of the total outstanding.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the Warburg Pincus group said it bought the stake for
investment purposes.
    Although the group said it is considering buying more
shares of Symbion, it said it has no plans to seek control of
the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3417>
Kindness N.V., a Bahamas-based firm
owned by U.K. investor and Bahamas resident John Templeton,
said it has acquired 137,900 shares of Hausereman Inc, or 5.9
pct of the total outstanding common stock.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Templeton said he bought the shares for investment purposes
only and has no intention of seeking control of the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3418>
A group of affiliated investment
firms led by Bermuda-based Fidelity International Ltd and
Boston-based FMR Corp, told the Securities and Exchange
Commission it raised its stake in McGill Manufacturing Co Inc.
    The group said it raised its stake to 88,580 shares, or 6.2
pct of the total outstanding common stock, after buying 14,135
McGill common shares between Jan 19 and March 2 at prices
ranging from 33.57 to 34.57 dlrs a share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3422>
Louart Corp, a Los Angeles investment
firm, said it raised its stake in Certron Corp to 237,000
shares, or 7.8 pct of the total outstanding common stock, from
164,000 shares, or 5.4 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Louart said it bought 73,000 Certron shares between Sept 9 and
March 6 at a total of 109,315 dlrs a share.
    It said its dealings in Certron were for investment only,
but said it might increase its stake. It said it has no plans
to seek control of the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3425>
Hogan Systems Inc said it acquired
&lt;Systems 4 Inc> of Durango, Colo., for 1.7 mln dlrs.
    Hogan said Systems 4 provides integrated applications
software and processing services to about 30 community banks.
    Systems 4 has revenues of 1.5 mln dlrs a year, Hogan said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3459>
West German retail group Kaufhof AG
&lt;KFHG.F> is considering taking a stake in shipping and
transport group Hapag-Lloyd AG &lt;HPLG.F> but has yet to reach a
final decision, a spokesman said in response to queries.
    Press reports said Kaufhof wanted a stake of up to 12.5 pct
in Hapag-Lloyd.
    The Kaufhof spokesman noted any decision on purchasing
shares in the shipping group would have to be approved by the
supervisory board, which is due to hold a meeting tomorrow.
    Late last year the Gevaert group of Belgium and West
Germany's VEBA AG &lt;VEBG.F> said they had each acquired a 12.5
pct stake in Hapag-Lloyd from Deutsche Bank AG &lt;DBKG.F> and
Dresdner Bank AG &lt;DRSD.F>.
     Industry sources estimate Deutsche and Dresdner,
Hapag-Lloyd's majority shareholders, held about 75 pct of
Hapag-Lloyd's share capital before selling portions of it to
Gevaert and VEBA.
    The two banks have said they eventually wanted to reduce
their stake in the shipping group to 15 pct each.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3477>
Tesco Plc &lt;TSCO.L> said that &lt;County
Ltd> had yesterday bought on its behalf 2.06 mln shares, or
around 4.2 pct, in &lt;Hillards Plc> for between 302p and 310p a
share.
    Tesco yesterday launched a 151.4 mln stg bid for the north
of England supermarket chain, which Hillards promptly rejected.
    Hillards shares were last quoted at 324p, compared with
last night's close of 313p.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3491>
The &lt;Queensland Press Ltd> (QPL) board
said it unanimously recommended the one billion dlr takeover
bid by &lt;Cruden Investments Pty Ltd>, a family company of News
Corp Ltd &lt;NCPA.S> chief executive Rupert Murdoch.
    The 23 dlrs a share cash-only offer is nearly double the
market price before News announced its now-completed bid for
The Herald and Weekly Times Ltd &lt;HWTA.S> in early December and
no other offer is likely, it said in a statement.
    Independent adviser, &lt;Wardley Australia Ltd>, had also
concluded the offer was fair and reasonable, it added.
    QPL is already owned 48.3 pct by HWT.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3547>
New World Pictures Ltd said it sold
456,900 shares or about five pct of Taft Broadcasting Co common
stock for a gain of 17.8 mln dlrs.
    The company said in a brief statement that it acquired the
stock in late 1986.  It gave no further details and company
officials were not immediately available for comment.
    On Friday, Taft vice chairman Dudley S. Taft and
Narragansett Capital Inc &lt;NARR> offered to acquire Taft for 145
dlrs per share.  Dudley Taft and his family have owned 12 pct
of the company.
    An investment group leds by Robert M. Bass, one of the Bass
brothers of Fort Worth, Texas, has been reported as owning
about 25 pct of Taft stock, and &lt;American Financial Corp>
chairman Carl Lindner has been reported to own about 16 pct. 
Both Bass and Linder have acquired Taft shares in recent months.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3565>
CPC International Inc
said it has agreed in principle to sell its Peterson/Puritain
Inc subsidiary to Hi-Port Industries Inc.
    CPC said the sale is not expected to have a significant
impact on its earnings and is subject to approval by boards of
both companies.  Terms were not disclosed.
    Peterson/Purittan is a contract packager of personal care
and household products.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3573>
&lt;Qintex America Ltd> said it is again
extending its offer of 13 dlrs a share for 3.3 mln Princeville
Development Corp shares until today from yesterday.
    At midnight yesterday, 7,242,117 Princeville shares had
been tendered, up from 5,887,165 shares 24 hours earlier.
    Qintex said it is extending the offer to allow Princeville
to comply with federal law restricting the ownership of U.S.
airlines by non-U.S. citizens and to finalize the terms and
conditions of the letter of credit or bank guarantee required
under the previously announced acquisition agreement.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3587>
Hughes Tool Co said its board voted at
a special meeting last night to approve a new agreement with
regulators that would allow the company to complete its
proposed merger with Baker International Corp &lt;BKO>.
    The agreement, approved by the U.S. Department of Justice
yesterday, will give the merged company, Baker Hughes, six
months instead of three to sell certain assets.
    The pact also allows a three-month extension, if warranted,
and limits the obligation of the new company to give financial
support to the businesses to be divested, pending their sale.
    The company said its board recommended that shareholders
approve the merger of the oilfield service companies. A
previously adjourned meeting of Hughes Tool stockholders will
be resumed this afternoon, it said.
    "Hughes will work with Baker and the Justice Department
towards negotiating the final form of the consent decree and
filing it as soon as possible," the company said in a
statement. Closing of the merger would occur immediately after
the filing, it said.
    The assets to be sold under the consent decree consist of
Baker's domestic oilfield drilling bit business and its
domestic submersible electric pump business. Baker has an
agreement to sell the pump business to Trico Industries Inc
&lt;TRO>.
    The financial terms of the merger are unchanged, a Hughes
spokesman said. Under those terms, each Baker common share and
Hughes common share would be converted into one share and 8/10
of a share, respectively, of Baker Hughes Inc, which would be
formed as a new holding company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3596>
Goodyear Tire and Rubber Co said it
will receive about 588 mln dlrs in cash from Loral Corp &lt;LOR>
for the business of Goodyear Aerospace Corp.
    Goodyear said the previously announced acquisition by Loral
is expected to be completed March 13. When Loral announced the
transaction January 12, the company said it was paying 640 mln
dlrs for Goodyear Aerospace.
    Goodyear said the price it will receive is after
adjustments for such items as pension and benefits provision,
allocation of liabilities and asset valuations. Last year
Goodyear Aerospace had revenues of 695 mln dlrs.               
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3599>
British Aerospace Plc &lt;BAEL.L> said it
has increased its stake in &lt;Systems Designers Plc> to 22.1 pct
or 25.46 mln ordinary shares following the purchase of 10.45
mln ordinary shares.
    The British Aerospace Pension Fund holds 2.15 mln ordinary
shares in Systems, representing a stake of 1.9 pct.
    A spokesman for British Aerospace said it has no present or
future intention of making a full bid for Systems Designers.
System Designers shares were nine pence higher at 100 prior to
the share stake announcement, and have showed little movement
since.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3607>
Hanson Industries, the U.S. arm of
Hanson Trust PLC &lt;HAN>, said it has proposed to sell, in
separate transactions, Kaiser Cement's Northwest Terminals and
Montana City plant, to Lone Star Industries Inc &lt;LCE> and &lt;Ash
Grove Cement West Inc>, respectively for a total of 50.2
mln dlrs.
    Hanson said the deals are subject to normal conditions of
closing.
    Hanson Industries completed the purchase of Kaiser Cement
on March 3, for about 250 mln dlrs.
    Hanson said Kaiser Cement is now an indirect wholly owned
unit of Hanson Trust and forms part of its building products
group.
    "These sales are a continuation of an asset redeployment
program at Kaiser Cement and will allow Kaiser to concentrate
its efforts in the California marketplace, where it is the
largest cement producer and holds a premiere market position,"
Hanson Industries chairman Gordon White said.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3622>
Continental Health
Affiliates Inc said that it has acquired &lt;Marketech Inc>, an 80
pct partner in &lt;Diatronics Nutrition Services>.
    Continental said Diantronics Nutrition Services is a joint
venture with physicians providing patient-ready home infusion
therapy products and services to outpatients of five northern
New Jersery hospitals representing over 1,900 inpatient beds.
    Continental said the terms of the deal were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3632>
Alpine Associates, a Cresskill, N.J.
securities dealer, told the Securities and Exchange Commission
it has acquired 565,100 shares of Leaseway Transport
Corp, or 5.9 pct of the total outstanding common stock.
    Alpine, a limited partnership, said it bought the stock for
28.1 mln dlrs as an investment in the ordinary course of its
business as a securities dealer.
    It left open the possibility that it might buy more
Leaseway stock or sell some or all of its current stake, but
said it has no plans to seek control of the company.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3645>
Chrysler Corp's 1.5 billion dlr bid to
takeover American Motors Corp &lt;AMO> should help bolster the
small automaker's sales, but it leaves the future of its 19,000
employees in doubt, industry analysts say.
    It was "business as usual" yesterday at the American Motors
headquarters, one day after the proposed merger was unveiled by
Chrysler and AMC's French parent Renault, according to company
spokesman Edd Snyder.
    But AMC's future, to be discussed at a board meeting today,
would be radically different as a Chrysler subsidiary than if
it had continued with the state-run French car group as its
controlling shareholder.
    Industry analysts said the future of AMC's car assembly
plant in Kenosha, Wis., and its Toledo, Ohio, Jeep plant would
be in doubt if the overcapacity predicted in the North American
auto industry by the early 1990s comes to pass.
    Both plants are far from "state of the art" for car
manufacturing sites, and AMC has a history of poor labor
relations at each.
    "Chrysler doesn't need that many new plants," said Michael
Luckey, automotive analyst for the Wall Street firm Shearson
Lehman Brothers. "They probably will close the Toledo plant and
move Jeep production to Canada."
    Ronald Glantz of Montgomery Securities said that at the
very least, the new owner of the Toledo plant would be able to
wring concessions from the United Automobile Workers union
local representing Jeep workers.
    "The UAW won't be able to hold them up for ransom as they
have AMC because during a down year, Chrysler will have
underutilized facilities to transfer production," he said.
    Analysts said they foresaw no major complications that
would abort a combination which historians said would be the
auto industry's biggest merger since American Motors was formed
in 1954.
    AMC was in need of a financial savior because of its losses
of more than 800 mln dlrs since 1980 and pressures in France
for Renault to cut its backing. The company had said it could
not forecast consistent profitability until 1988 at the
earliest.
    In announcing the takeover agreement, Chrysler chairman Lee
Iacocca cited AMC's Jeep division as well as its new 675 mln
dlr assembly plant at Bramalea, Ontario, and its network of
1,200 dealers as the major attractions.
    Analysts reasoned that Chrysler might feel moved eventually
to sell off or close some of the older plants to cut overhead
costs in view of the new debts and liabilities it would incur
in the AMC buyout.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3652>
Pacer Systems said it has
agreed in principle to acquire the assets of Sea Data Corp, a
maker of low-powered electronic systems including undersea
intelligent recording sensors and high-density digital data
recorders, for one mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3673>
Sahlen and Associates Inc
said it has completed the purchase of Gleason Securities
Service Inc of New York and Gleason Plant Security Inc of
Connecticut.
    Sahlen said the deal's terms were not disclosed, but added
that the acquired companies had combined annual revenues of
over 18 mln dlrs.
    Sahlen, a private invetigation company, said the Gleason
companies provide security guard services to corporations in
the tri-state area.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3684>
&lt;Henry Ansbacher Holdings Plc> said it
has acquired a 51 pct interest in the U.S. Retail and general
corporate insurance broker &lt;Adams and Porter Inc>.
    The move is the first step in building a new international
insurance broking group following the appointment of a new
management team for its Seascope Insurance Holdings unit.
    Ansbacher said A and P has exciting growth potential,
particularly on the east coast of the U.S. And has an annual
revenue of more than four mln dlrs. Ansbacher shares were up
4-1/2p to 90-1/2, helped by the announcement earlier today of a
1986 pretax profit rise to 5.56 mln stg from 2.74 mln in 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3707>
Moore McCormack Resources Inc said it
agreed in principle to sell its Globe Metallurgical Inc unit to
Cyprus Minerals Co &lt;CYPM> for undisclosed terms.
    The sale, expected to close by mid-April, is subject to
certain conditions, including board approval at both companies.
    Globe produces silicon metals and magnesium ferrosilicon.
The products are used in the chemical, aluminum, iron, rubber
and semiconductor industries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3711>
The U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ)
is reviewing whether Trans World Airlines Inc &lt;TWA> and
Chairman Carl Icahn violated federal antitrust law by failing
to seek advance clearance from the DOJ or the Federal Trade
Commission for his extensive open-market purchases of USAir
Group Inc &lt;U> stock, a DOJ official told a Senate panel.
    "This is a matter that is being looked into," Charles Rule,
acting assistant attorney general-antitrust, told the Senate
Judiciary Committee's Antitrust Subcommittee.
    Rule declined further comment while the review was
continuing.
    Rule was responding to panel Chairman Howard Metzenbaum
(D-Ohio), who had asked why the department was not acting
against "what appears to be a clear violation of the law."
    Metzenbaum said Icahn had failed to file a pre-merger
notification form with the FTC prior to purchasing more than 15
mln dlrs' worth of USAir stock.
    But Rule said that, for airline companies, a purchaser
would be exempt from the requirement if it instead had filed a
merger application with the U.S. Department of Transportation.
    Icahn filed such an application with the DOT, but the
filing was thrown out by the DOT on Friday.
    The DOT threw out the application late Friday on grounds it
lacked the necessary data for the government to review the
proposed USAir takeover bid.
    Icahn refiled a more complete application form Monday.
    Rule pledged to act against Icahn and TWA if a violation
were found.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3744>
ChemLawn Corp said it has
started talks on the possible sale of the company with "various
parties" that it did not identify.
    The company said the talks began after it considred and
rejected Waste Management Inc's &lt;WMX> 27 dlr per share tender
offer for all its sharesd.
    ChemLawn gave no details on the talks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3747>
SHV Holdings NV said it is
withdrawing its take-over bid for Imperial Continental Gas
Association &lt;ICGS.L> after failing to gain the minimum number
of pledges sought from IC Gas shareholders.
    SHV said in a statement it had sought to gain 750,000 IC
Gas shares under a 700p offer for IC Gas ordinary stock but was
informed that level was not reached when the deadline expired.
"The tender offer is therefore void," it said.
     SHV also offered 252 pence for every one stg nominal of IC
Gas loan stock under the bid, made by &lt;SHV (United Kingdom)
Holding Co Ltd>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3759>
River Oaks Industries Inc said
it agreed in principle to give control of the company to Benson
Seizer, a New York investor, in return for 2.6 mln dlrs in
capital.
    The company, a maker of mobile homes, said it terminated
merger discussions with &lt;Nursing Centers of America>.
    River Oaks said it will place a 2.6 mln dlr convertible
note with Seizer, who in turn will name six additional members
to the company's five-member board. One of the new directors
will take over as chairman and chief executive officer, River
Oaks said.
    River Oaks said the note will be convertible into two mln
shares of its common stock at one dlr a share. The company
currently has 14 mln shares outstanding.
    The company said it will also grant Seizer an option to buy
an additional 2.6 mln shares during the next four years at 1.25
dlrs a share during the first year and 1.50 dlrs a share
thereafter.
    The company said the money raised from Seizer will further
strengthen its balance sheet and enhance its ability to seek
selective expansion opportunities.
    Seizer is experienced in turnaround situations and is
expected to take direct involvement in River Oaks management,
said Charles F. DeGroot, who will remain a director of the
company after giving up the post of chairman to one of Seizer's
board nominees.
    Don Manning will cede his post as chief executive but will
remain president, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3775>
Jones and Vining Inc said
Vulcan Corp, one of its main competitors in the production of
shoe lasts, has offered to acquire Jones and Vining for five
dlrs a share.
    Jones and Vining said a management effort to take the
company private will go ahead at 4.50 dlrs per share. The form
of the buyout has not yet been determined and the buyout is
subject to a nunber of conditions, it said.
    Jones and Vining said its board believes that a transaction
with Vulcan would be difficult to complete, but it has asked
Vulcan for further information to explore the bid.
    On January 23, Jones and Vining said its board had
recommended that shareholders aprove a management buyout at
4.50 dlrs a share.
    On February Six, Vulcan initially offered to acquire Jones
and Vining for five dlrs a share, but Jones and Vining
dismissed the offer as "frivolous" and "without substance" and
said the bid failed to comply with provisions of the Securities
Act of 1934.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3779>
Belgian Budget Minister Guy
Verhofstadt has proposed a plan to sell off shares in several
state-owned enterprises, including national airline Sabena and
the postal and telecommunications authority, government sources
said.
    They said the plan could raise more than 25 billion francs
in revenue over the next five years according to Verhofstadt's
projections, helping the government to reduce its huge budget
deficit, targetted this year at 418 billion francs.
    But the scheme had received a guarded reception from the
Social Christian parties in Belgium's centre-right coalition
when Verhofstadt unveiled it at a cabinet meeting yesterday.
    Discussion of the plan was likely to be long and difficult,
the sources said.
    Verhofstadt proposes beginning the selloffs in the last
quarter of 1987, with the sale of 30 to 40 pct of state
investment company SNI. He expects the sale to raise three
billion francs, they added.
    A 25 pct share in Sabena would be sold in mid-1989 for 1.5
billion francs, while 50 pct of the postal and
telecommunications authority would be sold off in two stages in
mid-1990 and early 1992, raising at least seven billion francs.
    Also on Verhofstadt's list are the Maritime Transport
Authority, leading gas distributor Distrigaz, CGER savings
bank, CGER, and several other credit institutions.
    Le Soir daily quoted CGER vice-president Paul Henrion as
expressing strong opposition to the privatisation of his bank.
    "Public company we are and public company we wish to stay,"
Henrion told the paper.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3790>
Rexnord nc said it signed a
definitive agreement to sell its Railway Maintenance Equipment
Co subsidiary to Banner Industries Inc. Terms were withheld.
    It said Railway Maintenance had 1986 sales of 16 mln dlrs
and employs 100 people.
    Rexnord said the sale is part of a major program to divest
several of its businesses representing about 200 mln dlrs in
net assets. Still to be divested are the Process Machinery
Division with sales of 137 mln dlrs and Mathews Conveyer Co,
with sales of 83 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3795>
Attorney General Edwin Meese said he
saw some benefit in the proposed purchase of American Motors Co
&lt;AMO> By Chrysler Corp &lt;C> in that it would return the smallest
of the U.S. auto manufacturers to American hands.
    Meese told the House Appropriations Subcommittee that
consideration would be part of the Justice Department's review
of the proposed merger. He said the agency has not yet received
a formal notice of the merger which would start the review
process.
   Chrysler has made a 1.3 billion dlr bid to buy AMC from its
French parent Renault.
    "I think one of the things that has to be recognized in that
merger is that it appears, at least, that a good portion of the
ownership of American Motors, which has been in overseas hands
will be put back in American hands," Meese told the
subcommittee.
    "That may be one of the factors that would be weighed in the
judgment," he added.
    Renault currently holds about 46 pct of AMC.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3797>
Martin Sosnoff, who has offered to
buy Caesars World Inc for 28 dlrs a share, said senior
officials of the company have offered to buy back the Caesars
stake he already holds, now 13.6 pct of the total outstanding.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Sosnoff, a New York investor and money manager, said the offers
to buy back his stock occurred "on several occasions during the
past year."
    The offers were made by several Caesars World
representatives, including its chairman, Henry Gluck, he said. 
   Sosnoff said he rejected all of the proposals.
    The Caesars World official suggested various forms of
payment for Sosnoff's stake, including other securities of the
company and cash, he said. Sosnoff did not detail the value of
the proposed compensation.
    Also suggested was a deal involving "put" and "call" option
regarding Sosnoff's Caesars World holdings, he said.
    The proposed deals would have also included a "standstill"
agreement, which would have restricted Sosnoff's right to buy
more Caesars World stock or "to take any action adverse to
incumbent management," he said.
    Sosnoff's report on the offers he received for his Caesars
World shares were amended to his official offer to purchase the
company, as well as reported to the SEC.
    Sosnoff now holds about 4.1 mln Caesars World shares, or
13.6 pct of the company's 30 mln shares outstanding.
    The Sosnoff offer to buy the shares of the company he does
not already hold has been valued at 725.2 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3821>
Versar Inc said it has agreed
in principle to acquire Martin Marietta Corp's Martin Marietta
Environmental Systems unit for about 5,300,000 dlrs.
    Versar said it would use its working capital and an
established life of credit to find the purchase, which is
subject to approval by both boards and is expected to be
completed in April.
    Marietta Environmental had 1986 revenues of about nine mln
dlrs.
    Versar said the acquisition should have a "moderately"
favorable effect on its earnings this year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3828>
Jim Walter Corp said it completed
the acquisition of Owens-Corning Fiberglas Corp's mineral
ceiling and fiberboard plant in Meridian, Miss.
    Terms were not disclosed
    The plant's operations will complement existing ceiling
materials production within jim Walter's building material's
group, which last year generated income of 54.9 mln dlrs on
sales of 740 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3833>
Louart Corp, a Los Angeles
investment firm, said it raised its stake in Amerford
International Corp to 105,615 shares, or 7.8 pct of the total
outstanding, from 69,715 shares, or 5.2 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Louart said it bought 35,900 Amerford common shares between
March 19, 1986 and Jan 30, 1987 at prices ranging from 3.92 to
4.29 dlrs a share.
    It said it bought the shares for investment purposes and
might increase its stake in the future.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3839>
First
Boston, the Swiss affiliate of First Boston Inc, said it raised
its stake in the company to 11,262,307 shares, or 35.5 pct of
the total, from 10,262,307 shares, or 32.8 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Financiere Credit Suisse said it bought 870,100 First Boston
common shares between Feb 10 and 27 at prices ranging from
48.125 to 53.000 dlrs a share, or 22.5 mln dlrs total.
    It said it bought the shares as part of an agreement to
raise its minority stake in First Boston to 40 pct, the same
stake level First Boston holds in Financiere Credit Suisse.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3856>
Oak Industries said it signed
a definitive agreement to buy the stock of Rexnord Inc's
Railway Maintenance Equipment Co unit, for an undisclosed sum.
    The company said Railway Maintenance had 1986 revenues of
16 mln dlrs.
    Oak said the acquisition is part of its two-tier strategy
of buying releated and unrelated businesses.
    Oak had a tax loss carryforward of 125 mln dlrs at the end
of 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3864>
Tenneco Inc, a company that has long
been rumored to be a takeover candidate, rose sharply today
when speculation surfaced that investor T. Boone Pickens may be
targeting the company for an acquisition, traders and analysts
said.
    Tenneco spokesman Joseph Macrum said "we have no comment to
make whatsoever." Pickens was not available for comment.
    Traders noted that activity in the stock increased today
after a published report linked Pickens to Tenneco.
    Tenneco rose two points to 48-3/4.
    Paul Feretti, an analyst with New Orleans-based Howard,
Weil, Labouisse, Friedrichs, Inc, said he was not surprised at
market rumors that Tenneco might be the target of a takeover
attempt.
    "It's pure market speculation that Boone Pickens and his
group may be interested," Feretti said.
    "But Tenneco would be a challenge to run because of its
sheer size and diversity. Mr. Pickens is a man who likes a
challenge."
    Pickens, who made an unsuccessful attempt to take over
Dallas-based Diamond Shamrock Corp &lt;DIA> last winter, has made
no secret of his plans to acquire additional natural gas
reserves in the belief that gas prices will stabilize sooner
than oil prices. Tenneco holds natural gas reserves estimated
in excess of 3.5 trillion cubic feet, analysts said.
    Feretti conservatively estimated Tenneco's breakup value at
58 dlrs a share and said the company generated a cash flow of
about 10 dlrs a share "which is probably very attractive to
Pickens." Other analysts, however, estimate a breakup value
well into the 60 dlr a share range.
    "I strongly doubt that there is going to be any hostile
takeover," Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc's Houston-based analyst
John Olson said, putting little credence in the rumors.
    "Tenneco is a gargantuan enterprise with seven billion dlrs
in long-term debt and preferred stock outstanding." He said the
buyer would also have to deal with "the intractable problems"
Tenneco faces with its farm equipment unit and energy
businesses.
    Analysts suggested that Tenneco could use a number of
defensive strategies to fend off an unwanted buyer, such as
spin off some of its non-energy businesses directly to
shareholders, buy back shares or create a limited partnership
out of its natural gas pipeline interests.
    An analyst who asked to remain unidentified, discouraged
the Pickens rumor. "Pickens has a plateful already with his
holdings in Burlington Northern and Amerada Hess," he said. "I
don't think he would be willing to take on Tenneco's problems
with Case (the farm equipment unit), which has been losing
about 180 mln dlrs annually and is worth less than a billion
dlrs on the market today."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3868>
&lt;Equity Silver
Mines Ltd> said it agreed to sell 6.6 mln shares of a new class
of par value voting stock to Placer Development Ltd for 37.1
mln dlrs, increasing Placer's stake in Equity to 74.5 pct from
68 pct.
    The transaction is subject to regulatory approval and a
vote by Equity minority shareholders at the April 23 annual
meeting, the company said.
    Proceeds from sale of the shares, priced at 5.625 dlrs
each, will be used to buy and deliver 4,985,000 ounces of
silver to Placer, Equity said.
    Equity Silver said the silver remains to be delivered under
its sale agreement with Placer, after delivery of its 750,000
ounce minimum commitment for 1987.
    Equity said it arranged to acquire 4,985,000 ounces of
silver at 7.40 dlrs an ounces, subject to selling the shares to
Placer.
    Purchase and delivery of the silver to Placer will result
in an after-tax gain of about 6.6 mln dlrs, Equity said.
    It also said the stock and silver transactions will create
a 37,059,000 dlr fund out of which dividends will be paid when
cash is available.
    The cash fund will enable Equity Silver to continue to pay
dividends on its preferred shares and increase the likelihood
that it may be able to pay dividends on its common shares, the
company said.
    It did not elaborate on what common share dividends might
be paid.
    The company normally pays quarterly preferred dividends
totalling 619,000 dlrs from retained earnings, Equity Silver
said.
    Equity Silver had retained earnings of 2,312,000 dlrs at
December 31, 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3873>
Paralax Video Enterprises Inc said it
has agreeed to acquire &lt;American Video Group Inc> in exchange
for 287,700 Paralax restricted common shares and three year
warrants to buy 318,600 restricted shares at six dlrs a share.
    Paralax said holders of some American Video convertible
debentures have elected to exchange them for Paralax restricted
common with a market value of about 380,000 dlrs with that
value to be determined in about 45 days.
    American Video is a closely held company operating video
rental concessions in post and base exchanges at 54 Army, Air
Force, Navy and Coast Guard installations. In its most recent
year, the company had revenues of about 1.5 mln dlrs.
    Paralax said the acquisition is scheduled to close March
16. The company now has about 5.5 mln shares outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3879>
Bayly Corp said it acquired 55 pct
of Chutes Corp, a maker of denim-oriented sportswear
headquartered in Seattle, Wash.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3906>
the council of ministers approved
petroleos de venezuela's planned purchase of a half interest in
the champlin petroleum refinery at corpus christi, texas,
government sources said.
    The cabinet authorized energy and mines minister arturo
hernandez grisanti to approve the purchase in the shareholders
assembly of the state oil company petroleos de venezuela
(pdvsa).
    Pdvsa last april 14 signed a letter of intent to buy a half
interest in champlin's corpus christi refinery for an
undisclosed sum.
    Under the terms of the provisional agreement, venezuela
would supply up to 160,000 barrels a day to the plant through a
new company which would be jointly owned by the pdvsa and
champlin, a subsidiary of the union pacific corp &lt;unp>.
    The deal would also allow pdvsa a joint share in champlin's
refinery and distribution network.
    The purhcase is one of a series of overseas joint ventures
by which venezuela has managed to assure markets for some
400,000 barrels of its approximately 1.5 mln bpd exports.
    Hernandez grisanti told reporters after the cabinet meeting
that pdvsa will pay 93 mln dlrs for its half ownership in the
champlin refinery - 33 mln dlrs in cash and 60 mln dlrs crude
oil and products.
    Through the deal, he said, venezuela will be assured the
sale of at least 140,000 bpd of crude and products.
    Hernandez said pdsva has entered similar joint ventures
with veba oel of west germany, nynas petroelum in sweden, and
citgo in the united states.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3910>
Rexnord Inc said it signed a
definitive agreement to sell its Railway Maintenance Equipment
Co subsidiary to Oak Industries Inc. Terms were withheld.
    Also participating in the agreement was Banner Industries
Inc, which previously agreed to acquire Rexnord.
    Railway Maintenance had 1986 sales of 16 mln dlrs.
    Rexnord said the sale is part of a major program to divest
several of its businesses representing about 200 mln dlrs in
net assets. Still to be divested are the Process Machinery
Division with sales of 137 mln dlrs and Mathews Conveyer Co,
with sales of 83 mln dlrs. -- Corrects mame of purchaser
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3912>
Dart Group Corp &lt;DARTA>, which wants
to acquire Supermarkets General Corp for 1.62 billion dlrs, is
not likely to give up without a fight if its target seeks
another buyer, arbitrageurs said.
    Speculation that Dart's offer of 41.75 dlrs per share could
be just the beginning of a bidding contest helped Supermarkets
shares gain one to 42-1/8  on 2.3 mln shares.
    One rumor had Federated Department Stores Inc &lt;FDS> taking
a look at Supermarkets General. "Our policy is that we do not
comment on any rumors or speculation of this nature," a
Federated spokeswoman said.
    An arbitrageur noted that Dart, controlled by chairman
Herbert H. Haft and his son Robert, last year raised its
initial bid for Safeway Stores by approximately 10 pct when
Safeway resisted.
    However, that company was later sold to a buyout group that
topped the Hafts.
    If history repeats itself, the Hafts could raise their bid
to 46 dlrs if they are rebuffed by Supermarkets General, the
arbitrageur said. But another arbitrageur said the Hafts'
present bid seemed "quite fair." He said the offer amounts to
10 times after-tax-cash flow which is "probably fully priced."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3916>
American Motors Corp said its
directors met Wednesday to review the takeover proposal which
the corporation received Monday from Chrysler Corp &lt;C>.
    AMC said its board has retained independent investment and
legal advisers and expects to meet periodically over the next
several weeks on the proposal.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3918>
Kansas City Southern
Industries Inc said an attempt by Santa Fe Southern Pacific Co
&lt;SFX> to reopen the proposed merger of the Atchison, Topeka and
Santa Fe Railway Co and the Southern Pacific Transportation Co
offers "nothing truly new."
    In a letter to shippers, Kansas City Chairman Landon
Rowland stated "This proposed merger is plainly
anti-competitive, as found by the ICC and urged by the
Department of Justice. Nothing has changed."
    Landon said Kansas City Southern is continuing its efforts
to acquire the transportation operation of Santa Fe Railway.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3920>
De Laurentiis Entertainment Group
Inc said Embassy Communications, a Californai general
partnership affiliated with Coca-Cola Co &lt;KO>, plans to sell
its 10.1 pct stake in the company.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission for
a secondary offering, De Laurentiis said Embassy will offer its
entire stake in the company of 964,936 shares of common stock
in the public sale.
    De Laurentiis said it has 9.6 mln shares outstanding.
    PaineWebber Inc will underwrite the offering.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3926>
Williams Cos said it completed the
sale of its Agrico Chemical Co unit to Freeport-McMoRan
Resource Partners L.P. &lt;FRP> for an initial 250 mln dlrs cash.
    The company said it will also receive an additional 100 to
250 mln dlrs in five years based on the operating performance
of the unit.
    It said the cash proceeds will be used to lower its debt
costs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3933>
Industrial Equity (Pacific) Ltd, a
Hong Kong investment firm, said it raised its stake in Calmat
Co to 1,480,830 shares, or 9.8 pct of the total outstanding
common stock, from 1,217,230 shares, or 8.0 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Industrial Equity, which is principally owned by Brierley
Investments Ltd, a publicly held New Zealand firm, said it
bought 263,600 Calmat common shares between Feb 17 and March 9
for 13.1 mln dlrs.
    It has said it bought the stock for investment purposes,
but may raise its stake to 15 pct.
                    
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3934>
Paralax Video Enterprises Inc said it
signed a definitive agreement to buy &lt;American Video Group Inc>
for stock.
    According to the merger proposal, American Video
shareholders will receive about 287,700 restricted Paralax
shares, and warrants to buy another 318,600 restricted shares
at six dlrs a share. The warrants run for three years.
    In addition, it said holders of American Video convertible
debentures agreed to exchange their holdings for about 380,000
dlrs worth of Paralax stock.
    American Video operates stores in U.S. military bases.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3939>
Rochester Telephone Corp said
it agreed to buy &lt;Canton Telephone Co> for undisclosed terms.
    Canton serves customers in northeastern Penn. In 1986, it
had operating revenues of about 1.3 mln dlrs, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3948>
Donaldson Bramham Lee, an investor
from Birmingham, Alabama, said he raised his stake in Penobscot
Shoe Co to 40,500 shares, or 6.6 pct of the total outstanding
common stock, from 33,500 shares, or 5.5 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Lee said he bought 7,000 Penobscot common shares between Feb 12
and March 2 at prices ranging from 13.75 to 16.25 dlrs a share.
    Lee has said he bought the Penobscot stock for investment
purposes only and has no plans to seek control of the company,
although he may buy more stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3960>
General Electric Co's GE
Semiconductor Business said it agreed to sell its Datel unit to
a group led by the unit's president, Nicolas Tagaris.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Tagaris founded the company, which produces precision data
acquisition, conversion and control components and subsystems,
in 1970. He sold it to GE in 1979.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3961>
Trico Industries Inc said it
set March 31 as the date for a special shareholders meeting for
a vote on the proposed acquisition of the company by Paccar Inc
&lt;PCAR>.
    In January the two companies announced an agreement
covering a proposed acquisition by Paccar of Trico's
approximately 8.2 mln shares outstanding for eight dlrs per
share in cash.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3970>
Pacific Southwest Airlines said it
reached an agreement with the Southwest Crew Controllers
Association needed to satisfy conditions of USAir Group's &lt;U>
proposed acquisition of PSA.
    PSA said this is the third of four unions agreement is
needed with for USAir's acquisition to be consummated.
    Under the agreement, PSA crew controllers received
assurances they will be provided with labor protective
provisions and a seniority integration process.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3984>
An overwhelming majority of Hughes Tool
Co shareholders approved a merger agreement with Baker
International Corp based on revised terms that allow the
companies additional time to sell a drilling bit business as
required by the U.S. Justice Department.
     Hughes chairman William Kistler said the revised terms of
the proposed consent decree also set a 10 mln dlr cap on how
much funding the newly combined companies will have to spend on
the disputed drilling bit business until it is sold.
    An earlier proposed consent decree did not establish a
funding limit.
    The Baker-Hughes merger, which would would create a 1.2
billion dlr oilfield services company, almost fell through
earlier this month when Hughes balked at terms of a proposed
Justice Department consent decree that would have given the
companies only three months to find a buyer for the Reed
business.
    Baker said today it would withdraw the one billion dlr
lawsuit it had filed to force Hughes to follow through with the
merger.
    Hughes' Kistler, speaking to reporters after 85 pct of
Hughes' shareholders approved the merger, said the revised
terms of the agreement give the companies six months to find a
buyer for the Reed drilling bit business. The previous
agreement had proposed a three-month period.
    Kistler said the the government had also indicated it would
consider granting, if necessary, an additional three-month
extension to complete the sale.
    He said there were "several people looking" at the domestic
drilling bit business.
    The companies, Kistler said, have also decided to
voluntarily sell a Reed plant in Singapore.
    Kistler estimated that the merger, which should be
completed in about two weeks, will result in annual cost
savings of about 50 mln dlrs. He said he expects "substantial
cutbacks" in the 20,000-member workforce at Baker-Hughes Inc,
the name the merged company will take.
    Kistler said the cost savings and greater efficiencies
should put the company on a profitable course. "We think that
in the third or fourth quarter after the merger we should see
something close to breakeven," he said.
    In the fourth quarter of 1986, Hughes earned 31.7 mln dlrs
on sales of 215.7 mln dlrs.
    Baker, in its first fiscal quarter ended December 31, lost
34.2 mln dlrs on revenues of 297.7 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3990>
Broad Corp said it acquired
the construction activities of Vogt and Conant Co of Cleveland.
    The combined companies, to be called Broad, Vogt and Conant
INc, will be the largest structural steel erection company in
the U.S. Combined sales of the two operations were more than 40
mln dlrs in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3991>
Harper and Row Publishers Inc said it
received an acquisition offer from Harcourt Brace Jovanovich
INc to acquire all of Harper and Row's shares at 50 dlrs a
share in cash.
    Harper said it will consider the proposal, including such
possible concerns as anti-trust and other legal considerations.
    On Monday, Harper and Row received a surprise 34 dlr-a-
share bid from investor Theodore Cross, owner of six pct of the
shares, for the stock he does not own.
     Harcourt made clear in its offer that it will step aside
if Harper's directors and shareholders reject the bid, Harper
said.
    Harper said the board has previously expressed a strong
determination to remain an independent publishing enterprise.
    Harper also said that New World Pictures, a shareholder,
has requested a copy of Harper's shareholder list to be used in
soliciting proxies.
    New World has 30,800 shares of the total 4.4 mln shares.
    Harper and Row's stock closed off 3/4 to 33-1/2 after
rising 9-1/4 points yesterday.
    Shareholders are due to vote April 2 on a shareholders
rights plan designed to thwart hostile takeovers.
    Ivan Obolensky, an analyst with the investment banking for
of Sterling Grace and Co said Harper and Row is one of the few
remaining independent publishers with a "back list" of authors
stretching back 200 years.
    He said as long as the company maintains copyrights with
the estates of deceased authors, it controls all motion picture
and television rights to the stories. And he said new printing
technologies make new editions a profitable business.
    "Harcourt Brace needs a back list of that nature and is
willing to pay up for it," Obolensky said. But he said Harper
and Row "has plenty of beef to warrant a 50 dlr bid.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3993>
Goldman, Sachs and Co told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it sold nearly its entire
stake in First Pennsylvania Corp of 2,450,598 shares, or 5.2
pct of the total outstanding common stock.
    Goldman Sachs said it has about 17,800 First Pennsylvania
common shares remaining. On February 26, the company redeemed
convertible debentures with common stock, which at once
increased Goldman's stock holding and the total outstanding.
    Goldman Sachs said it originally bought the stake as part
of its arbitrage business. Marine Midland Banks &lt;MM> has an
agreement in principal to acquire First Pennsylvania.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3999>
John Cotton, an Arizona businessman,
told the Securities and Exchange Commission he has acquired the
equivalent of 213,500 shares of Class A common shares in Del E.
Webb Investment Properties, or 8.9 pct of the total.
    Cotton, president of Finalco Group Inc, a Paradise Valley,
Ariz., data processing equipment maker, said he bought the
stake, which includes warrants to buy 186,300 shares, for
266,958 dlrs.
    The warrants are exerciseable at 9.50 dlrs a share, he
said. Cotton said it bought the stock for investment purposes
only.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4033>
Taft Braodacasting Co said its board
of directors unanimously decided not to accept the pending
proposal of Theta Corp, an investor group led by Dudley Taft.
    The decision was based on, among other things, the advise
of its financial advisors, goldman sachs and co, that the offer
of 145 dlrs per share was inadequate.
    Taft said the board concluded that the offer failed to
recognize fully the future propsects of the company and
directed management to explore alternatives including possible
financial restructuring.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4043>
American Motors Corp &lt;AMO> management
has ordered a hiring freeze in view of Chrysler Corp's &lt;C> 1.5
billion dlr takeover bid, a spokesman for AMC said.
    Analysts said the merger is virtually certain to go ahead.
    American Motors directors met for five hours Wednesday to
review the takeover proposal. "The board ... Expects to be
meeting periodically over the next several weeks on the
Chrysler proposal," AMC said in its first formal statement since
it acknowledged the Chrysler proposal on Monday.
    Chrysler, the number three U.S. Automaker, has said the
merger is motivated principally by its desire to acquire AMC's
profitable Jeep business and dealers, as well as a new modern
car assembly plant in Bramalea, Ontario.
    That means a guaranteed future for much of AMC, but it
leaves in question the fate of many of its 19,000-plus
employees, according to industry analysts. AMC's Toledo, Ohio
Jeep plant has 1,850 hourly workers on indefinite layoff while
its Kenosha, Wisconsin, car plant has another 2,250 on layoff.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4052>
The Bank of England does not favour the
introduction of rules to shield companies from hostile takeover
attempts, its governor, Robin Leigh-Pemberton, said.
    Instead, merchant banks advising bidding companies must
show restraint and responsibility to avoid the excesses that
have marred recent takeovers, he told the Yorkshire and
Humberside Regional Confederation of British Industries' annual
dinner.
    Leigh-Pemberton also called on companies to improve ties
with institutional investors, suggesting representatives of
those institutions be granted seats on the boards of directors
of companies they invest in.
    "Boards cannot expect protection from unwelcome predators,
for that is but a short step from saying that they should be
protected from their own shareholders -- who are, after all,
the proprietors of the company," Leigh-Pemberton said.
    He added takeovers and mergers had an important role to
play in furthering economies of scale, integration and more
efficient market penetration. "The degree of success or failure
(of a takeover) has not in my experience depended on whether or
not the takeover was contested," he said.
    Leigh-Pemberton noted there had been excesses in takeover
activity in the recent past. "The aim is to pressurise a
company's management into action dedicated solely to a
favourable impact on the share price in the short-term, partly
or even primarily at the expense of the future," he said.
    Such bids "often depend for their success on creating a
highly-charged and artificial situation in the share market,
and give rise to temptations, on both sides of the battle, to
engage in aggressive, even manipulative tactics that are
immensely damaging to the interest of the shareholders," he
said.
    In a clear reference recent events, he said "those in the
City who act for companies or individuals .. Must, I suggest,
be ready to accept a full measure of responsibility -- even if
it entails opprobrium -- for the transactions that may result."
    They "should exercise the most careful judgment at the
outset with respect to the clients for whom they act and the
activities contenplated. Those who sow wind cannot expect the
whirlwind to visit elsewhere," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4055>
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige
has asked the White House to consider blocking the planned
Japanese acquisition of a major U.S. Computer and semiconductor
maker, U.S. Officials said yesterday.
    The officials told reporters Baldrige had serious concerns
on national security grounds about the sale of Schlumberger Ltd
&lt;SLB> unit &lt;Fairchild Semiconductor Inc> to Fujitsu Ltd
&lt;ITSU.T>. The officials said the sale could leave the United
States overly dependent on a foreign company for equipment used
in advanced missiles, aircraft electronics and intelligence
gathering.
    The U.S. Officials added the sale would also worsen the
strained relations between the two countries stemming from the
huge Japanese trade surplus.
    The White House Economic Policy Council would consider the
sale in the coming weeks, they said.
    Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger's position was not
known, but in the past, he has opposed the transfer of high
technology to foreign governments or companies.
    Computers made by U.S. Manufacturers are widely used in the
world, but Tokyo told U.S. Negotiators recently it prefers
local manufacturers and would not buy U.S. Supercomputers.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4058>
North Broken Hill Holdings Ltd
&lt;NBHA.ME> (NBH) said it will offer one &lt;Norgold Ltd> share for
every five NBH shares in the float of its newly created gold
offshoot.
    The 20 cent par-value shares will be offered at 22 cents to
shareholders registered April 3, NBH said in a statement.
    Norgold's issued capital will be 240.5 mln shares, of which
63 pct will be held by NBH after 89 mln are issued to
shareholders to raise 19.6 mln dlrs, it said.
    Norgold will take control of a portfolio of precious metal
exploration and pre-development interests held by NBH.
    The major gold deposit to be acquired by Norgold is 100 pct
of the Bottle Creek deposit, west of Leonora in Western
Australia, NBH said.
    Production of gold from the project, at an annual rate of
35,000 ounces, is scheduled to begin early in 1988.
    Norgold will also have a 10 pct stake in the Coronation
Hill gold/platinum project in the Northern Territory and 43 pct
of the Poona copper/gold project in South Australia.
    Other gold exploration interests to be acquired by Norgold
are in Western Australia, Queensland, New South Wales and
Tasmania, NBH said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4064>
&lt;Renouf Corp Ltd> said it sold its
10.83 pct stake in &lt;NZI Corp Ltd> to &lt;Brierley Investments
Ltd>, (BIL), for 207.7 mln N.Z. Dlrs.
    Renouf managing director Mike Cashin said in a statement it
had been Renouf's intention to build up a long-term strategic
position in NZI. "But it became clear to us that it was in the
best interests of both NZI and ourselves for Brierley
Investments to acquire our holding," he said.
    He said Renouf built up its NZI holding over the past six
months. The sale comprised 74.9 mln shares at 2.725 N.Z. Dlrs a
share and 2,095 warrants at 1,709 dlrs each.
    The warrants are attached to a 150 mln Swiss franc note
issue. Each bond of 5,000 francs carries a detachable warrant
entitling the bearer to 2,486 NZI shares.
    In its 1986 annual report BIL reported that it held a 19
pct stake in NZI.
    NZI has 673.4 mln ordinary shares on issue. Total capital
including shares attached to warrants is 678.8 mln shares.
    Cashin said the sale will result in a significant profit
and places Renouf in a good position to consolidate on recent
transactions and pursue other opportunities.
    NZI shares were at 2.18 N.Z. Dlrs, BIL at 4.08 and Renouf
at 6.15 at the close of trading.
    BIL executives were unavailable for comment.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4069>
Guinness Plc &lt;GUIN.L> , the
brewing group, has challenged a 5.2 mln stg payment to a U.S.
Lawyer who says he organised its controversial takeover of
Scotch whisky maker &lt;The Distillers Co Plc>.
    But attorneys for lawyer Thomas Ward, a member of the
Guinness board, told a court yesterday in the Channel Island of
Jersey that Ward saw the payment as his reward for services in
last year's 2.7 billion stg takeover.
    Britain's Department of Trade and Industry is investigating
the takeover.
    Guinness says its former chairman Ernest Saunders and Ward
"breached their fiduciary duty" in authorising the payment to
Ward, via a Jersey-based company, Marketing and Acquisitions
Consultants and has gone to the Jersey court to recover it.
    MAC said in defence documents that Ward was the main
negotiator in the battle for Distillers against rival bidder
Argyll &lt;AYLL.L> Group Plc.
    "The bid would not have been successful but for the ...
Services of Mr Ward," MAC attorneys said in the documents
submitted in court. "The payment was, in all the circumstances,
reasonable, proper and fully earned."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4107>
Great Universal Stores Plc &lt;GUS.L> said
it has made an agreed offer for &lt;Pantherella Plc>, valuing the
company at 8.2 mln stg and each Pantherella ordinary share at
205 pence.
    The offer is based on eight new "A" non voting ordinary
shares in GUS plus 95.16 stg for every 100 ordinary
Pantherella.
    The new GUS shares will not receive the eight pence per
share interim dividend in respect of the year ending March
1987, the statement said.
    GUS has received irrevocable undertakings to accept the
offer in respect of 39.1 pct of Pantherella shares from the
company's directors and their families.
    The Pantherella board estimates the company, which
manufactures socks, will show a 1986 pretax profit of about
690,000 stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4127>
The Bank of England does not favour the
introduction of rules to shield companies from hostile takeover
attempts, its governor, Robin Leigh-Pemberton, said.
    Instead, merchant banks advising bidding companies must
show restraint and responsibility to avoid the excesses that
have marred recent takeovers, he told the Yorkshire and
Humberside Regional Confederation of British Industries' annual
dinner.
    Leigh-Pemberton also called on companies to improve ties
with institutional investors, suggesting representatives of
those institutions be granted seats on the boards of directors
of companies they invest in.
    "Boards cannot expect protection from unwelcome predators,
for that is but a short step from saying that they should be
protected from their own shareholders -- who are, after all,
the proprietors of the company," Leigh-Pemberton said.
    He added takeovers and mergers had an important role to
play in furthering economies of scale, integration and more
efficient market penetration. "The degree of success or failure
(of a takeover) has not in my experience depended on whether or
not the takeover was contested," he said.
    Leigh-Pemberton noted there had been excesses in takeover
activity in the recent past. "The aim is to pressurise a
company's management into action dedicated solely to a
favourable impact on the share price in the short-term, partly
or even primarily at the expense of the future," he said.
    Such bids "often depend for their success on creating a
highly-charged and artificial situation in the share market,
and give rise to temptations, on both sides of the battle, to
engage in aggressive, even manipulative tactics that are
immensely damaging to the interest of the shareholders," he
said.
    In a clear reference recent events, he said "those in the
City who act for companies or individuals .. Must, I suggest,
be ready to accept a full measure of responsibility -- even if
it entails opprobrium -- for the transactions that may result."
    They "should exercise the most careful judgment at the
outset with respect to the clients for whom they act and the
activities contenplated. Those who sow wind cannot expect the
whirlwind to visit elsewhere," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4135>
Taft Broadacasting Co said its
board of directors unanimously decided not to accept the
pending buyout proposal of &lt;Theta Corp>, an investor group led
by Dudley Taft.
    The decision was based on, among other things, the advice
of its financial advisors, Goldman Sachs and Co, that the offer
of 145 dlrs per share was inadequate.
    Taft said the board concluded that the offer failed to
recognize fully the future propsects of the company and
directed management to explore alternatives including possible
financial restructuring.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4145>
Pope, Evans and Robbins Inc said it
has repurchased 780,000 common shares from Putnam Mills Corp
principals Sidney and Peter Kaplan for 2.25 dlrs per share.
    It said the purchase price will be applied against the
1,700,000 dlrs Putnam Mills currently owes Pope Evans for
merchandise.  Pope Evans has about 7.6 mln shares outstanding.
    The company also said it has agreed in principle to acquire
privately-held Pat Fashions Industries Inc for 18 mln dlrs in
cash and notes, with financing to come partly from bank
borrowings, subject to approval by the Pope Evans board and Pat
shareholders.
    Pat Fashions imports apparel from the Far East and makes
apparel domestically as well.  In the year ended November 30,
Pat earned 5,400,000 dlrs pretax on sales of 83.0 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4146>
Baird Corp said the Massachusetts state
court for Suffolk county has granted it a temporary restraining
order prohibiting Mark IV Industries Inc &lt;IV> from further
purchases of Baird stock until Mark IV complies with the
Massachusetts Anti-Takeover Statute.
    The company said Mark IV currently owns at least 17.6 pct
of Baird stock and has indicated that it may attempt to acquire
Baird.
    Baird said the U.S. District Court in Boston has denied
Mark IV's application for a temporary restraining order to
prevent enforcement of the Massachusetts takeover law.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4153>
Taft Broadcasting Co vice chairman
Dudley Taft and Narragansett Capital Inc &lt;NARR> said they
intend to pursue their effort to acquire Taft Broadcasting
despite the rejection yesterday of their 145 dlr per share
offer by the Taft Broadcasting board.
    Dudley Taft and Narragansett, in a joint statement, said
they intend to explore alternatives to achieve the acquisition,
including further talks with Taft Broadcasting.
    They said they are confident that the Taft Broadcasting
board will conclude that the resolution of the company's
current "unstable situation" as quickly as possible is in the
best interests of all parties.
    They said the Taft board did not conclude that their offer
was not fair to Taft shareholders.  Taft Broadcasting
yesterday, however, said financial advisor Goldman, Sachs and
Co found the offer to be inadequate.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4158>
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige
has asked the White House to consider blocking the planned
Japanese acquisition of a major U.S. supercomputer and
semiconductor manufacturer for national security reasons, U.S.
officials said.
    The officials, who asked not to be named, said yesterday
that Baldrige has "serious concerns" about the sale of Fairchild
Semiconductor Corp. to Fujitsu Ltd., another major electronics
firm.
    The officials told Reuters that if the sale went through it
could leave the U.S. military overly dependent on a foreign
/ompany for vital high technology equipment used in its
advanced missiles, aircraft electronics and intelligence
gathering.
    In addition, they said, the sale would also worsen the
already strained trade relations between the U.S. and Japan
stemming from the huge Japanese surplus.
    The White House Economic Policy Council would consider the
sale in the coming weeks, they said.
    Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger's position was not
immediately known but in the past he has opposed the transfer
of high technology to foreign governments and companies.
    Supercomputers made by Fairchild and other U.S.
manufacturers are widely used throughout the world, but none
have been sold to the Japanese government or to Japanese
government-run agencies and universities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4159>
First Union Corp said
shareholders of First North Port Bancorp of Northport, Fla.,
have approved a merger into First Union for 40 dlrs per share,
or about 5,100,000 dlrs.
    The company said the acquisition is still subject to
regulatory approvals and is expected to be completed during the
second quarter.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4161>
Concorde Ventures Inc said it has signed
a letter of intent to acquire Englewood, Colo., homebuilder
Winley Inc for 12 mln common shares.
    The investment company said after the merger the combined
company will have 15 mln shares outstanding.
    For the year ended January 31, Winley earned 116,000 dlrs
pretax on revenues of 11.7 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4167>
&lt;Qintex America Ltd> said it is again
extending its offer of 13 dlrs a share for 3.3 mln Princeville
Development Corp shares until today from yesterday.
    As reported yesterday, Qintex said, about seven mln
Princeville shares had been tendered in response to the offer.
    Qintex said it is extending the offer to allow Princeville
to comply with federal law restricting the ownership of U.S.
airlines by non-U.S. citizens and to finalize the terms and
conditions of the letter of credit or bank guarantee required
under the previously announced acquisition agreement.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4182>
Clayton and Dubilier Inc and senior
management of a unit of Borg-Warner Corp &lt;BOR> said it will
form a new company to buy Borg-Warner's industrial products
group for about 240 mln dlrs.
    Borg-Warner industrial products has sales of about 300 mln
dlrs from three divisions, which provide advanced technology
fluid transfer and control equipment, systems and
services worldwide, Clayton said.
    The new company will have 3,000 employees and be
headquartered in Long Beach, Calif., the company said.
    Peter Valli, vice president of Borg-Warner Corp and
president of its industrial products division, will become
president and chief executive officer of the new company,
according to Clayton.
    Clayton, a private investment firm, said this was the third
mangement buyout of a divestiture completed by them since
December 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4201>
Borg-Warner Corp said it agreed to sell
its industrial products group to &lt;Clayton and Dubilier Inc>
and senior management of the group, for about 240 mln dlrs.
    Clayton and Dubilier is a New York-based private investment
firm, which has completed two other management-led buyout
transactions since December 1986.
    Borg-Warner's industrial products group, based in Long
Beach, California, has sales of about 300 mln dlrs and employs
about 3,000 staff.
    Its businesses include standard and custom engineered
centrifugal pumps and mechanical seals for the petroleum
industry and advanced controls for the aerospace and defense
industries.
    The sale is part of Borg-Warner's planned restructuring.
    the proposed sale is subject to approval by Borg-Warner's
directors, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4204>
&lt;Guardian-Morton Shulman Precious
Metals Inc> said Morton Shulman and Guardman Investment
Management Services Inc agreed in principle for Andrew Sarlos
to make a takeover bid for all special shares and series II
warrants of Guardian-Morton, subject to regulatory approval and
completion of definitive documentation.
    Guardman Investment, current manager and owner of all
common shares of Guardian-Morton, also agreed to sell the
common and its management agreement to a company controlled by
Sarlos if the takeover bid is successful, Guardian-Morton said.
    Price to be offered for the Guardian-Morton special shares
under the takeover bid will be 90 pct of the net asset value of
the special shares at the time of the bid, and two dlrs for
each series II warrant, the company said.
    Guardian-Morton said the takeover bid will be conditional
on Sarlos acquiring at least 90 pct of the special shares and
90 pct of the series II warrants, when combined the number of
special shares and warrants owned by the offeror at the time of
the bid.
    Investment companies managed by Sarlos currently own
slightly less than 10 pct of Guardian-Morton's special shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4209>
Dutch shipping and transport group
PHS Van Ommeren NV &lt;OMMN.AS> said it has taken over a small
Dutch gas container firm as a first step in establishing a
world-wide gas container organisation.
    The firm, Liquid and Gas Transport BV (LGT), employs 10
people and has a fleet of 200 gas containers.
    Van Ommeren will shortly open an office in Singapore and
expand its facilities in Houston to establish the gas container
network.
    REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4212>
International American Homes inc
said it has contracted to acquire &lt;Diversified Shelter Group
Ltd> for about 11,850,000 dlrs to be paid 73 pct in cash and 27
pct in International American common stock to be valued on a 30
day trading average prior to closing.
    It said the price is based on Diversified's estimated 3.2
mln dlrs pro forma pre-tax earnings for 1986 after adjustment
for certain non-continuing expenses. Diversified, a developer
of single family housing in the Atlanta market, had 1986
revenues of about 25.3 mln dlrs. The acquisition if subject to
International American arranging financing.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4227>
Quixote Corp said Dainippon Ink and
Chemicals Inc of Japan will buy 526,315 shares of Quixote
common stock, a 6.7 pct stake, for 10 mln dlrs, or 19 dlrs a
share.
    It said the two companies also agreed to share the results
of their research and development activities in optical disc
technology.
    Dainippon Inc's optical disc technology focuses on the
development of a new Direct-Read-After-Write optical disc and
an advanced erasable optical disc.
    Quixote said its wholly owned subsidiary, LaserVideo Inc,
is making advancements in the art of mastering and
manufacturing Compact Discs, CD-ROMs and laser-read videodiscs.
    Quixote said the agreement with Dainippon, which has annual
sales of more than two billion dlrs, provides for a Dainippon
representative to sit on the LaserVideo board of directors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4229>
American Savings and Loan Association of
Florida said &lt;Knoll International Holdings Inc> has offered to
purchase 500,000 new shares of American Savings for 10 mln
dlrs, and the board has accepted Knoll's offer.
    Knoll already owns 796,413 shares or 9.9 pct of American
Savings.
    American Savings said the purchase will resolve a
previously-announced disagreement between American Savings and
the Federal Home Loan Bank of Atlanta on the replacement of the
capital American Savings used to repurchase common shares in
January 1985 from former chairman Marvin L. Warner.
    It said completion of the transaction would give Knoll 15
pct ownership in American Savings.
    American Savings said Knoll also had talks with chairman of
the executive committee Shepard Broad and chairman Morris Broad
on the purchase of their American Savings shares as well at 20
dlrs each but no agreement was reached.
    American Savings said The company said Knoll's offer to buy
the new shares is not conditioned on other purchase of common
stock from any person or entity.
    It said its previously-announced engagement of Salomon Inc
&lt;SB> to evaluate alternatives to enhance shareholder values,
including the possible sale of American Savings, is still being
actively pursued.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4233>
Merrill Lynch Canada Inc, wholly owned
by Merrill Lynch and Co, is considering acquiring another
Canadian securities company as the result of federal and
provincial government moves to lift investment dealer ownership
restrictions on June 30, according to a published report.
    "We're talking to a number of people," Merrill Lynch Canada
deputy chairman E. Duff Scott told The Toronto Star. "Whether
we're going to do something, I don't know," he said.
    A Merrill Lynch Canada spokesman declined to comment on the
newspaper report when queried.
    Scott did not disclose which investment dealers Merrill
Lynch Canada was considering acquiring, but the Toronto Star
quoted unidentified industry sources as saying serious
discussions have already been held with Burns Fry Ltd.
    Burns Fry chairman Jack Lawrence told the newspaper the
investment dealer has not made a final decision, but was
examining "three or four alternatives."
    Discussions between brokers about possible mergers is to be
expected pending industry deregulation, one investment industry
source, who asked not to be named, told Reuters.
    "It's silly not to take a look (at making a merger or
acquisition). If you're a businessman, you have to take a look,"
the industry source said.
    Under federal and provincial government regulations
expected to be in place by June 30, banks, trust companies and
foreign companies will be allowed to acquire existing
investment dealers or establish their own securities
subsidiaries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4235>
&lt;Consolidated Gold Fields
PLC>'s ARC America Corp subsidiary said it has acquired
7,521,643 American Aggregates Corp shares, about 95 pct of
those outstanding, as a result of its tender offer which
expired February 27.
    As soon as is practicable, ARC America will acquire
American Aggregates, converting the company's remaining shares
into the right to receive 30.625 dlrs a share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4237>
Biotech Capital Corp said it agreed to
buy High Technology magazine from the Goldhirsh Group of
Boston.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    The magazine publishes information about emerging
technologies and their impact on business. It has a circulation
of 200,000 and is the largest of its kind in the world, the
company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4249>
Leader Development Corp said it
has purchased 300,000 shares of convertible preferred stock in
&lt;Petrosurance Inc> for 1,500,000 dlrs in cash and real estate.
    Petrosurance specializes in property and casualty insurance
for the oil industry.
    Leader said the stock is convertible into a Petrosurance
common. Leader said it already owns 12.5 pct of Petrorusrance
and conversion would give it about 45.0 pct.
    The company said Petrosurance will use the sale proceeds to
support growth and improve the structure of its reinsurance
treaties to retain a larger part of premiums written.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4277>
Instinet Corp said its board has
scheduled a special shareholders' meeting for May 21 to vote on
its proposed merger into Reuters Holdings PLC &lt;RTRSY>.
    It said shareholders of record as of April 10 will be
eligible to vote at the meeting.
    Instinet said the meeting date is subject to adjustment,
based on the length of time needed for the U.S. Securities and
Exchange Commission to complete its review of the filing of
merger proxy materials, which Instinet expects to make before
the end of March.
    Instinet said the filing of the preliminary merger proxy
materials is tied to the finalization of audited financial
statements of Instinet and Reuters for 1986.
    Under a merger agreement entered into in November, Reuters
tendered for up to 5.10 mln Instinet common shares, or about 45
pct of those not already owned by Reuters. As a result of the
tender, Reuters now owns about 49 pct of Instinet shares.
    In the merger, holders of remaining Instinet shares will
receive 8.50 dlrs of Reuters American Depositary Shares for
each Instinet share.
    The ADS's will be valued at the average of their closing
prices in the 10 trading days before the effective date of the
merger.
    Instinet said it expects the merger to become effective as
soon as possible after shareholder approval at the special
meeting.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4301>
Waste Management Inc said it
received notice of early termination of the Hart-Scott-Rodino
waiting period for its 270 mln dlr takeover bid for Chemlawn
Corp &lt;CHEM>.
    The waiting period was terminated March 11, Waste
Management said.
    Chemlawn has rejected Waste Management's 27 dlrs a share
bid. It has said it was talking with other parties about
selling its business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4303>
Cyacq Corp, an investor group
bidding for Cyclops Corp, said it would raise its outstanding
tender offer price for Cyclops common to 92.50 dlrs a share
from 80 dlrs, if certain conditions were met.
    The increased offer would exceed the 90.25 dlrs a share
price offered by Dixons Group PLC in a tender offer for Cyclops
that is part of a definitive agreement to acquire the
Pittsburgh-based maker of carbon tool and specialty steel
products.
    Cyacq includes Audio/Video Affiliates Inc and Citicorp
Capital Investors Ltd and other investors.
    Cyclops has about 4.1 mln shares outstanding.
    For the tender price to be raised, Cyclops must provide
Cyacq with all non-public information provided to Dixons Group
and Cyacq must be satisfied with financial projections made in
offering material by Dixons based on the information, Cyacq
said.
    Additionally, Dixon Group's rights to buy Cyclops common
and its rights to fees or expenses if the Dixon-Cyclop merger
agreement is broken must be rescinded, Cyacq said.
    Cyacq said financial projections it developed for Cyclops
were materially lower than the financial projections provided
by Cyclops to Dixons Group.
    A Cyclops spokeswoman said the company had no details of
the new Cyacq proposal and could not comment. "We have nothing
in hand," she said.
    In addition to making specialty metal products, Cyclops
also operates about 115 specialty stores that sell consumer
electronics products. The stores are located in 17 states
concentrated in the Northeast, Northwest and Southwest.
    Cyclops employs about 8,900 people in Pennsylvania, Ohio
and other states. It also has interests in non-residential
construction.
    In 1986, Cyclops earned 21.3 mln dlrs or 5.26 dlrs a share
on sales of 1.5 billion dlrs, compared to 1985 earnings of 26.2
mln dlrs or 6.20 dlrs on sales of 1.4 billion, the spokeswoman
said.
    The agreement with Dixons Group calls for Cyclops's steel
and construction businesses to be sold to a unit of Alleghany
Corp &lt;Y> for about 110 mln dlrs once the merger is completed.
    A Cyacq spokesman said the new conditional tender price
would be all cash. He had no comment on whether Cyacq plans to
withdraw its current offer, which is scheduled to expire
midnight on March six.
    Dixon Group's offer extends to March 17.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4310>
Security Pacific Corp said it
completed its previously announced acquisition of Orbanco
Financial Services Corp after receiving federal approval of the
deal.
    Security Pacific said the Federal Reserve Board approved on
Wednesday its purchase of the Portland, Ore.-based bank holding
company and financial services concern.
    The purchase of Orbanco, for about 47 mln dlrs in cash and
common stock, will be effective in 30 days, a Security Pacific
spokeswoman said.
    Terms call for each share of Orbanco common stock to be
exchanged for about 14 dlrs of Security Pacific common stock,
plus 1.50 dlrs cash.
    Each share of Orbanco's 100-dlr par value preferred stock
will be exchanged for 100 dlrs cash, plus accrued dividends.
    Orbanco, with one billion dlrs in assests, is the holding
company for the Oregon Bank, Orbanco Real Estate Service Co,
American Data Service Inc and Orbanco Securities Corp.
    Security Pacific now has four major regional bank purchases
outside California completed or pending.
    Security Pacific bought The Arizona Bank, with assets of
four billion dlrs, in the fourth quarter of 1986.
    Pending approval currently is the purchase of Rainier
Bancorporation &lt;RBAN>, with assets of 9.2 billion dlrs. In
anticipation of legislative changes that take effect in 1989,
Security Pacific has also negotiated the future purchase of The
Nevada Bank, with assets of 615 mln dlrs.
    Security Pacific is the sixth largest U.S. bank holding
company, with assets of about 61.60 billion dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4315>
Union Pacific Corp said it will sign a
pact in Caracas on March 17 with Petroleos De Venezuela, PDVSA,
to sell the state owned company half of its Corpus Christi,
Texas refinery owned by its Union Pacific's Champlin Petroleum
Co subsidiary.
    The sale will also include the related marketing and
distribution system for the refinery's products.
    A spokesman for the company said that a statement may be
issued later today giving details of the transaction.
    There was no immediate comment from PDVSA officials in New
York.
    The Corpus Christi refinery has a capacity of about 160,000
barrels per day, the Union Pacific spokesman said, and is a
largely upgraded facility but he would place no value on the
transaction.
    The additional acquisition of refinery and distribution
assets by PDVSA has been expected as Venezuela has been moving
aggressively to enhance its role in the oil industry from
producer to excpanding its presence in the downstream sector.
    Purchase of part of Champlin's operations also fits a
profile which PDVSA officials have said previously they looked
for in any acquisition.
    One PDVSA official said the company was looking for
independent oil companies with good refinery and distribution
network and a strong regional presence.
    The potential purchase of the interest in Champlin followed
its earlier acquisition of a part interest in Southland Corp's
&lt;SLC> Citgo Petroleum Corp subsidiary.
    In that agreement signed September 15, 1986, PDVSA paid
Southland 290 mln dlrs for half of Citgo's stock.
    The potetnital acquisition of half Champlin's Corpus
Christi plant will also give Venezuela an additional outlet for
its crude oil production while giving the refiner an assured
source of supply, trade sources said.
    In the earlier deal with Southland, PDVSA agredd to to
supply Citgo with at least 130,000 bpd of crude oil and other
feedstocks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4323>
Zico INvestment Holdings INc said that
Bancroft Convertible Fund Inc filed suit seeking to enjoin
Zico's 30 dlr-a-share tender offer for 500,000 Bancroft shares.
    In its complaint, Bancroft said the tender offer materials
and letters to shareholders are false and misleading and that
the tender offer violates the investment company act of 1940.
    Zico said the suit is totally without merit and vigorously
intends to contest it.
    A motion is scheduled to be heard on March 16.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4339>
&lt;Protein Databases
Inc> said Millipore Corp through its venture capital
subsidiary, Millicorp, acquired an equity position in the
company.
    Protein said it and Millipore intend to establish an
"interactive relationship."
    No other details were disclosed about the amount of
Millipore's investment in Protein.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4343>
Merrill Lynch and Co Inc fired the
head of the mergers department in its London office today,
saying he had been unable to provide a "satisfactory
explanation" in response to insider trading charges filed
yesterday by the Securities and Exchange Commission.
    Merrill had suspended the official, Nahum Vaskevitch,
yesterday saying at the time it was "disappointed and angry" if
the SEC charges are true.
    Merrill Lynch's statement at midday today said the firm
will continue to cooperatie fully with authoriteis in the U.S.
and London investigating Vaskevitch's activities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4360>
Blue Grass Breeders Inc said it has
completed the acquisition of Equine Enterprises Inc for four
mln common shares.
    It said it is obligated to deliver another 2,741,660 shares
on the attainment of a certain level of shareholders' equity
during any fiscal quarter within 12 months of closing.
    If all the contingent shares are issued, Blue Grass said
former owners of Equine will have a 75 pct interest in Blue
Grass.
    Equine is a New Mexico quarter horse breeding and racing
company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4367>
Union Pacific Corp said it will enter
a 50-50 partnership with Petroles de Venezuela, PDVSA, to own
and operate Union Pacific's 160,000 barrel-per-day Corpus
Christi, Texas, oil refinery.
    The assests to be acquired by the partnership are valued at
190 mln dlrs, Union Pacific said.
    Closing is expected to take place in early April and the
venture is to be called Champlin Refining Co.
    The partnership will acquire the refining and distribution
systems currently owned and operated by Champlin Petroleum, a
wholly owned subsidiary of Union Pacific.
    The venture will acquire the related inventories and the
Champlin trade name, the company said.
    PDVSA and Union Pacific will each contribute half the
capital required by the venture and arrange a revolving credit
facility with U.S. and foreign banks to finance inventories and
receivables, Union Pacific said.
    Petroles de Venezuela also signed a 25-year agreement to
supply at least 140,000 bpd of Venezulean crude oil and naphtha
to the refinery at market related prices.
    Under various options the in the agreement PDVSA could
supply another 50,000 bpd on similar terms, the company said.
    "This will provide a stable, long-term supply to the
refinery at competitive costs, thereby assuring the economic
viability of the plant," a statement issued by Union Pacific
said.
   The statement said the agreement with PDVSA will enable the
company to supply a steady flow of refined products to its
customers.
   Union Pacific said employees of the refinery would be
transfered to the new company and would retain the same
benefits as in the past.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4369>
A Purolator Courier Corp director
resigned from the company's board, saying he plans to take
steps to make or find an offer that tops the 265 mln dlr buyout
deal already accepted by Purolator's board, the company said.
    The director, Doresy Gardner, resigned in a March 10 letter
to the Purolator board, which was included in a filing made by
the company to the Securities and Exchange Commission.
    Gardner noted that the terms of the merger agreement in
which the company would bought out by a group of its managers
and E.F. Hutton LBO Inc bar directors from taking action to
solicit, initiate or encourage acquisition proposals.
    "I, as a shareholder, wish to solicit, initiate or
encourage such an offer or indication of interest, and believe,
therefore, that I should resign as a director of the
corporation," Gardner said in the letter.
    "Accordingly, I hereby resign as a director of Purolator
Courier Corp, effective immediately," he said.
    Gardner said he believes shareholders could get a better
deal than the buyout offer if the company would agree to be
sold to some other entity, or if it could sell off all or part
of its U.S. courier division.
    On March 4, another Purolator shareholder, Rodney Shields,
filed a class action suit on behalf of the company's
shareholders charging the company and its board with breaching
their fiduciary duty by failing to take steps to ensure that
shareholders got the highest possible price in the buyout.
    The deal would give shareholders 35 dlrs a share in cash if
just 83 pct of Purolator's 7.6 mln shares are tendered. If more
are tendered, they would receive 29 dlrs in cash and six dlrs
in debentures and a warrant to buy stock in the new company in
exchange for each share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4371>
Century Telephone Enterprises Inc
said it has accepted an offer to sell its cable television
properties in Michigan, Tennessee, Florida, Arkansas and
Louisiana for a "substantial" gain.
    The company said details were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4401>
DeSoto Inc said it sold the
plant, inventory and certain other assets of some of its
industrial chemical operations to Plastic Specialities and
Technologies Inc, a privately-held company headquartered in
Parsippany, New Jersey.  Terms were not disclosed.
    Desoto's industrial chemical operations are based in Fort
Worth, Texas, and has annual sales of about 17 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4408>
CytRx Corp said its 60 pct owned CytRx
Biopool Ltd subsidiary has acquired Biopool AB of Umea, Sweden,
for undisclosed terms.
    It said former shareholders of Biopool AB own the remaining
40 pct in CytRx Biopool Ltd. Biopool AB develops cardiovascular
and fibrinolytic products for diagnostic applications.
    The company said CytRx Biopool is studying the possible
combination of CytRx Corp's RheothRx drug to reduce platelet
aggregation and viscosity in blood with Biopool AB's drug t-PA
for dissolving blood clots.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4411>
A group of investment firms told the
Securities and Exchange Commission they raised their stake in
Intermedics Inc to 1,721,900 shares, or 16.8 pct of the total
outstanding, from 1,565,900 shares, or 15.2 pct.
    Bessemer Securities Corp, a New York investment firm,
Cilluffo Associates L.P., a New York investment partnership,
and related entities said they bought 156,000 Intermedics
common shares between February 24 and March 9 for 1.4 mln dlrs.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4447>
First Granite Bancorp Inc
said it agreed in principle to become a wholly owned subsidiary
of Magna Group Inc &lt;MAGI>.
    Under terms of the agreement, First Granite shareholders
will receive 2.175 shares of Magna for each First Granite share
held. First Granite shareholders will be asked to approve the
tranaction in late summer.
    First Granite, which has 675,000 shares outstanding, as of
Dec 31, 1986 had assets of 186.5 mln dlrs. It owns First
Granite City National Bank and Colonial Bank of Granite City,
Ill.
    Magna Groups as of Dec 31, 1986 had assets of 1.47 billion
dlrs. It owns 13 banks, a data services company, a mortgage
company and a trust company, serving St. Louis as well as
Springfield, Centralia and Decatur, Ill.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4465>
Alleghney International Inc said the
plaintiffs in the existing lawsuits opposing its sale requested
an amendment to their complaint to include a class action
count.
    Alleghney said the suit, filed in the U.S. District Court
for the Western District of Pennsylvania, was aimed at blocking
the sale of Alleghney to an affiliate of First Boston Inc.
    Allegheney said the additional count sought by the
plaintiffs alleges the price to be offered for AI's common
stock, 24.60 dlrs, is grossly unfair and one the purposes of
the proposed sale is to absolve the individual defendants of
liability in the lawsuit.
     The additional count among other forms of relief, requests
an injunction against the defendants from taking any steps to
accomplish the proposed sale, Alleghney said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4477>
Purolator Courier corp's stock rose on
specualtion that a disgruntled former Purolator director would
find a new suitor for the company, traders said.
    Purolator agreed in late February to a 35 dlr-a-share, 265
mln-dlr offer from E.F. Hutton LBO Inc and certain members of
its Purolator courier division's management.
    The stock today hit 36-1/4, up one.
    Today, Purolator revealed in a filing with the Securities
and Exchange Commission that director Doresy Gardner resigned
from its board of directors in a letter dated March 10.
    The letter from Gardner said he resigned the board because
the merger agreement with Hutton barred directors from
soliciting new offers and he believes shareholders might get a
better deal. Gardner said he believes a better offer might be
found if the company would agree to be sold to some other
entity, or if it could sell off all or part of its U.S. courier
division.
    "Basically, (the courier division) is a company that has
450 mln dlrs in revenues. It's a very large company and it's
being sold for 50 or 60 mln dlrs," said Gardner in a telephone
interview with Reuters.
    Gardner is an official of Kelso Management, a firm
associated with Fidelity International Ltd. A group of Fidelity
companies owns eight pct of Purolator, and Gardner said he
personally owns 20,000 shares.
    A Purolator official said the company has no comment on the
letter from Gardner.
    Arbitragers speculated another overnight messenger service
may emerge as a likely bidder for Purolator. Before the
transaction with Hutton LBO was announced, analysts had also
speculated another courier company would be the most likely
suitor.
    While one arbitrager acknowledged there in fact may be no
new bidders, he said the possibility one could appear pushed
the stock into play again.
    "There's no shortage of possibilities. It's just a question
of management's willingness to let the process continue," said
one arbitrager.
    Arbitragers said a new buyer might be found because they
believe Hutton LBO has taken on no risk in the transaction.
Hutton has begun a tender for 83 pct of Purolator at 35 dlrs
cash per share. The balance of Purolator's stock will be bought
for securities and warrants in a new company holding the U.S.
courier operations.
    The arbitragers said tender offer documents show that
Hutton does not need to use its cash in the transaction and
will emerge with a giant, majority equity interest in
Purolator.
    "As far as I can tell from the public documents from the
deal that's on the table, Hutton is basically putting up zero.
One always likes a situation like that. You always like to
think if they can do this deal at no risk, there should be
someone else in the world that could do it higher," said one
arbitrager.
    The firm, however, is supplying temporary financing, and
sources close to the transaction disputed the claim that the
firm will not end up paying for its equity position.
    While one scenario mentioned in the tender offer document
did note that the E.F. Hutton Group subsidiary may not have to
keep cash in the transaction, the sources said there is some
risk to the firm.
    "There are a variety of contingencies and restricted cash,
and all sorts of things that make it very speculative," said
one of the sources, adding there are also severance payments to
employees.
    The E.F. Hutton Group subsidiary is supplying 279 mln dlrs
in so-called "bridge" financing for the transaction. The bridge
financing is a temporary loan from Hutton.
    The financing is to be replaced with permanent financing,
expected to come from banks. However, it may take some time to
replace the financing, the source said, resulting in what could
be a substantial expense to the firm.
    Gardner said Hutton stands to gain fees of 10 to 20 mln
dlrs from the transaction, but sources close to the transaction
said fees are at the low end of the scale.
    "It's a very complex transaction, but basically what
happens is they ostensibly put up money but the fees recapture
any investment they might have once the merger takes place,"
Gardner said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4488>
Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger
will join Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige in fighting
Fujitsu Ltd's &lt;ITSU.T> plan to buy 80 pct of &lt;Fairchild
Semiconductor Corp>, Pentagon officials said.
    "He (Weinberger) opposes it. It is not in the best interests
of the country to have more of the micro-electronics business
leaving the United States," one of the Pentagon officials, who
asked not to be identified, told Reuters.
    Commerce Department officials told Reuters yesterday that
Baldrige opposed the planned sale and that the White House
Economic Policy Council will take up the matter within weeks.
    Commerce and defense officials said Baldrige and Weinberger
feared the U.S. military is already leaning too heavily on
foreign electronic support.
    But the Defense Department also said today that Weinberger
and Baldrige differed on the proposed sale of U.S. computer
equipment to Iran.
    The Commerce Department advised the Pentagon recently that
defense objections to two proposed sales -- to an Iranian power
company and the Islamic Republic of Iran News Agency -- were
not valid and the sales of small and medium computers would go
through unless more evidence was presented.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4493>
Safeguard Scientifics Inc
said it made a 2.5 mln dlr equity investment in &lt;Sanchez
Computer Associates Inc>, a private computer software firm
based in Malvern, Pa.
   Safeguard said the investment gives it a "major ownership
position" in Sanchez, which specializes in software products
for financial institutions.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4510>
Summit Petroleum Corp said it
sold 11.3 mln shares, or 29.4 pct, of its common stock to
&lt;Halbert and Associates Inc>.
    The company said the shares were previously held by
&lt;Consolidated Energy Corp> and Harken Oil and Gas Inc &lt;HOGI>.
    In addition, David D. Halbert, president and chief
executive officer of Halbert, an Abilene investment firm, was
named chairman and chief executive of Summit, the company said.
   Halbert, Charles M. Bruce and James O. Burke were also named
directors, expanding the board to five, Summit added.
    The company said Burke is president and chief executive of
&lt;Allied Comprehensive Health Inc>, Abilene, while Bruce is a
partner in the Washington law firm of Butler and Binion.
    Summit said it intends to actively seek acquisitions to
increase its asset base.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4518>
Allied-Lyons PLC &lt;ALLD.L> and Canada's
Reichmann brothers are working well together as partners and
currently do not plan any change in their joint ownership of
distiller Hiram Walker-Gooderham and Worts, Allied-Lyons
chairman Derrick Holden-Brown said.
    Allied-Lyons got 51 pct control of Hiram Walker-Gooderham
last year for about 600 mln U.S. dlrs, while the Reichmanns'
&lt;Gulf Canada Corp> acquired 49 pct in an out-of-court pact
after a hostile battle for the wine and spirits division of
&lt;Hiram Walker Resources Ltd>.
    "We are getting along very well as partners ... I hope
there won't be any change, but there could be," Holden-Brown
told reporters after a speech in Toronto.
    He said Allied-Lyons has a two-year call option that could
force Gulf Canada to sell its 49 pct stake to Allied-Lyons, and
Gulf Canada has a two-year put option that could obligate
Allied-Lyons to buy its 49 pct.
    "Both we and Gulf hope very much there will be no occasion
for either the put or call to be exercised," Holden-Brown said.
    In answer to a reporter's question, Holden-Brown said it
would be possible for Gulf Canada to sell off part of its 49
pct in a public offering with Allied-Lyons' consent. "I don't
think we would have any objection to it," he added.
    Allied-Lyons maintains control of Hiram Walker-Gooderham's
board of directors and has total responsibility for its
management. "We cannot contemplate giving up our control," he
said.
    Holden-Brown would not disclose how big a profit
contribution the distiller will make in Allied-Lyons' financial
results, but he said "it will be substantial."
    "I am not able to give profit forecasts," he said.
    Holden-Brown said Allied-Lyons was able to finance the
Hiram Walker-Gooderham acquisition with cash and borrowings,
and has no current plans for a stock issue.
    He said the company is not currently negotiating any more
acquisitions in Canada but has a team of officials evaluating
possible purchases of wines, spirits, soft drinks or food
concerns. "I don't think we shall be looking at the brewery
scene (which is) highly concentrated already," he added.
    Holden-Brown said Allied-Lyons plans to list its shares on
Canadian stock exchanges, possibly later this year.
             
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4536>
Princeville Development Corp and
&lt;Aloha Inc>, parent of Aloha Airlines Inc, jointly said they
agreed to terms for the sale of Princeville Airways Inc to
Aloha. Terms of the agreement were not disclosed.
    Under the proposed sale, the companies said Aloha would
acquire the entire Princeville Airways commuter operation and
access to the Princeville Airport on the island of Kauai.
    They said Princeville Airways is expected to operate as a
subsidiary of Aloha Inc and will continue to use the
Princeville Aiways name.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4537>
New Hampshire Savings Bank Corp
said it agreed to buy &lt;Seashore Bankshares Inc> in an exchange
of stock.
    According to the terms of the deal, it said Seashore's
61,000 shares will be exchanged for 9.8 mln dlrs of New
Hampshire Savings stock.
    It said Seashore Bankshares has assets of about 46 mln
dlrs.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4579>
Baird Corp &lt;BATM> said the
Massachusetts State Court for Suffolk County has lifted a  
temporary restraining order prohibiting Mark IV Industries Inc
from further purchases of Baird stock.
    According to filings with the Securities and Exchange
Commission, Mark IV owns at least 17.6 pct of Baird's stock and
may attempt to acquire Baird, Baird said.
    Baird said the court also issued an order enjoining Baird
from enforcing the Massachusetts Anti-Takeover Statute against
Mark IV industries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4586>
&lt;Eager Technology Inc> said it signed a
letter of intent to acquire Nuclad Inc, a private Colorado
corporation, and its subsidiaries.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4591>
&lt;Interconnect Capital Corp>
said it sent a letter to the board of Gates Learjet Corp,
offering to buy the company for 7.07 dlrs a share.
    Gates Corp, which owns 64.8 pct of Gates Learjet, agreed
earlier this week to sell its shares to a partnership formed by
privately-held &lt;Cobey Corp> and a unit of Bear Stearns Cos Inc
&lt;BSC> for 6.50 dlrs a share or 51 mln dlrs. The proposal is
subject to approval by Gates Learjet's board.
    A spokesman for privately-held Interconnect said it made
the new proposal to Gates Learjet's board, but would not say if
it had held talks with the parent company's board.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4592>
Seal Inc said it acquired
Ademco Ltd, a United Kingdom company which distributes mounting
and laminating equipment and supplies, for a combination of
cash and stock valued at 2.6 mln dlrs, based on current
exchange rates.
    Seal said it will pay up to an additional 1.3 mln dlrs
contingent on the market price of Seal's common on December 31,
1988, and on certain earnings targets by the acquired business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4605>
WEintraub Entertainment Group Inc
said it agreed to acquire Cannon Group's Screen Entertainment
film library.
    The library was purchased in May 1986 as part of Cannon's
acquisition of Screen Entertainment Ltd from Bond Corp Holdings
Ltd. The library has over 2,000 theatrical motion pictures.
    Terms call for the price to be established through an
appraisal process beginning immediately and not to exceed 175
mln dlrs or be below 125 mln dlrs.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4606>
Gerber Scientific Inc said
its GST Acquisition Corp purchased 444,646 shares of its 84 pct
owned Gerber Systems Technology pursuant to a January 15 tender
offer.
    Following the purchase, Gerber made a capital contribution
to GST of all the shares it owned resulting in 95.6 pct
ownership by GST.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4615>
Price Co said it agreed to buy at
least 81 pct of the stock of &lt;TSS-Seedman's INc> for about 50
mln dlrs.
    The terms envision a purchase of the entire company, it
said.
    The transaction is expected to close at the end of April.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4622>
The &lt;Hearst Corp> is buying the Houston
Chronicle from Houston Endowment Inc for 400 mln dlrs.
    The announcement was made jointly by Frank Bennack Jr,
president and chief executive officer of Hearst, and Richard
Johnson, president of the Chronicle.
    The Houston Endowment is selling the paper to comply with
federal tax laws requiring charitable institutions to divest
themselves of profit-making subsidiaries by 1989.
    The Chronicle has a daily circulation of over 425,000 and
is in competition with the Houston Post, owned by the &lt;Toronto
Sun Publishing Corp>, with a circulation of about 316,000.
    The acquisition gives Hearst its biggest newspaper holding
in Texas, where the California-based publisher already owns
papers in San Antonio, Beaumont and Laredo.
    The chain also owns, among others, the flagship San
Francisco Examiner, the Los Angeles Herald Examiner and the
Seattle Post-Intelligencer.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4623>
&lt;Industrial Equity Ltd> (IEL) unit
&lt;Acmex Holdings Ltd> said it proposed to make a formal takeover
offer for all the issued capital of &lt;Cheetham Ltd>, a producer
of salt, animal feed and seeds.
    Acmex said in a statement it would offer one share for
every two Cheetham shares or 3.40 dlrs cash for each share.
    Acmex said it was presently entitled to 5.1 mln Cheetham
shares or 16.85 pct of its 30.27 mln issued shares.
    The scrip offer values Cheetham at about 110 mln dlrs,
based on Acmex's current price of 7.20 dlrs, and the cash offer
at about 104 mln. Cheetham last traded at 3.10 dlrs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4659>
&lt;County Ltd>, which is acting in concert
with Tesco Plc &lt;TSCO.L> in its 151.4 mln stg for supermarket
chain operator &lt;Hillards Plc>, has purchased 300,000 Hillards
ordinary shares at 316p per share, a statement said.
    These purchases, together with those made by County on 10
March, represent about 4.8 pct of Hillards issued ordinary
share capital, it said.
    Tesco's offer, made on March 10, values each Hillards
ordinary share at 305.5p, a 37.6 pct premium over the previous
day's  closing price. A cash alternative of 290.55p will be
made available.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4665>
A Foreign Ministry official dismissed
arguments made by senior U.S. Government officials seeking to
block the sale of a U.S. Microchip maker to a Japanese firm.
    "They appear to be linking completely unrelated issues,"
Shuichi Takemoto of the Foreign Ministry's North American
Division told Reuters.
    U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige has asked the
White House to consider blocking the sale of &lt;Fairchild
Semiconductor Corp> to Japan's Fujitsu Ltd &lt;ITSU.T>, U.S.
Officials said yesterday.
    Baldrige expressed concern that the sale would leave the
U.S. Military dependent on a foreign company for vital high
technology equipment. Pentagon officials said Defence Secretary
Caspar Weinberger also opposes to the sale.
    U.S. Officials have also said the sale would give Fujitsu a
powerful role in the U.S. Market for supercomputers while
Japan's supercomputer market remains closed to U.S. Sales.
    Takemoto said national security should not be an issue
since the planned purchase of Fairchild from its current owner,
Schlumberger Ltd &lt;SLB>, does not include Fairchild's main
defence-related division.
    In addition, Takemoto said tension over the supercomputer
trade should not affect the sale as Fairchild does not make
supercomputers.
    Analysts noted that Fairchild does make sophisticated
microchips used in supercomputers. Fujitsu makes similar chips
and supplies them to U.S. Supercomputer makers, they said.
    Takemoto also dismissed U.S. Fears that the proposed
takeover would violate U.S. Antitrust law, saying "the purchase
would not result in Fujitsu monopolising the U.S. Semiconductor
market."
    Two separate issues appear to have come together to boost
pressure to block the purchase, industry analysts said.
    The move is in part an attempt to force Japan to open its
domestic market to more U.S. Supercomputer sales, they said.
    U.S. Officials have repeatedly charged that the Japanese
public sector is closed to U.S. Supercomputer sales despite
U.S. Firms' technological lead in the field.
    "The United States believes Japan will only react when
bullied, and this is a bullying ploy," Salomon Brothers Asia
analyst Carole Ryavec said.
    However, the analysts said more is at stake than
supercomputer sales as the U.S. Fears it is losing its vital
semiconductor industry to Japanese competitors.
    "The real issue is xenophobia in (the U.S.) Silicon Valley,"
said Tom Murtha of brokerage James Capel and Co.
    U.S.-Japanese tension over the semiconductor trade has
failed to subside despite recent efforts by Japan's Ministry of
International Trade and Industry (MITI) to get Japanese firms
to abide by a bilateral pact aimed at halting predatory pricing
and opening Japan's market.
    A MITI official said that while Japan is faithfully abiding
by the agreement, problems remain in halting the sale of
microchips in Europe and Southeast Asia at prices below those
set by the pact.
    "It is only a matter of time before we solve this problem,"
he told Reuters.
    Despite the furore, Fujitsu will proceed with talks on the
acquisition in line with the basic agreement reached with
Schlumberger last year, a Fujitsu spokeswoman told Reuters.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4690>
A Mannesmann AG &lt;MMWG.F> spokesman
said the company has lodged an application with the Federal
Cartel Office for approval of a possible majority stake in car
parts company &lt;Fichtel und Sachs AG>.
    He described the application as a precautionary move and
said no agreement on buying a majority stake had yet been
reached. Until now Mannesmann has said only that it wanted to
buy a 37.5 pct stake in Fichtel from the heirs of Ernst Wilhelm
Sachs, the grandson of the firm's founder.
    The spokesman declined to say from whom it may buy the
other shares to create a majority stake in the firm.
    Fichtel's other principal shareholders are Commerzbank AG
&lt;CBKG.F>, with 35.01 pct, and Salzgitter AG &lt;ISLG.F>, with
24.98 pct. Spokesmen declined to comment directly on the
possibility of selling Fichtel shares to Mannesmann.
    Mannesmann said in January it hoped to take a 37.5 pct
stake in Fichtel's holding company Sachs AG in the first
quarter.
    Last week a spokesman said Mannesmann had a letter of
intent on the 37.5 pct stake but completion was being delayed
by legal questions surrounding the inheritance.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4733>
First Boston Inc said it has started
its previously-announced tender offer for all common shares,
2.19 dlr cumulative preference shares and 11.25 dlr convertible
preferred shares of Allegheny International Inc at 24.60 dlrs,
20.00 dlrs and 87.50 dlrs respectively.
    In a newspaper advertisement, the company said the offer
and withdrawal rioghts will expire April Nine unless extended.
The offer is conditioned on receipt of at least a majority of
Allegheny voting power on a fully diluted basis and on receipt
of at least two thirds each of the preference and preferred
shares.
    A merger approved by the Allegheny board in which remaining
common, preference and preferred shares would be acquired at
the tender prices is to follow the offer.
    Receipt of the minimum amounts under the offer would give
First Boston sufficient voting power to assure approval of the
merger without the affirmative vote of any other shareholder,
the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4748>
&lt;Service Control Corp> said it has
started a tender offer for all shares of &lt;American Service
Corp> at 37 dlrs each.
    In a newspaper advertisement, the company said the offer
and withdrawal rights expire April Nine unless extended.  The
American Service board has approved the offer, which is to be
followed by a merger at the same price.
    Service Control said the offer is conditioned on receipt of
at least 534,806 shares.  It said holders of 534,819 shares
have agreed to tender their shares under the offer and have
granted Service Control an option to buy them at 37 dlrs each.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4772>
Caesars World Inc said its board
unanimously rejected a 28 dlr a share takeover offer by New
York investor Martin T. Sosnoff.
    Caesars said Sosnoff's offer to by all its outstanding
shares of common stock was inadequate and not in the best
interests of its shareholders.
    The company recommended that shareholders reject Sosnoff's
offer, made through his &lt;MTS Acquisition Corp>, and not tender
any of their shares.
    Caesars said it will explore a variety of alternative
transactions but did not elaborate.
    Caesars, in a brief statement, did not say whether it would
seek to buy back its shares held by Sosnoff.
    A Caesars spokesman said the company would not comment
further on its decision.
    On Wednesday, Sosnoff told the Securities and Exchange
Commission that he controls 13.6 pct of the company's stock.
    Sosnoff also informed the SEC that Caesars had offered to
buyout his holdings several times during the past year.
    No one from the Sosnoff organization was immediately
available for comment.
    Caesars said its financial advisor, Drexel Burnham Lambert
Inc, had determined that Sosnoff's offer was financially
inadequate for shareholders other than Sosnoff.
    The company said other factors it considered in rejecting
the offer were its financial condition, future prospects,
current market conditions and the numerous conditions on which
Sosnoff's bid was conditioned.
    Caesars' stock opened up 1/8 point at 28-1/8. That is 1/8
point above Sosnoff's offer price.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4774>
Conseco Inc said it has signed a
definitive agreement to acquire Western National Life Insurance
Co from Beneficial Corp for 275 mln dlrs in cash.
    Western National had assets of 1.9 billion dlrs at the end
of 1986 and 1986 premium and investment revenues.  Western
issues structured settlement annuities for the settlement of
personal injury and damage claims and sells tax-sheltered
annuities.
    The acquisition is subject to regulatory approval.
    Conseco said the acquisition would raise its assets to 2.7
billion dlrs and annual revenues to about 800 mln dlrs.
    Beneficial had previously announced plans to leave the
insurance business.  On March Three, it said it agreed in
principle to sell its American Centennial Insurance Co,
Beneficial International Insurance Co, Consolidated MArine and
General Insurance Co Ltd, Consolidated Life Assurance Co Ltd,
Wesco Insurance Co and Service General Insurance Co
subsidiaries to a management-led group for 98 mln dlrs in notes
mostly contingent on performance of the units and 10 mln dlrs
in cash.
    Conseco had 1986 operating earnings of 4,968,000 dlrs on
revenues of 84.9 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4798>
Elder-Beerman Stores Corp said
owners of about 70 pct of its stock have offered to take the
company private by offerring 30 dlrs per share for the
remaining 30 pct of its stock.
    The company said the proposal will be considered at a
regularly scheduled board meeting on March 17.
    It said the offer was made by members of the Beerman family
holding about 70 pct of the company's stock, Chairman Max
Gutmann, and certain members of the board.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4806>
Computer Memories Inc, which ended
its disk drive operations in June 1986, agreed to acquire
&lt;Hemdale Film Corp> in a transaction which will give Hemdale's
owner control of the resulting company.
    Computer Memories' principal asset is about 29.4 mln dlrs
in cash and cash equivalents. It has agreed to exchange newly
issued shares equaling 80 pct of the aggregate issued to
acquire Hemdale. That company's owner, John Daly, would then
become chief executive officer of the combined company which
would be renamed Hemdale Film Corp.
    Computer Memories said the proposed transaction is subject
to the results of certain corporate reviews and approval of its
shareholders, who will hold a special meeting as soon as
practicable.
    The company said it has 11,109,190 shares outstanding, of
which about 1,734,000 are held by Intel Corp &lt;INTC>. It is
anticipated the FIntel shares will be purchased for 2.75 dlrs a
share in connection with the merger with Hemdale, Computer
Memories said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4807>
KLM Royal Dutch Airlines &lt;KLM.AS>
said it is negotiating for a minority stake in a British and
Commonwealth Shipping Plc &lt;BCOM.L> courier service in a
transaction which might include a convertible loan issue.
    KLM, already active in the fast growing door-to-door
delivery market through a 50-pct stake in a Dutch courier
service, is seeking to buy one-third of &lt;IML Air Services Group
Ltd> from British and Commonwealth.
    The two companies agreed earlier this month for KLM to take
a 15-pct stake in British and Commonwealth commuter airline Air
U.K. Ltd in a deal worth around two mln stg.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4812>
Packaging Systems Corp said
it agreed to acquire &lt;Walter-Richter Labels Inc>, a privately
held maker of woven labels based in Paterson, N.J.
    Terms of the acquisition, which is expected to be completed
within 60 days, were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4818>
Holiday Corp and Communications
Satellite Corp said they closed the previously announced sale
to Comsat of Holiday's 50 pct interest in Hi-Net
Communications, their joint venture that provides in-room video
entertainment to hotels by satellite.
    Under terms of the deal, Comsat paid Holiday 25 mln dlrs in
cash and assumed half of the venture's 50 mln dlrs of
outstanding debt, the company's said.
    Hi-Net, they added, will continue to provide programming to
Holiday's hotels.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4841>
National Pizza Co said it reached an
agreement in principle to buy seven Straw Hat pizza restaurants
and certain related real estate for approximately three mln
dlrs in cash.
    The acquisitions will be converted to Pizza Hut
restaurants, said National Pizza, and are expected to generate
annual sales of approximately eight mln dlrs.
    When the sale is complete, it will bring to 24 the number
of restaurants operated by National Pizza, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4850>
Chrysler Corp said its Chrysler
First Inc acquired a major portion of the commercial lending
portfolio of Beneficial Business Credit Corp, a subsidiary of
Beneficial Corp.
    It said the acquisition involves about 84 mln dlrs of net
receivables.
    Chrysler First, a subsidiary of Chrysler Financial Corp,
had receivables of 4.3 billion dlrs at the end of 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4884>
Metropolitan Consolidated Industries
Inc, a New York paint company, said it has acquired 278,709
shares of Metex Corp, or 21.2 pct of the total, and left open
the possibility that it might acquire more through a merger.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Metropolitan said it bought the Metex stock as an investment.
    It also said it may buy additional shares, or sell some or
all of its current stake. If it buys more shares, Metropolitan
said it would consider doing so in the open market, in private
deals, or through an exchange offer, tender offer or merger.
    Metropolitan said it may acquire an option on or may buy
some or all of the Metex shares owned by William Hack, a Metex
director, who, together with this wife, holds 149,750 of the
company's common shares, or 11.4 pct of the total.
    Metropolitan said it already has an option to buy another
42,750 Metex common shares at 11.25 dlrs each. The option is
not exercisable until April 12, 1988, it said.
    If Metropolitan were to exercise the option and acquire all
of Hack's stake, it would have 471,208 Metex common shares, or
35.9 pct of the total. Metropolitan's SEC filing was
made as a shareholder group with Hack.
    Metropolitan, which said it spent 3.1 mln dlrs to acquire
its Metex stake, listed its recent stock purchases as 54,993
common shares on March 67 at 10 dlrs each and 83,916 shares on
March 11 at 11.25 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4887>
BPI Systems Inc said it is
holding discussions that could lead to the sale of all its
outstanding shares for about 12 mln dlrs.
    BPI president and chief executive officer David R. Fernald
declined to identify the other party involved in the talks.
    For the nine months ended December 31, BPI lost 1,286,000
dlrs on sales of 6,452,000 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4890>
(Telemedia Inc) said its (Telemedia
Publishing Inc) subsidiary agreed to buy privately-owned
Harrowsmith and Equinox magazines for an undisclosed amount of
cash.
    Telemedia said the acquisition is expected to have a small
positive impact on short-term earnings.
    Harrowsmith, an alternative life-style magazine, is
Canada's seventh-largest paid circulation English-language
magazine while Equinox is the country's eighth largest. Each
has a circulation of about 160,000 copies.
     The magazine group had revenues of eight mln dlrs last
year and employs 50 people, Telemedia said.             
    Telemedia said it will also acquire a 10 pct interest in
the company which recently launched the U.S. edition of
Harrowsmith.
    The magazine's U.S. editiion, begun last year, now has a
paid circulation of 180,000, the company said.
    It said a final deal is expected in mid-April.
    Telemedia said the magazines' founder has agreed to
continue to provide editorial and publishing direction for the
magazines.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4893>
Bally Manufacturing Corp said it is
considering the sale of its Six Flag theme amusement park unit
and would use the proceeds to pay off debt.
    In addition to the possible sale of the amusement parks,
Bally plans to sell a minority stake in its health club chain
to the public. The company will register a proposed offering
with the Securities and Exchange Commission for 20 to 30 pct of
the health clubs soon, spokesman William Peltier told Reuters.
    "Selling Six Flags is definitely under consideration,"
Peltier said in response to an inquiry. He said the company
would use much of the income from the amusement park chain,
were it to be sold, to repay debt.
    Six Flags might sell for as much as 300 mln dlrs, analysts
said. The health club chain, the nation's largest, is valued at
350 to 375 mln dlrs, they said.
    Bally reportedly already has been approached about Six
Flags by several prospective buyers.
    The company needs the cash to begin paying back a 1.6 mln
dlrs mountain of debt.
    Bally recently completed a 439 mln dlrs acquisition of the
Golden Nugget casino hotel in Atlantic City from Golden Nugget
Inc &lt;GNG.N>.
    The purchase pushed its long-term debt to 1.6 billion dlrs,
or almost 2.7 times its equity of 600 mln dlrs.
    Bally's 325-unit health and tennis clubs had revenues in
1986 of more than 450 mln dlrs, or about 28 pct of Bally's
total revenues of 1.64 billion dlrs.
    Bally acquired Six Flags for 147.4 mln dlrs in January 1982
from Penn Central Corp. Bally bought the Great America theme
park in Gurnee, Ill., in May 1984 for 113.2 mln dlrs from
Marriott Corp &lt;mhs>.
    In 1986 the parks had pretax operating profit of 48.6 mln
dlrs on revenues of 369.4 mln dlrs.
    The clubs and equipment unit combined to post operating
profit of 60.4 mln dlrs on revenues of 475.6 mln dlrs in 1986,
of which 456.2 mln came from the clubs.
    The company earlier this month said it will take a charge
to earnings in the first quarter of 17.3 mln dlrs as a result
of its deal to buy back 2.6 mln of its common shares from real
estate developer Donald Trump.
    Under a February 21 deal, Bally agreed to buy the 2.6 mln
of the 3.06 mln shares held by Trump at 24 dlrs a share, or
62.4 mln dlrs, plus 6.2 mln dlrs related expenses in exchange
for Trump not seeking control of the company for 10 years.
    The deal also requires Bally to buy Trump's remaining
shares for 33 dlrs a share if the stock price does not reach
that level by February 21, 1988.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4894>
Franklin Resources Inc said
it believes earnings could double this year as compared to a
year ago when the company reported income of 32 mln dlrs on 143
mln dlrs in revenues.
    Franklin Resources is a financial services company. Its
fiscal year ends September 30.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4908>
Bryson Oil and Gas plc, a Belfast,
Northern Ireland, oil company which has said it is considering
seeking control of Cenergy Corp, said it raised its stake in
the company to 1,281,887 shares, or 13.2 pct of the total.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Bryson said it bought 440,000 Cenergy common shares on March 10
at eight dlrs each. Previously it had held 841,887 shares, or
8.5 pct.
    Bryson has request detailed shareholder information from
Cenergy in case it decided to communicate with shareholders.
But it said Cenergy has made legal challenges to the request.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4910>
Allegheny International Inc said  
Sunter Acquisititon Corp, formed by First Boston Inc, began a
cash tender offer in accordance with their previously announced
merger agreement for all the outsanding shares of Allegheny's
common stock, 2.19 dlr cumulative preference stock and 11.25
dlrs convertible preferred stock.
    The offer expires April 9, unless extended.
    Under terms of the agreement, tendering shareholders will
receive 24.60 dlrs per common share, 20 dlrs per preference
share and 87.50 dlrs per preferred share.
    Allegheny said the offer is conditioned upon the valid 
tender of stock representing a majority of the voting power and
at least two-thirds of outstanding shares of preference stock
and preferred stock.
    The merger agreement was announced earlier this week.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4918>
A group of affiliated New York
investment firms said they lowered their stake in Cyclops Corp
to 200,500 shares, or 5.0 pct of the total outstanding, from
260,500 shares, or 6.4 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group, led by Mutual Shares Corp, said it sold 60,000
Cyclops common shares since February 26.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4933>
Cyclops Corp said its board rejected
a request by Cyacq Corp, an investor group, for more non-public
information about Cyclops, a maker of specialty steels and an
electronics retailer.
    Cyclops cited its agreement to be acquired by Britain's
Dixons Group PLC for 90.25 dlrs a share under a tender offer
that expires midnight March 17.
    Cyacq, comprising Audio/Video Affiliates Inc, Citicorp
Capital Investors Ltd and other investors, yesterday said it
would increase its tender offer for Cyclops to 92.50 dlrs a
share from 80 dlrs, subject to certain conditions.
    The conditions were that Cyclops provide Cyacq with
non-public data given to Dixons and that Cyacq be satisfied
with financial projections made by Dixons in its offer.
    Cyclops also said its board determined that Cyacq's
announcement was not an offer. "Cyacq's press release does not
amend Cyacq's outstanding tender offer which remains at 80 dlrs
per share and it does not state that Cyacq has financing
commitments necessary to carry out its original offer or any
increased offer that it may make," Cyclops said in a statement.
    Its agreements with Dixons are binding and Dixons indicated
it will not rescind or waive any provisions of the pacts,
Cyclops said.
    The company also said it was advised that Dixons'
shareholders approved the merger, satisfying that condition of
the agreement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4937>
A group led by New York investor
Asher Edelman said he lowered its stake in Lucky Stores Inc
&lt;LKS> to 1,827,734 shares, or 4.8 pct of the total outstanding
common stock, from 1,930,734 shares, or 5.1 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the Edelman group said it sold 103,000 Lucky Stores common
shares on March 9 and 10 at prices ranging from 28.625 to
30.375 dlrs a share.
    So long as Edelman's stake is below five pct he is not
required to report his dealings in Lucky Stores stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4952>
&lt;Interconnect Capital> said it
seeks to acquire Gates Learjet Corp on friendly terms.
    Late yesterday the company said it has offered 7.07 dlrs
per share for all Gates Learjet shares.
    Interconnect Capital said it intends to purchase the &lt;Gates
Corp> loan to Gates Learjet for 13 mln dlrs should its bid be
successful.
    Interconnect Capital is controlled by &lt;Interconnect Inc>.
    Gates Corp owns 64.8 pct of Gates Learjet.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4955>
(Mindscsape Inc) said it
agreed to buy the educational software unit of Holt, Rinehart
and Winston Inc, a subsidiary of Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc,
for undisclosed terms.
    Sales of the division, which had been purchased by Holt,
Rinehart from CBS, peaked at about 10 mln dlrs in 1985,
Mindscape said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4963>
Atlantic Richfield Co said it sold
its Plan Cell Research Institute unit and its Arco Seed Co
operations in two transactions for undisclosed prices.
    The company said it sold Dublin, Calif.-based Plant Cell
Research to Montedision SpA of Milan, Italy, and ARCO Seed Co
to U.F. Genetics of Hollister, Calif.
    Atlantic Richfield said the divestitures are in line with
its policy of focusing resources on oil, gas, chemical and coal
operations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4964>
Caesars World Inc, in rejecting a 28
dlr a share takeover bid by New York investor Martin Sosnoff,
said it is considering alternatives that include a
restructuring of the company and the sale to someone else.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Caesars World said its board decided at a special meeting
yesterday to "explore and investigate" several alternatives in
an effort to thwart Sosnoff's takeover attempt.
 More
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4970>
ChemLawn corp said it has asked
potential purchasers of the company to submit their proposals
by 1700 EST on March 18.
    ChemLawn said if Waste Management Inc &lt;WMX> intends to
participate in the bidding process, it will have to submit a
confidentiality agreement to Chemlawn financial advisor Smith
Barney, Harris Upham and Co Inc.
    Waste Management has a 27 dlr per share tender offer for
Chemlawn underway that Chemlawn has already rejected as
inadequate.
    Chemlawn has already said it is holding talks with various
parties on the sale of the company and said it has informed all
potential purchasers that they mnust sign confidentiality
agreemnents to receive confidential information on Chemlawn.
    ChemLawn said if Waste Management were to sign such an
agreement, ChemLawn would supply it with the same information
being supplied to other potential purchasers. But it said it
will not make an exception for Waste Management which would
give that company an advantage in the bidding process.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4976>
SmartNames Inc said it reached
an agreement in principle to buy American Information Network.
    Terms of the agreement were not disclosed.
    The company said the purchase of American will allow it to
meet the needs of a broader range of direct mail industry
customers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4981>
Atlantic Richfield Co said it sold
its Plan Cell Research Institute unit and its Arco Seed Co
operations in two transactions for undisclosed prices.
    The company said it sold Dublin, Calif.-based Plant Cell
Research to &lt;Montedision SpA> of Milan, Italy and ARCO Seed Co
to U.F. Genetics of Hollister, Calif.
    Atlantic Richfield said the divestitures are in line with
its policy of focusing resources on oil, gas, chemical and coal
operations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5001>
PLM Cos Inc said its PLM Power Co
unit broke off merger discussions with Sunlaw Energy Corp of
Beverly Hills, Calif.
    In January PLM Power entered into a letter of intent to
negotiate a potential acquisition of Sunlaw, subject to
substantial due diligence, the company said.
    But it also said the two companies were not able to agree
on mutually satisfactory final terms and conditions.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5020>
Maxtor Corp and U.S. Design
Corp &lt;USDC>, said they reached definitive agreement covering
the acquisition of U.S. Design by Maxtor.
    They said the arrangement, which is subject to a number of
conditions including U.S. Design shareholder approval, calls
for Maxtor to issue 12 mln dlrs worth of its own common stock
in exchange for all of U.S. Design.
    The number of Maxtor shares to be issued will be determined
by the average closing price of Maxtor stock over the 10
trading day period prior to the day the acquisition becomes
effective, the companies also said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5044>
Kansas oilman Nicholas Powell told
the Securities and Exchange Commission he has acquired 195,000
shares of QED Exploration Inc, or 8.7 pct of the total
outstanding common stock.
    Powell, who heads Prairie Resources Corp and Mack C. Colt
Inc, both Kansas oil and gas exploration companies, said he
bought the stock for investment purposes.
    Powell, who said he has already spent 609,831 dlrs on his
QED stock, said he plans to buy more shares as long as he
considers them to be undervalued.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5077>
Tony Lama Co Inc said it signed
a letter of intent to buy Coulson of Texas Inc, a maker of
heels and leather components.
    The company said exact terms of the deal have not been
determined but that it does not expect the acquisition to have
a material effect on its financial position.
    In addition to buying substantially of all Coulson's
assets, Tony Lama said it would assume certain of the company's
liabilities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5080>
Tribune Co said it completed the sale
of the Danville, Va., cable television system to Cablevision
Industries Ltd Partnership, affiliated with Cablevision
Industries Inc of Liberty, N.Y.
    It said the Danville system was one of two systems acquired
by Tribune on September 30, 1986 as part of its purchase of The
Daily Press Inc, publisher of the Newport News Daily Press and
The Times-Herald. Agreements to sell both systems for a total
of 100 mln dlrs were reached in October.
    Sale of the Newport News system was completed in December.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5081>
Infortext Systems Inc said it
finalized a two-year agreement under which GTE Services Corp
and eight affiliates will sell Infortext's line of personal
computer-based telephone call accounting systems.
    GTE Services, a unit of GTE Corp, evaluated 23 competitive
call accounting systems, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5082>
Sheppard Resources Inc
said it signed a letter of intent to merge with Breast Centers
Inc, an owner, operator and franchiser of clinics that provide
services for the early detection of breast cancer.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    After the merger, Breast Centers shareholders would become
the majority shareholders of the combined company.
    Also, if approved, Sheppard will change its name to Breast
Centers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5091>
First Boston Inc's &lt;FBC> Sunter
Acquisition Corp said it began its previously announced 24.60
dlr per share tender offer for Allegheny International Inc's
common stock.
    The company is also offering 20 dlrs for each 2.19 dlr
cumulative preferred share, and 87.50 dlrs for each share of
11.25 dlr convertible preferred stock.
    The company said the offer and withdrawal rights will
expire at midnight April nine unless extended.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5094>
&lt;Cablevision Industries Corp>
said its Cablevision Industries of California Inc subsidiary
has entered into an agreement to buy substantially all of the
assets of Valley Cable TV for about 100 mln dlrs.
    The company said it will buy the system from a California
limited partnership, which is wholly-owned by Toronto-based
&lt;Hollinger Inc>.
    It said Valley Cable operates a 60,000 subscriber cable
television systems passing about 180,000 homes in the west San
Fernando Valley area of Los Angeles.
    Cablevision said it is the nation's 21st largest cable
company and is ownnd by Alan Gerry, its chairman, president and
chief executive officer. The company said the agreement is
subject to regulatory approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5097>
Borg-Warner Corp said its directors
approved the sale, for about 240 mln dlrs, of its industrial
products division to a New York-based private investment firm,
Clayton and Dubilier Inc, and senior management of the group.
    Yesterday, the company said it agreed to sell the division,
which has annual sales of about 300 mln dlrs and is based in
Long Beach, California.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5102>
&lt;Southam Inc> said its Flyer Force unit
acquired three community newspapers in Winnipeg with a combined
circulation of 65,000 for undisclosed terms.
    Southam said the newspapers, The Herald, The Lance and
Metro One, will be printed at its Canadian Publishers division
in Winnipeg.
    Flyer Force intends to expand distribution of the
newspapers to begin improved service to the Winnipeg market,
Southam said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5112>
Forest City Enterprises Inc said it
completed the previously announced sale of assets of its retail
store division, excluding real estate, to Handy Andy Home
Improvement Centers Inc, a private Gurnee, Ill., firm.
    The sale is for cash and notes but exact terms were not
disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5113>
Beaver Creek State Bank in Beaver
Creek, Minn., failed and the bank's insured assets were
transferred to Citizens State Bank of Silver Lake, Minn., the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. said.
    Separately, the Federal Home Loan Bank Board said Victor
Federal Savings and Loan Association of Muskogee, Okla., was
placed into receivership.
    Beaver Creek's two offices will re-open as branches of
Citizens on Monday.
    The transfer was arranged because there were no bids to buy
Beaver Creek, the FDIC said.
    Citizens will pay a premium of 30,000 dlrs  to the FDIC and
purchase Beaver Creek's assets for 5.3 mln dlrs.
    It was the 43rd bank failure in the nation this year.
    The FHLBB said Victor Federal Savings was insolvent and its
assets were transferred to a newly chartered federal mutual
association with directors named by the FHLBB.
    Victor was a stock association with 564 mln dlrs in assets.
    The new association is to be known as Victor Savings and
Loan Association and its assets continue to be insured by the
Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp, the FHLBB said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5116>
Petroleos de Venezuela, S.A. said it
will sign a contract March 17 to buy a half interest in a
Corpus Christi, Texas refinery and related operations.
    The contract, to be signed by PDVSA and Champlin
Petroleum's parent company, the Union Pacific Corp, will create
a new joint venture called Champlin Refining.
    The state oil company said PDVSA will pay on the order of
30 mln dlrs for the half interest in Champlin.
     Energy minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said Wednesday
the cost would be 33 mln dlrs in cash, plus an additional 60
mln in crude and refined oil shipments.
    PDVSA and Union Pacific have sought a line of credit from a
group of North American and Japanese banks to finance the new
company's working capital, the Venezuelan company said.
    Under the deal, PDVSA will supply up to 140,000 barrels a
day to the refinery with the option to place 50,000 bpd more -
mostly gasoline and distillates - through Champlin's
distribution system in 10 U.S. states.
    The new company will be directed by a six-member board,
with three representatives each from PDVSA and Union Pacific.
    According to PDVSA, Venezuelans will occupy such key
positions such as treasurer and vice-president for
manufacturing.
    The total capacity of the Champlin refinery is 160,000 bpd
of crudes and another 40,000 bpd of intermediates. The plant
will be able to handle 110,000 bpd of Venezuelan heavy crudes,
which make up more than half of the country's crude oil
exports.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5117>
Investor Martin Sosnoff said in a
statement that he was disappointed in Caesars World Inc's
response to his 28 dlrs a share offer to buy the company.
    The company had said the offer was inadequate and that it
was exploring restructuring or sale of the company to another
party.
    Sosnoff said he believes the offer is fair to all
shareholders. "My primary desire is still to sit down with
management to negotiate a friendly acquisition," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5121>
PH Acquisition Co, a unit of Pratt Hotel
Corp, said its 135 mln dlrs per share tender offer for all
shares of Class B common stock of Resorts INternational Inc
expired.
    As of today, about 45,690 shares were tendered, an
insufficient number of shares to satisfy the condition that 51
pct of the voting power be tendered.
    Earlier this week, New yOrk developer Donald Trump made a
competing bid for the class B shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5141>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board
(FHLBB) announced the acquisition of Home Savings and Loan
Association in Seattle, Washington, by InterWest Savings Bank
of Oak Harbour, Washington.
    The FHLBB said Home Savings was the 12th troubled savings
institution requiring federal action this year.
    It said Home Savings had assets of 150.6 mln dlrs in assets
and InterWest had assets of 342.9 mln dlrs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5162>
European Commission President Jacques
Delors, quoted by Le Monde newspaper, said he favoured a
Franco-German candidate to take over &lt;Cie Generale de
Constructions Telephoniques>, which has a 16 pct stake in the
French public telephone switching market.
    "I wish for a European solution ... That will enable Germany
and France to move closer together, which is currently
necessary," he was quoted as saying.
    "Given the situtation of the EC (European Community) and of
the importance for our future connunications audiences and of
cooperation already undertaken on the Community level, that
seems the best choice," Delors added.
    Five groups, including an alliance between West Germany's
Siemens AG &lt;SIEG.F> and France's Schneider S.A. &lt;SCHN.PA>
subsidiary Jeumont-Schneider, have applied to buy what is
France's second largest telephone switching firm.
    Under French privatisation law, foreign companies are
restricted to a 20 pct stake in privatised companies.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5177>
Harper and Row Publishers Inc said its
board of directors decided to take no action on two takeover
bids that the company has received. Instead, it appointed a
committee of independent directors to study strategic
alternatives for the 170-year-old firm.
    The alternatives include continuation of the company's
existing business plans, possible business combinations, sales
of stock, restructuring and the sale of all or part of the
company.
    Kidder Peabody and Co Inc has been retained to advise on
the alternatives, Harper and Row added.
    Private investor Theodore Cross last week offered 34 dlrs a
share for Harper and Row, prompting a rival bid of 50 dlrs a
share from another publishing firm, Harcourt Brace Jovanovich
Inc &lt;HBJ>.
    After considering the two offers at a meeting on Friday,
the Harper and Row board decided not to act on them.
    The directors unanimously expressed their strong desire to
preserve the company's independence and take advantage of its
"considerable future prospects," according to director Winthrop
Knowlton, former chief executive and now chairman of the newly
established independent committee.
    "However, given the significant current interest in the
company, we also feel that we should carefully review all the
options available. The committee will consider all the
pertinent facts and alternatives.... We intend to make a
careful and informed decision but will proceed expeditiously to
a conclusion," Knowlton said.
    Pending its deliberations, Harper and Row's board has
postponed indefinitely a special meeting of stockholders that
had been scheduled for April 2 to discuss a proposal to
recapitalize the company's stock to create two classes of
shares with different voting rights.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5203>
The Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd &lt;BRKN.S>
said it will merge its BHP Minerals division and &lt;Utah
International Inc> into a single business unit under a common
management structure.
    The merger will be effective June 1, coinciding with the
retirement of Utah International chairman and chief executive
Bud Wilson, BHP said in a statement.
    The new BHP-Utah Minerals International Group will be
headed by Jim Curry as executive general manager and chief
executive officer. Curry is currently executive vice-president
of Utah International, BHP said.
    &lt;BHP Petroleum (Americas) Inc>, formerly part of Utah
International, will become a subsidiary of BHP's renamed &lt;BHP
Petroleum International>, now &lt;BHP Petroleum Pty Ltd>, the
company said.
    BHP will also bring its Queensland coal operations under
one management structure and consolidate minerals marketing and
sales offices in various markets throughout the world.
    BHP acquired Utah from General Electric Co &lt;GE> in 1984.
    Utah's assets include stakes of 40.25 to 52.25 pct in seven
large Central Queensland coking mines, 49 pct of the Samarco
iron ore operation in Brazil, 60 pct of La Escondida copper
deposit in Chile, the Island Copper mine at Port Hardy in
Canada, 70 pct of a coal mine and 30 pct of a gold mine in
South Africa and coal and other mines in the U.S.
    BHP Minerals' assets include wholly and partly-owned iron
ore mines, coal mines, manganese and base-metal operations or
prospects and 30 pct of the Ok Tedi gold-copper project in
Papua New Guinea.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5212>
Carlton Communications Plc &lt;CCML.L> said
in a statement it had purchased a 20 pct stake or some 5.1 mln
shares in Central Independent Television from Ladbroke Group
Plc &lt;LADB.L> at 578p per share.
    The consideration of 29.5 mln stg will be met with 18.2 mln
stg in cash and the issue of one million ordinary Carlton
shares, it said.
    Central showed pretax profits up by 57 pct to 18.8 mln stg
for the year ended 30 September 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5226>
A government commission that controls 51
pct of &lt;San Miguel Corp> (SMC) stock will increase its nominees
on the firm's 15-member board to nine from six.
    "We want to correct business practices," Ramon Diaz, chairman
of the Presidential Commission on Good Government (PCGG), told
Reuters.
    "Right now there are a lot of companies that keep so many
things from their shareholders and one of them is San Miguel,"
he said.
    A San Miguel spokesman declined comment.
    Diaz said New York investment bank Allen and Co Inc told
the PCGG it was interested in tendering for all outstanding SMC
stock, with the subsequent dispersal of 60 pct of the stock to
Filipino investors to comply with investment laws.
    He said Australian businessman and brewer Alan Bond and the
brewing company Elders IXL Ltd &lt;ELXA.S> were interested in
buying 40 pct each of SMC stock.
    He added that the PCGG wanted some foreign input but would
not allow foreign control of the brewing and food conglomerate,
the Philippines' biggest manufacturing concern.
    Diaz said the PCGG did not plan to remove SMC president
Andres Soriano from his family company.
    "He has tremendous prestige to run the company," Diaz said.
"We appreciate his management, but certainly some practices have
to be corrected."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5234>
&lt;Bond Corp International Ltd>, a
subsidiary of the Australian-based Bond Corp Holdings Ltd
&lt;BONA.S>, said it would defer its planned rights issue but
still wants the issue to be made before July 31.
    No date has been set for the issue, announced in January.
    In a document to shareholders, Bond Corp said the delay
follows its receipt of a 240 mln H.K. Dlr loan from its parent
company to meet the first payment on the newly acquired Bond
Centre commercial complex in central Hong Kong.
    It also wants outside partners to take up to 50 pct in the
project, the company said.
    The January announcement said the rights issue would
finance Bond Corp's 1.4 billion dlr acquisition of a 23.77 pct
stake in HK-TVB Ltd &lt;TVBH.HK> from film magnate Run Run Shaw.
    The company then reached an agreement with a consortium led
by Sino Land Co Ltd &lt;SINO.HK> to buy a commercial complex that
is still under construction for 1.9 billion dlrs.
    Bond International said in the document that except for the
240 mln dlr loan, the deal would be financed from internal
resources and by selling an interest in the building.
    The payments must be completed by the end of 1987.
    Bond International has also sold several residential
buildings in Hong Kong's mid-levels district for a total of
68.35 mln dlrs, the statement said.
    The flats were among the properties it bought last year
from Hongkong Land Co Ltd &lt;HKLD.HK> for 1.4 billion dlrs.
    Analysts said Bond International is heavily geared as it
has relied on bank borrowings to purchase both the Hongkong
Land properties and the HK-TVB shares.
    Bond International also said in the document that while it
plans to sell an interest in the complex it will hold the
HK-TVB shares as a long-term investment.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5272>
Bank of China has taken a stake in
Luxembourg-based finance company BAII Holdings SA, a spokesman
for BAII said.
    The stake was between three and five pct but no further
details of the deal, which was announced simultaneously in
Paris, London and Hong Kong, were immediately available.
    BAII, which is 50 pct Arab owned, is looking to expand its
activities in the Far East and recently established a
wholly-owned merchant banking subsidiary in Hong Kong, the
spokesman said.
    The group had earnings of 15.4 mln dlrs in 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5286>
Harper and Row Publishers Inc said its
board of directors decided to take no action on two takeover
bids that the company has received. Instead, it appointed a
committee of independent directors to study strategic
alternatives for the 170-year-old firm.
    The alternatives include continuation of the company's
existing business plans, possible business combinations, sales
of stock, restructuring and the sale of all or part of the
company.
    Kidder Peabody and Co Inc has been retained to advise on
the alternatives, Harper and Row added.
    Private investor Theodore Cross last week offered 34 dlrs a
share for Harper and Row, prompting a rival bid of 50 dlrs a
share from another publishing firm, Harcourt Brace Jovanovich
Inc &lt;HBJ>.
    After carefully considering the two offers at a meeting on
Friday, the Harpers and Row board decided not to act on them.
    The directors unanimously expressed their strong desire to
preserve the company's independence and take advantage of its
"considerable future prospects," according to director Winthrop
Knowlton, former chief executive and now chairman of the newly
established independent committee.
    "However, given the significant current interest in the
company, we also feel that we should carefully review all the
options available. The committee will consider all the
pertinent facts and alternatives... We intend to make a careful
and informed decision but will proceed expeditiously to a
conclusion," Knowlton said.
    Pending its deliberations, Harper and Row's board has
postponed indefinitely a special meeting of stockholders that
had been scheduled for April 2 to discuss a proposal to
recapitalize the company's stock in order to create two classes
of shares with different votinmg rights.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5287>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board
(FHLBB) announced the acquisition of Home Savings and Loan
Association in Seattle, Washington, by InterWest Savings Bank
of Oak Harbour, Washington.
    The FHLBB said Home Savings was the 12th troubled savings
institution requiring federal action this year.
    It said Home Savings had assets of 150.6 mln dlrs in assets
and InterWest had assets of 342.9 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5291>
Calny Inc said it has
received an offer to be acquired by PepsiCo Inc, which already
owns 9.9 pct of Calny stock, for 11.50 dlrs per share, subject
to approval by PepsiCo and Calny boards and Calny shareholders.
    The company said its board intendsd to schedule a meeting
in the near future to review the proposal and it has asked
&lt;Oppenheimer and Co Inc> to assist it in evaluating the offer
and advise Calny on its alternatives.
    Calny is the largest franchisee of PepsiCo's Taco Bell
restaurants, operating 143 in California, Oregon, Texas and
Washington as well as 15 La Petite Boulangerie bakeries in
Seattle.
    Calny earned 1,192,000 dlrs on sales of 56.2 mln dlrs for
the nine months ended November Four.
    On December Four, Calny rejected as inadequate an investor
group led by former president and chairman Robert A. Larive's
second offer to acquire it because the bid was inadeuqate and
subject to too many contingencies.  The group offered 11.50
dlrs and one dlr of 10 pct preferred stock per Calny share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5293>
&lt;Warburg, Pincus Capital Corp> said it
has started a tender offer for up to 2,500,000 common shares of
Symbion Inc at 3.50 dlrs each.
    In a newspaper advertisement, The firm said the opffer is
not conditioned on receipt of any minimum number of shares but
is conditioned on holders of nor more than 400,000 Symbion
sharesseeking to receive the fair value of their shares under
provisions of the Utah Business Corporation Act.  Warburg said
receipt of 2,500,000 shares would raise its interest in Symbion
to about 59.3 pct from 25.8 pct currently and give it control.
    Warburg said it reserves the right to buy more than
2,500,000 shares if the offer is oversubscribed but has no
present intention of doing so.  It said it has asked Symbion to
provide its shareholder list to help in disseminating the
offer.
    The firm said the offer, proration period and withdrawal
rights expire April 22 unless extended.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5299>
Dixons Group Plc &lt;DXNS.L> has sold 8.3
mln shares in Woolworth Holdings Plc &lt;WLTH.L> through Salomon
Brothers U.K. Equity Ltd, a statement from Salomon said.
    The shares were placed with about 45 to 50 institutions in
Europe and the Far East. Dixons retains one mln Woolworth
shares, a Dixons spokesman added.
    Industry sources said Dixons acquired the Woolworth shares
in connection with its unsuccessful bid for the company last
year.
    Dixons paid an average price of 695p per share which
compares with 819p today. Woolworth closed on Froday at 833p.
    A Dixons spokesman said the decision to retain one mln
shares reflected Woolworth's buoyant prospects.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5303>
Whippany Paper Board Co Inc said
shareholders at a special meeting approved a merger into NPN
Inc for 2.50 dlrs per share.
    NPN acquired control of Whippany in a recent tender offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5304>
Privately-held &lt;Pilot Air Freight>
said it met with officials of Northern Air Freight Inc to try
to negotiate a friendly acquisition of Northern, but Northern's
management had no interest in the proposal.
    Northern has annual revenues of about 60 mln dlrs and is
based in Seattle.
     
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5309>
Renouf Corp International said it has
extended the expiration of its offer to pay 31 dlrs a unit to
buy all outstanding units of Benequity Holdings a California
Limited Partnership to March 24 from March 13.
    As of March 13, Renouf said, about 3,847,375 units had been
tendered.
    Renouf pointed out this exceeds the minimum number sought
in the offer, but its statement gave no reason for the
extention. Benequity has 5.7 mln units outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5331>
Becor Western Inc said &lt;Investment
Limited Partnership> of Greenwich, conn., and Randolph W. Lenz
are offering to acquire Becor for 15.50 dlrs per share, subject
to Becor's receipt of at least 110 mln dlrs from the proposed
sale of its Western Gear Corp subsidiary.
    Becor said it has also received expressions of interest
from other parties seeking information about Becor.
    Becor had previously agreed to sell Western Gear for at
least 110 mln dlrs and to be acquired by BCW Acquisition Inc
for 10.45 dlrs in cash and four dlrs in debentures per Becor
share.  BCW was formed by Becor executives and &lt;Goldman, Sachs
and Co>.  Both deals are subject to shareholder approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5332>
Clark Equipment Co said it was
informed by Arthur M. Goldberg acting on behalf of a group of
investors that the group had accumulated 1,262,200 shares, or
about 6.7 pct of Clark's outstanding common stock.
    It said Goldberg recently approached Clark to repurchase
the shares. However, negotiations for the block repurchase were
unsuccessful and have been terminated.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5335>
&lt;Avia Group International Inc> 
stockholders filed a class a action suit in Multnomah County
Circuit court seeking to halt the sale of Avia to Reebok
International Ltd &lt;RBOK>.
    Avia stockholders also seek to receive compensation from
the defendants, who include most of Avia directors, according
to court papers.
    The suit grew out a meeting of several dozen dissatisfied
minority stockholders of Avia following the announcement of
Reebok's proposed acquisition of Avia and the sudden drop in
the price of Avia stock.
    The complaint was filed on behalf of Clem Eischen, a
Portland-area resident, who owns 500 shares of Avia, and Robert
Withers, also of the Portland-area, who owns 954 shares, and
other individuals who held stock at the time of Reebok's
announcement. A jury trial has been requested.
    "The actions of the small group that contral Avia have hurt
the little guy," said Eischen.
    The stockholders, according to a statement, have organized
a steering committee.
    The complaint reviews the price action of Avia stock from
March 1986 and noted the plaintifs who purchased stock between
19 dlrs and 25 dlrs per share. The price fell from 24 dlrs to
16.50 dlrs a share following the Reebok announcement.
    The complaint asked the defendants be enjoined from
proceeding with the Reebok acquisition of Avia. It also
requests damages to be determined at the time of trial.
    Avia said it had not seen the court papers and said it had
no comment on the suit.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5340>
Diamond Shamrock Corp said it will
accept about 27 pct of the 73,653,000 shares of its common
stock tendered in response to the company's offer to pay 17
dlrs a share for 20 mln shares.
    The company said it expects to mail checks representing the
purchase price of the 20 mln shares purchased later this week
and will be returning unpurchased shares shortly thereafter.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5349>
Aldershot Resources Ltd said
it signed an interim agreement to acquire 100 pct of the
outstanding shares of Intracoastal Refining Inc of Conroe,
Texas.
    Aldershot will pay a certain number of shares of common
stock based on book value, and up to a maximum of one mln
shares under a formula linked to the next five years' pre-tax
net revenues.
    The transaction is subject to completion of a definitive
agreement and to regulatory approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5350>
&lt;Derlan Industries Ltd> said it
acquired 80 pct of Aurora Industries Inc of Montgomery,
Illinois for an undisclosed price.
    Closing is subject to completion of legal formalities,
Derlan said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5352>
&lt;Dart Group Inc> said it is
preparted to negotiate all terms of its proposed acquisition of
Supermarkets General Corp.
    Early this month, Dart made an unsolicited offer of 41.75
dlrs a share in cash for Supermarkets General's stock.
    Releasing a letter sent friday to Supermarkets General,
Dart said "we believe that an agreement can be reached which
will be in the best interests of Supermarkets General, its
stockholders, management, employees and customers.
    "To that end, we are prepared to negotiate all terms of an
acquisition agreement," Dart said.
    Dart said it urges a meeting with Supermarkets General
officials be held promptly.
    The letter pointed out the company has not heard from
Supermarkets General since making the offer "other than on this
past Monday when we were informed that our offer would be
seriously considered and that you would get back to us on a
timely basis to arrange a meeting."
    Dart said it has "acted openly and amicably" in an effort
to facilitate its proposed acquisition, adding it has not
purchased additional Supermarkets General stock since prior to
submission of its offer.
    Dart said it continues to be interested in acquiring
Supermarkets General in a friendly manner, noting it has given
the company "the tune that you suggested in order to allow you
to evaluate the available options."
    Dart now owns 1.9 mln Supermarkets General shares, slightly
less than five pct of those outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5357>
Thermo Electron Corp said it has
entered into talks with underwriters on the possible public
sale of a minority interest in its packaged cogeneration
systems subsidiary, Tecogen Inc.
    The company also said it plans to offer convertible
subordinated debentures publicly.
    It gave no further details.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5379>
Texas Air Corp said under a settlement
of class action litigation with &lt;Mutual Shares Corp>, former
minority shareholders of Continental Airlines Inc will receive
an additional 3.75 dlrs per share.
    In February, Texas Air acquired the minority interest in
Continental that it did not already own for 16.50 dlrs per
share. Mutual had challenged the adequacy of the price.
    Texas Air said any former Continental holder who has sought
appraisal rights under Delaware law may continue to seek the
appraisal remedy in Delaware Chancery Court or accept the
settlement and drop the appraisal process.
    Texas Air said the settlement has other terms relating to
employee shareholdrs of Continental, who will receive options
from Texas Air.  It did not give details.
    The company said the settlement is subject to approval by
the Delaware Chancery Court, which is expected to take about 60
days.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5396>
Intermagnetics General Corp
said it completed the purchase of the advanced products
department of Air Products and Chemicals Inc &lt;APD>.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    The department, which makes cryogenic equipment, will
continue operating at its present location in Allentown, Pa.,
the company said. It will market its products as APD Cryogenics
Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5398>
Italy's Ferruzzi SpA has taken a 67 pct
stake in Spanish sunflower seed and cotton mill Cooperativa
Agricola del Guadalete SA (GUADALCO), sources at GUADALCO said.
    The Italian firm's Spanish subsidiary, Ferruzzi Espana SA,
took the majority equity stake, with the remaining 33 pct
retained by GUADALCO.
    Ferruzzi plans to set up a sugar division and import some
30,000 tonnes of industrial sugar from its French factories in
its first year of operation.
    GUADALCO has a processing capacity of 250 tonnes a day of
sunflower seeds and 12,000 tonnes a day of raw cotton.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5409>
National Pizza Co said the
seven Straw Hat Piza restaurants in Los Angeles and
Bakersfield, Calif., that it announced plans to buy Friday are
expected to generate annual sales of about 3,800,000 dlrs, not
the eight mln dlrs the company originally announced.
    The company said it will convert the restaurants to Pizza
Hut units.  Closing is expected around March 31.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5411>
&lt;AVAQ International Inc> said it
intends to require Gates Learjet Corp &lt;GLJ> to honor its
agreement to sell its shares to the company.
    AVAQ said it made the statement in response to an offer by
&lt;Interconnect Capital Corp> for all of Gates Learjet shares
after what it believed to be an agreement by Gates to accept
its offer.
    AVAQ said it offered, pusuant to Gates' guidelines, six
dlrs per share, plus the purchase of Gates Corp's promisary
note for 23 mln dlrs.
    Interconnect said it offered 7.07 dlrs per share, plus the
repurchase of the loan for 13 mlns, for an aggregate price in
the 95 mln dlr range. Interconnect said it made the offer to
the board of directors of Gates Learjet on March 9.
    AVAQ said Gates Corp and Gates Learjet approved its offer
Feb 26.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5435>
Mount Isa Mines Holding Ltd plans to
acquire a 30 pct stake in Europe's largest primary copper
producer, Norddeutsche Affinerie AG, a spokesman for
Metallgesellschaft AG said.
    MIM intends to take Preussag AG's total 20 pct share in the
copper producer in exchange for some three pct of MIM's share
capital. MIM will also take another 10 pct now held by Degussa
AG, reducing Degussa's share to 30 pct from 40.
Metallgesellschaft's share will remain at 40 pct.
    The move is subject to approval of the federal cartel
office and supervisory boards of the companies involved.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5441>
Comtech Inc said it agreed in
principle to sell 95 pct of its outstanding shares in Premier
Microwave Corp for seven mln dlrs.
    It said the buyers include an investment group composed of
the unit's management.
    The company said it expects the sale to close in the next
few weeks. Proceeds will be used to reduce debt.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5442>
A group of affiliated New York-base
investment firms and funds told the Securities and Exchange
Commission they have acquired 453,300 shares of Purolator
Courier Corp, or 5.9 pct of the total outstanding.
    The group, led by Mutual Shares Corp, said it bought the
stock for investment purposes.
    It also said it is studying the 35 dlr a share leveraged
buyout offer made by Purolator managers and E.F. Hutton LBO Inc
but has not decided whether it will tender its stock in the
offer. The group said it has held talks with the Hutton LBO
group before and may do so again.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5455>
Seton Co said its board has
received a proposal from chairman and chief executive officer
Philip D. Kaltenbacher to acquire Seton for 15.75 dlrs per
share in cash.
    Seton said the acquisition bid is subject to Kaltenbacher
arranging the necessary financing.  It said he intends to ask
other members of senior management to participate.
    The company said Kaltenbacher owns 30 pct of Seton stock
and other management members another 7.5 pct.
    Seton said it has formed an independent board committee to
consider the offer and has deferred the annual meeting it had
scheduled for March 31.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5465>
Metex Corp said its chairman and
chief executive officer Alan Cohen sold 78,375 shares of Metex
common stock to Metropolitan Consolidated Industries Inc
&lt;MONY>.
    The company said the selling price was 11.25 dlrs per share
with an option for Metropolitan Consolidated Industries to
purchase up to 42,750 shares more at the same price.
    Metex also said Mason Carter was elected president and
chief operating officer of the company. Carter joined Metex in
1982, where he was formerly its executive vice president.
    In addition, Attilio Petrocelli, president of Metropolitan,
was named to fill a vacancy on the Metex board of directors,
the company said.
    Metropolitan owns 21 pct of Metex common stock, the company
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5469>
American Security Corp said a
release will be forthcoming shortly regarding its pending
merger with Maryland National Corp &lt;MDNT>, approved by its
stockholders October 10.
    American was halted on NASDAQ pending a news announcement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5477>
Forum Group Inc said it has
terminated its agreement in principle to buy eight retirement
living centers in six states from Beverly Enterprises due to a
failure to reach a satisfacotry definitive agreement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5505>
Triangle Microwave Inc said
it is involved in talks on its possible purchase by a
"substantial U.S. company" it did not identify.
    Triangle said no agreement has yet been reached and there
can be no assurance that one will be reached. Any acquisitioon
would be subject to approval by its shareholders and to
regulatory filings, it said.
    Triangle Microwave makes microwave system components and
had earnings for the first half ended January 31 of 1,055,000
dlrs on sales of 7,292,000 dlrs, up from earnings of 763,000
dlrs on sales of 6,034,000 dlrs a year before.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5516>
A group controlled by Equitable
Bancorp Chairman Alfred Lerner said it has acquired a 9.6 pct
stake in AmeriTrust Corp &lt;AMTR> and may buy up to 24.9 pct if
obtains regulatory approval.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group said it bought its stake of 2.0 mln Ameritrust common
shares, for 81.1 mln dlrs as an investment.
    But the group, acting through Clevebaco L.P., a Cleveland
partnership, also said it would seek regulatory approval to
increase its stake. Lerner owns Clevebaco Corp, which is the
general partner of Clevebaco L.P.
    The Lerner group said it filed with the Federal Reserve
Board on March 13 notice of its intent to buy more than 10 pct
of the common stock of AmeriTrust, a Cleveland bank holding
company.
    If the Fed approves, Lerner, whose Equitable Bancorp is
also in Cleveland, said he intends to buy more AmeriTrust
stock, subject to market conditions and other factors.
    Since Lerner heads a bank holding company with assets
greater than one billion dlrs, he said he is barred by law from
serving as a director or officer of AmeriTrust or of having his
representatives on its board.
    Lerner said he has no intention of influencing AmeriTrust
management or its policies.
    The group said Clevebaco L.P. bought one mln of its shares
from Bear, Stearns and Co Inc on March 9 at 41 dlrs a share.
    Lerner said he accumulated the other one mln shares through
March 3 and sold them to Clevebaco L.P., which he controls, on
March 10 for 40.10 dlrs a share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5517>
Maryland National Corp &lt;MDNT> said it
has completed the acquisition of American Security Corp in an
exchange of 0.81 Maryland share for each of American's 12 mln
shares outstanding.
    The company said the mandatory 30-day review by the U.S.
Justice Department was completed today.
    Maryland National said American Security shareholders will
be entitled to receive the 32-1/2 ct per share Maryland
National regular quarterly dividend that is payable March 31 to
holders of record today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5520>
Rainier Bancorp said it completed the
acquisition of Tacoma, Wash.-based United Bank, for 59 mln dlrs
worth of Rainier stock.
    United, a savings bank with 607 mln dlrs in assets and 23
offices, will operate as a wholly-owned subsidiary, Rainier
said.
    Rainier, which last month agreed to merge with Security
Pacific Corp &lt;SPC>, said the United acquisition will increase
its assets to 9.8 billion dlrs from the 9.2 billion reported at
the end of 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5533>
Armtek Corp, formerly
Armstrong Rubber Co, completed the previously announced sale of
its Natchez, Miss., tire plant and other assets to &lt;Condere
Corp>, Condere said.
    Condere, formed to acquire the Armstrong assets, said it
named Dennis Terwillger, formerly vice president and controller
of Armstrong's Tire Division, president.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5559>
Safety-Kleen Corp said it has
tentatively agreed to buy an 80 pct stake in Breslube
Enterprises of Toronto for 14 mln dlrs in stock, cash and
equipment.
    Price includes 14 mln dlrs of Safety-Kleen common stock,
cash and a rerefining plant owned by Safety-Kleen. Closing of
the deal is expected by May.
    Breslube is a leading rerefiner of used lubricating oils in
North America, collecting used oils from auto garages, car
dealers and other businesses. In 1986 it refined 20 mln gallons
of used oil.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5596>
Cheyenne Software Inc said it is
in preliminary talks on the acquisition of compouter hardware
distribution firm F.A. Components Inc and its Freeman-Owings
Inc subsidiary.
    The company said F.A. had sales of 43.1 mln dlrs for 1986
and expects to report a loss for the year.
    Cheyenne said the purchase price would be paid in common
stock and it would provide additional finances for the
operation of F.A.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5597>
Hudson Valley Patrol Inc said it
agreed to acquire privately held Federal Protection Services
Inc, a Palm Beach, Fla., security firm, for 200,000 common
shares and other considerations.
    Hudson Valley, which provides guard and patrol services in
upstate N.Y., said Federal Protection Services provides
investigation, uniformed guard and armoured truck services to
banks, corporations and residential communities in southern
Florida.
    The company said it will issue 200,000 shares of its common
at closing and additional shares based on Federal Protection's
pretax earnings over the next three years.
    Closing is subject to setting a definitive agreement, it
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5608>
Banking Center said it has
signed a letter of intent to acquire First Railroad Mortgage Co
from First Union Bank of Augusta, Ga., for undisclosed terms.
    The company said First Railroad had loan production of over
100 mln dlrs in 1986 and was servicing over 435 mln dlrs in
loans at the end of 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5609>
Italian state bank &lt;Istituto Bancario San
Paolo di Torino> said its fully-owned &lt;San Paolo U.S. Holding
Co> of Wilmington in the U.S. had signed a letter of intent to
acquire &lt;Valley National Bank> of California.
    San Paolo said in a statement that, subject to obtaining
official authorization from the relevant bodies, it would merge
Valley National Bank with its subsidiary &lt;First Los Angeles
Bank>.
    Value of the planned acquisition was not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5615>
&lt;International Fine Foods Inc> said it
has acquired 2001 Distributors Inc of West Babylon, N.Y., for
875,000 common shares, plus contingent shares based on future
earnings.
    2001 distributes fresh-squeezed juices and had a loss on
sales of about one mln dlrs in 1986, its first year of
operation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5641>
Lynch Corp subisidiary Lynch
Entertainment Corp said it formed a general partnership called
Coronet Communications Co, which has acquired WHBF-TV station,
in Rock Island, Ill.
    The company said the price for the station, a CBS
television network affiliate, was 20 mln dlrs. The company also
said the other partner is Lombardo Communications Inc, a
wholly-owned corporation of Phillip Lombardo.
    Lynch said it will pursue further acquisitions of media and
entertainment entities with emphasis on broadcasting and cable
television operations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5643>
Schlumberger Ltd said it terminated an
agreement in principle for Fujitsu Ltd to buy 80 pct of its
Fairchild Semiconductor operations.
    The company said the rising political controversy in the
U.S. concerning the venture made it unlikely that the sale of
the Fairchild stake could be completed within a reasonable
time.
    The sale has been opposed by the U.S. Commerce Department
and the U.S. Defense Department, in part on national security
grounds.
    The company said termination of the agreement opened other
possibilities, including a possible leveraged buyout of the
semiconductor maker by Fairchild management.
    In the interim, Fairchild would continue its ongoing
business within Schlumberger, the oilfield services concern
said.
    Last October, Schlumberger announced the sale of the
Fairchild stake and said it would take a 200 mln dlrs charge in
the fourth quarter from the sale. The company ended up
recording special charges of 2.1 billion dlrs in the fourth
quarter, leading to a loss of 2.02 billion dlrs for the year.
    Schlumberger never announced a price for the sale, but
industry analysts have estimated the value of the deal at about
200 mln dlrs.
    The proposed sale was under antitrust review by the U.S.
Justice Department. Additionally, Commerce Secretary Malcolm
Baldridge and other U.S. officials have voiced reservations
about the transaction since it was announced.
    Government officials have expressed concern that the sale
could reduce the competitiveness of U.S. chip makers by putting
key advanced technology into Japanese hands.
    New, high-technology semiconductors are used in
supercomputers, which are faster and more powerful than
existing computers.
    Schlumberger is an oilfield services company controlled by
French interests and headquartered in New York. Fujitsu Ltd is
a computer and telecommunications company based in Japan.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5659>
McGraw-Hill Inc said it bought
&lt;Medecines et Sciences Internationales SA>, a French Healthcare
publisher, from Harper and Row Publishers Inc.
    The sum of the deal was not disclosed.
    It said the French company publishes original titles by
French authors, as well as translations of American, British
and German Medical books. The company will be consolidated with
McGraw-Hill France, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5661>
Suburban Bancorp said a Cook
County Circuit Court ruled in favor of one of its companies,
Suburban Bancorp of Bartlett (formerly Bartlett State Bank) on
claims against six former directors.
    Suburban Bank of Barlett claimed that the former directors
breached their fiduciary duties and were negligent in opposing
Suburban Bancorp's tender offer in January 1985, costing
Bartlett State Bank several hundred thousand dollars.
    It said a hearing to determine the amount of damages owed
to the bank was set for April 21.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5665>
CooperVision Inc &lt;EYE> told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it has acquired 1,420,500
shares of Cooper LaserSonics Inc, or 6.5 pct of the total
outstanding common stock.
    CooperVision said it bought the stake for 2.9 mln dlrs for
investment purposes.
    It said it might buy additional Cooper LaserSonics common
shares, but said it does not plan to boost its stake above 10
pct of the total outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5667>
DNA Medical Inc said Walter G.
Mize had bought about 9,400,000 shares, or about 33 pct of
DNA's outstanding stock, for 100,000 dlrs cash.
    Under an agreement with Mize, DNA said he will also become
chairman, and may, at his option, expand the board to provide
him equal representation with the current board.
    DNA also said it will submit a proposal at its annual
meeting for it to acquire three companies owned by Mize,
&lt;Heritage Lite Meat Corp>, &lt;National Lean Beef Corp> and
&lt;Heritage Cattle &lt;Corp>. DNA said the total value of the
transactions is 700,000 dlrs.
    DNA said that when the transactions are approved by its
shareholders, it will issue additional shares of its common so
that Mize will own 80 pct of its issued and outstanding stock.
    DNA said Mize will replace its current chairman, Donald
Holbrook, who will remain on the board.
    The company also said it will continue in the medical
development business as "long as it is deemed to be
advantageous."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5670>
CityFed Financial Corp said
its City Federal Savings Bank has a preliminary agreement to
sell 14 consumer lending offices to &lt;Goldome FSB> for
undisclosed terms.
    Goldome is the largest mutual savings bank in the U.S.
    CityFed said it decided to sell its consumer lending
offices outside its main market areas in New Jersey and Florida
to concentrate its resources to these markets.
    The offices being sold operate under the name of City
Consumer Serices Inc in Arizona, Colorado, Illinois, Maryland,
New Mexico, Oregon and Virginia.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5671>
Trans World Airlines said it told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it does not intend to seek
control of USAir Group or to acquire more of its stock at this
time.
    TWA also said it is amending its application with the
Department of Transportation to seek control of USAir.
    The amendment said TWA reserves the right to seek control
of USAir in the future, that it intends to maintain its 15 pct
stake, and that it also is seeking the flexibility to acquire
up to 25 pct of USAir.
    TWA said all USAir stock owned by it would be in a voting
trust and voted in the same proportion as the vote of all other
USAir shareholders.
    TWA filed a 13-D with the Securities and Exchange
Commission, reporting its holding of 4,023,200 shares of USAir.
TWA has said the stake amounts to about 15 pct.
    TWA also said that by order of the federal court in
Pittsburgh, it is temporarily barred from buying additional
shares of USAir pending a hearing March 23 to reconsider
USAir's application to expand the temporary restraining order
to a preliminary injunction.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5672>
First Bank System Inc said it has
found a potential buyer for First Bank Luverne and its office
in Pipestone, Minnesota.
    The bank holding company said 215 Holding Co, a corporation
controlled by the family of the late Robert Short, will buy
First Bank Luverne. The bank has 59.2 mln dlrs in assets.
    First Bank, which announced plans in 1985 to restructure
its banking assets by offering to sell 28 of its banks with a
total of 45 offices, said agreements have now been signed for
43 of these offices.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5675>
American International Petroleum Corp
&lt;AIPN> said it agreed to acquire for one mln dlrs the assets of
a western Louisiana oil and gas company. American International
would not identify the company.
    American said assets included nine leases totalling 2,600
acres, various working interests in 15 oil and gas wells on
that property, all equipment and machinery necessary for
operation, and a 50 pct interest in a nine-mile gas pipeline.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5686>
Condere Corp, formed by former
managers of Armtek Corp, said it completed the acquisition of a
tire plant and other assets of Armtek for undisclosed terms.
    In addition to a tire manufacturing plant, Condere bought
S. and A. Truck Tire Sales and Service Corp, which operates 51
Sears Truck Tire Sales and Service Centers through a licensed
agreement with Sears Roebuck and Co &lt;S>.
    The plant will supply tires to Armtek's Armstrong Tire Co
as well as to several Sears Centers. Condere said it expects
first year revenues to be 90 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5690>
Schlumberger Ltd most likely has an
alternate buyer lined up for its Fairchild Semiconductor unit,
Wall Street analysts said.
    "I think its clear that in cancelling its agreement with
Fujitsu, Schlumberger has signaled that it has another deal in
the works," said Paul Johnson, a semiconductor analyst with
L.F. Rothschild.
    "There are unquestionably other buyers out there," added
Kidder Peabody analyst Adam F. Cuhney. "A lot of companies have
looked at Fairchild and would be willing to buy it."
    Among the companies that would be interested in bidding for
Fairchild are Advanced Micro Devices &lt;AMD>, Sunnyvale, Calif.,
and LSI Logic Corp &lt;LLSI>, Milpitas, Calif., industry analysts
said.
    Top U.S. chipmakers like National Semiconductor Corp &lt;NSM>,
Texas Instruments Inc &lt;TXN> and Motorola Inc &lt;MOT> might also
seek to buy Fairchild, but could possibly run into antitrust
problems, the analysts added.
    Moreover, Fairchild's management is thought to be
considering proposing a leveraged buyout of the Cupertino,
Calif., company, analysts said.
    In a brief statement announcing the termination of the
agreement with Fujitsu, Schlumberger said the decision opened
up other possibilities, including a possible buyout by
Fairchild management.
    The company said it ended the deal, in which Fujitsu would
have bought 80 pct of Fairchild for an estimated 200 mln dlrs,
because rising opposition to the deal by the Reagan
administration made it unlikely that the sale could be
completed within a reasonable period of time.
    Analysts questioned this explanation, however, arguing that
the companies did not need government approval to complete the
transaction. Both Schlumberger and Fujitsu are foreigned-owned
companies.
    "Schlumberger would not have terminated the deal because
the U.S. government didn't want it," said Johnson of L.F.
Rothschild.
    A spokesman for Schlumberger declined to elaborate on the
company's news release.
    He said only that the company was reviewing a number of
possible alternatives for the Fairchild unit.
    Officials at Fairchild and Fujitsu were not immediately
available for comment.
    Analysts noted the significance of the government's
apparent success in preventing Fujitsu from taking control of
Fairchild.
    Administration officials, including Commerce Secretary
Malcolm Baldrige and Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger,
feared that the sale to Fujitsu would lead to Japanese control
of key semiconductor technology for supercomputers and military
weapons systems.
    "The government really stood up for the semiconductor
industry," said Johnson of L.F. Rothschild. "That, I think, is
the real significance of this."
    Consequently, analysts said, the Japanese government might
now feel more pressure to address U.S. complaints about
Japanese chipmakers' violation of the semiconductor trade
agreement signed last summer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5693>
SAFT, a unit of Cie Generale
d'Electricite of France, said it bought U.K.-based Alcad Ltd
from Penn Central Corp's Marathon Manufacturing Cos Inc.
    Terms of the deal were not disclosed.
    Alcad is one of the world's largest producers of
pocket-plate nickel-cadmium storeage batteries, used in
industrial and railroad applications to start engines and as
light sources, SAFT said.
    SAFT said it expects to add 400 jobs at the U.K.
operations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5708>
McDermott International Inc said
the purchase of a 5.4 pct block of its stock was an apparent
violation of the laws of Panama, its country of incorporation.
    The company said a detailed disclosure of an acquisition
offer must be made to the Panamanian National Securities
Commission or to the target's board before acquiring more than
five pct stake.
    It said transfers of securities in violation of these
Panamanian regulations are invalid.
    The company was not immediately available to say who had
acquired the 5.4 pct block of stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5710>
Corporate raider Carl Icahn
acknowledged that he is one of the targets of an investigation
by the Securities and Exchange Commission into possible
violations of securities laws.
    Icahn, who heads and controls Trans World Airlines Inc
&lt;TWA>, made the acknowledgement in a filing TWA was required to
make with the SEC disclosing its 14.8 pct stake in USAir Group.
    The SEC issued a formal order launching the private
investigation on Nov 12, 1986, Icahn said in the SEC filing.
    The order empowers SEC investigators to try to find out
whether any persons, including Icahn, violated securities laws
and related rules, Icahn said.
    Specifically, the probe is examining the acquisition and
subsequent sale of more than five pct of the stock of certain
unspecified companies, he said.
    Federal law requires individuals or groups of individuals
who have made shareholder agreements, to disclose stakes in
companies of at least five pct within 10 days.
    Icahn has acknowledged that he has been subpoenaed in
connection with SEC probes, but this is the first time he has
disclosed that he is among those being investigated.
    By making the disclosure in a filing with the SEC, which is
obviously already aware of its own probe, Icahn was also
alerting current and potential shareholders of TWA.
    It is not uncommon for companies which are aware that they
or their officers are the targets of government probes to
acknowledge the existence of the otherwise secret
investigations to fulfill their legal disclosure requirements
to their shareholders.
    Icahn said the SEC is looking into whether he and others
whom he did not name violated securities laws by acquiring and
selling more than five pct of a company's stock.
    SEC investigations into those kinds of possible securities
law violations have been spawned by the agency's widening probe
into the Wall Street insider trading scandal, according to
published reports.
    Making late filings of 13D forms, which disclose the amount
of stock over five pct an investor has in a company, or making
no filing at all could indicate a scheme to "warehouse" shares
of stock.
    In a warehousing scheme, a group of investors acting in
concert would each amass stock in the company without
disclosing that they have an agreement among them.
    By failing to disclose that they are acting together the
market is unware of the amount of stock of a company that is
controlled by a group acting in concert.
    Last year, the SEC charged members of the wealthy Belzberg
family of Canada with taking part in a warehousing scheme while
it was accumulating stock in Ashland Oil Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5713>
Ameritrust Corp said it sold two mln
shares of its common stock to an investment group named
Clevebaco Ltd Partnership.
    The partnership is controlled by Alfred Lerner, and a
subsidiary of the Progressive Corp &lt;PROG> is the limited
partner, according to the company.
    Ameritrust said it was advised that the Clevebaco group has
filed an application with bank regulatory authorities seeking
permission to acquire up to an additional three mln shares of
Ameritrust common stock.
    The company said the group indicated to it that it had no
hostile takeover intent toward Ameritrust, and that the
purchase was for investment purposes.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5724>
A U.S. Commerce Department spokesman
said the agency would have no comment on Schlumberger Ltd's
announcement that it had terminated an agreement in principle
to sell its Fairchild Semiconductor Corp unit to Fujitsu Ltd.
    Sclumberger had said that controversy surrounding the
venture made it unlikely the sale could be completed any time
soon. The sale was opposed by Commerce and the U.S. Defense
Department, in part on national security grounds.
    Commerce chief spokesman B.J. Cooper said the department
had had no contact with Schlumberger about the deal.
    A Defense Department spokesman said the agency was unaware
of Schlumberger's announcement and would have no immediate
reaction.
    Officials last week told Reuters that Commerce Secretary
Malcolm Baldrige and Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger had
joined forces to fight the planned sale because it could have
left the U.S. military overly dependent on foreign sources for
vital equipment used in high-technology weapons.
    Administration opposition to the deal also stemmed from
ongoing trade tensions between the United States and Japan,
officials said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5732>
Central Pennsylvania Savings
Association said it made a 30 pct investment in &lt;Pinnacle
Mortgage Investment Co>.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Pinnacle, incorporated in 1985, generates about 60 mln dlrs
in closed mortgage loans annually.
    Central Pennsylvania also said its directors recently
approved a letter of intent to acquire Hamilton-Reliance
Savings Association of Norristown, Pa.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5739>
Pacific Lighting Corp said it is
considering the sale of its land development line of business
and will be initiating discussions with potential buyers.
    The book value of the company's investment in land
development operations is 224 mln dlrs. The Pacific Lighting
Real Estate Group earned 24.2 mln dlrs and employed 800 people
during 1986, the company said.
    Alternatives to the sale being considered include a master
limited partnership and an initial public offering of the
equity in the land development companies, it said.
    Proceeds from the sale would likely be invested in Pacific
Lightings' new specialty retailing line of business and its oil
and gas operations, the company said.
    The investment banking firm Morgan Stanley has been
retained to advise Pacific Lighting on the disposition of the
land development operations.
    Completion of a transaction, it one is made, is expected by
the end of the year, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5740>
MLX Corp said a subsidiary has
tentatively agreed to acquire a sintered friction materials
business in Milan, Italy, from a unit of Abex Corp for
undisclosed terms.
    The deal will close after obtaining Italian government
approvals, expected in late April.
    The business, which will operated under the name S.K.
Wellman, will become a member of MLX's specialty friction
materials group. The business is a manufacturer of high-energy
friction materials for heavy-duty transmissions and clutches.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5750>
Trans World Airlines Inc, which
disclosed that it does not intend to seek control of USAir
Group at this time, said it still believes a combination of the
two airlines would have benefits to both.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
TWA, which is controlled by Carl Icahn, said it continues to
closely watch the developments of USAir, which has an agreement
to acquire Piedmont Aviation Inc &lt;PIE>.
    TWA said it spent 178.2 mln dlrs to acquire its 4,043,200
USAir shares, which amount to 14.8 pct of its total outstanding
common stock.
    TWA said it would not buy more USAir Group stock, at least
for the moment.
    But it said it still believes a TWA-USAir combination would
"create certain synergies that would be mutually beneficial to
both carriers."
    TWA stressed that it reserved the right to revive its
takeover attempt and said it may continue to explore the
feasibility and strategies of gaining control of USAir.
    Further purchases of USAir stock would require the approval
of the Department of Transportation, TWA said.
    Because of Department of Transportation rules, TWA also
said it put its USAir stock into a voting trust with Fleet
National Bank as the voting trustee.
    The voting trust agreement requires the bank to vote in
favor of any acquisition agreement between TWA and USAir and to
opposed any other merger of USAir.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5751>
Adobe Resources Corp and High Plains Oil
Corp said they reached an agreement in principle under which
High Plains will be merged into a unit of Adobe.
    Under terms of the agreement, the companies said each share
of High Plains common stock not owned by Adobe or held in the
High Plains treasury will be exchanged for 1.12 shares of newly
issued Adobe common.
    The exchange, they said, will be made on the effective date
of the merger, which must be approved by both companies' boards
and High Plains' shareholders.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5755>
TransAmerica Natural Gas Corp said it
is seeking two billion dlrs in punitive and actual damages in a
lawsuit it filed today against Coastal Corp, its chairman and
certain Coastal affiliates.
    TransAmerica, a privately held company that has been in
bankruptcy since 1983, said its suit alleges that Coastal and
its chairman, Oscar S. Wyatt Jr, unlawfully interfered with
agreements it previously reached with its creditors, causing
the company significant damage.
    TransAmerica also said its suit, filed in state district
court in Harris County, Texas, seeks injunctions against Wyatt
and Coastal to enjoin them from interfering with its
contractual agreements with its creditors.
    The company alleged that beginning in mid-1986, Coastal and
its chairman took various steps to acquire its gas and other
assets.
    Coastal has used TransAmerica's bankruptcy proceedings to
engineer a hostile takeover attempt, the company charged.
    In its suit TransAmerican alleged that Coastal and Wyatt
are "notorious corporate raiders who have been restrained in
the past from taking over other corporations in their attempt
to create a stranglehold position from which they could control
and raise gas prices..."
    "It is obvious that Coastal's efforts to improperly take
over TransAmerican is a thinly veiled attempt to control a
larger share of the Texas gas market to the detriment of end
users and consumers," the company alleged.
    Coastal could not be reached for comment. Company name is
Transamerican.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5756>
Caesars World Inc said it filed a
lawsuit against Martin T. Sosnoff and MTS Acquisition Corp
regarding its March 9 unsolicited tender offer for Caesars
World stock.
    The company said it filed in the Federal Court in the
Central District of California, charging the tender offer,
which its board rejected, violated federal securities laws and
federal margin regulations.
    The suit charges the offering materials are materially
false and misleading and misstate and conceal material
information required to be disclosed to shareholders.
    The suit also charges the offer is illusory and designed to
manipulate the market in Caesars World stock to enable Sosnoff
to sell the Caesars World stock he already owns for a
substantial profit.
    The complaint seeks, among other things, to enjoin the
tender offer and to require MTS and Sosnoff to correct false
and misleading statements in the offer.
    Caesars World is expected to seek a friendly suitor,
restructure operations, or buy back Sosnoff's holdings in an
attempt to fight off the bid.
    Sosnoff holds about 13.6 pct of the company's stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5757>
Harris Associates L.P., a Chicago
investment advisor, said it raised its stake in Centerre
Bancorporation to 508,062 shares, or 6.6 pct of the total
outstanding, from 427,061 shares, or 5.5 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Harris said it bought 81,001 Centerre common shares between Jan
2 and March 4 at prices ranging from 36.00 to 39.75 dlrs a
share.
    It said its dealings in the company's stock are on behalf
of its clients.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5762>
Aero Services International Inc
said it signed an agreement with Dibo Attar, who controls about
39 pct of its common stock, under which three nominees to
Aero's board have been selected by Attar.
    In addition to Attar, the nominees are Stephen L. Peistner,
chairman and chief executive officer of &lt;McCrory Corp> and
James N.C. Moffat III, vice president and secretary of
&lt;Eastover Corp>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5780>
Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corp
&lt;HKBH.HK> is close to a deal on the sale of a commercial
building in Hong Kong's Mongkok business district, a bank
spokesman said.
    He said the 21-storey Wayfoong Plaza was likely to be sold
for about 280 mln H.K. Dlrs but declined to identify the buyer.
    The spokesman gave no further details.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5789>
&lt;Independent Newspapers Ltd> (INL)
said it bought two more community newspapers in Houston, Texas,
through a subsidiary there, for an undisclosed sum.
    INL said in a statement &lt;Houston Community Newspapers Inc>
bought the South West Advocate and the South Bend Advocate,
with combined circulation of 74,000 copies, and associated
assets, from &lt;The Advocate Communications Corp Inc>.
    INL publishes Wellington's morning and evening newspapers
as well as New Zealand provincial dailies and newspapers in
Rhode Island. Just under 40 pct of INL is owned by &lt;News Ltd>,
an Australian subsidiary of News Corp Ltd &lt;NCPA.S>.
    Production and administration of the two publications would
be transferred to the company's existing centre in Houston. INL
said the acquisition took effect on March 1.
    INL chairman Alan Burnet said the purchase would enable the
subsidiary to offer advertisers a combined distribution of nine
community newspapers to 340,000 homes in the greater Houston
area. Trading conditions in the area are particularly difficult
because the city's economy depends to a large extent on the
fortunes of the petroleum industry, but the situation should
improve in the medium to long term and the investment will
prove to be sound, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5808>
Schlumberger Ltd's &lt;SLB.N> decision to
end an agreement in principle for Fujitsu Ltd &lt;ITSU.T> to buy
80 pct of its &lt;Fairchild Semiconductor Corp>, and the political
furore that surrounded the proposed sale, will make Japanese
companies more cautious in their efforts to acquire U.S. High
technology firms but will not halt such attempts, industry
analysts said.
    The collapse of the deal will not be a critical blow to
Fujitsu but it will boost the cost of future U.S. Expansion by
the Japanese firm, said analysts polled by Reuters.
    "The acquisition of Fairchild is not essential to Fujitsu's
North American operations, but it would have been a great
boost," James Capel and Co analyst Tom Murtha said.
    French-controlled Schlumberger said yesterday it was ending
the agreement because mounting political controversy in the
U.S. Made it unlikely that the sale of the Fairchild stake
could be completed in a reasonable time.
    The sale was opposed by the U.S. Commerce Department and
Defence Department, partly on national security grounds.
    Fujitsu's acquisition of Fairchild would have given the
Japanese computer maker control of a comprehensive North
American sales and distribution system and access to
microprocessor technology, an area where Fujitsu is weak,
analysts said.
    The deal would also have given Fujitsu 14 additional
microchip production facilities worldwide, eight of them in the
U.S., A report by the Capel firm said.
    "It was an entry point, a port for semiconductors and a
marketing channel for other things," said Barclays de Zoete Wedd
analyst Rick May.
    Several analysts said the purchase would not have given
Fujitsu access to critical defence technology.
    "(Fairchild) simply doesn't have key technology -- that's a
thing of the past," May said.
    The failure could be a blessing in disguise for Fujitsu as
it might have had to spend several hundred million dollars to
modernise Fairchild's production lines, Capel's Murtha said.
    The failure of the deal will doubtless encourage Japanese
firms to take a lower profile in attempts to acquire U.S. High
tech firms but they are unlikely to stop, analysts said.
    Most analysts said Fujitsu was likely to go the more costly
route of expanding its own production and distribution
facilities in the U.S., Although some said it could use the
estimated 200 mln dlrs set aside for buying Fairchild to try to
acquire some less politically symbolic firm.
    "It may slow the pace of Japanese acquisitions, but the
necessity of expanding their production and design capacity in
America remains," said Capel's Murtha. "The Japanese will
continue to shop for bargains, but it will be harder to find
ones that are politically acceptable."
    Japanese firms are likely to favour joint ventures or
smaller equity stakes in firms to avoid the political backlash
that blocked the Fairchild sale, analysts said. "They're not
going to slow up, they're just going to buy smaller pieces ...
Because of the political risk," said Barclays de Zoete's May.
    Several Japanese firms have already taken 10 to 30 pct
shares in smaller U.S. High technology firms such as super
minicomputer makers, he said.
    Opposition of the sort that blocked Fujitsu could end up
harming U.S. Firms and undermining a trend toward multinational
tie-ups, some analysts said.
    "This is not really of benefit to U.S. Firms either," said
Jardine Fleming (Securities) Ltd analyst Nick Edwards. "The
pooling of resources in semiconductors is a positive move --
why should the government step in to prevent it?"
    Japan's Minister of International Trade and Industry Hajime
Tamura told a press conference that interference by U.S.
Government officials in the Fairchild deal was inappropriate.
    "This is entirely a private sector matter and not a matter
for governments' comment," Tamura said. "I think it was improper
for U.S. Government officials to intervene to the extent they
did," he said.
    A spokesman told Reuters the ministry's view is that
international investment flows ought to be free and that such
flows are of increasing importance in line with the growing
closeness of U.S.-Japanese economic ties.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5854>
Hanson Trust Plc &lt;HNSN.L> said it will
sell its Finlays confectionery, tobacco and newsagent business
to a specially formed company, &lt;Finlays Plc> for an estimated
16.9 mln stg cash.
    The chain of stores was acquired when Hanson took over
&lt;Imperial Group Plc> last year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5873>
Commercial International Corp said
it has completed the previously-announced acquisition of most
of the assets of Growers Distributing International Corp, a
table grape marketer, for an undisclosed amount.
    It said the entire purchase price will be payable over a
three-year period and based on a percentage of pre-tax earnings
of the acquired operation.
    The company said it has an option to acquire Growers' cold
storage facility and related assets in Tulare County, Calif.
Growers is owned by Commercial chairman Sid Schuman Jr. and
director Arnold T. Cattani Jr.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5875>
&lt;Swiss Corp for Microelectronics and
Watchmaking Industries> said it has acquired International time
corp from privately-held Timex corp for undisclosed terms.
    International Time is exclusive distributor of Swiss Corp's
Tissot watches in the U.S.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5876>
Wavehill International Ventures Inc
said it has completed the previously-announced acquisition of
Personal Computer Rental corp for 500,000 restricted common
shares, giving former shareholders of Personal Computer a 25
pct interest in the combined company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5889>
OII Holdings Corp, a company formed by
Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and Co, said it received and purchased
about 58.3 mln shares or 96 pct of Owens-Illinois Inc common
stock and 50,275 of 4.75 dlr cumulative convertible preference
shares of Owens, or about 83 pct.
    The company said its tender offer for all common and
preference shares expired last night. It said Owens-Illinois
will be merged into a subsidiary of OII Holdings on March 24.
Common shares not bought in the offer will be converted into
the right to receive 60.50 dlrs per share in cash, the tender
price.  The preference stock has been called.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5899>
&lt;Shamrock Holdings Inc> said
its subsidiary, Shamrock Holdings of California, acquired
controlling interest in &lt;DBMS Inc> through the purchase of
575,000 shares of its preferred stock.
    The company said the stock was purchased for an undisclosed
amount from an unnamed group of investors.
    Shamrock said Raymond Nawara, a former executive vice
president of DBMS, a privately-held software company, also
granted it options and voting rights on a major portion of his
shares of common stock.
   
    The combination of preferred and common stock holdings
permit Shamrock and Nawara to exercise voting control over
approximately 53 pct of the shares of the company.
    Shamrock also said Nawara has been elected president of
DBMS and one of its directors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5900>
French state agricultural bank &lt;Caisse
Nationale du Credit Agricole> has joined the group led by
publishing house &lt;Hachette> which is bidding for control of the
state television station TF1, replacing &lt;Banque Nationale de
Paris> which has withdrawn, Hachette said in a statement.
    Credit Agricole's stake in the consortium will be 3.5 pct.
    Last week the broadcasting supervisory board asked Hachette
to remove BNP from the consortium because the bank had acted as
adviser to the government for the imminent privatisation of
TF1.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5902>
Gillette Co &lt;GS> exercised an option to
take a 51.2 pct stake in the French pen firm Waterman which it
had previously been authorised to do by the French government,
the French stockbrokers' association (CSAC) said.
    Gillette has given an undertaking to intervene on the
Bourse until April 7 to prevent Waterman shares from falling
below 650 francs, it added.
    This compares with yesterday's rate of 625 francs.
    Under the agreement concluded last November between
Waterman owners Francine and Grace Le Foyer-Gomez and Alice
Lundgren and the Gillette group, Gillette agreed to acquire
51.2 pct of the capital of Waterman at 700 francs a share.
    Gillette is buying a total 180,000 shares, valuing the deal
at 126 mln francs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5910>
Atico Financial Corp said it has executed
a definitive agreement to acquire 93.5 pct of Intercontinental
Bank of Dade County, Fla., from Intercontinental Bank Holding
Co for an undisclosed amount of cash and common stock.
    It said closing is subject to regulatory approval.
    Atico said in connection with the acquisition it will apply
to become a registered bank holding company and convert its 99
npct owned Atico Savings Bank subsidiary to a state-chartered
commercial bank.
    Intercontinental had year-end assets of about 487 mln dlrs.
    Atico had year-end assets of about 534 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5919>
Baker International Corp said it has
signed a definitive agreement to sell the assets and business
of the electric submersible oilwell pump product line in the
continental U.S. of its Baker Oil Tools Inc subsidiary to Trico
Industries Inc &lt;TRO> for an undisclosed amount of cash and
other consideration.
    The company said the transaction is subject to Hughes Tool
Co &lt;HT> and Baker shareholder approval of the Baker/Hughes
merger. The U.S. Justice Department has announced that it will
require divestiture of the product line for approval of the
merger.
    Baker said the transaction is subject to approval by the
Justice Department and the boards of Baker, Hughes and Trico.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5934>
Clabir Corp said its 86 pct
owned affiliate, Ambrit Inc &lt;ABI>, has agreed to acquire the
Popsicle Industries division of &lt;Sara Lee Corp of Canada Ltd>
for about 37 mln Canadian dlrs in cash.
    Clabir said the purchase from the Sara Lee Corp &lt;SLE>
subsidiary is worht about 28 mln U.S. dlrs.
    The agreement is subject to Canadian regulatory approval.
    Popsicle Canada, through its 19 licensees, is the largest
maker and distributor of frozen novelty products in Canada,
Clabir added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5937>
Adams-Russell Electronics Co Inc
said it has acquired Hermetronics PLC, a maker of hermetic
integrated circuit packages, for about 600,000 dlrs. 
    The company said HErmetronics is expected to have sales of
over 800,000 dlrs for the year ending this month.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5946>
Memory Protection Devices Inc said it
expects to close the previously announced acquisition of the
assets and liabilities of Bogen, a division of &lt;Lear Siegler
Inc>, on April one.
    Memory Protection Devices said it received a senior loan
commitment letter as well as the requisite waiver under the New
Jersey Environmental Control Reclamation Act, both of which are
necessary to complete the acquisition. It declined to provide
further details.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5947>
&lt;Canadian Foremost Ltd>,
earlier reporting lower 1986 net profit, said negotiations are
continuing concerning the previously announced sale of the
company's 49 pct interest in &lt;Macedon Resources Ltd>.
    If concluded, the sale would be refelected in the company's
1987 results, Foremost said without elaborating.
    It also said lower revenues from the last half of 1986 are
expected to continue during 1987, but a strong cash and working
capital position will enable Foremost to go on developing
traditional and new markets. It earlier said 1986 earnings fell
to 1,042,000 dlrs from year-ago 2,510,000 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5949>
Texas International Co said it
has completed the previously-announced 120 mln dlr sale of its
domestic oil and natural gas reserves to &lt;Total Compagnie
Francaise des Petroles>.
    It said on closing it used part of the proceeds to retire
all 100 mln dlrs of its U.S. bank and U.S. senior debt and the
rest will be used for general corporate purposes.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5955>
&lt;Qintex America Ltd> said its offer
for 3.3 mln Princeville Development Corp shares has been
extended to March 19 from March 18.
    As of yesterday, Qintex said, 7,060,197 Princeville shares
had been tendered in response to the offer and not withdrawn,
down from over 7.2 mln on March 10.
    Qintex said it is extending the offer to allow Princeville
shareholders to assess the sale announced last week of
Princeville Airways Inc to Aloha Inc &lt;ALO>, adding a supplement
to the Quintex offer further detailing the agreement with Aloha
will be distributed later today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5974>
TM Communications Inc said it has
completed the acquisition of radio station KNSS-FM of Reno,
Nev., for about 2,500,000 dlrs in cash.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5975>
Peoples Heritage Bank said it
has agreed to purchase Northeast Leasing Co Inc, a Portland,
Maine lessor of office equipment, for about 43,000 common
shares.
    It said Norhteast had year-end receivables of 2,700,000
dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5977>
Owens-Corning Fiberglas Corp said
it has completed the previously-announced sale of its three
foam products plants to Atlas Roofing Corp for undisclosed
terms.
    The sale is part of its restructuring, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5986>
Royal Resources Corp said it has
exercised its optioon to purchase Montagu Mining Investments
Inc from &lt;Samuel Montagu Ltd> of London for 3,600,000 dlrs in
cash and 200,000 common shares.
    The company said Montagu's main asset is a 10 pct interest
in the Hog Ranch Joint Venture, which operates the open cut
heap leach Hog Ranch gold mine in Washoe County, Nev.  The mine
now produces gold at over 50,000 ounces a year.
    It said after nine months following closing, Montagu may
require Royal to register the 200,000 shares for sale.         
    Royal said from six months after closing until one year
after, Montagu also has the right to require Royal to
repurchase any or all of the 200,000 shares at 4.50 dlrs each.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6003>
Irving Bank Corp said it bought the
factoring division of Associates Commercial Corp, a unit of
Gulf and Western Co Inc's Associates Corp of North America.
    The terms of the previously announced deal were not
disclosed.
    It said the assets were transferred to Irving Commercial
Corp.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6020>
Spendthrift Farm Inc said it has
received three tentative proposals to acquyire control of the
company.
    It said it is evaluating the proposals and will not comment
further unless a definitive agreement is reached.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6027>
Development Corp of America
said its merger with Lennar Corp &lt;LEN> was completed and its
stock no longer existed.
    Development Corp of America, whose board approved the
acquisition last November for 90 mln dlrs, said the merger was
effective today and its stock now represents the right to
receive 15 dlrs a share.
    The American Stock Exchange said it would provide further
details later.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6030>
Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd,
based in Israel, said it sold its wholly owned Promedico
subsidiary, to foreign investors for four mln dlrs.
    It said the book value of the unit is about 2.2 mln dlrs.
    Teva said it will continue to market Promedico's products
through its wholly owned subsidiary, Salomon, Levin and Elstein
Ltd.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6034>
K Mart Corp said recent talks to sell
65 remaining Kresge variety stores and their underlying real
estate to F.W. Woolworth Co &lt;Z> have ended.
    Robert Stevenson, K Mart vice president, told Reuters the
talks, which began about six weeks ago, ended. He declined to
give a reason.
    Kresge is the forerunner of what is now the K Mart chain.
The name was changed to K Mart in 1977, Stevenson said.
    "We're selling and buying real estate in our real estate
division, and Woolworth was interested in some of our
properties. The talks were of a casual nature," he said.
    The 65 Kresge stores that are scattered around the country
in downtown and suburban locations, he said.
    Stevenson said K Mart will continue to operate the stores.
"The stores are profitable. The only decision K Mart has made
is that we will continue to operate them," he said
    Kresge had been a nationwide chain of 900 variety stores.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6056>
Dudley Taft and Narragansett
Capital Inc said it was prepared to raise its bid to acquire
Taft Broadcasting Co to more than 150 dlrs per share.
    Taft, through Theta Co, sent and letter to Taft's board of
directors stating he was committed to purchasing the
broadcasting company and was ready to discuss all aspects of
the purchase.
    The company said items to be discussed included price,
structure and form of consideration. Taft said he was prepared
to negotiate a transaction in which Taft Broadcast shareholders
would receive in excess of 150 dlrs per share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6059>
Allwaste Inc said it entered into an
agreement in principle to acquire all the outstanding common of
a related air-moving and industrial services company. It did
not disclose the name of the company.
    Allwaste, which preforms air-moving and related services,
said it will swap shares of its common, valued at 2.6 mln dlrs,
with the company it is acquiring.
    It said the acquisition is subject to negotiation of a
final agreement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6065>
An investor group led by New York
investor George Soros said it acquired a 6.1 pct stake in B.F.
Goodrich Co common stock as an investment.
    The group said it paid about 69 mln dlrs for the 1,389,600
Goodrich shares, which are being held by Quantum Fund N.V., a
Netherlands Antilles investment firm advised by Soros.
    It said all the shares were bought between Dec. 29 and
March 9.
    The group said it reserved the future right to buy
additional shares and to formulate other purposes or plans
regarding its Goodrich investment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6070>
A group led by New York investor
Michael Steinhardt told the Securities and Exchange Commission
it bought a 6.6 pct stake in Holiday Corp common stock as an
investment.
    The group said it paid 114 mln dlrs for its 1.6 mln Holiday
shares, 530,000 of which were bought since Feb. 6.
    At the same time, group members said they held short
positions in the stock totaling 830,000 shares.
    In addition to Steinhardt himself, the group includes
Steinhardt Partners and Institutional Partners, two investment
firms of which Steinhardt is one of the general partners.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6082>
Bancroft Convertible Fund said the
U.S. District Court for the District of New Jersey issued a
preliminary injunction, enjoining &lt;Zico Investment Holding
Inc's> tender offer for Bancroft.
    It said the Court order prevents Zico from buying any
shares tendered to them during the offer, which began on Feb.
17, 1987.
    In the tender offer blocked by the Court, Zico offered to
buy 500,000 shares, or about 22 pct of Bancroft's outstanding
stock, for 30 dlrs a share.
    Previously, Zico had bought 965,000 Bancroft shares for 31
dlrs a share, giving it about 28 pct of the company. If the
recent offer had gone through, the Zico would have owned
slightly more than 50 pct of Bancroft's outstanding shares.
 
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6085>
Taft Broadcasting Co said its
board continues to explore alternatives, such as a possible
financial restructuring, in response to a Theta Corp offer of
150 dlrs per share for Taft stock.
    Last week Taft rejected a 145 dlr-a-share bid by Theta, an
investment group headed by Taft's vice chairman, Dudley Taft.
    Taft also said the new proposal would be submitted to the
board but no decision had been made with respect to the sale of
the company.
    In the proposal, Theta said it was prepared to discuss all
aspects of the offer including price, structure and form of
consideration and would be prepared to negotiate a transaction
in which shareholders would receive a value in excess of 150
dlrs per share.
    Taft said Theta requested that the company cooperate and
provide it with information subject to an appropriate
confidentiality agreement.
    The company declined to comment beyond this statement.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6090>
American Telephone and Telegraph Co and
Philips Telecommunications BV (APT) would hold 36 pct through
direct and indirect holdings in France's &lt;Cie Generale de
Constructions Telephoniques> if a joint bid with French
partners for the soon-to-be-privatised firm succeeds, a
director at one of the partner firms said.
    Marc Mathieu of &lt;Societe Anonyme de Telecommunications>
SAT, told journalists the bid foresaw a direct stake of 20 pct
for APT, the joint firm set up by the U.S.'s ATT &lt;T.N.> and the
NV Philips Gloeilampenfabrieken &lt;PGLO.AS>.
    The other 80 pct would be owned by a holding company made
up of SAT, APT, Cie du Midi &lt;MCDP.PA> and five mutual funds.
   Under French law, foreign investors are restricted to a 20
pct direct stake in privatised companies but can boost their
stake to 40 pct through indirect holdings.
    The make-up of the holding company, however, is subject to
close discussions within the government due to legal queries
over the nationality of the mutual funds, a Finance Ministry
official said.
    Although bought by French citizens they are managed by
foreign banks &lt;Morgan Guaranty Trust Co of New York> and
&lt;Banque de Neuflize, Schlumberger, Mallet SA>, controlled by
Algemene Bank Nederland NV &lt;ABNN.AS>, an SAT spokesman said.
    CGCT, which controls 16 pct of the French public telephone
switching market, is to be sold by the government for 500 mln
francs by private tender.
    Five groups are bidding for the company and the government
has said it will choose CGCT's new owner by the end of April.
    APT vice-president Wim Huisman told a news conference a
capital increase was envisaged if SAT-APT wins CGCT, but
declined to give details or say how an increase would affect
foreign stakes in CGCT.
    In 1985, CGCT posted losses of 200 mln francs on sales of
three billion after 1984 losses of 997 mln francs.
    A joint SAT-APT statement added that buyers were committed
to investing 240 mln francs in CGCT research and production
plants. The APT-SAT offer includes a provision for CGCT to
produce APT 5ESS-PRX switching technology and adapt it to
French standards.
    The tender was launched after a 1985 draft agreement for
ATT to take over CGCT was abandoned following the introduction
of the French government privatisation laws which reopened
bidding among a wider range of applicants.
    Other candidacies to take over CGCT include West Germany's
Siemens AG &lt;SIEG.F> allied with Schneider SA &lt;SCHN.PA>
subsidiary Jeumont-Schneider, Sweden's Telefon AB LM Ericsson
&lt;ERIC.ST> allied with Matra &lt;MATR.PA> and Bouygues SA
&lt;BOUY.PA>, Italy's &lt;Italtel>, and Canada's Northern Telecom Ltd
&lt;NTL.TO>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6092>
A shareholder group led by New York
investor Robert Toussie told the Securities and Exchange
Commission it sold off most of its holdings in Heck's Inc
common stock but reserved the right to again seek control of
the company in the future.
    The group, which includes the Edward A. Viner and Co
brokerage, said it sold 579,600 shares since March 5, leaving
it with 157,000 shares or 1.8 pct of the total outstanding.
    The group had proposed a takeover of Heck's in September
but later withdrew the offer, and Heck's on March 5 filed for
protection from its creditors under federal bankruptcy law.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6093>
&lt;Dixons Group PLC>, which is in a
battle with &lt;CYACQ Corp> for control of Cyclops Corp, said a
Cyclops shareholder had agreed to withdraw a motion in U.S.
District Court to prevent Dixons from completing its tender
offer for Cyclops, which expires 2400 EST today.
    Dixons did not name the shareholder and did not disclose
the holder's stake in Cyclops.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6096>
Siebel Capital Management Inc, a
California investment adviser, told the Securities and Exchange
Commission (SEC) it bought 1.3 mln CooperVision Inc common
shares or 5.9 pct of the total outstanding.
    In its SEC filing, the firm said it "intends to acquire more
stock and may attempt to influence management of the company to
make major changes in the company's business or corporate
structure."
    Siebel said it made net purchases of 163,200 CooperVision
shares since Jan. 1.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6101>
American Cyanamid Co said it bought
the 50 pct interest of Cyanamid Fothergill Ltd held by
&lt;Fothergill and Harvey PLC>, making the unit a wholly owned
subsidiary.
    The unit manufactures structural materials, including
advanced composites, adhesives, and aluminum honeycomb for the
European space industry.
    The current management will remain in place and the unit
will continue at its locations in Wrexham, U.K., the company
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6103>
An investor group including New
York-based Mutual Shares Corp and Mutual Qualified Income Fund
Inc told the Securities and Exchange Commission it raised its
stake in Gelco Corp common stock to 575,859 shares or 8.2 pct
of the total outstanding.
    The group said its most recent purchases included 241,000
shares bought between January 21 and March 10.
    The group said it purchased the shares for investment
purposes.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6120>
VTX Electronics Corp said its
board declared a five-for-four stock split, payable April Nine
to holders of record March 27.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6121>
Coastal Corp said it expected earnings
for 1987 "to be significantly above" profits of 71.6 mln dlrs
last year.
    In a letter to shareholders appearing in the company's
newly-issued 1986 annual report, Coastal chairman Oscar Wyatt
did not elaborate on how much earnings were expected to
increase.
    The 1986 profits of Coastal, a natural gas production and
pipeline company, were halved from 1985 levels due to slumping
energy prices. The company's sales totaled 6.7 billion dlrs
last year.
    Coastal also said it sold its natural gas for an average
price of 2.17 dlrs per mcf in 1986, a drop of 18 pct from the
previous year. Oil and natural gas liquids sold for an average
14.20 dlrs a barrel in 1986, a reduction of 37 pct.
    The Houston-based company, which produced a daily average
of 120 mln cubic feet of gas and 11,149 barrels of oil, said it
had proved reserves at yearend 1986 of 28.6 mln barrels of oil
and 954 billion cubic feet of natural gas. Average reserve
replacement costs were 8.28 dlrs per barrel of oil equivalent
during the past three-year period, representing a little more
than half of the industry average, the company said.
    Coastal's more than 800 gasoline retail outlets were
operated profitably during 1986 "and are expected to continue
to do so," the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6124>
Norstar Bancorp said it has agreed
in principle to acquire United National Bank of Callicoon,
N.Y., by exchanging three Norstar common shares for each of the
201,660 United shares outstanding.
    Based on the recent price of Norstar's stock, it said, the
proposed tax-free exchange would have a market value of about
20 mln dlrs.
    Norstar said the acquisition is subject to approval by
United's holders and state and federal regulators. United has
assets of 90 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6135>
&lt;Fortune Savings Bank> said it
agreed to buy the deposits and assume the leasehold of a
Financial Security Savings and Loan Association &lt;FSSL> branch
here.
    Terms of the agreement were not disclosed.
    Fortune said the agreement is subject to regulatory
approval. It also said that if the transaction is approved,
Financial would generate a profit on the sale.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6157>
Taft Broadcasting Co stock rose almost
three points today as its vice chairman and an investment group
proposed to sweeten a takeover offer for the company.
    However, several arbitragers said they would shy away from
the stock at its current price levels since it is unclear how
high bidding for the company would go and whether the company
would agree to a takeover.
    "There are too many uncertainties," said one arbitrager.
    Taft stock rose 2-7/8 to 155-3/4.
    Dudley Taft, Taft vice chairman, and Narragansett Capital
Inc said they sent a letter to the Taft board, stating they
were committed to pursuing acquisition of the broadcast company
and were prepared to negotiate a transaction in excess of 150
dlrs per share.
    The company responded that the proposal would be submitted
to the board of directors, but that no decisions have yet been
made on a sale of the company.
    "Someone's betting this company will go for 170 (dlrs per
share)," said one arbitrager.
    Arbitragers said the stock is a risky buy at current
levels, unless an offer was accepted in the 170 dlr per share
range. They said to make an arbitrage investment at this level
would be chancy since it will take a long time for any
transaction to be completed because of regulatory approvals
necessary for the broadcast properites.
    Taft earlier rejected a 145 dlr per share or 1.35 billion
dlr bid from the investment group. The company said it rejected
the bid as inadequate based on advice of Goldman, Sachs and Co,
its financial adviser. It said it would consider alternatives
such as restructuring.
    Arbitragers speculated a bidding war may erupt for Taft,
which has two large shareholders in an investment group led by
Robert Bass and Carl Lindner, chairman of American Financial
Corp. The Bass group holds 25 pct of Taft and Lindner holds
16.2 pct. The Taft family, which founded the company almost 50
years ago, has about 12 pct.
    Lindner last week told the Securities and Exchange
Commission he may be interested in making a bid for Taft.
    "I could see if things got really crazy that it might go
for 175 (dlrs per share)," said one arbitrager, but he
speculated it probably would not even be taken over for more
than a price in the 160s.
    Another speculated that Lindner might bid, but he
speculated the investor would not really be interested in
running the company. Lindner was unavailable for comment.
    Dennis McAlpine, an analyst with Oppenheimer and Co, said
he had speculated the company might be considering a leveraged
buyout.
    "Ideally, you'd have to break this thing up to satisfy all
the interests involved," he said, adding the two largest
shareholders might be interested in pieces of Taft.
    He said the highest takeover price he calculated for the
company has been about 140 dlrs per share, but that the highest
estimates on Wall Street have been about 160. He said the
latter would be based on more optimistic expectations for the
broadcast industry.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6180>
Midway Airlines Inc, which has
frequently been mentioned as an acquisition target, said it
declared a shareholder rights plan.
    Holders will get a dividend of one preferred share purchase
right on each outstanding share of common stock.
    Each right, when exercisable, will entitle the holder to
purchase one one-hundredth share of Series C Junior
Participating preferred stock for 50 dlrs.
    The rights are intended to assure that all holders receive
fair treatment in the event of a takeover. The company said
this is not in response to a known effort to acquire control.
    The rights will be exercisable 10 days after a person or
group buys 20 pct of the company's common, or announces or
commences a tender offer that would result in acquisition of 30
pct or more of its common.
    Midway can redeem the rights at two cts each at any time
prior to expieration of 10 days after the acquisition by any
person of 20 pct or more of the companyt's common, it said.
    If Midway is acquired, each right will entitle its hodler
to purchase a number of the acquiring company's common shares
having a market value at that time of twice the right's
exercise price.
    The dividend will be payable to holders of record April
six, and expire 10 years later on April 6, 1997.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6188>
Temco Service Industries Inc said its
proposed buyout by chairman Herman J. Hellman and president
Harvey Newwman has been terminated by mutual consent, and Temco
has no present intention of being acquired by any other party.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6199>
Pentron Corp said its
Rotational Molding Inc unit has purchased privately held Ice
Creations Unlimited for an undisclosed amount of cash and other
considerations.
    The company said Ice Creations had sales of 1.2 mln dlrs in
the year ended May 31, 1986.
    Ice creations is a molder of plastics.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6217>
Allegheny Beverage Corp said it
has been approached by a group interested in acquiring its
foodservice unit, Service America Corp.
    The group includes senior management of Service America but
no officers of Allegheny Beverage, the company said.
    The company has agreed to permit the group and its
potential lenders to perform a due diligence review of Service
America, it said.
    Allegheny noted it had previously cancelled plans to spin
off the foodservice subsidiary.
    The company said the group's review is preliminary and
there is no assurance that an acquisition proposal will be made
or, if made, accepted.
    Service America had fiscal 1986 revenues of about 934 mln
dlrs, or about 83 pct of Allegheny Beverage's total revenues of
1.13 billion dlrs for the year ended March 29, 1986, a
spokesman for Allegheny Beverage said.
    He declined to identify the Service America officials in
the acquisition group.
    On Feb 18, 1987, Allegheny said it was cancelling the spin
off of Service America, but gave no reason for doing so. It
said it would place major emphasis on managing Service America
to improve operations and increase earnings at the unit.
    Service America, which Allegheny acquired in May 1985,
operates cafeterias and food and beverage vending machines.
Through other subsidiaries, Allegheny provides coin-operated
laundry services, building maintenance services and retail
office and furniture operations.
    In fiscal 1986, Allegheny reported earnings from continuing
operations of 8.2 mln dlrs or 1.09 dlrs a fully diluted share,
excluding income of 59.7 mln dlrs from discontinued operations
and an extraordinary loss of 8.1 mln dlrs. In May 1985,
Allegheny sold its Pepsi-Cola Bottling Co unit to Pepsico Inc
&lt;PEP> for 160 mln dlrs.
    Including discontinued operations and the special item, net
income was 59.8 mln dlrs or 6.21 dlrs a share fully diluted.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6223>
A shareholder group led by New York
investor Theodore Cross said in a Securities and Exchange
Commission filing that it boosted its stake in Frost and
Sullivan Inc common stock to 208,800 shares or 13.7 pct of the
total outstanding.
    The group said Cross bought 17,000 shares in the open
market between Feb. 17 and March 10.
    The group had said previously that its Frost and Sullivan
share purchases were for investment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6225>
peru will sell about 40 state-owned firms
to trim a projected 740 mln dlrs loss this year among
government-owned companies.
    Some companies would be sold in their entirety and others
would be privatised only partially, according to jose palomino,
president of the government's state company holding firm, the
national development council (conade).
     He told reporters in a radio interview that the aim was to
slim a projected public sector firm deficit of 11 billion
intis. He did not say if foreigners would be allowed to buy all
or part of the companies.
    Independent economists warn that the deficit could push
inflation to between 60 and 100 pct in 1987, against the
govenment target of 40-50 pct.
    Palomino said aeroperu, the government flagship airline
with a 10-jet fleet, would issue stock for purchase by private
investors. The company in 1986 registered its first profit in
eight years, earning about 44.6 mln intis in pre-tax profits.
    Peru has about 140 non-financial state firms. Palomino said
the government would soon publish a list of those to be sold,
including those whose shares would be offered on the lima stock
exchange.
    Last november, palomino said conade's plans included the
possible sale of a company producing palm oil and another
manufacturing electrical appliances. Shares could also be sold
in a copper mine, empresa nacional tintaya sa, in the southern
state of  arequipa.
    Neither Palomino nor conade's general manager, enrique
estremadoyro, were available for comment on whether foreigners
would be allowed to purchase the companies. Their secretaries
said they were out of their offices.
    Jose antonio almenara, the general manager of the lima
stock exchange, where shares of the state-owned firms could be
sold, told reuters that the only foreigners who could purchase
stock at the exchange had to be tax-paying residents of peru.
    He said foreign stockholders cannot remit profits abroad
until at least july 1988.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6246>
Norstar Bancorp said it reached an
agreement in principle to buy United National Bank of Callicoon
through a stock exchange valued at 20 mln dlrs.
    Under terms of the agreement, Norstar would buy all 201,660
shares of United's common stock at a rate of three Norstar
shares for each United share.
    With year-end assets of 90 mln dlrs, United has branches
six upstate New York cities, all of which will become part of
Norstar Bank of the Hudson Valley, N.A.
    Norstar is an 11.1 billion dlr multibank financial services
company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6276>
Healthvest said it acquired the
Eastwood Hospital medical complex in Memphis from Healthcare
International Inc for 50 mln dlrs cash.
    Healthcare International will continue to operate the
hospital under a lease agreement, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6277>
Ventra Management Inc, an over the
counter company, said it acquired Joint Venture Leasing Inc for
60 mln Venture shares, valued at 3.6 mln dlrs.
    Joint Venture was organized in September 1986 to establish
leasing joint ventures with manufacturers and vendors of
computer equipment.
    As a result of the acquisition and Joint Venture's backlog,
Ventra said it expects 1987 sales to be 30 mln dlrs with net
profits of 1.5 mln dlrs.
    Ventra was organized in September 1986 and completed a
public offering of 30 mln shares in January 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6278>
&lt;Oxford Financial Inc> said it acquired
&lt;Clancy Systems International Inc> for an undisclosed sum.
    The company said Clancy has developed a fully automated
parking citation system, currently in use in Oklahoma City, the
University of California at Sacramento, and in a pilot program
in San Francisco.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6282>
W.R. Grace and Co said it completed
the sale of its Bermans The Leather Experts retail business to
a new company in a management led buyout.
    Grace received 99.3 mln dlrs cash and will record a pretax
gain of about 37 mln dlrs in the first quarter, the company
said. An additional pretax gain of 19 mln dlrs will be deferred
until realization is more fully assured, it said.
    The diversified chemical and industrial company said the
sale completes its program to divest retail operations.
    In addition to the cash payment, Grace received warrants to
buy up to 47.5 pct of the new company and has reinvested about
19 pct of the proceeds in debt of the new firm.
    Financing was provided by Prudential Insurance Co of
America and affiliates.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6315>
Lennar Corp said it completed the
previously announced acquisition of Development Corp of America
&lt;DCA>.
    Consequently, it said the American Stock Exchange suspended
trading of Development Corp's common stock, 10 pct subordinated
debentures due 1993 and 12 pct subordinated debentures due
1994.
    Lennar said the debentures will continue to be traded
over-the-counter.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6331>
&lt;Paperboard Industries Corp> said it
planned to make an unconditional 21 dlr a share cash offer for
&lt;Belkin Inc>'s 7.6 mln common and 2.3 mln non-voting shares.
    Paperboard said Balaclava Enterprises Ltd, owned by Morris
Belkin, agreed to tender 98.2 pct of Belkin's common shares.
It added that in case of a competing offer of more than 23
dlrs, it had the right to match it. If it did not match the
offer, Balaclava could accept the competing bid.
    The two companies manufacture linerboard and boxboard from
recycled fibre. Their combined revenues are about 500 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6337>
The Reagan administration will
consider curbing foreign takeovers of security-sensitive
industries such as semiconductors and computers, the New York
Times said, quoting an unnamed senior administration official.
    "I think there's a strong sentiment here that some
industries are not totally up for grabs," the paper quoted the
official as saying.
    "Two of the most visible (industries) are semiconductor and
computer companies," said the official, who the newspaper said
was a central figure in the opposition to Japan's Fujitsu Ltd
&lt;ITSU.T> takeover bid for &lt;Fairchild Semiconductor Corp>.
    The Fairchild-Fujitsu deal was abandoned on Monday, and
industry analysts said the move was a victory for the Reagan
administration in its drive to beat back Japanese competition
in the important computer chip manufacturing industry.
    Officials told Reuters last week that Commerce Secretary
Malcolm Baldrige and Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger fought
the planned sale of Fairchild by French-controlled Schlumberger
Ltd &lt;SLB> to Japan's largest computer maker because it could
have left the U.S. Military dependent on foreign sources for
vital technology.
    The New York Times quoted Baldrige as saying the time had
come to limit takeovers in security-sensitive areas.
    "Everybody wants an open investment policy, but there have
to be some exceptions for the national interest," Baldrige was
quoted as saying.
    The newspaper said Baldrige and Weinberger are expected to
bring the takeover issue before a top-level interagency
policymaking group, such as Treasury Secretary James Baker's
Economic Policy Council or the president's National Security
Council.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6340>
The Philippines' Social Security System
(SSS) is planning to buy eight mln shares in diversified brewer
&lt;San Miguel Corp> (SMC), SMC chief financial officer Ramon del
Rosario said.
    He told reporters the government organisation had expressed
interest in one seat on SMC's 15-man board and was preparing to
invest 800 mln pesos, assuming a purchase price of 100 pesos a
share.
    The shares involved in the proposal were part of the block
of 38 mln shares owned by the United Coconut Planters Bank
(UCPB) and sequestered by the government.
    The block is split between class A and class B stock.
    SMC also proposed to sell a further five mln shares to A.N.
Soriano Corp, the family company of San Miguel president Andres
Soriano, del Rosario said.
    The shares are worth some 500 mln pesos at recent prices.
    Del Rosario said the 14 mln B shares in the block which are
open to foreign ownership would probably be sold to
unidentified foreign purchasers.
    He said SMC and UCPB would meet later this week to try to
resolve disputes over the pricing of the shares.
    President Corazon Aquino earlier this month established an
arbitration panel to settle a row over the disposal of the
shares.
    Their initial sale to Soriano through SMC Hong Kong unit
Neptunia Corp was blocked by the Presidential Commission on
Good Government.
    The commission sequestered the stock on suspicion that the
real owner of the block was Eduardo Cojuanco, the former
chairman of San Miguel and the UCPB and a close associate of
deposed former president Ferdinand Marcos.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6346>
More U.S. And European firms will be
falling prey to Japanese corporations bulging with cash and
eager to extend their reach further overseas, according to
merger and acquisitions specialists polled by Reuters.
    Already, rich Japanese companies have pounced on U.S.
Banks, steel and other businesses.
    In the latest attempt, Fujitsu Ltd &lt;ITSU.T> -- Japan's
biggest computer maker -- unsuccessfully bid for &lt;Fairchild
Semiconductor Corp>, a U.S. Microchip maker which supplies
components for supercomputers.
    Nomura Securities Co Ltd &lt;NMSC.T> and Daiwa Securities Co
Ltd &lt;DSEC.T>, Japan's two largest brokerage firms, are seeking
a niche in the U.S. And European securities markets, while the
country's huge banks are looking for strongholds in overseas
banking, the takeover specialists said.
    Major trading houses, which see their profits evaporating
in the heat of increased competition in merchandise trade, all
have foreign businesses on their shopping lists.
    Among manufacturers, car parts makers are under the most
pressure to buy up overseas companies and follow the big auto
makers they subcontract for as these move offshore.
    "The timing is favourable for Japanese parties to buy up
potential overseas businesses, especially in the U.S. --
Japan's largest market and where political risks are minimal," a
takeover specialist at one trading company said.
    Japanese companies have become among the world's richest
after a series of boom export years and as the yen has climbed
against the dollar by some 40 pct in the past 18 months.
    But the yen's strength, which has also raised the costs of
Japan's exports and allowed its Asian neighbours to move into
its traditional markets, has frozen Japanese corporate growth,
the specialists said.
    Looming trade friction is also threatening to erect more
barriers against Japanese exports.
    Japanese firms see overseas acquisitions as a way to avoid
the gloomy growth outlook and put their excess cash to work.
Domestic interest rates, now at record lows, offer little
investment opportunity.
    "Japanese interest in acquisitions has been continuous, but
the recent economic factors have become a driving force," said a
banking industry source.
    So far, though, the Japanese are being cautious.
    While mergers and acquisitions among U.S. Firms number in
the thousands, Japanese buyouts of overseas companies have
totalled just a few dozen, one merchant banker said.
    Another merchant banker said that a flurry of Japanese
acquisition activity was originally expected five years from
now, but that time span appeared now to be too long.
    Japanese firms are becoming more aggressive now, he said.
    A turning point seemed to be Dainippon Ink and Chemicals
Inc's &lt;DIAC.T> takeover bid for &lt;Sun Chemical Corp> of the U.S.
Last year, which some analysts saw as somewhat hostile, he
added.
    Dainippon Ink bought Sun Chemical's graphic arts group for
550 mln dlrs late last year, after an earlier unsolicited bid
for the whole company. Sun Chemical refused to sell its entire
business after learning that Dainippon planned to liquidate all
but its graphic arts-related businesses.
    Hostile takeovers are considered unethical and frowned upon
by the Japanese, the trading company official says. "Japanese
people don't like fighting. They prefer peaceful amicable
deals." But now after some experience overseas, Japanese
companies are acquainted with local practice, he adds. "This is
a healthy progression."
    However, the experts do not expect the Japanese to run the
board meetings of any giant U.S. Or European concerns.
    "Japanese companies are not fully confident in managing a
large U.S. Or European corporation," one banker said. "They will
expand their operations only gradually, a typical way for
Japanese business."
    A foreign merchant banker also noted, "There are not many
mega-deals left to do in the United States. A lot of the big
deals there have already been done."
    But medium-size and small concerns are potential targets of
Japanese companies, the specialists said.
    Japanese will be aiming for new businesses in
high-technology areas. "Japanese companies had used technology
and quality to get where they are and are unlikely to deviate
from that trend," one takeover specialist said.
    Many are watching the results of the first acquisitions. If
these succeed, activity could build, the specialists said.
    But few such specialists are going to sit back and wait
until the action begins. Already, they said, Japanese trading
houses, long-term credit and commercial banks, brokerages and
foreign merchant banks have set up research sections to act as
go-betweens in deals or find good buys for themselves.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6361>
The Singapore government has taken
over 82 mln dlrs worth of Goodwood Park Hotel Ltd shares and
loan stock certificates belonging to the company's chairman,
Khoo Teck Puat, banking sources said.
    Khoo is a major shareholder of the &lt;National Bank of Brunei
Bhd> (NBB), which closed in November after the Brunei
authorities alleged 90 pct of its loans of 1.3 billion Brunei
dlrs had been extended to Khoo-related firms without
documentation or guarantee.
    The Goodwood securities are now held by the Commercial
Affairs Investigation Department, the banking sources said. The
department declined to comment.
    The government move is aimed at protecting Goodwood's
minority shareholders and securing Goodwood deposits at the
NBB, the banking sources said.
    Goodwood had a total of 87.3 mln dlrs in fixed deposits,
bank balances and accrued interest due from NBB as of last
November, according to Goodwood's annual report.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6368>
The state-owned Philippine National Bank
(PNB) will fund Toyota Motor Corp's &lt;TOYO.T> planned purchase
of its bankrupt former local partner's manufacturing facilities
for at least 193 mln pesos, a bank official told reporters.
    Toyota has informed the Philippine government it plans to
produce cars again here in joint venture with a local partner.
    It proposes to invest about 400 mln pesos in the
manufacture of car spare parts and other items, and generate
about 100 mln pesos in export earnings over five years.
    The banker said today a letter of intent was signed three
weeks ago but the sale requires approval from government
agencies charged with selling private sector assets taken over
by state-owned banks.
    Official sources said Toyota's application was likely to be
approved.
    Toyota severed ties with its Philippine partner of 20
years, &lt;Delta Motor Corp>, in 1984 because the local company
was suffering financial difficulties. PNB later foreclosed on
Delta's assets.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6373>
The sale of the government's 25.55 pct
stake in VEBA AG &lt;VEBG.F> is still expected this month, banking
sources closely linked with the transaction said.
    A spokesman for the Finance Ministry said no exact date had
yet been set for the privatisation, which the government has
tabled for the second half of March. However, he added a
scandal at Volkswagen AG &lt;VOWG.F>, VW, over currency losses "has
nothing to do" with the timing of the VEBA sale.
    Finance Minister Gerhard Stoltenberg has said the sale of
the Federal government's stake in VW, originally scheduled for
later this year, may be delayed because of the currency affair.
    A banker involved in the VEBA placement said "Nothing has
changed in the planning. I still presume that it will take
place in the second half of March."
    This banker said there would be no reason to postpone the
issue of the 10 mln VEBA shares for a few days. He added that
the consortium which is arranging the deal had completed its
preparatory work, although the price had not been decided.
    The VEBA share has been weaker ahead of the placement but
West German stocks have been generally bearish and news of the
VW scandal last week put further pressure on the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6382>
NV KLM Royal Dutch Airlines &lt;KLM.AS>
is "absolutely not" negotiating a takeover of U.S. Regional
carrier Air Atlanta, a KLM spokeswoman said in a comment on an
article in the leading Dutch evening paper NRC Handelsblad.
    "U.S. Law requires that at least 75 pct of shares in a U.S.
Airline be owned by American firms or persons," the spokeswoman
added.
    The newspaper said that Air Atlanta, which flies to 11 U.S.
Cities, has a fleet of five Boeing jets with passenger capacity
of 110 and employs 400 people, is making losses.
    She said KLM had started talks with Vendex International NV
&lt;VENN.AS> on their jointly owned courier service XP Express
Parcel Systems, but declined to confirm an NRC Handelsblad
report saying it wanted to buy the Vendex stake in XP.
    KLM said last week it is negotiating a minority stake in
British courier service &lt;IML Air Services Group Ltd>, a
subsidiary of British and Commonwealth Shipping Plc &lt;BCOM.L>,
to strengthen its position in the fast-growing worldwide
door-to-door delivery market.
    The KLM spokeswoman said she expected further announcements
about the talks with Vendex to be made early next week.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6402>
Dixons Group Plc &lt;DXNS.L> said its
tender offer for all of the common shares in &lt;Cyclops Corp> of
the U.S. Expired at midnight yesterday and that it had accepted
approximately 2.3 mln shares in the company at 90.25 dlrs each.
    This represents just over 54 pct of the outstanding shares
on a fully diluted basis. But including shares already owned,
Dixons now holds a total of 56 pct of the fully diluted
outstanding shares.
    The company said it is now entitled to subscribe for all
the authorised but unissued and unreserved shares of common
stock of Cyclops, which total some 5.4 mln shares, at 90.25
dlrs each.
    Dixons said it has waived its condition that 80 pct of the
fully diluted outstanding shares be validly tendered and not
withdrawn.
    Dixons launched the agreed 384 mln dlr offer on February 17
this year in the wake of its unsuccessful battle to take over
the U.K. Retail store chain Woolworth Holdings Plc &lt;WLUK.L>.
    Dixons shares were last quoted at 390p, up on last night's
close of 380p.
    On Friday, &lt;CYACQ Corp>, an investor group formed by
Audio/Video Affiliates Inc &lt;AVA> and Citicorp &lt;CCI>, said it
would increase the price it was offering for all Cyclops shares
to 92.50 dlrs from 80.00 dlrs each if Cyclops would provide it
with confidential information given to Dixons and if it were
satisfied that any rights Dixon might have to recover fees or
expenses from Dixons or to buy Cyclops stock would be rescinded
or proved invalid.
    Audio/Video's offer is scheduled to expire March 20.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6410>
&lt;General Partners>, controlled by
privately-held Wagner and Brown and by AFG Industries Inc, said
it has started a tender offer for all common shares of GenCorp
Inc and associated defensive preferred share purchase rights
for 100 dlrs a share.
    GenCorp stock closed yesterday in composite tape trading at
90.50 dlrs a share, up two dlrs on the day.
    In a newspaper advertisement, General Partners said the
offer and withdrawal rights expire April 14 unless extended.
    General Partners said the offer is conditioned on receipt
of sufficient financing to buy all shares on a fully diluted
basis and receipt of enough shares to give General Partners at
least 51 pct voting power, again fully diluted.
    It said the offer is also conditioned on GenCorp redeeming
the defensive rights or General Partners being satisfied that
the rights have been invalidated and General Partners obtaining
from the Federal Communications Commission a special temporary
authorization allowing completion of the acquisition of GenCorp
shares.
    General Partners said it would set up voting trust
arrangements pending review of its long-form application for
FCC approval of its acquisition of control of GenCorp's
broadcasting subsidiary.
    The partnership said the offer is further conditioned on
GenCorp management withdrawing its proposals to amend the
company's articles of incorporation and code of regulations to
provide for an increase in authorized common shares, a
classified board of directors and the elimination of cumulative
voting.  The latter two changes would make it harder for
minority shareholders to elect directors.
    General Partners said it is asking GenCorp for its
shareholder lists for help in disseminating the offer.
    GenCorp has about 22.3 mln shares outstanding, making the
value of the offer about 2.23 billion dlrs.
    Last fall, AFG and Wagner and Brown offered to acquire
&lt;Lear Siegler Inc> for about 1.44 billion dlrs but withdrew the
offer when higher bids emerged and due to complications of the
Tax Reform Act of 1986.  Lear Siegler eventually went private
for 1.66 billion dlrs.
    GenCorp is involved in tire and plasticmaking and aerospace
as well as broadcasting.  The company faces challenges to its
two television and 12 radio station licenses, partly becuase it
failed to inform the FCC about allegedly improper foreign
payments and political contributions.
    GenCorp has agreed to sell its New York-area television
station WOR to MCA Inc &lt;MCA> for 387 mln dlrs and its Los
Angeles station KHJ to Walt Disney Co &lt;DIS> for 217 mln dlrs.
An investor group challenging the Los Angeles license would
also receive 103 mln dlrs from Disney.
    For the year ended November 30, GenCorp earned 130 mln dlrs
on sales of 3.10 billion dlrs.
    A GenCorp spokesman said the offer came as a surprise and
the company was not yet in a position to comment on the bid.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6422>
Far West Financial Corp
said its Far West Savings and Loan Association unit has reached
an agreement in principle to acquire all the outstanding stock
of Progressive Savings and Loan Association &lt;PRSL>.
    Far West said it does not expect the cost of the
transaction to exceed 15 mln dlrs.
    Progressive Savings has ten branches in Southern California
and about 500 mln dlrs in assets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6428>
Cable and Wireless PLC &lt;CAWL.L> and the
Pacific Telesis group &lt;PAC.N> may take part in a proposed
merger of two rival firms seeking to enter Japan's
international telecommunications market, a senior industry
official said.
    Fumio Watanabe, head of a telecommunications committee with
the Federation of Economic Organisations (Keidanren), told a
news conference Japanese shareholders in the two consortiums
agreed that the U.S. And British companies will be invited to
participate in the new merged firm.
    The planned linkup will satisfy Tokyo's request that only
one private company should enter the market.
    The two consortiums, &lt;International Digital Communications
Planning Inc> (IDC) and &lt;International Telecom Japan> (ITJ),
were set up in 1986 to compete with monopoly &lt;Kokusai Denshin
Denwa Co> (KDD) after the market was deregulated in 1985.
    Watanabe said the Post and Telecommunications Ministry
wanted only one competitor for the time being because of the
size of the Japanese telcommunications market and that foreign
investors will only be allowed to hold a minority stake.
    He estimated the two foreign firms' share in the merged
consortium at less than three pct and added that even the
largest shareholders could own only some five pct .
    Cable and Wireless and Japanese trading house &lt;C. Itoh and
Co.> each have a 20 pct stake in the IDC consortium while
Pacific Telesis and Merrill Lynch and Co. Inc. &lt;MER.N> jointly
hold 13 pct .
    ITJ is headed by a rival group of trading houses. Several
firms including Toyota Motor Corp. &lt;TOYO.T>  belong to both.
    Watanabe said progress was being made towards a merger
agreement and added that Japanese industry agreed with the
government on having only one private consortium as two
companies might invest "excessive" amounts.
    He said talks with Cable &amp; Wireless will continue this
week.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6430>
Italy's &lt;Gruppo Ferruzzi> is in the
advanced stages of negotiations that could result in an
acquisition worth "some hundreds of billions of lire" in the
European agro-industrial sector, a company spokesman told
Reuters.
    The spokesman declined to identify the other party or
parties involved in talks, or whether a complete takeover was
under discussion, but said an Italian newspaper report that
Ferruzzi was studying the possibility of advancing an offer for
13 European cereal processing plants owned by the U.S. Group
CPC International Inc &lt;CPC.N> was incorrect.
    The spokesman said that possibility had been evaluated by
Ferruzzi but that the company's attention at the moment was
"decisively in another direction."
    The spokesman, responding to a report in the Italian
economic daily Il Sole-24 Ore that Ferruzzi was considering a
possible bid for the CPC plants, told Reuters his company hoped
to conclude the talks currently underway in a couple of months.
    The spokesman said that since the U.K. Government last
month blocked Ferruzzi's bid to acquire &lt;British Sugar Plc>,
the company had been looking at other investment opportunities.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6433>
InterCare Inc said it has
agreed to terminate the proposed acquisition of &lt;Universal
Care> because &lt;First Jersey Securities> has withdrawn as
underwriter for a proposed offering of InterCare securities.
    The company said the offering was to have raised 7,500,000
dlrs for working capital through the sale of equity and debt
and would have also financed the 1,897,000 dlr cash portion of
the Universal Care purchase price.  In addition, 1,700,000 dlrs
would have been used to repay debt.
    InterCare said to date it has incurred about 500,000 dlrs
in expenses in connection with the proposed offering.
    The company said to improve its working capital position,
it plans to reduce operating expenses by decreasing hours of
operation and its workforce and selling some assets.
    As of October 31, the copmpany said it had a working
capital deficit of 2,301,000 dlrs, on a pro forma basis to
include recently acquired U.S. Medical Enterprises Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6441>
Mobex Corp said 2,088,461 Grant
Industries Inc common shares, about 87 pct of the 2.4 mln
outstanding, have been tendered in response to Mobex's offer.
    The company said its offer of 7.75 dlrs a share for the
stock has been extended to 2000 EST March 23 from 2400 March 17.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6442>
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc
said it has told Harper and Row Publishers Inc representatives
that it intends to withdraw its proposal to acquire Harper and
Row for 50 dlrs per share in cash if the parties have not made
satisfactory progress in discussions by the close of business
on March 30.
    Harcourt Brace said, "We do not wish to put undue pressure
on Harper and Row, but we also, in fairness to our own
shareholders, cannot allow an offer of such magnitude to lie on
the table too long."
    Harcourt said three of its senior officers and its
investment bankers met yesterday with investment bankers for
Harper and Row to discuss the Harcourt Brace offer.
    Harcourt Brace said it will only pursue the acquisition if
a mutually-satisfactory merger agreement can be negotiated.
    Last week, a group formed by Theodore Cross offered to
acquire Harper and Row for 34 dlrs per share.  The group held
about six pct of Harper and Row.
    In addition, New World Pictures Ltd &lt;NWP>, holder of 4.5
pct of Harper and Row, had offered to discuss a merger with
Harper and Row.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6463>
(General Partners), a Texas general
partnership equally owned by affiliates of Wagner and Brown and
AFG Industries Inc &lt;AFG>, said it currently holds 2,180,608
common shares, or about 9.8 pct, of Gencorp Inc's &lt;GY>
outstanding common stock.
    General Partners said it began a 100 dlrs a share cash
tender offer for all of Gencorp, an Akron, Ohio-based concern,
that is worth nearly 2.3 billion dlrs.
    Gencorp, which has interests in tire- and plastic-making,
aerospace and broadcasting, has about 22.3 mln shares
outstanding.
    The General Partners offer is subject to receipt of
financing, a majority of Gencorp shares and other conditions.
    In a letter to Gencorp chairman and chief executive A.
William Reynolds describing the offer, General Partners said it
was willing to negotiate terms of the offer and was prepared to
meet as soon as possible.
    In a statement, General Partners said it has contributed
250 mln dlrs in equity financing and also has commitments for 
a one billion dlr credit line from Wells Fargo and Co &lt;WFC> and
a 1.25 billion loan from Shearson Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc,
a unit of American Express Co &lt;AXP>.
    A Gencorp spokesman said the company's management was
meeting but that its board was not scheduled to meet today. He
said he was not sure the company had formally received notice
of the offer but was aware of it through press accounts.
    He declined to say what Gencorp's next move might be or
whether it would issue a statement later today.
    In the letter, General Partners said it plans to maintain
Gencorp's corporate headquarters in Akron, and retain the
company's plastics and industrial products businesses and its
tires and related products segment.
    The letter did not mention Gencorp's RKO General
broadcasting subsidiary, which has been involved in disputes
over license renewals at several of its television stations.
Gencorp has agreed to sell two of its independent stations, WOR
in the New York area and KHJ in Los Angeles.
    General Partners officials were not immediately available.
    Gencorp shares were delayed at the opening on the New York
Stock Exchange because of an imbalance of orders, and the NYSE
said the shares were indicated to open at 103 to 115. The
shares closed up two yesterday at 90-1/2, a new 52-week high.
    The financing for the offer includes the 250 mln dlrs in
equity from General Partners, the 1.25 billion dlr loan from
Shearson Lehman Brothers, a senior subordinated bridge loan for
which a binding agreement can be delivered within 24 hours
after a request from the partnership, and the one billion dlr
credit line from Wells Fargo.
    Wells Fargo has agreed to lend up to 250 mln dlrs of the
line itself and form a syndicate of banks to provide the rest,
the partnership said.
    Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc will act as dealer manager in
the tender offer, it said.
    In the letter, the partnership said it was confident it
could obtain the financing and close the transaction promptly.
    Last fall AFG and privately held Wagner and Brown offered
to acquired (Lear Siegler Inc) for about 1.44 billion dlrs but
withdrew the offer when higher bids emerged. Lear Siegler
eventually went private for about 1.66 billion dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6473>
The Securities and Exchange
Commission (SEC) staff is seeking authority to take enforcement
action against Allegheny International Inc, the
Pittsburgh-based industrial and consumer products firm said.
    Allegheny made the disclosure in documents filed with the
SEC in connection with its recent agreement to be taken private
through a leveraged buyout led by First Boston Inc.
    "Following announcement of the merger agreement, the company
was informed by the Enforcement Division of the (SEC) that it
intends to seek authority from the commission to institute a
proceeding against the company," Allegheny said.
    "The company is cooperating in the commission's
investigation which is continuing and now includes the taking
of testimony of employes and others," Allegheny said.
    In the ongoing probe, Allegheny said, the staff has asked
for information about company executive compensation and
benefit plans, certain company-owned real estate, travel and
entertainment spending and the use of corporate aircraft.
    It also has asked for information on acquisitions and
divestitures, the company's accounting system "and other
internal controls," Allegheny said.
   The probe began in February 1986, Allegheny said.
    The SEC, as a matter of policy, routinely declines comment
on its enforcement actions.
    The SEC investigation began just months before Allegheny
became the target of a series of shareholder lawsuits claiming
that the company had violated the federal securities laws by
failing to disclose material matters in recent annual proxy
statements.
    The suits, later consolidated into a single class-action
complaint before a Pennsylvania federal court, allege
securities law violations involving numerous current and former
Allegheny officers and directors.
    Earlier this month, lawyers for the shareholders asked the
court to expand the charges to include an allegation that, in
the buyout, Allegheny had attempted to illegally freeze out its
public shareholders at an unfair price.
    Allegheny said it intends to vigorously defend itself
against all charges.
    The charges made in the shareholder suits are widely
believed to have led to last summer's resignation of Chairman
and Chief Executive Officer Robert Buckley.
    In the buyout, a group led by First Boston tendered March
13 for all outstanding Allegheny shares at 24.60 dlrs a share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6477>
&lt;Canamax Resources Inc> said it agreed
to acquire the 50 pct interest it does not already own in the
Krezmar gold property, near Wawa, Ontario, by paying nine mln
dlrs to &lt;Algoma Steel Corp Ltd> and granting Algoma a four pct
net smelter return royalty, which is payable after payback.
    The property's drill indicated reserves to a depth of 1,200
feet are estimated at over one mln tons averaging 0.25 ounces
of gold a ton, Canamax said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6488>
Anacomp Inc said it acquired
the common stock of DatagraphiX Inc from General Dynamics Corp
&lt;GD> for about 128 mln dlrs.
    It said the purchase will be financed with a combination of
a new bank credit agreement and through private placement of
senior subordinated notes and convertible preferred stock.
    DatagraphiX, which had 1986 sales of 240.7 mln dlrs,
manufactures a line of computer output to microfilm hardware
and supplie.
    Anacomp's sales for the year ended Sept 30, 1986 were 108.8
mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6497>
Gelco Corp said it signed a letter
of intent to sell its Canadian courier unit, Gelco Express Ltd,
to Air Canada for about 54 mln dlrs (U.S.).
    It said consummation of the transaction depends on
execution of a definitive agreement, which is expected in May.
    As part of its restructuring plan, Gelco had announced that
it would sell four business units. Gelco Express Ltd was one of
the companies scheduled for divestiture.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6498>
Synthetech Inc said it
discontinued negotiations on acquiring Southwest Photo chem Inc
of Pomona, Calif.
    The company cited "irreconcilable differences" in the
financial structure of the deal.
    It said Southwest Photo proposed a significant change in
terms outlined in the letter of intent signed last month.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6499>
Ranco Inc said shareholders at a
special meeting approved a merger into &lt;Siebe PLC> for 40 dlrs
per share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6502>
State-owned Air Canada said it will
make a statement at 1100 EST concerning a published report that
the airline has agreed to acquire Gelco Corp's Canadian unit,
Gelco Express Ltd, an Air Canada spokesman said.
    The spokesman declined to comment on the Toronto Globe and
Mail report when queried.
    The sale of Gelco Express, Canada's second largest courier
service, is part of the parent company's strategy to repay 350
mln U.S. dlrs of debt by the end of 1987, the report said,
quoting a Gelco spokesman. The report did not disclose a price
for the sale of Gelco's Canadian unit.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6511>
The Icelandic government said it will
privatise the state-owned bank Utvegsbanki, the country's
second largest. Parliament also granted an 800 mln crown cash
infusion to ease cash flow problems that arose when the bank
lost 600 mln crowns in a shipping firm bankruptcy two years
ago.
    Utvegsbanki director Halldor Gudbjarnarson told Reuters the
decision to privatise the bank was a relief and that foreign
banks had already expressed interest in taking a share.
    A quarter of the one billion crown total share capital will
be available to foreign investors, government officials said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6527>
Exovir Inc said it sold to an
investor group led by Mark Hammer 200,000 shares of company
common stock and warrants to purchase an additional 200,000
shares.
    Exovir said the transaction increases the group's stake
from 12.9 pct to 18.5 pct.
    The net proceeds to the company total 2.8 mln dlrs, the
company said. The warrants are exerciseable over the next three
years at 19.50 dlrs per share of common stock, according to
Exovir.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6537>
&lt;Peat Marwick>, an accounting and
management consulting firm, and &lt;Nolan, Norton and Co>, an
information and technology planning concern, said they have
merged.
    The companies said with the merger Nolan now will be known
as Nolan, Norton and Co-partners, the information technology
arm of Peat Marwick.
    Also as part of the merger, Nolan's 21 principals have
become Peat Marwick partners, the companies said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6538>
Trus Joist Corp said it agreed to
purchase Dashwood Industries Ltd, a Canadian wood window and
patio door manufacturer, for an undisclosed amount of cash.
    Trus Joist said it expects to close the transaction before
June 30.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6556>
ChemClear Inc said it terminated
merger talks with Environmental Systems Co &lt;ESC>.
    ChemClear said it was unable to reach agreement with
Environmental, which was considering buying ChemClear.
    ChemClear said it is considering other options, including
other business combinations and financing through commercial
lending and other financial institutions for internal
expansion.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6562>
Pearson Plc &lt;PSON.L> said &lt;Camco Inc>,
its 65.4 pct owned U.S. Oil and oil services subsidiary, signed
a letter of intent covering Camco's purchase from Baker
International Corp &lt;BKO.N> of substantially all the business of
&lt;Reed Tool Co>.
    Reed, a leading manufacturer of drilling bits, had sales
for 1986 of around 76 mln dlrs.
    The transaction is subject to negotiation of a definitive
agreement approved by the Baker and Camco boards and by the
U.S. Department of Justice, with which talks are already taking
place concerning the combination of Baker and Hughes Tool.
    Baker International has proposed a merger with Hughes Tool
which could create a 1.2 billion dlr oilfield services company.
    Pearson shares were down 4p to 567 after the announcement.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6604>
Air Canada, the state-owned airline,
said it signed a letter of intent to acquire 65 pct of EMS
Corp, a Calgary-based messenger service which operates in
Western Canada and the U.S..
    Gelco Corp (GEL) earlier said Air Canada agreed to buy its
Canadian Gelco Express Ltd unit for 54 mln U.S. dlrs.
    Air Canada said the acquisitions will complement its main
cargo business. It said it expects the courier market to grow
by about 25 to 30 pct a year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6616>
Financial Security Savings
and Loan Association said it has agreed to sell its Sunrise,
Fla., branch to Fortune Financial Group Inc &lt;FORF> of
Clearwater, Fla., for a "substantial profit," subject to
regulatory approval.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6630>
GenCorp Inc plans to use First Boston
Corp and Kidder, Peabody and Co as financial advisers on a
tender offer for the company by General Partners, a GenCorp
spokesman said.
    The spokesman, in response to questions from Reuters, said
the company does not yet have a comment on the 100 dlr per
share tender offer, launched by the partners today.
    First Boston and Kidder have been advisers to GenCorp in
the past, he said.
    General Partners is comprised of investors Wagner and Brown
and AFG Industries Inc, a glass manufacturer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6638>
&lt;Bevis Industries Inc> said it
retained Tucker Anthony and R.L. Day Inc to seek purchasers of
the company or its units.
    It issued no further details.
    The company, which makes stainless steel tubing for the
chemical, petrochemical, and oil industries, earned 1,045,000
dlrs or 51 cts a share in the nine months ending September 30,
1986. It had sales of 17.1 mln dlrs in the period.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6639>
A House subcommittee voted to give
President Reagan authority to block foreign takeovers of U.S.
companies similar to the takeover of Schlumberger Ltd's &lt;SLB>
Fairchild Semiconductor Corp by Fujitsu Ltd which was
withdrawn.
    The House Energy and Commerce Subcommittee on Commerce
approved as an amendment to the overall House trade bill a
provision giving Reagan the power to block sales to foreign
companies if the sale was not in the national or economic
interest.                
    The takeover provision was sent to the full Energy and
Commerce Committee for consideration as part of the overall
trade bill which is being written by several House committees.
    The subcommittee's bill would bar imports of digital audio
recording equipment that is not made with anti-copying chips.
This provision is designed to protect U.S. companies from the
unauthorized use of U.S. designs in foreign products.
    The bill calls for an investigation of whether U.S.
engineering and construction firms are given adequate
opportunity to bid on Japan's civil works procurement practices
including the construction of the Kansai airport.
    The Energy and Commerce subcommitte rejected a plan offered
by Rep. William Dannemeyer, a California Republican, to require
the U.S. to pay investors one pct for the right to hold their
gold investments in government storage.
    His amendment called for the government to sell gold coins
and gold-backed bonds with maturities of 30 to 50 years to
investors to reduce the federal debt.               
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6655>
First Union Corp said the
buyout of Commerce National Bank by its First Union National
Bank of Florida unit was approved by Commerce shareholders.
    According to the terms of the deal, First Union will pay
8.5 mln dlrs for the outstanding shares of Commerce National, a
bank with 43.2 mln dlrs in assets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6659>
Norstar Bancorp said that its
board and the board of Fleet Financial Group have approved a
definitive agreement to merge.
    A Norstar spokesman said that a press release containing
further details on the merger would be issued shortly.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6665>
The surprise 2.2 billion-dlr tender
offer for Ohio-based conglomerate GenCorp Inc will not be
enough to buy the company, analysts said.
    Analysts estimated the 100 dlr-per-share offer from General
Partners is 10 to 20 dlrs per share below the breakup value of
GenCorp. However, market sources and analysts said  uncertainty
surrounds any transaction because of the legal challenges to
Gencorp broadcasting licenses.
    Gencorp's stock rose 15-3/4 to 106-1/4 in heavy trading.
    "The expectation is either there will be someone else or
the bidder will sweeten the offer hoping to get management's
cooperation," said Larry Baker, an analyst with E.F. Hutton
group.
    Analysts said there is concern about challenges to
Gencorp's broadcast licenses for two television and 12 radio
stations. Some of the disputes, dating back about 20 years,
were brought by groups that alleged improper foreign payments
and political contributions.
    "I think it kind of muddies an already muddy situation,"
said Baker of the offer.
    Some arbitragers said they were concerned the ongoing issue
might be a stumbling block or result in a long period of time
for any transaction.
    A source close to General Partners, however, said General
Partners would apply to the Federal Communications Commission
for special temporary authority to hold the broadcast stations.
The source said if approved, the authority would allow a
transaction to be carried out.
    If it received the "short-form" approval, General Partners
would set up a trust which would hold the broadcasting
properties until the licensing situation is resolved.
    General Partners is equally owned by investors Wagner and
Brown and glass-maker AFG Industries Inc.
    Some market sources speculated an outside buyer, such as
General Partners, might even be be a catalyst to resolution of
the challenges since it would carry out GenCorp's plan to sell
the stations.
    GenCorp earlier this month reached an agreement with Walt
Disney Co to sell its Los Angeles television station, WHJ-TV.
Disney would pay 217 mln dlrs to GenCorp and 103 mln dlrs to a
group that challenged the station's license.
    GenCorp also has a pending agreement to sell WOR-TV in
Secaucus, N.J. to MCA Inc for 387 mln dlrs.
    General Partners said it intends to keep the company's
plastics and industrial products businesses and its tires and
related products segment.
    Charles Rose, an analyst with Oppenheimer and Co, said
that, on a breakup valuation, the company might be worth as
much as 125 dlrs per share. Rose estimated the aerospace
business could bring 30 to 40 dlrs per share or one billion
dlrs, as would DiversiTech, the plastics unit. Broadcasting,
including assets pending sale, might be 30 to 40 dlrs per
share, he said.
    The company, formerly known as General Tire
and Rubber Co, also has a tire business Rose estimated would be
worth five to 10 dlrs per share. He estimated the bottling
business might also be worth several dollars per share, he
said.
    Analysts said GenCorp chairman A. William Reynolds, who
became chairman last year, has been emphasizing the company's
Aerojet General and DiversiTech General businesses. GenCorp,
founded in 1915, became an unfocused conglomerate over the
years and analysts believe reynolds has helped it to improve.
    "The management's doing a very fine job in trying to deal
with the non-strategic assets of the company," Rose said.
    Analysts expect GenCorp to resist the tender offer, but
they declined to predict what steps the company might take.
They said it would be possible the company might consider a
leveraged buyout or restructuring to fend off the offer.
    General Partners holds 9.8 pct of GenCorp stock, and there
was some concern about "greenmail." Greenmail is the payment at
a premium for an unwanted shareholders' stock.
    "I would doubt they would greenmail them, but nothing
surprises me anymore," said Rose.
    GenCorp has not commented on the offer. It has retained
First Boston Corp and Kidder, Peabody and Co as advisers.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6682>
Butler Manufacturing Co said
it completed sale of its Livestock Systems division and part of
its Control division in separate transactions to two unrelated
parties.
    Butler's livestock systems division was sold to an investor
group including the president of the operations and certain
Control division assets were sold to Minneapolis-based Enercon
Data Corp.
    Terms of the transactions were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6689>
Fleet Financial Group said
that its board and the board of Norstar Bancorp have agreed to
merge the two bank holding companies in a transaction which
would create a 23 billion dlr asset bank holding company.
    Under terms of the transaction, each Norstar shareholder
will receive 1.2 shares of Fleet common stock based on the
number of Fleet shares after giving effect to a previously
announced April one Fleet stock split.
     The two-for-one stock split will increase Fleet's
currently 25.7 mln outstanding shares to 51.5 shares. There are
about 34.9 mln Norstar shares outstanding.
    Fleet said the deal is expected to be completed by July one
1988, the date on which the nationalization of Rhode Island's
interstate banking law takes effect.
    For the full year ended december 31, Fleet, a Rhode Island
based bank holding company, reported net income of 136.7 mln
dlrs and assets of 11.7 billion dlrs. Norstar, an Albany N.y.
holding company, reported net income of 104.8 mln dlrs and
assets of 11.1 billion dlrs.
     Fleet comptroller Irv Goss said it is estimated that the
transaction will result in minimal dilution in Fleet/Norstar
earnings per share. It is the intention of both companies that
cash quarterly dividends following the combination not decline
for either company's stock holders, the company said.
    For 1986, Norstar issued 1.31 dlrs annually in cash
dividends on its common stock. Fleet's current annual
distibution on a pre-split basis would be equivalent to 1.68
dlrs a share.
    In addition, Fleet and Norstar have each granted the other
an option to purchase such number of authorized buy unissued
shares of common stock, that will constitute 24.99 pct of the
fully diluted shares outstanding.
    The transaction is subject to both regulatory and
shareholder approval.
    The companies said that after the proposed merger, the
combined banking holding wil be among the 25 largest in the
country.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6694>
&lt;Trilogy Resource Corp> said
&lt;Teck Corp> agreed to purchase 4.5 mln Trilogy common shares at
one dlr per share in a private placement, which would increase
its stake in Trilogy to 37 pct from 29 pct.
    Trilogy also said its board approved a private placement of
3.5 mln common shares at a price of 90 cts per share to a group
of investors.
    The placement will be made through McNeil Mantha Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6695>
Rabbit Software Corp said it has
agreed in principle to acquire privately-held communications
hardware maker Micro Plus II Corp for about two mln common
shares, with closing expected by May.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6697>
Amour Inc said it has entered into
a letter of intent to acquire &lt;Bard International Associates
Inc> for 70 mln common shares in a transaction that would give
former Bard shareholders control of the combined company.
    Bard makes tennis and squash racquets and accessories.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6702>
American Travellers Corp said
it has entered into an agreement to purchase ISL Life Insurance
Co of Dallas, a corporate shell with active licenses to operate
in 12 states, for about 400,000 dlrs.
    The company said closing is expected by late spring and
will result in American Travellers being licensed in seven new
states.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6707>
American Express Co climbed 2-1/2 to
80-1/8 on rumors the company was about to announce an agreement
to sell 10 pct of its Shearson Lehman Brothers unit to Nippon
bLife Insurance of Japan, traders said.
    Speculation about an impending deal, rumored to be worth
600 mln dlrs, also sent shares of other U.S. brokerages up
sharply. PaineWebber Group Inc &lt;PWJ> gained 1-5/8 to 37-1/8 and
Merrill Lynch and Co Inc &lt;MER> rose 1-3/8 to 42-7/8.
    American Express officials declined comment but cited a
statement it released more than two weeks ago in which it said
it was studying matters of strategic importance.
    American Express officials also pointed out the earlier
statement, issued March one, said it is company policy not to
comment on rumors or speculation. The earlier announcement also
said American Express and Shearson were studying options
including expansion of capacity to meet international
competition and broadening access to capital.
    The latest rumors originated in Tokyo, traders said.
    If the rumors are true "it gives them a nice infusion of
capital for an attractive price," said Lawrence Eckenfelder,
analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6710>
Cross and Trecker Corp said its
Warner and Swasey subsidiary will seek to sell its Grinding
Division to focus on other areas of its business.
    The company said the Grinding Division had sales last year
of about 18 mln dlrs. It makes grinding machines.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6719>
Fairchild Semiconductor Corp
president Donald Brooks said he intends to take a management
buyout proposal to the company's parent at some point in the
future and substantial funding is available for such a
purchase.
    Fairchild is owned by Schlumberger Ltd &lt;SLB>.
    Brooks also told a press conference that if management is
successful, it may later attempt to take the company public.
    "I am sure that if such a management buyout is to occur,
and I am hopeful that it does, the public market is one of the
avenues we will ultimately have to use to raise capital,"
Brooks said.
    Brooks also said the company would continue to attempt an
exchange of technology and manufacturing agreement with Fujitsu
Ltd if successful in its buyout bid.
    Futjitsu withdrew an offer to acquire some 80 pct of
Fairchild, a semiconductor maker, after U.S. government
officials expressed opposition to the transaction.
    Brooks told the news conference that any purchase would be
in the form of a management buyout and not a leveraged buyout.
    He also said the transaction could be financed through a
debt issue or conventional financing from investors.
    Brooks said management is pleased by a number of investment
proposals bought to them, but he added, "the investors must be
willing to invest in the future growth of the company and not
just selling off assets."
    Brooks also said he was not aware of any direct
intervention by the U.S. in an attempt to block the merger.
    "I am not aware of any direct contact between Washington
and Fujitsu, but that doesn't mean it doesn't exist," Brooks
said.
    He also said Fujitsu executives remain enthusiastic about a
link with Fairchild.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6725>
Mitsui and Co Ltd said it has
signed a letter of intent with Security Pacific Corp to buy 50
pct of Japan Security Pacific Finance Co Ltd, for an
undisclosed sum, to form a joint venture.
    Japan Security Pacific has assets of 200 mln dlrs.
    The joint venture will introduce various financial products
to the customer base of Mitsui and its group of companies, the
company said.
    Security Pacific will provide expertise in consumer and
commercial lending, as well as data processing support.
    Japan Security Pacific Finance is a wholly-owned subsidiary
of Security Pacific International Finance Inc, which is owned
by Security Pacific Corp.
    Security Pacific said in addition to originating consumer
and commercial loans and leases, the joint venture will market
related financial products and services.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6731>
Puritan-Bennedtt Corp said
it has acquired a majority interest in Medicom Inc, which makes
a heart monitor for use in diagnosing heart disorders, for
undisclosed terms.
    The company said the device will be sold under the name
Companion Heart Monitor.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6767>
Union Corp said it agreed
in principle to sell its Union Flonetics Corp subsidiary to
Irvin Kaplan, a Houston investor.
    The unit makes valves and marine specialty equipment for 
the military. Kaplan is also controlling shareholder of &lt;Hunt
Valve Co Inc>.
    The amount of the cash transaction, expected to close in
April, was not disclosed.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6788>
A U.S. House subcommittee voted to
give President Reagan authority to block foreign takeovers of
U.S. companies similar to the takeover of Fairchild
Semiconductor Corp. by Fujitsu Ltd which was withdrawn.
    The Energy and Commerce Subcommittee on Commerce approved
as an amendment to the overall House trade bill a provision
giving Reagan the power to block sales to foreign companies if
the sale was not in the national or economic interest.
    The subcommittee rejected a proposal requiring the U.S. to
pay investors one pct for the right to hold their gold
investments in government storage. His amendment called for the
government to sell gold coins and gold-backed bonds with
maturities of 30 to 50 years to investors to reduce the federal
debt.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6789>
&lt;Siebe Plc> of the U.K. said it
completed the acquisition of Ranco Inc, following approval by
Ranco shareholders.
    According to the terms of the deal, Ranco holders will
receive 40 dlrs a share in cash. Ranco will be transferred to
one of Siebe's U.S. subsidiaries, Robertshaw Controls Co.
    Ranco produces automatic control devices and power controls
that regulate temperature, pressure, time sequencing, current,
fluid flow and humidity. Its Teccor unit makes a specialized
line of semiconductors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6807>
&lt;MONY Financial Services> said it
purchased United Administrators Inc in an effort to secure a
larger market share for its group insurance line.
    MONY said this acquisition, coupled with its purchase of
Kelly Associates in 1985, contributes to its goal of expanding
its group business and improving its product lines.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6810>
Fortune Financial Group Inc's
Fortune Savings Bank subsidiary said it executed a definitive
agreement to buy &lt;Marine Savings and Loan Association of
Florida> for 10.1 mln dlrs.
    It said the agreement has been approved by the directors of
both banks and is subject to approval of Marine shareholders by
a majority vote.
    Fortune said that under the agreement it will pay 20.10
dlrs cash for each of Marine's 500,000 shares outstanding,
among other things.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6811>
&lt;Hawker Siddeley Canada Inc> said that,
due to poor market conditions for railway freight car
manufacturing, it plans to sell its Trenton Works division in
Trenton, Nova Scotia.
    Hawker Siddeley said it set aside a provision of 7.7 mln
dlrs for the proposed sale.
    It also said lower 1986 earnings were due to much lower
earnings in transportation equipment and losses in steel
castings and forgings, which offset gains in the mining sector
and improvements in forestry equipment.
    Hawker Siddeley also said demand for new railway equipment
was limited with export sales frequently restrained by
customers' financing difficulties.
    Demand for steel castings and wheels for Canadian railways
continued to be very depressed with maintenance requirements at
the lowest level in the past decade.
    However, there was demand for industrial casting due to
increased hydro-electric power generation, the company said.
    The company said manufacturing of mining machinery and
tunnelling equipment showed greatly improved results in the
U.S. and export markets, mainly China and India.
    The Orenda division maintained a high level of activity in
aircraft engine repair and overhaul and in the manufacture of
engine components.
    Sawmill equipment and skidder operations were affected by a
strike in British Columbia and the extended debate on U.S.
imports of Canadian lumber, but there were encouraging signs at
yearend, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6815>
GAMCO Investors Inc, an affiliate of
Gabelli and Co, plans to propose an anti-greenmail provision at
the GenCorp Inc annual meeting March 31, according to GAMCO
Chairman Mario Gabelli.
    Greenmail often involves the repurchase of shares at a
premium by a company from an unwanted investor. GenCorp today
received a surprise tender offer from a group that holds 9.8
pct of its stock.
    Gabelli also said GAMCO has sent a 13-D filing to the
Securities and Exchange Commission on the 6.5 pct of GenCorp
stock held by GAMCO and its affiliates.
    The stock amounts to 1,462,000 shares and most of it was
reported in an earlier 13-G filing. A 13-G is filed by passive
investors to show holdings of more than five pct.
    Earlier today, General Partners, owned by Wagner and Brown
and AFG Industries Inc, launched a 100 dlr per share tender
offer for GenCorp. Analysts said the offer was between 10 and
20 dlrs per share too low.
    GenCorp has made no comment on the offer.
    Gabelli said he also proposes that management consider
spinning off all assets, other than the GenCorp broadcast
properties, to shareholders. The licenses of the broadcast
properties have long been entangled in a series of challenges.
    "One thing is going to be clear and that is I'm going to
the meeting and putting up "no greenmail," Gabelli said.
    Gabelli said he fears that greenmail might be a motivation
in the offer.
    The annual meeting is to be held in Akron, Ohio.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6817>
National Data Communications Inc said it
is no longer obligated to issue its majority shareholder
&lt;Signature Capital Corp> 20 mln common shares under a previous
agreement.
    National said it entered into a new agreement with
Signature, which would have owned about 80 pct of National's
common under the prior pact.
    Under the new pact, National said it granted Signature a
five-year option to acquire two mln shares of its common for an
option price equal to its current market value. National has
about 15.3 mln shares outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6818>
&lt;Pilgrim Venture Corp>
said it signed a letter of intent to merge with &lt;Marketing
Technologies Group Inc>, Rockville Center, N.Y.
    Under terms of the agreement, Pilgrim, a publicly held
corporation, said it will issue two mln shares of authorized
but unissued restricted common stock to Marketing Technologies
shareholders. The company said it expects to complete the
merger by June 17.
    Marketing Technologies is developing a computer-based
advertising system geared toward large advertisers, the company
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6819>
GenCorp Inc chairman William
Reynolds said the company's board and its financial and legal
advisors will study the unsolicited tender offer from &lt;General
Partners>.
    "Right now, our advice to all our shareholders is to wait
until the board advises them of its position ... which will
happen on or before March 31," Reynolds said.
    Earlier today, General Partners, controlled by Wagner and
Brown and AFG Industries Inc, said it started a tender offer
for all of Gencorp's shares and stock purchase rights for 100
dlrs a share.
    General Partners said the offer, which is due to expire
April 14, is conditioned on receipt of sufficient financing and
other conditions.
    "We are asking our shareholders to postpone any decision on
whether to accept or reject the offer until the board finishes
its evaluation," Reynolds said in a statement.
    "The Wagner and Brown-AFG offer does not expire until April
14, so shareholders have time to make their decision," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6841>
Canadian Pacific Ltd said it retained
Wood Gundy Inc to seek a buyer for Maple Leaf Mills Ltd of
Toronto.
    The company said Maple Leaf had 1986 sales of 819 mln dlrs
and an after tax profit of 16.3 mln dlrs. It is a diversified
agriproducts company which produces and sells industrial and
consumer flour, flour-based products and baked goods.
    It also operates a fully integrated poultry business and a
rendering businesses, markets livestock and poultry feed and
distributes grain through a network of country and terminal
elevators.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6844>
Air Canada's 54 mln U.S. dlr
acquisition of Gelco Corp's &lt;GEC> Canadian unit has
dramatically altered Canada's fast growing courier industry,
largely dominated by U.S. companies until this year, company
officials and analysts said.
    State-owned Air Canada takes over the country's second
largest overnight courier business just two months after
another Canadian company, &lt;Onex Capital Corp Ltd>, approved the
acquisition of number one ranked Purolator Courier Ltd from New
Jersey-based Purolator Courier Corp &lt;PCC>.
    But analysts said the two acquisitions were prompted by
financial restructuring undertaken by the U.S. parent companies
and likely don't represent an industry trend toward buying out
foreign owned courier operations.
    "It's a case of whether you can buy from the right people at
the right time," McLeod Young Weir Ltd transportation analyst
Tony Hine commented.
    The two acquisitions fit with a larger move by U.S.
companies embroiled in a take-over or restructuring to sell-off
their Canadian units to generate ready cash, said Nesbitt
Thomson Deacon Inc analyst Harold Wolkin.
    "There is a very good correlation between the U.S. parent
selling Canadian subsidiaries and the U.S. parent either being
under siege or taking someone else over," he said.
    Gelco Corp, of Minnesota, decided to sell Gelco Express Ltd
as part of its previously announced program to sell off four
operating units to buy back shares and pay down debt, Gelco
Express marketing vice president James O'Neil told Reuters.
    The sale is the first under Gelco's divestiture program,
and proceeds will be used to help pay down 350 mln U.S. dlrs of
debt by year-end, the company said.
    While company officials declined to disclose earnings and
revenue figures, O'Neil said Gelco Express holds a dominant
position in the industry, handling more than 50,000 packages a
day and generating revenues of more than 100 mln Canadian dlrs
a year.
    The earlier move by Purolator to sell its Canadian unit
formed an important part of a company restructuring program,
adopted after another Canadian Company, &lt;Unicorp Canada Corp>,
acquired a 12.6 pct stake in Purolator and said it would
consider acquiring the whole company.
    Last month, Purolator agreed to be acquired by a company
formed by E.F. Hutton LBO Inc and certain managers of
Purolator's U.S. courier business.
    For Air Canada, its acquisition of Gelco's Canadian courier
business represents an "excellent financial investment" in a
market it sees growing by 25 to 30 pct annually, spokesman
Esther Szynkarsky said.
    The airline also announced it acquired a 65 pct stake in
EMS Corp, of Calgary, an in-city messenger service.
    It did not disclose financial terms, but Szynkarsky said
the two acquisitions totalled about 90 mln Canadian dlrs, and
the two business have combined yearly revenues of 170 mln dlrs.
    She said the acquisition fit with Air Canada's strategy of
seeking attractive investments that compliment its main airline
business.
    Gelco will continue to operate with current management,
independently of Air Canada, although Air Canada already
operates its own air cargo business that includes a small
door-to-door courier operation.
    "They're well run, they're a good investment, they're doing
well in a growing market, and that's the way we want to keep
it," Szynkarsky said.
    Analyst Hine said the Gelco and Purolator Canadian units
will likely retain operating links with their U.S. delivery
network, generating traffic for the former parent companies
without them having to tie up capital in Canada.
    "The nature of the business is that incremental traffic is
incremental revenue," Hine said.
    "It's sort of a sausage maker business where you put in
place the sausage grinder, and the more sausage you can stuff
through, the more money you make," he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6849>
A shareholder group led by Far
Hills, N.J., investor Natalie Koether said it is reconsidering
its plan to seek control of Computer Memories Inc and now plans
to sell its entire stake in the company.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group, which includes Sun Equities Corp, said it sold a net
365,375 Computer Memories common shares between March 5 and 17
at prices ranging from 3-3/4 to four dlrs a share, lowering its
stake to 687,000 shares, or 6.2 pct of the total outstanding.
The group said it reconsidered its takeover plans after the
company announced it agreed to a stock swap.
    On March 12, the Chatsworth, Calif., computer disk drive
concern said it agreed in a letter of intent to exchange 80 pct
of its stock, all of which would be newly issued, for the
assets of privately held Hemdale Film Corp, with Hemdale as the
surviving entity.
    "In light of these disclosures, Sun found it necessary to
re-evaluate the feasibility of seeking control of the company
and has sold a portion of its shares and currently intends to
sell the balance thereof from time to time," the group said.
    The group, which disclosed plans on Dec 29 to seek control
of the company, reserved the right to change its mind again.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6853>
XTRA Corp said it agreed to acquire all
the stock of RentCo Trailer Corp, a wholly owned subsidiary of
Fruehauf Corp for about 70 mln dlrs.
    RentCo had revenues of about 70 mln dlrs.
    The transaction is expected to be completed in April and is
subject to regulatory approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6855>
Wickes Companies Inc said
it completed the sale of its Sequoia Supply division to a new
company created by the management of that division.
    Paul Hylbert, president of Sequoia, has been named
president and chief executive officer of the new company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6856>
LDBrinkman Corp Chairman L.D.
Brinkman and members of his family said they cut their stake in
Cenergy Corp to 3,647 shares, or 0.4 pct of the total
outstanding, from 912,147 shares, or 9.4 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the group said it sold 302,833 Cenergy common shares to Snyder
Oil Partners L.P. &lt;SOI> on March 14 for 2,725,500 dlrs and gave
Snyder another 605,667 shares, in exchange for 524,135 units of
limited partnership interests in Snyder.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6869>
The British Conservative government said
it would sell off its remaining 31.7 pct shareholding in
British Petroleum Co Plc &lt;BP.L> during the next financial year
which starts on April 1.
    Treasury Financial Secretary Norman Lamont made the
announcement to Parliament. He said, "The government's policy is
to sell its minority holdings in companies as and when
circumstances permit.
    "As part of this policy I am now able to announce that,
subject to market conditions, the government will sell its
remaining shares in BP during the 1987/88 financial year."
    The last sale of British government shares in BP was in
September 1983. The government currently holds some 578.5 mln
ordinary shares in the company.
    Lamont said the Treasury would appoint financial advisers
for the sale. Merchant banks and stockbrokers interested in
being considered for this would be interviewed in early April.
    In September 1983, the U.K. Government sold 150 mln shares
in an underwritten offer for sale by tender. The striking price
then was 435 pence - 7.5 pct above the minimum tender price, a
Treasury spokesman said.
    He said the sale of BP shares would not cut across the
government's plans to privatise Rolls-Royce, in either April or
May, or the sale of BAA Plc, the British airports authority
which is slated for privatisation in either June or July.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6873>
Snyder Oil Partners LP said
it acquired 1.2 mln shares, or 12 pct, of Cenergy Corp.
    It said it is continuing to review its investment  and has
made no determination of its future course of action.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6874>
Progressive Savings and Loan
Association &lt;PRSL> said it has agreed in principle to be
purchased by Far West Financial Corp's Far West Savings and
Loan Association.
    The acquisition would be a cash merger, with Progressive
shareholders receiving up to three dlrs per share, the company
said.
    Progressive Savings has assets of about 500 mln dlrs and
operates ten offices in Los Angeles and Orange counties.
    The agreement is subject to federal and shareholder
approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6884>
Canadian Pacific Ltd said it retained
Wood Gundy Inc to seek a buyer for Maple Leaf Mills Ltd of
Toronto.
    The company said Maple Leaf had 1986 sales of 819 mln
Canadian dlrs and an after tax profit of 16.3 mln Canadian
dlrs. It is a diversified agriproducts company which produces
and sells industrial and consumer flour, flour-based products
and baked goods.
    It also operates a fully integrated poultry business and a
rendering business, markets livestock and poultry feed and
distributes grain through a network of country and terminal
elevators.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6886>
Greyhound corp said it completed
the sale of its Greyhound Lines unit to Dallas-based GLI
Holdings Inc for 350 mln dlrs in cash, securities, royalties
and other considerations.
    Greyhound said GLI is authorized to continue using the
familiar running dog logo on a red, white and blue shield,
while Greyhound Corp will continue to use the running dog alone
as its symbol.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6887>
InterCare Inc said it 
terminated plans to acquire Universal Care, a California health
mainenance organization, following First Jersey Securities'
decision to withdraw as underwriter for InterCare's proposed
public debt and equity securities offering.
    The acquisition was contingent on its ability to obtain
financing to fund the 1.9 mln dlr cash portion of the purchase
price, InterCare said.
    It also said the offering was aimed at raising 7.5 mln dlrs
for working capital and 1.7 mln to repay debt incurred in
connection with its recent acquisition of U.S. Medical
Enterprises Inc.
    The company further stated that it has a 1.7 mln dlr
working capital deficit and it will therefore reduce operating
expenses by decreasing operating hours, workforce reductions
and the sale of certain assets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6888>
Providence Energy Corp said it
completed the purchase of North Attleboro Gas co.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    North Attleboro serves 2,273 residential customers, 288
commercial customers, and 40 industrial customers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6908>
Champion Parts Rebuilders Inc
said Echlin Inc has bought a 20 pct stake in it by acquiring
600,000 newly issued shares and warrants to buy another 300,000
shares at 9.20 dlrs each, for a total investment of 5,400,000
dlrs.
    The newly issued shares raises Champion's outstanding
shares to 3,113,074.
    There are no voting restrictions on the new shares.
Champion's board will be expanded to include two or three
independent persons suggested by Echlin, it said.
    Champion will use the proceeds to pay down long-term debt,
it said.
    Echlin has agreed to limits on buying additional Champion
shares and its ability to seek control of Champion during the
next seven years, Champion said.
    Echlin will also receive protection against the decline in
price of Champion's stock for seven years. Echlin could receive
a one-time payment, at its option in cash or stock, ranging
from up to one dlrs a share in 1989 to four dlrs a share in
1992 to 1994, to the extent the market price of Champion shares
is less than nine dlrs a share at those times.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6914>
Fleet Financial Group hopes its
proposed merger with Norstar Bancorp &lt;NOR>, ranked as the
largest U.S. banking merger, can be completed by the beginning
of 1988, according to an executive of Fleet.
    Robert Lougee, director of corporate communications for
Rhode Island-based Fleet, told Reuters the company is exploring
the possiblity of seeking a change in the national trigger date
for the state's reciprocal bank law to Jan 1, 1988 from July
one. The decision is up to the Rhode Island legislature.
    The merger plan was announced in a midday news release that
said the deal, worth about 1.3 billion dlrs, would be
consummated July one when Rhode Island barriers to interstate
banking outside of New England come down. "If we can consummate
the deal earlier that would be better for all concerned,"
Lougee said. He said to the best of his knowledge a change in
the Rhode Island law would not be a hardship for any other
banking institution in the state.
    He said Fleet is optimstic Connecticut law, which only
permits interstate banking mergers within New England, can be
amended. Fleet owns First Connecticut Bancorp.
    If the Connecticut law is not amended in time, Lougee said,
an option would be to spin off that unit with repurchase
provisions.
    The New England reciprocal banking laws have excluded New
York as a means of protecting regional banks from being gobbled
up by the money center giants.
    Wall Street analysts said the merger accord between Fleet
and Albany, N.Y.-based Norstar demonstrates the rapid pace of
interstate banking mergers since state legislatures begain
permitting regional mergers on a reciprocal basis. The U.S.
Supreme Court decided in mid-1985 to permit the mergers.
    Fleet and Norstar in a joint statement billed the proposed
merger as "a partnership of two companies." Both will continue
to operate existing headquarters after the merger.
    Norstar holders will receive 1.2 Fleet shares for each one
of theirs following Fleet's previously announced two-for-one
split. Fleet shares closed today at 59-1/2, up 1/8, giving the
deal an indicated value of 1.3 billion dlrs.
    That topped the proposed merger of Los Angeles-based
Security Pacific Corp &lt;SPC> and Seattle's Rainier Bancorpartion
&lt;RBAN>. The West Coast deal, announced about four weeks ago, is
worth an estimated 1.2 billion dlrs.
    Chemical New York Corp's &lt;CHL> acquisition of Texas
Commerce Bancshares last year was valued at about 1.2 billion
dlrs, making it similar in size to the Security Pacific-Rainer
deal. The California combination of Wells Fargo and Co &lt;WFC>
and Crocker National Corp last year was worth 1.1 billion dlrs
and there have been several bank mergers in the southeast
valued in the 700-800 mln dlr range.
    "It's a merger of equals," said analyst John Rooney of
Moseley Securities Corp. He said Norstar had a book value at
the end of 1986 of 19.63 dlrs per share, while Fleet's book
value was 28.02 dlrs.
    Rooney noted that Norstar chairman Peter Kiernan is in his
60's while Fleet's Terrence Murray is in his late 40's. He said
Kiernan would probably head the combined company until his
retirement then Murray could assume the top post.
    Analyst Thaddeus Paluszek of Merrill Lynch and Co said
Fleet's earnings would have been diluted about two pct in 1986
on the basis of the merger terms announced today.
    He noted that Fleet has a "teriffic reputation" after
having diversified in a number of financial areas. Fleet has
established consumer banks in the southeast and is known as an
innovator in securitization of mortgages.
    The merged banks would have assets in excess of 25 billion
dlrs and be one of the 25 largest banks in the U.S.  Norstar
operates in most of New York state but not in New York City.
    Lougee said at some point in the future banking operations
that both Norstar and Fleet operate in the state of Maine would
be combined.
    The agreement between Norstar and Fleet includes a
"lock-up" option designed to deter other acquirers. Each
granted the other an option to purchase authorized but unissued
shares amounting to 24.99 pct of the fully diluted shares
outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6928>
&lt;General Partners>, controlled by
privately-held Wagner and Brown and by AFG Industries Inc, said
plans to sell GenCorp Inc's aerospace and soft drink bottling
divisions if it succeeds in acquiring the company.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
General Partners said proceeds from the sale of GenCorp's
aerospace division would help it repay some of the debt it
would incur in the 100 dlr a share cash tender offer.
    General Partners, which launched the surprise tender offer
today, said it already 2,180,608 shares of GenCorp, or 9.4 pct
of the total outstanding common stock.
    General Partners, which estimated the total cost of the
takeover at 2.5 billion dlrs, also said it plans to continue
GenCorp's policy of trying to settle Federal Communications
Commission charges against two of its television and 12 radio
station licenses.
    It said it would also continue GenCorp's policy of trying
to sell its New York-area television station WOR to MCA Inc
&lt;MCA> for 387 mln dlrs and its Los Angeles station KHJ to Walt
Disney Co &lt;DIS> for 217 mln dlrs.
    But General Partners said it plans to keep GenCorp's
headquarter in Akron, Ohio.
    General Partners also said it would maintain GenCorp's
plastics and industrial products division as well as tires and
related products.
    But it left open that it might make other changes in
GenCorp's operations after it completes the merger.
    Besides using 250 mln dlrs of its own equity for the tender
offer, General Partners said it would seek one billion dlrs
under a secured margin facility from Wells Fargo Bank N.A.
and other banks. It also said it would seek 1.25 billion dlrs
from the sale to Shearson Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc or its
affiliates of senior subordinated promissory notes.
    In a March 18 letter to GenCorp Chairman William Reynolds,
which was included in the SEC filing, General Partners
officials said they were "confident of our ability to promptly
obtain the remaining funding as described in our offer
materials."
    "For this reason, we do not forsee any obstacles to a
prompt consummation of the transaction," General Partners said.
    Shearson is dealer manager of the General Partners offer
for GenCorp.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6929>
Mondanto Co said it has paid off
two-thirds of the debt from its 2.8 billion-dlr acquisition of
G.D. Searle and Co by the end of 1986.
    This lowered the company's debt-to-capitalization ratio
from 45 pct at the end of 1985 to 35 pct, it said.
    The company also said that chemical sales accounted for 52
pct of its sales in 1986, down from 70 pct in 1981. This
underscores its strategy of shifting away from low profit
commodity chemicals in mature markets into higher value
chemical businesses in high growth areas, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6930>
Lifestyle Restaurants Inc said it
reduced the number of Bombay Palace Restaurants inc common
shares to be received in its previously announced merger
agreement.
    Under the amended deal, Lifestyle shareholders will get one
Bombay share for each six instead of five Lifestyle shares.
Under the amended offer, Bombay will issue about 900,000
shares, currently 7.2 mln dlrs.
    The amendment also increases the cash consideration to be
offered on Lifestyle's 13 pct convertible subordinated
debentures from 55 pct of the principal amount to 57.5 pct.
        
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6944>
&lt;Nippon Life Insurance Co> is pursing a
possible link with an American securities house to expand its
overseas investment portfolio, a company spokesman said.
    But he declined to comment on rumours the company would
take a 10 pct stake in &lt;Shearson Lehman Brothers>, an
investment banking unit of American Express Co &lt;AXP>.
    He said the firm started to sound out several U.S.
Investment banks on capital participation about 18 months ago
and was narrowing the number of prospects, but he did not say
if it had set its sights on one firm.
    Nippon Life, Japan's largest life insurer, also plans to
set up a wholly owned investment unit, &lt;Nissei International
America>, in New York next month and subsidiaries in Canada,
Singapore, the Cayman Islands and Jersey this year, he said.
    These moves are in line with its long-term strategy to put
more emphasis on overseas investment management as
opportunities at home are declining while the company's assets
are growing.
    The company is especially attracted by the scale and depth
of U.S. Money and credit markets and wants to establish a firm
foothold there, the spokesman added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6953>
A Mitsui and Co &lt;MITS.T> spokesman said
its subsidiary &lt;Mitsui and Co USA Inc> bought two mln dlrs of
newly-issued shares in &lt;Imatron Inc>, an unlisted
California-based medical equipment manufacturer.
    Mitsui and Co USA is now Imatron's fifth-largest
shareholder with 3.1 pct of the firm's outstanding shares.
Imatron is capitalised at 32.76 mln dlrs, the spokesman said.
    Mitsui and Co intends to import Imatron's computerised
diagnostic equipment into Japan, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6961>
Sanwa Bank Ltd &lt;ANWA.T> has agreed to buy
a two pct stake in Oporto-based &lt;Banco Portugues de Investmento
Sarl> (BPI), Portugal's largest merchant bank, a Sanwa official
said.
    Sanwa will purchase the shares from International Finance
Corp, a BPI shareholder and sister organisation of the World
Bank, for 351 mln yen, he said.
    The acquisition will be completed this month as both the
Japanese and Portuguse governments are expected to give
permission soon.  This is the first time a Japanese bank has
bought a stake in a Portuguese bank.
    Sanwa plans to increase its stake in BPI to four pct, the
ceiling for foreign shareholders, the official said.
    The bank has also agreed with &lt;Banco Portugues do
Atlantico>, a state-owned merchant bank in Oporto, to exchange
information on customers and help accelerate Japanese
investment and technological transfers to Portugal, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7024>
&lt;Nippon Life Insurance Co> is pursing a
possible link with an American securities house to expand its
overseas investment portfolio, a company spokesman said.
    But he declined to comment on rumours the company would
take a 10 pct stake in &lt;Shearson Lehman Brothers>, an
investment banking unit of American Express Co &lt;AXP>.
    He said the firm started to sound out several U.S.
Investment banks on capital participation about 18 months ago
and was narrowing the number of prospects, but he did not say
if it had set its sights on one firm.
    Nippon Life, Japan's largest life insurer, also plans to
set up a wholly owned investment unit, &lt;Nissei International
America>, in New York next month and subsidiaries in Canada,
Singapore, the Cayman Islands and Jersey this year, he said.
    These moves are in line with its long-term strategy to put
more emphasis on overseas investment management as
opportunities at home are declining while the company's assets
are growing.
    The company is especially attracted by the scale and depth
of U.S. Money and credit markets and wants to establish a firm
foothold there, the spokesman added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7030>
Sanwa Bank Ltd &lt;ANWA.T> has agreed to buy
a two pct stake in Oporto-based &lt;Banco Portugues de Investmento
Sarl> (BPI), Portugal's largest merchant bank, a Sanwa official
said.
    Sanwa will purchase the shares from International Finance
Corp, a BPI shareholder and sister organisation of the World
Bank, for 351 mln yen, he said.
    The acquisition will be completed this month as both the
Japanese and Portuguse governments are expected to give
permission soon.  This is the first time a Japanese bank has
bought a stake in a Portuguese bank.
    Sanwa plans to increase its stake in BPI to four pct, the
ceiling for foreign shareholders, the official said.
    The bank has also agreed with &lt;Banco Portugues do
Atlantico>, a state-owned merchant bank in Oporto, to exchange
information on customers and help accelerate Japanese
investment and technological transfers to Portugal, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7041>
American Express Co said it and its
Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc subsidiary have been holding talks
on the possible equity investment in Shearson Lehman by &lt;Nippon
Life Insurance Co> of Japan.
    The company said, "The discussions have led to a general
understanding by which Nippon Life would purchase a 13 pct
equity investment in Shearson Lehman for approximately 530 mln
dlrs and American Express, Shearson Lehman and Nippon Life
would explore mutually advantageous, nonexclusive business and
investment opportunities."
    The company said a definitive agreement on the matter is
subject to a number of conditions, including approval of the
American Express board and the Japanese Ministry of Finance.
    The company said its board is scheduled to meet March 27
for its regular monthly sessions.
    American Express said it is continuing to evaluate various
courses of action of strategic importance to Shearson Lehman in
addition to the possible investment by Nippon Life.
    It said the options range from expanding Shearson's
capacity to meet international competition, to broadening
further its access to capital.
    The company also said, "All the courses of action under
study reflect the continuing integral role of Shearson Lehman
in American Express' worldwide financial services strategy."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7045>
Fi-Tek Corp said it has signed a letter
of intent to acquire &lt;Voice Systems and Services Inc> for an
undisclosed amount of stock.
    It said on completion of the acquisition it would change
its name to Voice Systems and Services Inc.  It said VBoice
Systems has received a 3,600,000 dlr contract to provide FLP
Communications of Dallas with voicemail systems through service
bureaus located throughout the U.S. and has also contracted to
provide voicemail systems and administration to M and S
Communications.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7046>
First Wisconsin Corp said it has
agreed to acquire North Shore Bancorp Inc of Northbrook, Ill.,
for 6,160,000 dlrs in cash, or slightly more than twice book
value, subject to approval by North Shore shareholders and
regulatory authorities.
    The company said completion is expected in the third
quarter.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7065>
National Capital Real Estate
Trust said it has entered into a definitive agreement to sell
its Irvine Commercial Center in Irvine, Calif., to Shuwa Corp
of California for 10.85 mln dlrs.
    It said the buyer has pl;aced 250,000 dlrs into an escrow
account as a nonrefundable deposit.
    The trust said existing debt secured by the property of
about 6,700,000 dlrs in due on completion of the transaction,
which is expected in early April.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7068>
Waste Management Inc said it
sent a letter to the ChemLawn Corp board, saying it is prepared
to increase its bid for ChemLawn to 33 dlrs a share,
from 27 dlrs, if ChemLawn promptly negotiates and executes a
simple two-step merger agreement containing only essential
covenants and conditions.
    Upon such an agreement, Waste Management said, it would
amend its 27 dlrs a share cash tender offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7090>
&lt;Metro Funding Corp> said its
shareholders approved its merger into &lt;Maxcom Corp> and its
change of incorporation from Nevada to Delaware.
    Metro Funding also said its subsidiary, Comet Corp, will be
renamed Maxcom USA.
    The company also reported shareholders approved the
authorization of 500,000 shares of common stock to be set aside
for an incentive stock option plan.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7093>
Telecom Plus International Inc
said the closing of the sale of its 65 pct interest in Tel Plus
Communications Inc to &lt;Siemens AG> has been delayed.
    The company said it will be continuing its talks with
Siemens and based on current circumstances believes the
transaction could close next week.
    Closing had been scheduled for March 16.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7109>
MEDIQ Inc said its MEDIQ
Diagnostic Imaging Partners - I LP has signed a letter of
intent to acquire substantially all the assets of American
Medical International Inc's AMI Diagnostic Services Inc
subsidiary for undisclosed terms.
    The company said AMI Diagnostic operates seven magnetic
resonance and mutli-modality diagnostic imaging centers. MEDIQ
Diagnostic is a limited partnership of which MEDIQ is general
partner.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7110>
Cyclops Corp said its board has
been restructured under the terms of the company's merger
agreement with &lt;Dixons Group plc> following the British
company's acquisition of 54 pct of Cyclops' stock.
    The company said its board is now composed of three Cyclops
executives -- Chairman W.H. Knoell, President James F. Will and
Senior Vice President WIlliam D. Dickey -- and three Dixons
executives -- Vice-Chairman and Financial Director Egon von
Greyerz, Corporate Finance Director Gerald M.N. Corbett, and
Secretary Jeoffrey Budd.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7111>
Blockbuster Entertainment Corp said it
will sell its investment in Amtech Corp to the company
chairman, David Cook, and president, Kenneth Anderson.
    The company said the sale is taking place because Amtech is
not compatible with Blockbuster's main line of business, will
require substaintial additional funding to develop and market
its product, and is expected to sustain operating losses for
the forseeable future.
    The company said Cook and Anderson will form a new company
with the sale called Amtech Holdings Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7130>
Scan-Graphics Inc said it will be
acquired by Captive Venture Capital Inc, a public company,
in a stock transaction approved by shareholders of both
companies.
    As a result of the merger, the former shareholders of
Scan-Graphics will become the majority shareholders of Captive
Venture Capital. The name of the corporation will be changed to
Scan-Graphics Inc and its borad of directors will be composed
of individuals now on the Scan-Graphics board.
    Under the terms of the deal, Capitive Venture Capital will
issue 1.6 mln shares of restricted convertible preferred stock,
convertible into 16 mln shares of common stock, in exchange for
all outstanding stock of Scan-Graphics.
    Upon completing the deal, there will be 2,649,500 common
shares of Capitive Venture Capital issued and outstanding, of
which 149,500 shares will be held by the public.
    In addition, there are 95,050 tradeable class A warrants
and 100,000 B warrants, each of which entitles the holder to
buy 10 shares of common stock at 1.25 dlrs and 1.50 dlrs,
respectively, a share.
    Scan-Graphics makes systems that allow users to convert
graphic documents, such as charts, maps and engineering
drawings, into computer data that can be displayed, edited and
stored by computer.
    Currently, Captive Venture Capital stock is traded over the
counter and will soon trade under the Scan-Graphics name.
Application for Nasdaq listing is expected as soon as
requirements are met.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7136>
Xerox Corp's U.K. unit, Rank Xerox
Ltd, said it agreed in principle to sell its South African
company, Rank Xerox South Africa Pty Ltd, to &lt;Altron Group's>
Fintech unit.
    Terms of the deal were not disclosed.
    Altron said the acquisition was key to making Fintech an
office systems company.
    The South African Rank Xerox unit sells copiers and
duplicators throughout South Africa and in Namibia (South West
Africa). It has over 800 employees, all of whom will be
retained by Fintech when the deal closes, Rank Xerox said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7149>
Amcast Industrial Corp said it
completed the sale of its Newman Division to Newman
Manufacturing Inc, a new company formed by Newman's employees.
    The sale price was not disclosed.
    Amcast said Newman's Kendallville, Indiana plant is one of
the country's largest producers of gray iron castings for the
automotive and commercial air conditioning and refrigeration
industries. It said the plant employs 300 people.
    Amcast said it decided to sell the division to move out of
the gray iron castings business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7168>
Aluminum Co of America said it has
signed a letter of intent to sell its American Powdered Metals
Co subsidiary to R.W. Technology Inc for undisclosed terms,
with completion expected in early May.
    American Powdered makes metal parts for various industries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7199>
Richardson Electronics Ltd said it
agreed to buy for undisclosed terms, G.E.B., Giant Electronics
Brand, a Florence, Italy-based distributor of electron tubes
and semiconductors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7218>
Financial Performance Corp said it
continued its rapid expansion with a signing of a partnership
agreement with Gold Sierra Financial Advisors, founded by
former Bank of America officers in capital markets.
    It said the agreement, under which it owns 50 pct of the
partnership, enables it to move into the mergers and
acquisitions business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7220>
AmSouth Corp said the Federal
Reserve Board approved the affiliation of First Tuskaloosa Corp
with Amsouth.
    The approval was the final regulatory step in the
affiliation process which began in August, Amsouth said.
    Under terms of the affiliation, each First Tuskaloosa
shareholder will receive 66 dlrs value of AmSouth stock for
each share held. The total consideration is valued at 105.6 mln
dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7225>
Independence Bancorp Inc said
it completed its merger with Scranton, Penn.-based &lt;Third
National Bank and Trust Co>, with assets of 316 mln dlrs.
    Independence said its combined assets are now 2.5 billion
dlrs.
    The company said that each share of Third National common
will be exchanged for 4.06 shares of its common. Independence
said the merger will be accounted for as a pooling of
interests.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7234>
Carroon and Black Corp said it
completed the acquisition of &lt;Poggi-Harrison Agency Inc> and
&lt;Risk Control Inc>.
    Terms of the acquisitions were not disclosed.
    Separately, Carroon said it also completed the acquisition
of &lt;Rosskopf, Rapp and Schmidt Insurance Agency>, based in El
Monte, Calif.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7240>
&lt;Benetton SpA> of Italy expects to
further diversify into financial services and is weighing 
possible acquisitions, a Benetton spokeswoman here said.
    "We are thinking of diversification outside of the retail
line," the spokeswoman said. "We are looking at financial
services and other manfacturing companies."
    However, she said the company was not targeting the U.S.
for its planned expansion, but was looking at a number of
different countries.
    The company's shares are traded in the U.S. as American
Depository Receipts, which were issued through an offering by
Morgan Stanley Group Inc &lt;MS> earlier this month.
    Benetton is now holding talks with Wall Street firms about
the possibility of receiving a quotation of its shares on the
New York Stock Exchange. "There's absolutely no timetable. It
may not even happen," the spokeswoman said.
    She also denied reports that the company was considering an
issue of convertible bonds with warrants in the U.S. "We're not
thinking of issuing bonds," she said.
    In line with its planned Global expansion efforts, Benetton
is also holding talks with the Soviet Union to explore the
possibility of opening up to 150 stores in the country. But the
spokeswoman pointed out that many companies are holding talks
with the Soviets.
    "We are in discussions and are looking forward to some
response," she said. She added the company had no firm
timetable on when a response might be received.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7247>
Rexnord Inc said it expects to
merge with a wholly-owned subsidiary of Banner Industries Inc
in early May.
    Late last month, Banner said it completed a tender offer
for and held 96 pct of Rexnord's common shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7253>
Symbion Inc said &lt;Warburg, 
Pincus Capital Co L.P.> began a tender offer to purchase up to
2.5 mln shares, or about 33 pct, of Symbion's shares at 3.50
dlrs per share. Warburg already owns about 26 pct of Symbion.
    Symbion has 7,472,000 shares outstanding. The company makes
artificial hearts.
    Symbion said its board and management are carefully
reviewing the offer and on or before March 30 will advise its
shareholders on whether it accepts or rejects the offer. If the
tender offer is successful, Warburg wll own about 59 pct of
Symbion.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7260>
Solar Systems by Sundance Inc said it
agreed to buy a 45 pct interest in a company that will sell
condoms produced by INKEY SA of Spain.
    It said a spermicide used in INKEY's condoms contains an
ingredient that may help prevent the sexual transmission of
AIDS. The ingredient was cited in an article in the West German
publication, Aids Forschung. But it said the article was
about the ingredient and did not mention the spermicide or the
condoms made by INKEY.
    The company also said it is changing its name to
Eurocapital Corp shortly.
    Solar Systems said it was buying the 45 pct stake in a
U.S.-based &lt;Europharmaceutical Co>. INKEY and an affiliate own
the remaining shares of the company, which was set up to
distribute condoms and vaginal products that are made, or are
being developed by INKEY.
    The agreement calls for a two mln dlr payment to Inkey for
the distributorship. The first 500,000 dlr payment is due 30
days after the products are approved by the Food and Drug
Administration. It said Europharmaceutical plans to soon file
with the FDA to market the condom, but expects the approval
process to be a lengthy one.
    The company said the active ingredient in the spermicide is
currently used in the U.S. in antiseptic applications unrelated
to condoms. As far as it knows, the ingredient has not been
tested in a spermicide.
    Inkey's condoms will be sold in the U.S. under the brand
name, "Carlton." The exclusive distribution contract for the
products runs for three years and is renewable for one-year
periods, the company said.
    It said the condoms are currently sold in Spain but have
not gone on sale in other European countries.
    It said Europharmaceutical currently does not have the
resources to make the payments under the distribution agreement
or fund the studies necessary to obtain marketing approval from
the FDA.
    The company also said Europharmaceutical is in talks to
acquire either one or more publicly held companies with little
or no assets. In the event an acquisition goes through, Solar
Systems' interest in Europharmaceutical would be diluted below
its current 45 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7296>
Prime Medical Services Inc said merger
talks with National HMO Corp &lt;NHMO> have been terminated.
    Prime gave no reason for the termination of the talks with
National HMO.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7305>
A group of New York investment
companies told the Securities and Exchange Commission they have
acquired 173,000 shares of Moore-Handley Inc, or 6.9 pct of the
total outstanding common stock.
    The firms, Robert H. Barker and Co, J.M.R. Barker
Foundation, Quaker Hill Associates L.P., Upland Associates L.P.
and James M. Barker Trust, said they bought the stock for two
mln dlrs soley for investment purposes.
    But the group said it might buy more Moore-Handley shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7315>
Greyhound Corp said it has
signed a definitive agreement to buy General Motors Corp's U.S.
Transit Bus and Parts business for an undisclosed sum.
    The agreement, tentatively set in January, includes
production tooling, design and equipment for urban transit
buses, inventories and trademark identification.
    The agreement also incudes the right to buy GM's Canadian
Transit Bus and Parts business, contingent on a satisfactory
labor agreement.
    Greyhound said it will relocate the production facilities,
currently in Pontiac, Michigan, to an undetermined location.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7319>
Mark IV Industries Inc &lt;IV>, which
has said it is mulling a bid to seek control of Baird Corp,
said it has no present plans to acquire more than 25 pct of the
company's total outstanding common stock.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Mark IV said its top officials told Baird executives at a March
17 meeting that while Mark IV may buy more Baird common stock,
it presently intends to hold it to the 25 pct limit.
    Mark IV, which first disclosed its stake and interest in
Baird on March 10, has reported it holds 391,800 Baird common
shares, or 17.6 pct of the total outstanding.
    Mark IV said it also agreed at the meeting that if it
decides to seek control of Baird, it would be through a
negotiated merger or business combination or through a tender
offer in which Baird would have at least 24 hours notice.
    Baird, in turn, agreed not to take any defensive measures
without giving Mark IV at least 24 hours notice, it said.
    Baird also confirmed that a takeover defense plan it
already has which is triggered by the accumulation of more than
25 pct of its stock, would not be triggered by a tender offer,
Mark IV said. Both parties also agreed to adjourn pending
litigation they have against one another, it added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7337>
Great American Management and
Investment Inc said its 80 pct-owned subsidiary agreed to buy
certain assets of two subsidiaries of Standard Oil Co, for 40
mln dlrs and the assumption of certain liabilities.
    Great American Industrial Group Inc agreed to acquire all
the U.S. and United Kingdom assets of Pfaudler Co and the stock
of certain Brazilian, Mexican, and West German subsidiaries of
Kennecott Mining Corp, it said. Pfaudler and Kennecott are
subsidiaries of Standard Oil.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7342>
First Financial Management corp said it
has offered to acquire Comdata Network Inc for 18 dlrs per
share in cash and stock, or a total of about 342.7 mln dlrs.
    The company said for each Comdata share it would exchange
half a First Data share and enough cash to bring the total
value up to 18 dlrs per share, provided that the market price
of First Financial stock were not less than 28 dlrs per share.
    It said the cash payment would be based on the average
market price of First Financial during a period shortly before
closing.
    First Financial said it would not pursue the offer if
Comdata's board rejected it.  Comdata has already agreed to be
acquired by a partnership for either 15 dlrs a share in cash or
at least 10 dlrs in cash and uniuts of securities.
    The partnership that made the first offer for Comdata was
Welsh, Carson, Anderson and Stowe.  Comdata had previously
entered into an agreement, which collapsed, for a repurchase of
six mln shares at 14.50 dlrs each and for the sale of one mln
shares by a director to &lt;Mason Best Co>. Mason Best already
owns 1,800,000 Comdata shares.
    A group led by &lt;Rosewood Financial Inc> has also disclosed
ownership of 6.2 pct of Comdata's 19.0 mln shares outstanding
and said it might seek to increase its interest to over 15 pct.
    The company said Comdata shareholder approval would also be
required for its proposal.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7344>
POP Radio Corp said it has signed a
seven-year agreement to provide Rite Aid Corp with in-store
customized disc jocky-hosted radio programs, resulting in an
increase of more than 50 pct in the total number of stores POP
now has under contract.
    Value was not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7352>
Vulcan Corp said it was
discontinuing its efforts to negotiate a purchase of the common
stock of Jones and Vining Inc.
    On February 6, Vulcan, a Cincinnati maker of shoe lasts and
other products, offered five dlrs a share for all of Jones and
Vining common, subject to certain conditions.
    Vulcan said it is dropping the proposal because it believes
subsequent actions by Jones and Vining are hostile and Vulcan
is only interested in a friendly transaction.
    Jones and Vining makes shoe lasts and shoe components. It
has about 3.7 mln shares outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7353>
Tempo Enterprises Inc said it
signed a letter of intent to sell seven cable television
systems, representing about 5,000 subscribers, to &lt;Eagle
Cable>.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7354>
Erbamont N.V. said its major
shareholder &lt;Montedison SpA>, which owns 85 pct of its common,
and Farmitalia Carlo Erba, its 75 pct owned subsidiary, have
acquired &lt;Antibioticos S.A.> and related subsidiaries.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7362>
&lt;Azure Ventures Ltd> said it
signed a letter of intent to acquire John Paul Richards and
Associates Inc.
    The company said if the merger is approved by shareholders
of both companies, the shareholders of John Paul Richards would
become majority shareholders, owning 60 pct of the common
stock, of the new public company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7370>
Odyssey Filmpartners Ltd
said is terminated discussions to acquire &lt;United Color Labs>,
pursuant to a Jan 27 letter of intent for it to buy the company
for stock and cash.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7386>
United Jersey Banks said it
plans to merge two of its southern New Jersey member banks into
one 704 mln dlr organization.
    It said United Jersey Bank/Fidelity Bank, based in
Pennsauken, will be merged into United Jersey Bank/South in
order to improve customer service and maximize efficiency
throughout the southern New Jersey markets.
    Raymond Silverstein, currently chairman of the board of
United Jersey Bank/Fidelity, will be chairman of the merged
bank, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7391>
American Express Co's plan to sell a
stake in its Shearson Lehman Brothers is believed to be a
prelude to a public offering of shares in the brokerage unit,
analysts said.
    American Express earlier said it has a general
understanding with Nippon Life Insurance Co of Japan to sell a
13 pct interest in Shearson for 530 mln dlrs.
    The statement triggered a rise in other brokerage stocks,
as investors speculated on the possibility of more investment
in the U.S. brokerage industry by Japanese concerns.
    The stocks of brokerage firms also climbed in response to
the relatively high value Nippon put on its stake in the U.S.
firm. Analysts said the 530 mln dlrs for 13 pct represents a
price of 2.7 times book value.
    Perrin Long of Lipper analytical said the brokerage stocks,
depressed somewhat by the dark cloud of the U.S. insider
trading scandal, closed out February at a market value of 1.8
times book value.
    American Express was trading today at 78-1/4, off 3/8. For
the last several weeks, the stock has been strong on rumors of
a spinoff of part of Shearson.
    Analysts said American Express and its Shearson unit will
benefit from the doors Nippon Life can open to the increasingly
important Tokyo financial markets.
    "I think this, in all honesty, is a preliminary step," said
Long.
    "What you will see probably in the future is American
Express selling an additional 17 pct in the public market and
have a public vehicle for Shearson," Long said.
    "Normally, investors do not make a major capital commitment
into an illiquid situation," he said of Nippon.
    Some analysts previously speculated a 20 pct stake in
Shearson might be sold to the public. They said the firm, like
other investment banks, needs capital to expand globally.
    American express has said the total employees of shearson
will expand by 20 pct in 1987 internationally. However, that
number is substantially lower than growth last year, a company
spokesman said.
    American Express officials would not comment beyond a
statement made this morning. That statement, however, did not
close off the possibility of a public offering or other option
for Shearson.
    David Anthony, a Smith Barney analyst, said it is possible
Shearson would be partially sold to the public. But he believes
the firm will digest the Nippon investment first.
    "I think they'll figure out what they're going to do with
the money they have," he said.
    Joan Goodman, an analyst with Pershing and Co, also said
American Express could determine to sell shares to the public.
    In its statement, the financial services giant said it is
continuing to study various plans for Shearson in addition to
the investment by Nippon.
    American Express said options under study range from
expanding Shearson's capacity to meet international competition
to broadening its access to capital.
    American Express also said the options reflect the
continuing integral role of Shearson in American Express'
worldwide financial services strategy.
    Shearson follows Goldman, Sachs and Co in finding a
Japanese partner. Goldman last year sold a 12.5 pct stake to
Sumitomo Bank in exchange for a 500 mln dlr capital infusion.
    Analysts speculated there will be more such matches.
    "Those (U.S. brokers) companies have the expertise. They
don't have the money. There's just not enough internal capital
growth," said Wertheim analyst James Hanbury, who follows other
U.S. brokerage companies.
    Hanbury said some Japanese companies, flush with cash, are
interested in the expertise of American brokers. "Those
(Japanese) companies have the capital and our companies have
the capital needs and the growth opportunities to use the
money. That's a nice marriage," he said.
    Morgan Stanley and Co &lt;MS> rose 4-1/4 to 74-7/8. First
Boston Corp &lt;FBC> was up one to 51-1/4. E.F. Hutton Group &lt;EFH>
rose 1-1/4 to 41-1/8, and PaineWebber Group &lt;PWJ> climbed 7/8
to 37-3/4. Merrill Lynch and Co, recommended today by a
PaineWebber analyst, rose 2-5/8 to 45-3/8.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7407>
Ambassador Financial Group Inc
said its Ambassador Real Estate Equities Corp, agreed to buy
Heritage Quality Construction Co Inc.
    Ambassador said its unit would purchase 100 pct of
Heritage's stock for an initial payment of approximately
500,000 dlrs and subsequent payments in cash over a five-year
period equal to 50 pct of the net after-tax profit of Heritage.
    If the acquisition is consummated, Ambassador said it
agreed to contribute 250,000 dlrs to the existing capital of
Heritage.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7433>
FCS Laboratories said its
investment banker, Butcher and Singer Inc, received a
preliminary merger proposal from another company in the
healthcare field.
    FCS said that if various aspects of the proposal are better
defined, its board may consider it. FCS said merger
negotiations with this other company have been continuing since
late August.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7453>
Tri-Star Pictures Inc said it agreed
to acquire the Roosevelt Field Century Theatre from Canada's
Cineplex Odeon Corp's RKO Century Warner Theatres Inc for 17
mln dlrs.
    The recently refurbished and expanded theater is located in
Garden City, N.Y..
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7464>
Dorsey Corp said it
completed the sale of substantially all its Dorsey Trailers Inc
subsidiary assets to &lt;Trailer Acquisition Corp>, whose
stockholders include a former Dorsey vice president and several
executives of the Dorsey Trailers management team.
    Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7469>
New York investor George Soros, and
an investment fund he controls, said they raised their stake in
King World Productions Inc to 2,485,510 shares, or 8.1 pct of
the total outstanding, from 1,986,710 shares, or 6.5 pct.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Soros said his group bought a net 498,800 King World common
shares between Jan 8 and March 6 at prices ranging fropm 18.924
to 21.203 dlrs a share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7470>
&lt;Cineplex Odeon Corp> said it agreed in
principle to acquire the Walter Reade Organization Inc New York
cinema chain from Coca-Cola Co's Entertainment Holdings Inc
unit for 32.5 mln U.S. dlrs.
    Cineplex said the purchase price consisted of 22.5 mln dlrs
cash and 652,742 Cineplex common shares. The transaction is
subject to fulfilment of certain unspecified conditions and
regulatory and board approvals.
    Walter Reade operates 11 screens in eight Manhattan
locations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7475>
Clorox Co said &lt;Henkel KGaA> of
Dusseldorf, West Germany, agreed to increase its holdings in
Clorox to 30 pct from the current level of 23 pct.
    Henkel, which also holds a subordinated note convertible
into another 1.7 pct of the company's stock, intends to acquire
the additional shares in the open market over an extended
period of time, Clorox said.
    It also said that, for the foreseeable future, Henkel does
not intend to increase its participation in Clorox above the 30
pct level.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7482>
Intermark Inc, which together with
one of its subsidiaries already holds a 43.4 pct stake in Pier
1 Imports Inc, told the Securities and Exchange Commission it
plans to acquire a majority of the company's voting stock.
    Intermark said it already holds 6,839,827 Pier 1 common
shares, or 35.66 pct, and its Pier 1 Holdings Inc holds
1,484,516 shares, or 7.74 pct.
    Intermark said it also has 341,991 shares of Pier 1
preferred stock, or 35.2 pct of the outstanding, while Pier 1
Holdings has 74,225 shares, or 7.6 pct.
         
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7484>
Josten's Corp said it agreed
to sell its proprietary school business to CareerCom Corp, for
20 mln dlrs in cash and about 1.7 mln CareerCom common shares.
    Upon completion of the proposed transaction, Josten's will
own 20 pct of CareerCom's stock, which it intends to hold for
investment purposes, it said.
    Proprietary school sales totaled about 56 mln dlrs and
accounted for less than 10 pct of Josten's total revenue, it
added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7490>
A group led by Halcyon Investments,
a New York securities and risk arbitrage partnership, said it
has acquired 486,400 shares of Atlantic Research Corp, or 6.4
pct of the total outstanding common stock.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the Halcyon group said it bought the stake for 15.6 mln dlrs
for no specific purpose.
    The group said it has no plans to seek control of Atlantic
Research, which has been sought by Clabir Corp &lt;CLG>, but said
it may buy more stock or sell some or all of what it has.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7494>
An investor group told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it plans to cut its stake in
Valero Energy Corp to 402,925 shares, or 1.6 pct of the total
outstanding, from 1,522,850 shares, or 6.0 pct.
    The group, led by TAG Group S.A. of Luxembourg, said it
filed with the SEC on Feb 20 a notice that it proposes to sell
1,119,925 shares of Valero Energy common stock.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7497>
Harmon Industries Inc said it
signed a letter of intent to acquire for about 3.5 mln dlrs, a
majority of the stock of SNP Inc, a Portland, Oregon-based
company which has patents to reprocess used railroad ties into
new ties for resale.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7504>
&lt;Bayou International Ltd> said it
purchased one-third of the outstanding stock of Solmecs Corp
N.V., a Netherlands Antilles corporation, for 1,750,000 dlrs.
    Bayou said it will also receive two seats on Solmecs'
board.
    Bayou Ltd is 55.2 pct owned by Australia Wide Industries
Ltd.
    Solmecs develops technology relating to energy conversion.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7539>
The state-owned Krung Thai Bank Ltd
will start taking over state-owned Sayam Bank Ltd and complete
the process in a year, Finance Minister Suthee Singhasaneh told
a press conference.
    He said the takeover decision was made this week to stem
the current heavy losses of Sayam and to avoid competition
between the two state-owned institutions.
    The minister said some of the existing 30 Sayam Bank
branches will be merged with their Krung Thai counterparts,
while others will continue operating but under Krung Thai's
name.
    Sayam Bank has existed since August 1984 when the Finance
Ministry took over and re-named the Asia Trust Bank Ltd.
    Sayam president Waree Havanonda told reporters last month
her bank posted a loss of more than 400 mln baht in 1986. At
the end of 1985 the bank, with 13.8 billion baht of assets, was
ranked 12th among Thailand's 16 local commercial banks.
    Waree said Sayam Bank was trying to recall about six to
seven billion baht of loans extended by its previous private
management and was taking legal action to collect another four
to five billion baht of doubtful debts.
    Krung Thai is Thailand's third largest bank.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7548>
New Zealand investment companies
&lt;Rainbow Corp Ltd> and &lt;Equiticorp Holdings Ltd> have placed
the majority of their joint shareholding in oil and gas
conglomerate Ultramar PLC &lt;UMAR.L> at prices up to 2.20 stg per
share, the companies said in a statement.
    The companies said they had bought their 4.9 pct stake in
Ultramar for a total of 50 mln N.Z. Dlrs through a joint
venture company formed for that purpose in October.
    They said the joint venture made a profit of 15 mln N.Z.
Dlrs on the deal, but they did say how many shares they had
sold. No further details of the sale were available.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7558>
Guinness Plc &lt;GUIN.L> said it has
started court proceedings against former chairman and chief
executive Ernest Saunders and non-executive director Thomas
Ward for recovery of 5.2 mln stg.
    The money was paid to Ward via Marketing and Acquisition
Consultants Ltd in Jersey.
    Guinness said earlier it would propose a resolution at the
annual meeting in May to remove Saunders and Ward as directors
of the company.  Earlier this month, lawyers for Ward told a
Jersey court that Ward saw the payment as his reward for
services in last year's takeover battle for &lt;Distillers Co
Plc>.
    Guinness has said that both men breached their fiduciary
duty in authorising the payment.
    Saunders resigned from his executive positions at Guinness
in January in the aftermath of a government enquiry into share
dealings during the battle for Distillers but retained his
position on the board.
    No spokesman for Guinness was immediately available for
comment on the statement.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7570>
The placement of the German federal
government's 25.6 pct stake in utility Veba AG &lt;VEBG.F> would
probably take place early next week, banking sources said.
    Share dealers said speculation had arisen in the early
pre-bourse market that the Veba announcement could come as
early as today. But one banking source, though confirming that
most of the details had been worked out, said the chances of an
announcement today were about nil. He had no price details.
    The 10 mln shares on offer are expected to bring a cash
call in Germany for well over two billion marks. The share was
around 253 marks today after a 6.50 drop to 252 yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7593>
KLM Royal Dutch Airways &lt;KLM.AS> said
it agreed to take full control of a partially owned Dutch-based
parcel delivery service and will offer a minority stake in it
to British and Commonwealth Shipping Plc &lt;BCOM.L>
    KLM, seeking to strengthen its market position in the fast
growing door-to-door delivery market, said it agreed with Dutch
retailer Vendex International &lt;VENN.AS> to take over Vendex's
50-pct in their jointly-owned courier, &lt;XP System VOF>.
    Ownership of XP will now be brought into the talks started
by KLM last week with British and Commonwealth for a one-third
stake in the latter's &lt;IML Air Services Group Ltd> courier.
    When announcing the negotiations with British and
Commonwealth last week, KLM said buying a minority stake in IML
could involve a convertible loan issue.
    A KLM spokeswoman said the Dutch flag carrier would now
offer a minority stake in XP to British and Commonwealth in the
negotiations on IML, but declined to elaborate on financial
aspects of the talks.
    She said KLM would like the two courier services to
cooperate in future and did not exclude a future merger between
them to combine IML's strong world-wide network with XP's
mainly European activities.
    XP System is based in the southern Dutch airport of
Maastricht and has an annual turnover of 100 mln guilders.
    KLM, which is also negotiating with British and
Commonwealth for a 15-pct stake in the latter's regional
airline &lt;Air U.K. Ltd>, says door-to-door delivery courier
services are seeing substantially faster growth than
traditional cargo activities.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7596>
&lt;Rainbow Corp Ltd> said &lt;Brierley
Investments Ltd> (BIL) is trying to disrupt Rainbow's planned
merger with &lt;Progressive Enterprises Ltd>.
    Rainbow chairman Allan Hawkins said in a statement, "In our
opinion BIL have deliberately tried to create anomalies in the
market prices of Rainbow and Progressive shares since the
merger was announced."
    The merger, announced in February, involves the formation
of a new company, &lt;Astral Pacific Corp Ltd>, which Rainbow and
Progressive shareholders will enter into on a one-for-one share
basis. Both boards have approved the merger.
    BIL has said it was the mystery bidder behind a recent
stand in the market for three mln Progressive shares.
    "We simply regard Progressive Enterprises shares to be worth
approximately twice as much as Rainbow shares and do not think
the merger, as proposed, is soundly based," BIL chief executive
Paul Collins said in an interview in the weekly National
Business Review newspaper published today.
    Collins was not immediately available to respond directly
to Hawkins' statement.
    Hawkins said the merger has been assessed by independent
consultants and declared fair in all respects, with benefits to
all shareholders.
    "We are not going to stand by while other parties distort
the picture for their own strategic purposes and distract the
market away from the real benefits of the merger," he said.
    "In our opinion, BIL's actions are clearly not designed to
be in the long term interests of either Progressive or Rainbow
shareholders," Hawkins said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7603>
&lt;Newman Industries Plc> said it was
discussing the possible merger of its electric motor operations
with Hawker Siddeley Group Plc's &lt;HSID.L> &lt;Brook Crompton
Parkinson Motors Ltd> unit.
    Newman has electric motor operations in the U.K. And
Australia. The company gave no further details but said a
further statement would be made shortly.
    Newman shares eased one penny on the announcement to 43p
while Hawker was unchanged at 528p, three pence higher on last
night's close.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7604>
Dutch chemical group Akzo
N.V. &lt;AKZO.AS> said it agreed to take over household product
subsidiaries of French group Rhone-Poulenc &lt;RHON.PA> for an
undisclosed sum.
    Under the agreement, Akzo will acquire the household
product activities of the Lyons-based &lt;Rhodic> and
Remalard-based &lt;Buhler-Fontaine> units of Rhone Poulenc.
Together, these activities account for over 180 mln French
francs in annual sales and employ 170, Akzo said.
    Akzo will integrate the firms, to be partially joined with
its own French activities, in its consumer products division.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7605>
A top Swiss banker called for an
obligatory, continuous rating for all Swiss franc bonds and
said he believed anyone buying more than five pct of a company
should be made to declare their share.
    In comments at a news conference of &lt;Vontobel Holding AG>,
chairman Hans Vontobel said he believed it was up to the banks'
own self-regulating bodies, such as the Swiss Admissions Board,
to take such action before governmental bodies stepped in.
    A decline in the average quality of borrowers on the Swiss
franc market and a debate on the use of registered shares to
prevent takeovers have made both major issues among bankers.
    Vontobel noted that many borrowers already came to the
market with ratings from the major U.S. Agencies, which were
readily available to professionals through specialised
information systems.
    "We should make this classification obligatory and publish
it in places that are easily accessible to lay people," he said.
The quick changing nature of the financial market meant these
ratings should also be continually updated, he said.
    Vontobel also noted that recent years had seen companies,
worried about takeovers, increasingly issuing registered shares
and participation certificates rather than bearer shares.
    However, both types of issue had a drawback, he said. The
recent attempt by Jacobs Suchard AG &lt;JACZ.Z> to take over Hero
Conserven Lenzburg &lt;HERZ.Z> had shown the limits of a 1961
pledge by the banks not to sell registered shares to someone
who was not eligible according to the company's statutes.
    Excessive issue of participation certificates, which do not
carry voting rights, would also be contrary to the principle of
greater democracy in the new share law before Parliament.
    "People buying, for example, more than five pct of a
company's shares should be made to declare their purchase," he
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7627>
Fleet Financial Group said it might
have to sell its First Connecticut Corp subsidiary as a result
of its proposed 1.3 billion dlr acquisition of Norstar Bancorp
&lt;NOR>.
    Under Connecticut banking law, New England based bank
holding companies such as Fleet are not allowed to operate
Connecticut banks if they merge with companies from outside the
region.  Norstar is based in Albany, N.Y.
    First Connecticut has assets of about two billion dlrs. 
Fleet has total assets of about 21 billion dlrs.
    Fleet said it will seek to have the Connecticut law amended
to allow it to retain First Connecticut, which is based in
Hartford.
    Fleet's acquisition of Norstar is now expected to be
completed around July 1, 1988, when a change in laws in Fleet's
home state of Rhode Island allowing interstate banking outside
New England will go into effect.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7635>
C.O.M.B. Co said its board has
approved a proposal to acquire the 50 pct of Cable Value
Network held by its cable television industry partners in
exchange for warrants for C.O.M.B. common.
    The company, which already owns the other 50 pct of CVN,
said it plans to change its name to CVN.
    C.O.M.B. said the proposal calls for its cable partners to
receive about eight mln five year warrants in exchange for
their 50 pct interest in CVN and commit to a long-term
affiliation agreement to carry CVN programming.
    C.O.M.B. said the proposed warrants would carry an exercise
price of 18.125 dlrs a share.
    It said the 7,869,353 warrants originally offered to cable
partners will continue to vest on the pre-agreed schedule. The
company now has about 18.1 mln shares outstanding.
    C.O.M.B. said the transaction is subject to the parties
entering into an agreement which would be subject to approval
by its shareholders and regulatory agencies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7644>
Ohio Edison Co said it has
completed the sale and leaseback of 30 pct of its 30 pct
interest in Unit One of the Perry Nuclear Power Plant,
receiving 509 mln dlrs for the interest.
    The utility said the share of its interest in the 1,205
megawatt generating plant was sold to a group of institutional
investors which leased it back to the company for a period of
about 29 years at a negotiated lease payment rate.
    Ohio Edison said the proceeds will be used to finance the
rest of its 1987 construction program and repay bank loans
incurred for the retirement of high-interest long-term debt.
    Ohio Edison did not detail the lease payments, but it said
the "payments will reduce the amount of revenue the company
will need to cover our investment in Perry, which translates
into savings for our customers."
    The utility said it projects the financing could reduce the
amount of annual revenue needed by about 20 mln dlrs. It plans
on filing a rate application with the Public Utilities
Commission of Ohio to recover the Perry costs later this year.
    It said the sale and leaseback was attractive to the
investors because they could take quicker advantage of tax
benefits than the utility could.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7650>
Trans World Airlines Inc said it
reached an agreement yesterday in federal court with USAir
Group Inc that prevents TWA from buying additional shares of
USAir.
    Under the agreement, TWA, which holds about 15 pct of USAir
stock, will not buy more USAir shares before April 23 and will
not do so after that date without giving 14 days notice to
USAir.
    TWA also agreed that it would not knowingly and willingly
interfere with the consummation of the merger between USAir and
Piedmont Aviation Inc &lt;PIE>.
    TWA said the court agreement confirms previous
announcements by the company, in filings with the Securities
and Exchange Commission, that it does not presently intend to
seek control of USAir or to acquire additional common stock.
    As a result of the agreement, the court removed a previous
temporary restraining order against TWA, the company said.
    TWA and USAir have also agreed that all litigation between
them in Pittsburgh and Delaware will be stayed until April 23.
TWA said the agreement does not prevent it from commenting to
regulatory agencies on the USAir, Piedmont merger.
    In a separate statement, USAir said the agreement also
included a provision that all USAir shares currently owned by
TWA and its chairman, Carl Icahn, will be voted through a
voting trust in proportion to the votes of other shares not
controlled by TWA or Icahn.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7659>
American Motors Corp's board of
directors is meeting this morning in New York to consider
Chrysler Corp's &lt;C> 1.5 billion dlr takeover offer, an American
Motors spokesman said.
    The spokesman reiterated statements made earlier in the
week that the regularly scheduled meeting was being held.
    The spokesman would not comment on recurring speculation
that the board might receive a higher offer from Chrysler.
Analysts have said the fact that American Motors' stock has
remained above the four dlrs a share Chrysler offer could lead
the larger company to raise its bid.
    The American Motors spokesman said he had not seen any
indication that a higher offer would be received from Chrysler,
although he added, "I don't know what the conversation is in
the meeting."
    He repeated statements made earlier in the week by the
automaker that today's meeting will probably not result in a
final decision on the Chrysler bid.
    "The board first apprised the proposal on the 11th (of
March). I suspect there will be several more (meetings) after
this," the spokesman said.
    The meeting is expected to go through early afternoon.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7670>
Universal Resources Corp said it
is holding a special shareholders meeting this morning to vote
on the previously-proposed merger between it and Questar Corp
&lt;STR>.
    Universal, whose stock was delayed this morning on the
American Stock Exchange, said it will release a statement later
in the day on the vote.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7672>
Louisiana Pacific Corp has
agreed to pay 3,475,000 dlrs for the bankrupt Harris Pine
Sawmill in Pendleton, Ore., the mill's bankruptcy trustee said.
    Louisiana Pacific refused to indicate whether it would
repoen the lumber mill which was closed after the sawmill owned
by the Seventh Day Adventist Church filed a bankruptcy petition
in Portland federal court in December.
    The trustee said the company outbid WTD Industries Inc for
the lumber mill, harvested logs and contracts to harvest timber
in the national forest. It outbidhell bankruptcy trustee said.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7678>
First Federal Bank FSB said it has
entered into a letter of intent to merge into BankEast Corp for
60 dlrs per First Federal share in BankEast common stock.
    First Federal said, subject to certain adjustments,
including First Federal's earnings prior to the close of the
deal, each share of its common stock shall not be converted
into less than 2.9 shares or more than 3.5 shares of BankEast
common.
    First Federal said the proposed move is also subject to
execution of a definitive agreement, regulatory approval and
the approval of First Federal shareholders.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7679>
Illinois Tool Works Inc said it
completed the sale of its Drill and End Mill division, Pine
Bluff, Arkansas and Eclipse Counterbore division, Detroit, to
newly-formed Eclipse Industrial Pruducts Inc, based in St.
Louis.  Terms were not disclosed.
    All employees at both locations will be retained, it added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7693>
Vertex Industries Inc and
&lt;Computer Transceiver Systems Inc> jointly announced an
agreement for Vertex to acquire a 60 pct interest in Computer
after it completes a proposed reorganization.
    Computer has been in reorganization proceedings under
chapter 11 since September 1986.
    The companies said the agreement would allow Computer's
unsecured creditors and debenture holders to receive new stock
in exchange for exsiting debt, and for shareholders to receive
one new share of Computer's stock for each four shares
previously held.
   
    The companies said the United States Bankruptcy court for
the Southern District of New York has given preliminary
approval for the proposal, which is subject to formal approval
by Computer's creditors and the court.
    Under the agreement, Vertex also said it would supply
Computer with 250,000 dlrs of operating funds, and arrange
renegotiation of its secured bank debt, among other things.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7698>
&lt;Cooper Canada Ltd> said it has
received takeover offers from "a number of companies."
    The company also said that "discussions are continuing, but
no definitive arrangements have been made."
    It gave no further details.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7704>
Illinois Regional Bancorp said
it is evaluating whether to affiliate with a larger bank
holding company or continue to remain independent.
    The 500 mln dlr-asset bank holding company said that in
view of recent investor interest in suburban Chicago banks, it
retained Merrill Lynch Capital markets to advise it on its
alternatives.
    Last year, Illinois Regional had discussions with
Milwaukee-based Marine Corp &lt;MCRP> but no agreement was
reached, a company spokesman said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7715>
Carteret Savings Bank said it
has completed the previously announced sale of six Virginia
branches to Charter Federal Savings and Loan Association
&lt;CHFD>.
    Carteret said it has opened a retail banking office in
Vienna, Va., as the next step in its move to build a strong
presence in the Washington, D.C., Baltimore, Md., area.
    Carteret said the new bank has two offices outside
Baltimore, which were acquired last June when Carteret merged
with Admiral Builders Savings and Loan Association.
    The company said it plans to open a retail banking office
in downtown Washington this summer, plus several more offices
in Baltimore County and others in Fairfax County, Va. Carteret
said it may open more loan offices in Virginia and Maryland.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7729>
Enviropact Inc said it has signed a
letter of intent to acquire Willms Trucking Co Inc for about
12.5 mln dlrs, with completion expected in 45 days.
    In the year ended September 30, Willms had revenues of
about 15 mln dlrs.  It transports hazardous waste, sand and
gravel.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7733>
Companies will henceforth be able to own
stakes in banks, but these should not constitute a "dominant"
holding, an Italian government committee ruled.
    The Interministerial Committee on Credit and Savings,
headed by Treasury Minister Giovanni Goria, said its decision
reflected the "need to safeguard the principle of separation
between banks and non-financial concerns."
    It did not quantify what might constitute a "dominant"
holding.
    The committee also set conditions for the allocation of
credits by banks to companies or individuals holding stakes in
them, and stipulates conditions under which the Bank of Italy
could exercise its powers of control in the case of stakes held
by banks in companies or other banks.
    Under the ruling, credits given by banks or their
subsidiaries to groups or individuals holding five pct or more
of the bank's capital must not exceed defined limits.
    The value of credits given cannot exceed either one-fifth
of the combined capital and reserves of the bank itself or
two-fifths of the value of the stake owned in the bank by the
group or individual concerned.
    Exceptions to these conditions include credits to concerns
in which the bank itself has a stake and to branches of foreign
banks. Credits made by foreign companies or banks to
subsidiaries which have their legal base in Italy will also be
excluded from the conditions.
    The Bank of Italy will request banks to insert rules in
their statutes to ensure that companies or individuals holding
five pct or more of the bank's capital are not given privileged
treatment with regard to credit allocation and terms.
    With regard to bank holdings in companies, the Bank of
Italy can exercise supervisory controls when information on a
bank's consolidated activities show single shareholdings in a
company or another bank of 25 pct or more, owned directly or
indirectly.
    Such controls can also be exercised even if the stake held
is below 25 pct if it can be considered a controlling interest.
    The controls will not be exercised in cases where the value
of the bank's stake in a concern is below the lesser of two
predefined limits.
    These limits are set at 15 billion lire or two pct of the
total assets of the parent company of the shareholding bank.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7737>
&lt;Cogeco Inc> said it agreed to acquire
100 pct of Quebec City radio station CJMF-FM and will issue
subordinated voting shares of the company to cover a portion of
the purchase price.
    It said the purchase price and other terms of the
transaction have not been disclosed. The transaction is subject
to approval of the Canadian Radio-Television and
Telecommunications Commission.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7747>
Audio/Video Affiliates Inc said it
has filed suit against &lt;Dixons Group PLC>, Cyclops Corp,
Alleghany Corp &lt;Y> and others in connection with Dixons'
recently completed tender offer in which it raised its
ownership of Cyclops to 56 pct.
    The company said the suit, filed in U.S. District Court for
the Southern District of Ohio, seeks a temporary restraining
order and preliminary injunction requiring Dixons, for 10
business days, to permit any Cyclops shareholder who previously
tendered and now wishes to withdraw to do so.
    The company said the order and injunction would also
prohibit Dixons from exercising a "lockup" option granted it by
Cyclops and prohibit Dixons for 10 business days from
attempting to exercise any control over Cyclops.
    Audio/Video said the suit also requests the court to order
Cyclops to immediately provide to all potential bidders for
Cyclops all information given to Dixons.
    Audio/Video and Citicorp &lt;CCI> have been tendering for all
Cyclops shares in a competing offer at 80.00 dlrs per share but
said it could raise its bid to 92.50 dlrs under certain
circumstances.  Dixons offered 90.25 dlrs in its tender.
    In February Alleghany agreed to buy Cyclops' steel and
nonresidential construction business for 111.6 mln dlrs in cash
and the assumption of liabilities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7749>
&lt;Dixons Group PLC> said the 
Securities and Exchange Commission has authorized, but not
commenced, the filing of an action against it concerning its
waiver of a condition in its tender offer for Cyclops Corp.
    Dixons has offered to buy about 80 pct of Cyclops shares.
The SEC action deals with a waiver by Dixons of a condition in
the tender offer which was made without an appropriate
extension of the offer, Dixons said.
    Dixons also said it is currently discussing the matter with
the SEC. The SEC has a standing policy of never confirming
or denying investigations or upcoming legal action.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7765>
Cable and Wireless Plc &lt;CAWL.L> is
resisting attempts to merge two Japan-based telecommunications
firms in the hope that overseas political pressure will force a
change in those plans, a company executive said.
    Cable and Wireless, which holds a 20 pct stake in one of
the two Japanese firms, is opposed to plans to reduce its share
to three pct in the merged firm, director of corporate strategy
Jonathan Solomon told reporters.
    That plan, put forward by a senior member of the powerful
business organization Keidanren with the tacit backing of the
Post and Telecommunications Ministry, has caused a storm of
protest from abroad that Japan is seeking to exclude foreign
firms from a meaningful position in the market.
    Pacific Telesis Group &lt;PAC.N> of the United States also
holds a 20 pct stake in one of the newly formed consortia,
&lt;International Digital Communications Inc> (IDC).
    Solomon said that both British Prime Minister Margaret
Thatcher and U.S. Secretary of State George Schultz have
written to the Japanese government about the planned merger.
    A key U.S. Senate committee, Commerce Secretary Malcolm
Baldrige and Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter have also
expressed opposition to the merger, he said.
    The Post and Telecomunications Ministry reiterated again
that it sees no need for two competitors to &lt;Kokusai Denshin
Denwa Co Ltd>, which holds a monopoly on international calls
from Japan. The ministry has also suggested that foreign
shareholders not hold managerial positions in the new firm.
    In an attempt to hammer out an agreement, Solomon today met
Fumio Watanabe, the senior Keidanren officer trying to arrange
the merger. But the two sides remained deadlocked.
    At stake is C and W's 400 mln dlr project to lay fibre
optic cables between Japan and Alaska, to form part of its
global network.
    "C and W wants to start right away on the project, such as
application and other procedures," said Watanabe, who is also
chairman of &lt;Tokio Marine and Fire Insurance Inc>. The Japanese
side is saying that the decision on such a plan should be left
with the new firm, after the merger.
    "These decisions (on the merger) were made in consideration
of Japan's economic conditions and legal systems. I told him we
are not a colony or something," said Watanabe.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7789>
Waste Management Inc said it
amended its offer to buy the outstanding shares of ChemLawn
Corp to 35 dlrs a share.
    On Thursday the company said it was prepared to bid 33 dlrs
a share, up from its original 27 dlrs a share offer.
    As a result of the price increase, made through Waste
Management's wholly owned subsidiary, WMX Acquisition Corp, the
offer has been extended and the withdrawal rights will not
expire at midnight EDT April Two, unless further extended.
    Waste Management also said it amended its offer to provide
that the tender offer price will not be reduced by ChemLawn's
10 cts a share dividend payable to holders of record April 1,
1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7791>
The Department of Transportation
said it will allow USAIR Group to acquire up to 51 pct of
Piedmont Aviation &lt;PIE> voting stocks pending final approval of
the proposed merger of the two airlines.
    The agency said the stock would have to be held in a voting
trust controlled by an independent trustee.
    An agency spokesman said that if USAIR, which has proposed
to buy all of Piedmont shares, controls more than 51 pct of the
firm's outstanding stock, it will have one week to sell those
excess shares.
    USAIR asked the Department of Transporation earlier this
month to approve a voting trust.
    An agency spokesman said this is a device that airlines use
to get majority control of a company it is trying to acquire
while their application before the government is pending
approval.
    The spokesman said the firm had asked the transporation
agency permission to buy all of Piedmont's voting stock, the
but agency decided to give approval for 51 pct of shares.
    The spokesman said agency action on the proposed merger
application could take as long as six months.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7796>
American Motors Corp said its directors
reviewed a Chrysler Corp merger proposal but took no action on
it.
    The company said its directors met in New York today at a
regularly scheduled meeting. The board's review is continuing
with the company's independent legal and financial advisers,
American Motors said in a statement issued from New York.
    American Motors' board voted to postpone its annual
shareholders meeting scheduled for April 29 in Southfield,
Michigan.
    The next regularly scheduled meeting of American Motors
board will be April 29, although it is expected that directors
will meet again prior to that date, according to the statement.
    Early last week, Chrysler said it agreed to buy the 46.1
pct interest owned by Regie Nationale des Usines Renault in
American Motors and acquire the balance of American Motors in a
transaction valued at 1.11 billion dlrs.
    Later that week, AMC said it had retained financial and
legal advisers and expected to meet periodiocally over the next
several weeks to consider the proposal.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7810>
Affiliated Publications Inc said it
agreed to acquire all the outstanding stock of &lt;Billboard
Publications Inc> for 100 mln dlrs in cash from a shareholder
group led by &lt;Boston Ventures Limited Partnership.>
    Affiliated, which owns the company that publishes the
Boston Globe, said the acquisition will give it a strong
position in the growing market for specialty magazines.
    Under a separate agreement, Affiliated said that certain
members of Billboard's management plan to buy up to 10 pct of
the equity in Billboard following Affiliated's acquisition of
the company.
    Billboard publishes eight specialty magazines, including
Billboard magazine, and 15 annual directories. It also
publishes and distributes speciality books under four imprints
and operates two book clubs.
    Affiliated is the parent company of Globe Newspaper Co,
publisher of the Boston Globe. It also has interests in
cellular telephone and paging services providers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7813>
Spear, Leeds and Kellogg, a New York
brokerage partnership, said it has acquired 136,300 shares of
Allegheny International Inc's 11.25 dlr convertible preferred
stock, or 7.1 pct of the total outstanding.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Spear Leeds said it bought the stake for 11.7 mln dlrs as part
of its normal trading activities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7814>
WTD Industries Inc said its
offer to buy the bankrupt Harris Pine sawmill in Pendleton,
Oregon was rejected by the bankruptcy court trustee.
    The company said the bid was rjected in favor of a higher
offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7816>
Celina Financial Corp said
shareholders at a special meeting approved a transaction in
which the company transferred its interest in three insurance
companies to a wholly owned subsidiary which then sold the
three companies to an affiliated subsidiary.
    It said the company's interests in West Virginia Fire and
Casualty Co, Congregation Insurance co and National Term Life
Insurance Co had been transferred to First National Indemnity
Co, which sold the three to Celina Mutual for cash, an office
building and related real estate.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7817>
Two affiliated New York investment
firms and an investment advisor told the Securities and
Exchange Commission they have acquired 555,057 shares of
Unicorp American Corp, or 5.1 pct of the total outstanding.
    The group, which includes Mutual Shares Corp, said it
bought the stake for 5.3 mln dlrs for investment purposes and
has no intention of seeking control of Unicorp American.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7820>
Revlon Group Inc said it bought
Germaine Monteil's cosmetics business in the U.S. from the
Beecham Group PLC.
    Terms of the sale were not disclosed.
    The sale includes the rights to Germaine Monteil in North
and South America and in the Far East, as well as the worldwide
rights to the Diane von Furstenberg cosmetics and fragrances
lines and the U.S. distribution rights to Lancaster beauty
products.
    Meanwhile in London a statement from Beecham said the
business was sold to Revlon for 2.5 mln dlrs in cash and a
royalty payment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7824>
Mark IV Industries Inc &lt;IV>, which
has said it may consider a bid to seek control of Baird Corp,
said Baird has not agreed to hold off on any defensive measures
without giving Mark IV at least 24 hours notice.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Mark IV corrected a statement it made yesterday in another SEC
filing in which it listed several agreements reached with
Baird, including that Baird would not take any anti-takeover
steps without providing at least 24 hours notice.
    Mark IV said it was later told by Baird that Baird had
given no such assurance.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7825>
Generale de Banque SA &lt;GENB.BR> and
&lt;Heller Overseas Corp> of Chicago have each taken 50 pct stakes
in factoring company SA Belgo-Factors, Generale de Banque said
in a statement.
    It gave no financial details of the transaction. SA
Belgo-Factors' turnover in 1986 was 17.5 billion Belgian
francs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7831>
Cooper Industries Inc asked the
Federal Trade Commission to vacate a 1979 order that requires
the company to get FTC approval before making certain
acquisitions, the FTC said.
    The order was issued as part of a settlement of FTC charges
that Cooper's merger with Gardner-Denver Co would lessen
competion and increase concentration in the gas compressor and
industrial air tool industries, the FTC said.
    The order requires that, until 1989, Cooper must get FTC
approval before acquiring companies in the natural gas
compressor or hand-held industrial pneumatic tool businesses.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7839>
The Federal Trade Commission said it
eased a requirement that Allied-Signal Inc's Allied Corp
subsidiary get prior FTC approval before making certain
acquisitions in the high-purity acid market.
    The FTC said it ended the prior approval requirement
because Allied no longer has businesses covered by the order.
Other restrictions still apply, it said.
    The restrcitions stem from a 1983 order by the FTC settling
charges that Allied's 1981 acquisition of Fisher Scientific Co
reduced competition in three high-purity acid markets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7847>
Universal Resources Corp said its
shareholders approved the merger of the company with Questar
Corp &lt;STR>.
    Separately, Universal said it will redeem its 15.75 pct
debentures due December 15, 1996, on April 19, at 104.8 pct of
face amount plus accrued interest.
    Universal said it will operate as a wholly owned unit of
Questar under its current name. Under terms of the merger,
which took effective today, Universal said its shareholders
will receive three dlrs a share in cash.
    It said its stock will no longer trade on the AMEX.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7855>
Armstrong World Industries
Inc said its Gilliam Furniture affiliate has purchased a
130,000 square foot building in Troutman, N.C., for undisclosed
terms.
    It said the new plant is expected to be in operation before
year-end and and will more than double Gilliam's production
capacity for upholstered furniture.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7865>
American Cablesystems Corp said
it agreed in principal to buy a cable television system in Los
Angeles County from Heritage Communications Inc &lt;HCI> for 15.5
mln dlrs.
    The company said the system being purchased serves about
12,000 subscribers in the towns of Compton, South El Monte,
Hawaiian Gardens and the communities of Willowbrook, Athens,
Firestone, Florence and East Compton.
    It said the acquisition will bring to seven the number of
cable systems it owns, manages or has agreed to buy in the Los
Angeles area.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7867>
ChemLawn Corp said it had no comment
on a sweetened offer from Waste Management Inc &lt;WMX>.
    Waste Management amended its 27 dlr per share tender offer,
raising it to 35 dlrs per share.
    ChemLawn had rejected Waste Management's earlier 27 dlr per
share offer, saying it was an undervalued bid. ChemLawn earlier
told its shareholders not to tender to Waste Management.
    ChemLawn rose 1-7/8 to 36 in over-the-counter trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7871>
Cook United INc said it expects
to report a loss a loss of 16 mln dlrs, before an extraordinary
credit of 44 mln dlrs resulting from its Chapter 11
reorganization, on sales of 217 mln dlrs for the year ended
January 31, 1987.
    For 1986, Cook reported a loss of 30.8 mln dlrs on sales of
257 mln dlrs for the prior year.
    Cook also said it began preliminary talks with private
investors looking to buy a stock position in order to provide
Cook with additional cash and assist its posture in its
negotation with its banks.
    Cook is negotiating with its bank lenders and private
sources for a borrowing facility to relieve its current working
capital requirements.
    Cook said it believes the reasons for its losses since
OCtober have been identified and are mostly non-recurring.
    Shutting down 12 unprofitable stores since November has   
effectuated cost controls and improved merchandising, it said.
    It anticipates the turnaround will contine and that
profitability with be restored. Cook now operates a total of 29
stores.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7891>
(Mountain View Investment
Corp), Phoenix, Ariz., said it acquired Maratech Communications
Cos Inc.
    Under terms of the transaction, the present directors of
Mountain View have resigned and have elected directors of
Maratech as new directors of Mountain View.
    It said a combined shareholders' meeting will soon be held
to vote on the acquisition.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7895>
Charter-Crellin Inc said it signed a
letter of intent to acquire all outstanding shares of &lt;Sebro
Plastics Inc's> capital stock.
    Charter-Crellin, a molded plastic product maker, said Sebro
is a precision molder of engineered specialty plastic products
for the automotive industry.
    The company said the deal is subject to the execution of a
definitive purchase agreement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7896>
New York State Electric and
Gas Corp said it has terminated its effort to acquire Corning
Natural Gas Corp.
    It cited as reasons the uncertain regulatory climate in New
York State and the depresed price of New York State Electric
stock which has been caused by the delay in the Nine Mile Point
Unit Two nuclear plant.
    The company had said in December that it had been
interested in acquiring Corning Natural Gas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7897>
&lt;Black Hawk Mining Inc> said it knows
of "no major activities" to account for the recent rise in the
company's stock price.
    The shares rose 11 cts to 88 cts on the Toronto Stock
Exchange yesterday.
    The company added that its application for its proposed
acquisition of &lt;Platinova Resources Ltd> and financings are
still before the listing committee of the stock exchange.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7899>
The chairman of the Senate antitrust
subcommittee said the Transportation Department was allowing
too many airline mergers and proposed its authority be
transfered to the Justice Department.
    "The Transportation Department's antitrust enforcement has
been disastrous, permitting rampant merger mania," Ohio
Democrat Howard Metzenbaum said in a statement.
    "The nine largest airlines now control 94 per cent of the
market. That's bad for competition and bad for the consumer,"
he said.
    Metzenbaum said he introduced a bill to transfer antitrust
authority over airline mergers to the Justice Department in
hopes it would more restrictive than the Transportation
Department.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7904>
&lt;Hudson's Bay Co> said a writeoff of
40.4 mln dlrs, or 1.39 dlrs per share, that it took in 1986 was
mainly due to its investment in Dome Petroleum Ltd &lt;DMP>.
     The company reported an operating profit of 33.0 mln dlrs,
or 32 cts per share, for fiscal 1986, compared to an operating
loss of 9,055,000 dlrs, or 1.23 dlrs per share, in the previous
year.
     Hudson's Bay holds about four mln shares of Dome's 10 pct
series one cumulative subordinate convertible preferred shares.
    Last March, Dome suspended payment of dividends on all
preferred shares until June 1, 1987. The shares give the holder
the right to convert to Dome common shares at 3.33 dlrs per
share.
    Dome has the right to force conversion if Dome common
reaches 3.885 dlrs per share. Dome is trading at 1.12 dlrs per
share, down one ct, today on the Toronto Stock Exchange.
    Hudson's Bay also said it had an increase in 1986 in retail
operating profit to 185.3 mln dlrs from 111.4 mln dlrs, but
that was partially offset by an increase of 14.9 mln dlrs in
interest costs and 25.3 mln dlrs in taxes.
     Hudson's Bay also said its Markborough properties
subsidiary had an operating profit of 108.6 mln dlrs, up from
98.8 mln dlrs the year before.
    Profit from non-Markborough real estate was 23.5 mln dlrs
in 1986, down from 27.6 mln dlrs a year ago.
    Operating profit from natural resources was 4.2 mln dlrs,
up 1.2 mln dlrs from the prior year. Pensions costs were
reduced by 34.9 mln dlrs due to an accounting change. Total
debt declined during the year by 251 mln dlrs to 2.28 billion
dlrs and debt to equity ratio improved to 1.8 to one from 2.1
to one.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7912>
First Financial Management Corp said it
acquired the data processing contracts and certain related
assets of Tel-A-Data L.P. for about 5.7 mln dlrs cash plus the
assumption of certain liabilities of about 2.5 mln dlrs.
    Tel-A-Data serves about 50 bank and thrift institutions
through a processing center in Lombard, Illinois.
    First Financial offers data processing services to over 800
financial institutions through 35 data processing centers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7927>
Bally Manufacturing Corp's proposed
public offering of 24 pct of its Health and Tennis Corp unit is
seen as the first step towards the sale of the entire unit,
analysts said.
    "In the longer-term horizon, Bally wants to concentrate on
its gaming businesses," said analyst Dennis Forst of Seidler
Amdec Securities Inc.
    Last week, Bally said it was considering the sale of
another non-casino unit, its Six Flags amusement park unit,
which analysts said could fetch about 300 mln dlrs.
    Bally spokesman Bill Peltier said "the company currently
has no hard plans to the sell any more of the health club
company, but in the long term we'll wait and see how the
offering goes."
    Once Bally's biggest revenue producer, the health club unit
had 1986 operating income of 60 mln dlrs on revenues of 456.2
mln dlrs, 28 pct of Bally's revenues. Analysts estimate the
unit could be sold for for 300-500 mln dlrs.
    Analysts said Bally's decision to offer shares in the unit
could be the first step to selling it.
    "It would seem obvious that an offering would decrease the
health club unit's debt, increase its cash flow and operating
income, making it an attractive buy to a third party," Steven
Eisenberg of Bear Stearns said.
    On Monday, Bally said it filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission for an initial offering of 24 pct, or 5.8
mln shares, of the unit's common stock at 13-15 dlrs a share.
   About half the proceeds, 40 mln dlrs, will be used to reduce
parent Bally Manufacturing's debt which has swelled to 1.6
billion dlrs due to recent hotel acquisitions and the purchase
of shares from Donald Trump who had threatened a hostile
takeover, according to Bally treasurer Paul Johnson.
    Remaining proceeds from the stock offering and from a
separate offering of 50 mln dlrs of 20-year convertible
subordinated debt would be used to repay about 75 mln dlrs of
short term senior bank debt of the health chain unit, a Bally
spokesperson said.
    Analysts said Bally's health club unit's profits have
remained strong, but are skeptical about the industry's long
range prospects.
    "The fitness club industry, over the last 10 years, has
grown tremendously, but the question is whether its a fad or a
permanent part of our lifestyle," said Eisenberg of Bear
Stearns.
    Analysts said fitness clubs will likely flourish if the
public stays at its peak of health consciousness, but that
overcapacity is likely to occur as consumer enthusiasm wanes.
     In addition, "the returns in the fitness club industry are
just not as high as they are in the gaming industry," said one
analyst.
     There are about 6,500 fitness clubs in the U.S., excluding
clubs run by not-for-profit organizations, according to the
Association of Physical Fitness Centers who estimates it to be
an 8.0-billion-dlr-a-year industry.
     Asked if anyone has offered to buy the unit, which is the
nation's largest health club chain, Peltier said, "no one has
the money to offer to buy it."
    "The fitness industry is a fragmented industry with no
leader and there is a great opportunity for growth through
acquisition and then standardization," said Wayne LaChapelle,
chief financial officer of Livingwell INc &lt;WELL>, the nation's
second largest fitness chain operator whih
    LaChapelle said Livingwell is always interested in
acquisition opportunities but "could not afford an acquisition
the size of Bally at this time."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7928>
Commercial Credit Co said its
American Health and Life Insurance Co sold its ordinary life
insurance business to American National Insurance Co &lt;ANAT>.
    American National will assume the business no later than
August 31, 1987, Commercial Credit said.
    The sale is part of a restructuring program begun by
Commercial Credit's subsidiary in late 1986, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7930>
Delta Air Lines &lt;DAL> said a court
order requiring Western Air Lines &lt;WAL> to arbitrate with two
of its unions will not delay the April 1 merger between the two
airlines.
    The order, which was issued by the Ninth Circuit Court of
Appeals, requires Western to discuss with its two unions
whether Western's labor contracts will be binding for Delta,
Delta said.
    "Nevertheless, the court order could cause significant
personnel problems, including the possible delay of wage
increases Delta had planned to give the Western personnel on
April 1," Ronald Allen, Delta's president, said.
    Delta said it feels the court has erred and should
reconsider the order.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7935>
Integrated Generics Inc said it
is discussing with an unnamed pharmaceutical distributor the
sale of 10 pct of its A.N.D.A. Development Corp subsidiary for
200,000 dlrs.
    Integrated said its subsidiary, Biopharmaceutics, is
negotiating with the same unnamed distributor to sell it five
prescription drugs.
    The company said it can release no other details at this
time.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7940>
ICN Pharmaceuticals Inc  has
about 500 mln dlrs in cash and another 1.50 billion dlrs in
available credit, which it intends to use to buy a
pharmaceutical company, Chairman Milan Panic said.
    At the company's annual meeting, he said an acquisition
could take place in the next 24 months.
    "The company has nearly two billion dlrs available for
acquisition today," Panic said, adding, "We are investigating a
number of companies." One company being studied could possibly
be acquired on a friendly basis, he said.
    Panic also said he intends to seek board approval today to
repurchase up to three mln ICN common shares.
    Discussing the possibility of an acquisition, Panic said
the such a purchase is necessary because ICN's current
marketing capability would not be sufficient to support
distribution of the company's products, given ICN's
expectations for market growth worldwide.
    ICN's principal product is ribavirin, also known as
Virazole. The drug is marketed in a number of countries and
described as a broad-based anti-viral.
    The company has said its possible applications include
treatment of some types of hepatitis, herpes, influenza,
childhood diseases and hemorrhagic fevers.
    ICN has been the focus of consirable investor attention in
recent months because of Virazole, which has undergone clinical
trials as a possible treatment of some AIDS-related diseases.
    Panic said today he would not discuss the drug with regard
to AIDS until the Food and Drug Administration completes its
review of data submitted by the company.
    He said an investigation of the drug being conducted by a
House Subcommittee is continuing.
    The subcommittee and the FDA have acknowledged they are
conducting separate investigations to determine whether or not
ICN witheld data from the FDA on adverse reactions to the drug.
    Virazole is approved for marketing in the U.S. in aerosol
form as a treatment for an infection that strikes infants,
called respiratory syncytial virus.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7959>
Regency Cruises Inc said it agreed to
sell a 40 pct interest in the corporation that owns the M/V
Regent Sea cruise ship for 2.1 mln dlrs to Monmouth
International SA, which owns the other 60 pct.
    The company said it also extended a 1.7 mln dlr secured
loan to Monmouth to finance completion of the renovation of
another vessel, the M/V Regent Star, which is scheduled to
begin operating in late June.
    Regency Cruises, which operates both ships, received a
five-year extension, to November 1995, to the Regent Sea's
original charter agreement, it said. It also received a
reduction, to 600,000 dlrs from 1.6 mln dlrs, of its total
charter guarantee for the Regent Sea and Regent Star.
    Regency also reported 1986 earnings of 5,695,000 dlrs or 37
cts a share on revenues of 40.9 mln dlrs. It began operations
in November 1985.
    In addition, the company said its bank, Irving Bank Corp
&lt;V>, agreed to waive a one mln dlr counter guarantee for the
bank to provide a 2.6 mln dlrs guarantee for Regency's Federal
Maritime Commission bond.
    The company said after April 3 the exercise price of its
warrants will return to two dlrs until they expire April 21.
The price had been reduced to 1.50 dlrs for the three weeks
ending April 3.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7963>
Clark Equipment Co said it has
purchased 1,339,000 shares of its common stock from an investor
group led by Arthur M. Goldberg for 26.375 dlrs a share.
    It said the purchase reduces the number of shares of Clark
common stock to be purchased under its stock repurchase plan
announced March 10. At the time the company said it would buy
back 3.0 mln shares, or 16 pct of the outstanding stock.
     Clark Equipment also said the investor group agreed to
enter into a standstill agreement which prohibits members of
the group from purchasing shares of voting securities of Clark
for 10 years.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7964>
Yankee Cos Inc's Eskey Inc &lt;ESK>
subsidiary said it reached an agreement in principle to sell
its Eskey's Yale E. Key Inc subsidiary to a new concern formed
by Key's management and a private investor for about 15.5 mln
dlrs.
    As part of sale, Eskey said the buyers will assume the 14.5
mln dlrs of publicly held Eskey 10-3/4 pct debentures due 2003.
It said the debentures will continue to be converted into
Yankee preferred. The remainder of the price will be a one mln
dlr note to Eskey. Yankee said the sale will result in a loss
of 1.5 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7966>
Wendy's International Inc declined to
comment on vague rumors by traders that it might be a takeover
target.
    Wendy's is currently trading up one at 11-3/4 on turnover
of more than 1.6 mln shares.
    A Wendy's spokesman said it was corporate policy not to
comment on market rumors.
    He further declined to attribute active trading in Wendy's
stock to a published report which stated Wall Street
professionals believe that Wendy's was possibly being studied
by Coca Cola Co (KO) with view to a possible acquisition.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7967>
Goody Products Inc said it entered
into an agreement to sell its J. and P.B. Myers packaging
business to Union Camp Corp to focus on its consumer products
and automated distribution system businesses.
    Terms of the agreement were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7968>
Champion Parts Rebuilders Inc
said it asked the Federal District Court in Chicago for a
declaratory judgment upholding its recent 5.4 mln dlr sale of
common shares and warrants to Echlin Inc &lt;ECH>.
    Champion said in hearings Thursday morning before the
federal judge on its lawsuit charging federal securities law
violations against Cormier Corp, Odilon Cormier, Morris Navon
and other defendants, the Cormier-Navon defendants indicated
they would challenge the transaction.
    Champion's suit claims that various Champion investors
alligned themselves with Cormier and Navon who failed to
disclose properly under federal laws that they were acting in
concert and they intended to spin off parts of the company and
sell the balance within two years once they got control.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7977>
An investment group led by
Audio/Video Affiliates Inc said it raised its tender offer to
acquire Cyclops Corp to 92.50 dlrs a share from 80 dlrs a
share.
    The group, Cyacq Acquisition Corp, also said it extended
the offer until April three, from March 20.
    The group said it added several conditions to its offer,
including receipt of all non-public information about Cyclops
that was provided to &lt;Dixons Group PLC> in connection with
Dixon's competing tender offer for Cyclops.
    Cyacq's sweetened offer, totaling about 398 mln dlrs, tops
Dixon's offer of 92.25 dlrs a share, or about 388 mln dlrs.
    On Wednesday Dixon said it had bought 54 pct of Cyclops'
4.3 mln shares outstanding, boosting its stake in the company
to 56 pct.
    Earlier today, however, the Securities and Exchange
Commisssion ordered Dixons to extended its tender offer until
March 24.
    Cyacq said it hopes Cyclops shareholders "will withdraw
previously tendered shares from Dixons' tender offer to take
advantage of Cyacq's higher offer."
    The SEC's order came after Cyacq filed suit to block Dixons
from taking control of Cyclops and to force an extension of
Dixons' tender offer.
    A Cyclops spokeswoman said the company had no immediate
comment on the sweetened bid from Cyacq.
    Cyacq said its new offer is also subject to Cyclops
rescinding any agreements with Dixons under which the
U.K.-based firm would receive "break-up fees" or expenses from
Cyclops or could buy Cyclops common stock from the
Pittsburgh-based company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7983>
Jefferies and Co said it is making a
market in the stock of Cyclops Corp at 92-1/2 to 95.
    Cyclops received a sweetened offer of 92.50 dlrs per share
from Cyacq Acquisition Corp, led by Audio/Video Affiliates Inc
&lt;AVA>.
      
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7984>
BEI Holdings Ltd said it acquired
Ivey-Rowton and Associates, a Nashville, Tenn.-based bank
marketing firm.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7992>
Southeastern Asset Management Inc
and its two controlling shareholders said they sold their
entire 5.6 pct stake in Allegheny International Inc.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Southeastern, a Memphis, Tenn. investment advisor, said it sold
the entire 604,000-share stake between March 13 and 16 at
prices ranging from 24.25 to 24.625 dlrs each.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7993>
Sumitomo Bakelite Co Ltd, a Japanese
company, told the Securities and Exchange Commission it has
acquired 325,000 shares of Sheldahl Inc, or 10.7 pct of the
total outstanding common stock.
    Sumitomo Bakelite said it bought the stock for 4.9 mln dlrs
for investment purposes.
    Under an between Sumitomo Bakelite and Sheldahl, as long as
its stake is more than five pct, Sumitomo said it has
preemptive rights for 60 days following notice of issuance of
new Sheldahl common stock. As long as its stake is over 10 pct,
it said it is entitled to Sheldahl board representation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7997>
Subsidiaries of John Hancock Mutual
Life Insurance Co told the Securities and Exchange Commission
they sold their entire 13.1 pct stake in Price Communications
Corp back to the company.
    The Hancock subsidiaries said they sold their entire
1,627,603-share stake in Price Communications to the company
for 11 dlrs a share on Feb 23.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8010>
Chemlawn Corp and Ecolab Inc
said they signed a definitive merger agreement under which
Ecolab will buy all outstanding Chemlawn common stock for 36.50
dlrs a share in cash, for a total of about 370 mln dlrs.
    Under terms of the agreement, Chemlawn said it rescinded
its previously announced rights dividend plan.
    Chemlawn previously rejected a 27 dlr a share offer from
Waste Management Inc &lt;WMX>.
    Yesterday, the Oak Brook, Ill.-based waste disposal company
said it was prepared to offer 33 dlrs a share, or about 330 mln
dlrs, for Chemlawn, a lawn-care company.
    Chemlawn had said last week that it was negotiating with
other possible suitors, which it did not identify.
    A Chemlawn spokesman said further details on the merger
would be issued later.
    Ecolab is a maker of commercial laundry detergent based in
St. Paul, Minn. For its first six months ended December 31, the
company earned 20.4 mln dlrs, or 76 cts a share, on sales of
421.8 mln dlrs.
    Officials at Waste Management could not be reached for
immediate comment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8020>
Halcyon Investments, a New York risk
arbitrage and securities dealing partnership, told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it has acquired 288,000
shares of Cyclops Corp, or 7.1 pct of the total outstanding.
    Halcyon said it bought the stake for 26.1 mln dlrs as part
of its ordinary risk arbitrage and securities trading business.
Other than that, the firm said there was no specific purpose in
its purchases.
    Halcyon said it might buy more stock or sell some or all of
its current stake. It said it bought the bulk of its stake
between Feb 6 and March 13.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8021>
Canadian Bond Rating Service said it
placed Chrysler Credit Canada Ltd, a subsidiary of Chrysler
Corp &lt;C>, on creditwatch until all financial details concerning
the proposed acquisition of American Motors Corp &lt;AMO> are
finalized.
    The creditwatch affects Chrysler Credit Canada's short term
notes, guaranteed notes, debentures and the recently completed
75 mln dlr 9.25 Eurobond issue due April 15, 1993.
    Canadian Bond Rating Service said that, based on facts
currently available on the proposed transaction, it does not
anticipate the necessity of a downgrade.
    Canadian Bond Rating Service said Chrysler Credit Canada
short term notes are now rated A-2 (high) and guaranteed notes
and debentures are rated B plus plus (high).
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8023>
Rogers Corp said its board
approved a shareholder rights plan designed to protect its
shareholders in the event of an attempted hostile takeover.
    Rogers said the plan is not being adopted in response to
any specific takeover attempt.
    Under the plan, shareholders may buy one share of common
stock at 65 dlrs for each share held. The rights will be
exercisable only if a person or group acquires 20 pct or more
of Rogers' shares or announces an offer for 30 pct or more.
    The dividend distribution will be made March 30 to holders
or record on that date.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8040>
American Express Co's board of
directors Monday will discuss the company's arrangement to sell
13 pct of Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc to Nippon Life Insurance
Co, a company spokesman said.
    The spokesman would not say whether the board is planning
to vote on the understanding between American Express and
Nippon Life. The Shearson stake is to be sold for 530 mln dlrs,
American Express has said.
    The spokesman also would not comment on speculation that
the board was to discuss a sale of securities to the public.
    Monday's board meeting is a regular monthly meeting. The
plan to sell part of Shearson to Nippon Life must be approved
by the American Express board and Japan's Ministry of Finance.
    Earlier, American Express and Shearson said they were
subpoenaed by the Securities and Exchange Commission. American
Express said it was subpoenaed for documents pertaining to
securities transactions of American Express and Fireman's Fund.
Shearson was subpoenaed for documents related to transactions
with Jefferies and Co and others.
    The American Express spokesman said he could not comment on
whether any officials of the firm were subpoenaed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8085>
Diversified investment company, &lt;Ariadne
Australia Ltd>, has offered 3.8 billion pesos for 38 mln shares
in the Philippine brewing firm &lt;San Miguel>, a Manila newspaper
reported.
    The Sunday Times quoted a letter sent yesterday to
President Corazon Aquino from Ariadne's chairman, New Zealander
Bruce Judge, that he was offering cash equivalent to five pct
of the nation's yearly budget to buy the shares from the
government.
    The presidential office and Ariadne representatives in
Manila were not available for comment on the report.
    The shares are the entire block seized by the government
from the United Coconut Planters Bank (UCPB) on suspicion that
the real owner was Eduardo Cojuangco, the former chairman of
San Miguel and UCPB and a close associate of deposed president
Ferdinand Marcos.
    The 38 mln shares consist of 24 mln class A stock and 14
mln class B shares.
    Government officials have said earlier that the more
valuable class A shares would not be sold to foreigners.
    The offer values each share at 100 pesos -- the price at
which the Philippine Social Security System suggested it might
buy eight mln class A shares last week.
    "Judge's offer of 3.8 billion pesos is about five pct of the
Philippines' yearly budget," Ariadne's Philippine agent Domingo
Panganiban was quoted as telling reporters yesterday.
    "Mr Judge's objective in this investment is to make his
corporation's management expertise available to San Miguel so
that the company's assets can be fully utilised."
    San Miguel, the country's largest brewer, is also one of
the major manufacturers of grocery lines.
    Panganiban is quoted as saying that San Miguel could tap
food and liquor distribution lines in Australia, Britain, the
U.S., New Zealand and Hong Kong through &lt;Barwon Farmlands Ltd>,
a listed Australian firm in which it has 30 pct equity.
    Ariadne, with about one billion dlrs in assets and turnover
of about two billion, has interests also in mining, real estate
and agricultural products.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8091>
The Australia based &lt;Ariadne
Australia Ltd>, plans to set up a branch in the Philippines to
fulfill a prerequisite for the takeover of the Philippine
brewing firm, &lt;San Miguel Corp>, a Hong Kong newspaper said.
    The Hong Kong Economic Journal quoted a spokesman of
Australian stock broker Jacksons Ltd as saying that &lt;Barwon
Farmlands Ltd>, a listed Australian firm of which Ariadne owns
a 30 pct stake, is planning a branch in the Philippines.
    He added Jacksons is arranging an offer by Barwon to pay a
total 3.8 billion pesos in cash for 38 mln San Miguel shares.
    Barwon is offering 100 pesos each for 24 mln class A San
Miguel shares and 14 mln class B stock. But the Jacksons
spokesman noted that the more valuable A stock would only be
sold to Filipinos or companies registered in the Philippines.
    He said Barwon has approached the Philippine government
which seized the block of shares from the United Coconut
Planters Bank, which is believed to be linked with the
country's deposed President Ferdinand Marcos.
    He added he expects a deal to be concluded between Barwon
and the Philippine Government in 14 days as it is the only
offer in cash, the newspaper reported.
    Hong Kong Economic Journal also noted stock market rumours
that &lt;Neptunia Corp>, a Hong Kong registered company which
controlled by San Miguel's president Andres Soriano, is the
other party keen on the block of San Miguel shares.
    The Philippine's Commission on Good Government ruled last
May against a move of Neptunia to acquire 33 mln San Miguel
shares controlled by the brewery firm's former chairman Eduardo
Cojuangco, who is also chairman of United Coconut.
    Commissioner Ramon Diaz said at the time the government
would not allow a subsidiary to buy into a parent firm, adding
San Miguel could have offered the shares to other parties.
    The Manila newspaper Sunday Times published a letter sent
yesterday to President Corazon Aquino from Ariadne's chairman,
New Zealander Bruce Judge, that he was offering cash equivalent
to five pct of the nation's yearly budget to buy the shares
from the government.
    "Judge's offer of 3.8 billion pesos is about five pct of the
Philippines' yearly budget," Ariadne's Philippine agent Domingo
Panganiban was quoted as telling reporters yesterday.
    Spokesmen of Ariadne, Jacksons and Neptunia were not
available for comment, nor any officials of the Philippines.
    &lt;San Miguel Brewery Ltd>, a Hong Kong listed company which
is 69.65 pct held by Neptunia on behalf of San Miguel Corp,
closed 40 cents higher at 15.50 H.K. Dlrs on Friday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8100>
Cooper Basin oil producer Santos Ltd
&lt;STOS.S> said it will bid 4.00 dlrs a share for the 96.03 pct
it does not already hold in diversified oil and gas company
&lt;TMOC Resources Ltd>.
    Santos said the bid values TMOC at 248.5 mln dlrs. It said
it already holds 1.91 mln of TMOC's 25 cent par shares.
    TMOC held interests outside the Cooper Basin region of
South Australia and Queensland and the acquisition would
further the Santos objective of developing as a broadly based
oil and gas company with interests outside its existing base in
the Cooper Basin, the company said in a statement.
    Santos said TMOC holds several important domestic oil and
gas production, exploration and pipeline interests.
    In the Northern Territory it has a 43.75 pct stake in and
operates the Mereenie oil and gas field in the Amadeus Basin
and owns 32 pct of &lt;N.T. Gas Pty Ltd>, owner and operator of
the Alice Springs to Darwin gas pipeline.
    In Queensland, TMOC has extensive interests in the Surat
Basin, including the 100 pct owned and operated Moonie oil
field and 33 pct of the Boxleigh gas field.
    TMOC owns 80 pct of the &lt;Moonie Pipeline Co Pty Ltd> which
owns and operates the Moonie to Brisbane oil pipeline.
    TMOC also holds 25 pct of the Jackson to Moonie oil
pipeline, 20 pct owned by Santos. Output from the Naccowlah
block, 40 pct owned by Santos, provides the bulk of the
throughput of both pipelines.
    TMOC has exploration interests in a number of areas in the
Amadeus, Surat, Eromanga and Canning basins.
    It also has oil and gas interests in Britain's North Sea,
Ecuador, and the U.S., Along with gold and base metal
production through its associate &lt;Paringa Mining and
Exploration Co Plc>, Santos said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8115>
&lt;Dart Group Corp> said it told
Supermarkets General Corp &lt;SGL> it was flexible on the price it
would pay to acquire the company.
    Dart has said it would offer 41.75 dlrs cash for each SGL
share if the SGL board recommended the offer to shareholders.
    SGL has termed the 1.62 billion dlr offer unsolicited.
    In a letter to SGL dated March 20, Dart also said it was
denied confidential information on SGL that would be given to
other potential bidders.
    SGL officials could not be reached for comment.
    Dart said it was advised that a selling brochure for the
sale of SGL had been distributed to about 20 potential buyers,
but not itself. These purchasers would also be given access to
SGL's books and records and the opportunity to talk with key
employees.
    "We suspect that one or more of the 20 are leveraged buyout
firms," said a source close to Dart. Analysts have said SGL
management may be considering a leveraged buyout.
    Dart said it remains interested in acquiring SGL on a
friendly basis and reiterated its willingness to negotiate all
the terms of its offer.
    Dart said SGL representatives said the company has not
received any other offer.
    It said it requested the confidential information to better
understand SGL, but was denied this because it refused to sign
an agreement prohibiting it from making a bid for SGL without
SGL's approval.
    The agreement would also have limited its ability to buy
SGL shares, Dart said. It considered those conditions
unreasonable in the interest of trying to negotiate a friendly
transaction, it said.
    Dart has just under five pct of SGL shares.
    Dart said it requested the information before its meeting
with SGL representatives, but held the meetings in the hope
representatives would reach an agreement.
    It said it indicated it was flexible on price, but was told
there were certain issues important to SGL management and while
they were not conditions to the deal, Dart was expected to take
them into account in putting together its package.
    It said the issues include an immediate payment of 5.7 mln
dlrs to SGL chairman Leonard Lieberman, executive vice
president James Dougherty and financial officer Murray Levine.
    Dart said this payment was intended for the three officers'
severance agreements, although there was an implication that
Lieberman and Dougherty would be leaving the company of their
own volition.
    Dart said under their present agreements, none of these
officers have any right to such accelerated payments. Also,
Dart said Lieberman, Dougherty and Levine are to be paid 2.6
mln dlrs to pay their taxes. It also said top management's
incentive shares were to be accelerated and paid for at a cost
of six mln dlrs although there are restrictions on the shares
unless waived by the company's compensation committee.
    Dart said it was to fund up to five mln dlrs for top
management's supplemental retirement plan.
    Dart said another issue was to agree to future severance
obligations and future salary guarantees for top management,
estimated at more than 15 mln dlrs in excess of obligations
under the company's present policy.
    Dart said despite such management payments, it agreed to
discuss all aspects of its offer and in fact did try to
negotiate a transaction at the March 18 meeting with SGL.
    Supermarkets General owns the Path Mark supermarket chain
and Rickels home centres.
    Dart also released a copy of a lawsuit that was being filed
by an SGL shareholder, seeking to stop SGL from taking such
actions as paying greenmail or enacting a poison pill defence.
    The suit also sought to have directors carry out their
fiduciary duty.
    Greenmail is the payment at a premium for shares held by an
unwanted suitor and a poison pill is typically the issue of
securities to shareholders which make a takeover more
expensive.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8126>
&lt;Bell Resources Ltd> said it has executed
an underwriting agreement with &lt;Equiticorp Tasman Ltd> to
acquire 57.6 mln ordinary shares in The Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd
&lt;BRKN.S> for 540 mln dlrs.
    Bell said in a statement that it now holds 29.93 pct of
BHP's 1.2 billion shares.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8130>
Ariadne group unit &lt;Barwon Farmlands
Ltd> confirmed it offered 3.8 billion pesos in cash for the 38
mln shares of Philippine brewing company &lt;San Miguel Corp>.
    The Australia-based Barwon, 30 pct owned by New Zealander
Bruce Judge's Ariadne group, said in a statement released in
Hong Kong that a formal offer had been made to the Philippines
government, which holds the shares.
    It said it was confident the offer will be reviewed
favourably.
    Newspapers in Manila and Hong Kong reported at the weekend
that an offer had been made.
    Barwon said it was represented by Australian stockbroker
&lt;Jacksons Ltd>, which forwarded a formal offer to Philippine
President Corazon Aquino of 100 pesos for each of the 38.1 mln
A and B shares of San Miguel.
    The Philippine government seized the shares, which
represent a 31 pct stake in the brewery firm, from the &lt;United
Coconut Planters Bank>, alleged by the government to be linked
with the country's deposed President Ferdinand Marcos.
    The Barwon statement said a deal is expected to be
concluded between Barwon and the Philippines government in 14
days.
    Barwon also said it made recommendations to the government
on how it could purchase the class A shares, which can only be
held by a Philippine national or a firm which is at least 60
pct held by a member of the country. It did not elaborate.
    The Hong Kong Economical Journal quoted a spokesman of
Jacksons as saying Barwon plans to set up a branch in the
Philippines to meet the criteria.
    &lt;San Miguel Brewery Ltd>, a locally listed firm 69.65 pct
held by San Miguel's &lt;Neptunia Corp> affiliate, was last traded
at 16.30 H.K. Dlrs against 15.50 dlrs on Friday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8166>
French sugar group Beghin-Say, which is
49.6 pct owned by Italy's Gruppo Ferruzzi, is to raise its
capital to 703 mln francs from 527 mln through a three-for-one
issue of shares and investment certificates to finance
expansion, president Jean-Marc Vernes told analysts.
    For the first stage Beghin-Say will issue some 2.05 mln new
65 franc shares at 500 francs to increase capital to 660 mln
francs. The share currently trades at 734 francs. Then 658,000
new 65 franc investment certificates will be issued at 400
francs, raising capital to 703 mln francs.
    The capital increase will bring the group around 1.2
billion francs in new funds to finance its expansion plans.
These include the possible acquisition of the Corn Products
maize starch plant at Haubourdin in northern France, Vernes
said.
    Ferruzzi is one of several groups bidding to buy all of
Corn Products' installations in Europe. Apart from the French
plant, these include three factories in each of Italy and West
Germany, two in Britain and Spain and one in the Netherlands
and Denmark.
    Corn Products has put a 650 mln dlr price tag on the
installations, and Beghin-Say estimates that acquisition of the
Haubourdin plant would cost between 80 and 100 mln dlrs, Vernes
said.
    If this bid fails, Beghin-Say would consider acquiring and
developing two other French plants, either in the maize or
wheat starch sector.
    Beghin-Say is also planning to finance European expansion
for its Kaysersberg subsidiary, another major reason for its
capital increase.
    Kaysersberg, which was transformed from a division of
Beghin-Say into a fully-fledged chemical subsidiary last year,
has been holding talks with other European companies on
possible accords, Vernes said. He added the company could be
introduced onto the Paris Bourse in the near future.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8204>
General Partners, the group tendering
for all GenCorp Inc shares at 100 dlrs each, said it has
started soliciting proxies against GenCorp's proposals to
increase its number of authorized shares outstanding, create a
board with staggered election dates and eliminate cumulative
voting.
    The proposals are to be voted on at the March 31 annual
meeting.
    General Partners, a partnership of privately-held &lt;Wagner
and Brown> and AFG Industries Inc &lt;AFG>, made the disclosure in
a newspaper advertisement.
    The partnership has already filed suit in U.S. District
Court in Columbus, Ohio, seeking to block a vote on the
proposals and to invalidate GenCorp's defensive preferred share
purchase rights.
    General Partners asked shareholders to either vote against
the proposals or abstain from voting on them.                  
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8205>
USAir Group Inc said it has amended
its 69 dlr per share tender offer for shares of Piedmont
Aviation Inc to reduce the maximum number it will accept to
9,309,394. Previously it had sought all shares.
    In a newspaper advertisement, USAir said the offer and
withdrawal rights have not been extended and will still expire
April 3, along with the new proration period.
    On Friday, the U.S. Department of Transportation approved
USAir's acquisition of 51 pct of Piedmont. If USAir were to
acquire more than 51 pct in the tender, it would be required to
sell the excess within one week.
    USAir said receipt of the 9,309,394 shares -- which is also
the minimum amount it will accept -- would give it a total of
about 61 pct of Piedmont shares currently outstanding and 50.1
pct on a fully diluted basis.
    The company said even if the purchase of the 9,309,394
Piedmont shares caused it to exceed the 51 pct limit, USAir
would waive the condition to the offer that the Transportation
Department approve a voting trust agreement permitting USAir to
buy and hold shares under the offer pending review of USAir's
application to gain control of Piedmont, subject to the order
not being rescinded or modified in an adverse way.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8217>
Microtel Inc said it has
completed the acquisition of &lt;American Teledata Corp> and its
US Dial subsidiary, which provide long distance telephone
service in northeast Florida. Terms were not disclosed.
    Microtel's shareholders include Norfolk Southern Corp
&lt;NSC>, M/A-Com Inc &lt;MAI>, Centel Corp &lt;CNT>, Alltel Corp &lt;AT>
and E.F. Hutton Group Inc &lt;EFH>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8220>
&lt;American Variety International
Inc> said its agreement to acquire &lt;First National
Entertainment Corp> has been terminated because First National
was not able to fulfill terms of the agreement.
    It said due to protracted negotiations with First National,
several American Variety divisions were inoperative in 1986.
    American Variety said it is reevaluating its record and
tape library for possible conversion to compact discs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8222>
Harper and Row Publishers Inc said its
special committee of independent directors has received
expressions of interest from a considerable number of domestic
and foreign firms with respect to restructuring or acquisition
transactions with the company.
    Winthrop Knowlton, chairman of special committee said "no
determination has been made by the full board as to any
transaction."
    He said the special committee and Kidder Peabody and Co Inc
intend to engage in discussions with interested parties in an
effort to come to a conclusion in the near future.
    Formation of the special committee was announced early last
week when Harper and Row said its board had taken no action on
two pending acquisition proposals.
    At that time, directors also indefinately postponed a
planned special shareholders vote on a restructuring proposal
which would have created a Class B common with 10 votes a share
and limited transferability.
    The acquisition proposals had come from Theodore L. Cross,
owner of about six pct of the company's stock who offered 34
dlrs a share, and Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc &lt;HBJ>, which
offered 50 dlrs a share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8224>
Fruit of the Loom Inc said it agreed to
sell its General Battery Corp subsidiary to Exide Corp for
about 145 mln dlrs in cash.
    The proposed sale will complete Fruit of the Loom's
previously announced plan to divest itself of unrelated
businesses.
    Proceeds from the proposed transaction are more than the
price projected in the company's recent initial public
offering, it said.
    Completion of the transaction is subject to a definitive
agreement, regulatory approvals, financing and certain other
conditions and is expected to close May one, 1987, the company
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8225>
&lt;Cityquest Plc>, a newly formed company,
is making a recommended 120 mln stg offer for builders
merchants and DIY (do-it-yourself) company &lt;Wickes Plc>, Wickes
said in a statement.
    Undertakings to accept what is effectively a management
buyout have been accepted by holders of 88.9 pct of the shares.
    The statement said the offer was due to a decision by
Wickes International Corp, a member of the U.S. Wickes
Companies &lt;WIX.A> Inc group, which holds an 80.5 pct stake, to
realise much of its investment.
    The offer would enable Wickes to become fully independent
and once the bid succeeded all the Wickes directors would
become members of the Cityquest board.
    The offer will be of 345p cash for every Wickes share.
Wickes was last quoted at 345p compared with 275p at Friday's
close.
    Wickes shareholders will also have the option of taking one
Cityquest share or 205p in loan notes for every 205p of the
cash consideration.
    Henry Sweetbaum is chairman and chief executive of both
Cityquest and Wickes, and it was intended that Cityquest's name
would be changed to Wickes in due course.
    Wickes came to the U.K. Unlisted Securities Market in
January, 1986 with a capitalisation of about 96 mln stg.
    Cityquest has a fully paid share capital of one mln stg. S
G Warburg Securities has organised commitments from a group of
investors to subscribe for 65 mln stg in shares and 28.2 mln
stg in subordinated convertible loan stock. Lead investor is
Investors in Industry Plc
    Cityquest also has loan facilities of 30 mln stg.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8255>
Delta Business Systems Inc said
it has completed a previously-announced merger into Alco
Standard Corp.
    Delta said it expects sales of about 30 mln dlrs for the
year ending in April.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8259>
Anacomp Inc said it
finalized the financing of its 128 mln dlrs purchase of
DatagraphiX Inc from General Dynamics Corp &lt;GD>.
    The financing, arranged by Drexel Burnham Lambert, consists
of 90 mln dlrs of bank financing, the private placement of 71
mln dlrs of senior subordinated notes and 25 mln dlrs of
convertible preferred stock, it said.
    DatagraphiX, a manufacturer of microgrpahics equipment has
been merged into Anacomp and will be operated as a separate
division, Anacomp said.  The division is expected to improve
results for Anacomp this year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8264>
Energy Factors Inc said it has signed
an agreement to acquire GWF Power Systems Co and Combustion
Power Co Inc from Allied-Signal Inc for undisclosed terms.
    The two Allied units operate and are developing
cogeneration projects and small petroleum-coke fueled power
plants.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8287>
Safeguard Scientific Inc
said its subsidiary, Coherent Communications Systems Corp,
purchased a telecommunications equipment business for an
undisclosed amount of cash, notes and Coherent common stock.
    Safeguard said it bought the business unit from Comsat
TeleSystems Inc, a subsidiary of Communications Satellite Corp
&lt;CQ>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8288>
Patrick Petroleum Co said it
signed a definitive agreement to buy Bayou Resources Inc.
    As previously announced, the transaction is valued at about
8.8 mln dlrs, including 2.8 mln dlrs in debt.
    Under the agreement, Patrick will pay six dlrs per share
for each Bayou share, with additional value being given for
Bayou's preferred and options. Bayou has 827,000 shares out.
    Depending upon the results of the re-evaluation of a
significant Bayou well as of Jan. 1, 1988, Bayou stockholders
may receive up to an additional two mln dlrs in stock and cash,
which has not been included in the 8.8 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8293>
IC Industries Inc said its Abex Corp
subsidiary agreed to sell its sintered friction materials
business in Italy to Troy, Michigan-based MLX Corp, for
undisclosed terms.  Completion of the proposed transaction is
subject to approval by the Italian government, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8298>
&lt;Deloitte Haskins and Sells>, an
accounting and consulting firm, said it bought a stake in
&lt;Holland Systems Corp>, a software and services company.
    The company also said it set up a venture with Holland
Systems to develop and market an integrated line of information
management products and services.
    It said products from the venture are expected to be
introduced within the next year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8327>
A joint venture controlled by Dallas
investor Bradbury Dyer said it had acquired 377,000 shares, or
9.9 pct, of the common stock of Munford Inc.
    In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the concern, which comprises Paragon Associates and Paragon
Associates II, said it bought the stake for 7,659,000 dlrs and
may buy more shares.
    Paragon said it bought the shares for investment purposes.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8351>
American Television and
Communications Corp said it has completed the acquisition of
Manhattan Cable Television Inc from Time Inc for about
9,400,000 Class B common shares.
    American Television was spun off from Time in August 1986.
The company said following this transaction, Time now owns 82
pct of American Television.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8353>
DWG Corp said it has completed the
previously-announced sale of its Texsun Corp subsidiary to
Texsun Corp subsidiary to Sundor Brands Inc for 27.5 mln dlrs
and the assumption of liabilities.
    It said proceeds have been placed in escrow pending the
outcome of talks with lenders.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8355>
Allied Supermarkets Inc said it entered
into a definitive agreement to sell its Michigan operations for
about 46 mln dlrs in cash and debt plus assumption of
substantially all of Allied's liabilities other than senior
subordinated debentures.
    It said the operations will be sold to Meadowdale Foods
Inc, a corporation formed by members of its existing
management, including Chairman David Page and President Lon
Makanoff.
    The transaction is conditioned on  Allied's pending merger
with the Vons Cos Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8359>
KLM Royal Dutch Airlines &lt;KLM.AS> is
discussing marketing cooperation with U.S. regional carrier Air
Atlanta Inc but it is not seeking to take a stake in the
airline, a KLM spokesman said.
    "We're not considering taking either a majority or minority
stake in Air Atlanta, but we are thinking of providing them
with a loan," the spokesman told Reuters in a comment on a Wall
Street Journal report saying debt-laden Air Atlanta could sell
as much as 25 pct of its stock to the Dutch airline.
    KLM last week denied a Dutch press report saying it was
discussing a takeover of Air Atlanta.
    The KLM spokesman said Air Atlanta's regional route
network, centred on Atlanta, Ga, could serve as a feeder to
KLM's international network, which includes direct flights
between Atlanta and Amsterdam.
    KLM and Air Atlanta had been talking "for some time," he
said, but declined to elaborate further on the talks or give
details of the loan to Air Atlanta.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8361>
Gencorp Inc said it filed suit
against the unsolicited 100 dlr-a-share tender offer of Wagner
and Brown and AFG INdustries.
    Gencorp said it is seeking an injunction against the offer
because it is violates federal securities laws and margin
regulations.
    Gencorp also said its board is carefully studying the offer
and will make a decision on whether or not shareholders should
accept or reject it by March 31.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8367>
&lt;Principal Neo-Tech Inc> said it
completed the sale of its subsidiary, Neo-Tech Inc, to Seismic
Holdings Inc and Energy Holdings Inc, of Denver, Colo.
    As part of the price, Principal Neo-Tech received notes and
preferred shares of Energy Holdings. However, terms were not
disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8370>
PHH Group Inc said it acquired
two design firms for undisclosed terms.
    In 1986, the two firms, Neville Lewis Associates of New
York and Walker Associates Inc of L.A., produced 15.6 mln dlrs
in total fees.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8373>
Charter Federal Savings and Loan
Association of Bristol, Va., said it has agreed to acquire
Jefferson Savings and Loan Association of Warrenton, Va.
    Under terms of the transaction, which would result in a 1.3
billion dlr thrift institution, stockholders of Jefferson will
get 30.50 dlrs per share, half in cash and half in shares of
Charter.
    The resulting association will operate under the name of
Charter and will be based in Bristol.
    The transaction is valued at about 16.3 mln dlrs, a
Jefferson spokesman said.
    Charter said the merger is subject to approval of the
Federal Home Loan Bank Board.
    Jefferson reported a 1.5 mln dlrs loss and assets of 360
mln dlrs for the year ended September 30, 1986.
    For the year ended June 30, Charter reported net income of
7.9 mln dlrs. Assets totaled about 844.0 mln dlrs as of
December 31.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8396>
A Coca Cola Co spokesman said rumors
the company is interested in acquiring Wendy's International
&lt;WEN> are not true.
    "Those rumors are not correct," said Carlton Curtis, an
assistant vice president at Coke. "We have stated many times
that Coca Cola Co has no interest in an acquisition in the food
service industry and thereby becoming a competitor to our food
service customers."
    Wendy's stock has been flying high on the rumors for two
days. Today, Wendy's hit a high of 13-3/8 before dropping back
to 12-3/8, up 5/8 in heavy trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8406>
Allegheny International Inc said it
and First Boston Inc's &lt;FBC> Sunter Holdings Corp subsidiary
have been named as defendants in a class action filed in the
Court of Common Pleas for Allegheny County, Pa., which seeks an
injunction against Allegheny's proposed merger into Sunter.
    The company said its board and some former directors and
First Boston were also named as defendants.
    It said it and Sunter intend to vigorously oppose the
action.
    Allegheny said the class action suit alleges the price to
be paid in the transaction is grossly unfair. The company said
the suit's allegations are similar to those contained in an
earlier federal court suit.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8428>
U.S. Bancorp's Pacific State
Bank of Lincoln City said it plans to merge with U.S. Bancorp's
U.S. National Bank of Oregon.
    Under the pact, Pacific State will become part of the U.S.
Bank branch system.
    The company said the merger is expected to be completed
after mid-year, following regulatory approval.
    All local staff and management will remain the same, it
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8430>
Wolverine World Wide Inc said
it signed a letter of intent to sell to an investment group two
subsidiaries, Kaepa Inc, an athletic footwear maker, and its
international marketing arm, Kara International Inc.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Wolverine said the action continues the restructuring
operation begun last July to make the company more competitive
and profitable. Wolverine said it will concentrate its effort
in the athletic footwear market in its Brooks footwear
division.
    Wolverine said it expects "favorable results in the second
half as a result" of its restructuring. In 1986 it said
restructuring helped improve its financial capabilities.
    The company reported a 12.6 mln dlr loss, or 1.75 dlrs a
share, in 1986 due largely to a 9.0 mln dlr restructuring
charge and a 4.0 mln dlr inventory evaluation readjustment
taken in the second quarter.
    Since that time, it has sold two small retail operations,
closed and consolidated five domestic footwear factories and
closed about 15 retail locations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8432>
PacifiCare Health Systems Inc
said it is in negotiations to acquire Capital Health Care, a
40,000 member health maintenance organization servicing Salem
and Corvallis, Ore.
    The company said it will not disclose terms or other
details of the acquisition until negotiations are completed.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8438>
Martin T. Sosnoff said his &lt;MTS
Acquisition Corp> to date has received only a "negligible"
number of Caesars World Inc shares in response to its 28-dlr-
per-share tender offer for all shares.
    Sosnoff also said he has held preliminary talks with Pratt
Hotel Corp &lt;PRAT> and Southmark Corp &lt;SM> on forming a joint
venture to enter into talks to acquire Caesars in a friendly
transaction in which Sosnoff would have a 50 pct interest and
Pratt and Southmark the remainder.
    Sosnoff said the talks with Pratt and Southmark are not
being actively pursued at the presentand may or may not be
continued in the future.  He said there could be no assurance
that a joint venture would be formed or that Caesars would
agreed to talks.  "Several preliminary contacts with
representatives of Caesars have not resulted in any indication
that it wishes to enter into such negotiations," Sosnoff said.
    He said based on talks with staff members of gaming
authorities, there can be no assurance that the necessary
regulatory review of its bid for Caesars World can be completed
by the original April Three expiration date.
    Sosnoff said it has extended the tender until May 15.  The
bid remains subject to regulatory approvals and the arrangement
of financing.
    Pratt, which owns the Sands Hotel and Casino in Atlantic
City, N.J., where Caesars operates the Boardwalk Regency Hotel
and Casino, recently waged an apparently unsuccessful campaign
to acquire control of Resorts International Inc &lt;RTA> against
New York developer Donald Trump.  Southmark owns about 37 pct
of Pratt Hotel.
    Caesars World's boasrd has urged rejection of the offer on
the grounds that it is inadequate and has said it would
investigate alternative transactions.  Sosnoff currently owns
about 13.3 pct of Caesars World.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8441>
Takeover speculation buoyed Wendy's
International Inc's stock, even after Coca Cola Co took the
fizz out of market rumors by denying it was an interested
suitor.
    Wendy's retreated from an earlier high of 13-3/8, and lost
a point when Coca Cola &lt;KO> said the rumors were untrue.
However, Wendy's remained up 5/8 at 12-3/8 on volume of more
than three mln shares.
    Several analysts were skeptical of the rumors, yet they
said they could not conclude a takeover of the fast food
restaurant chain was impossible.
    Wendy's declined comment on takeover rumors of all kinds.
Yet, a Wendy's spokesman said the company was aware of a
Business Week article, which named Coke as a potential suitor
and which market sources said helped ignite the rumor mill.
    Market sources mentioned Anheuser-Busch Inc &lt;BUD> and
Pepsico Inc &lt;PEP> as alternatives to Coke as acquirers. Neither
of those companies would comment, nor would the Wendy's
official.
    "It doesn't happen every day, every week, every month, but
its not unusual for us to be linked with those companies," said
Denny Lynch, Wendy's vice president of communications.
    However, Lynch would not comment specifically on the
current market rumors.
    Even before Coke denied the rumors, analysts had been
skeptical of a takeover since Atlanta-based Coke has stated it
views fast food chains as customers and does not want to become
a competitor to them.
    "I can't put another name on it," said Kidder peabody
analyst Jay Freedman as vaguer rumors continued to hold up
Wendy's stock. "It very well could be someone's interested."
    But Freedman said he doesn't believe now is the right time
for Wendy's to be sold.
    "They're obviously having operational difficulties. I've
always believed at the right price Wendy's would consider (an
offer), but I can't believe this is the right price at the
right time," Freedman said.
    "If a transaction takes place, the buyer's going to control
the situation," Freedman said.
    "I just don't think there's anything going on. I don't
think it's worth much more than where it is," said Joseph Doyle
of Smith Barney.
    Analysts said Wendy's has suffered largely from the "burger
wars" between itself, McDonald's Corp &lt;MCD> and Pillsbury Co's
&lt;PSY> Burger King chain. Wendy's, the third largest fast food
hamburger chain in the U.S., lost about 11 pct in same store
sales last year, analysts said.
    Wendy's also fumbled when it introduced a high-priced
breakfast, which it has since withdrawn, analysts said. Some
analysts said the company should be bringing in new products,
but it is too soon to predict a significant turnaround.
    There are analysts, however, who believe Wendy's may be
vulnerable to a takeover.
    James Murren of C.J. Lawrence said Wendy's could be worth
14 to 15 dlrs on a break-up basis. He said the company has
improved its debt-to-equity ratio and Wendy's owns a high
percent of its own restaurants - 38 pct of 3,500.
    "They also have some attractive leaseholds on their
restaurants," Murren said.
    Murren said that despite the downturn in sales last year,
Wendy's real sales, store for store, turned upwards in the
fourth quarter. "That was about the first time in seven
quarters," he said.
    Caroline Levy of E.F. Hutton also believes something could
be going on with Wendy's. "My gut feeling is something's going
to happen. I don't know what," she said.
    She estimated a takeover price would be at least 15 dlrs
per share.
    One analyst speculated that Coke became the rumored suitor
because Wendy's decided to sell Coke at its fountains instead
of Pepsi.
    Wendy's is currently embroiled in litigation brought by
Pepsi, which holds a contract with the company, analysts said.
Pepsi's soda is still sold in the Wendy's restaurants.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8467>
BellSouth Corp said it completed its
previously-announced agreement to acquire &lt;Dataserv Inc> for an
exchange of shares.
    BellSouth said under the Nov 25, 1986, agreement, it
exchanged one of its common shares for every 13.3 Dataserv
common shares. The exchange reflects the Feb 23 three-for-two
BellSouth stock split, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8472>
Rexham Corp, a maker of
packaging materials and machinery, said it received an
unsolicited offer of 43 dlrs a share from Nortek Inc &lt;NTK>.
    Nortek, a Providence, R.I., textile manufacturer, has
disclosed it holds 381,050 Rexham shares, or about 9.1 pct of
the outstanding, the company said.
    Rexham said it does not welcome the proposal but added its
board will study the offer and respond in due course.
    Nortek has proposed paying half cash and half Nortek
convertible preferred stock for Rexham, which has about 4.2 mln
shares outstanding.
    The cash portion would include the amount previously paid
for the Rexham stake and the terms of the convertible preferred
stock would be negotiated, the company said.
    Rexham said it received the takeover offer in a letter from
Nortek.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8496>
Caesars World Inc declined
immediate comment on news that Martin Sosnoff's &lt;MTS
Acquisition Corp> has held preliminary talks with two companies
on the possibility of forming a joint venture to pursue the
acquisition of Caesars.
    Earlier today MTS said it held talks with Pratt Hotel Corp
&lt;PRAT> and Southmark Corp &lt;SM> on forming a venture to acquire
Caesars.
    MTS also reported that it received a "negligible" number of
Caesars World shares in response to its 28 dlr per share tender
offer.
    Earlier this month Caesars World rejected the Sosnoff
takeover bid and said it is considering alternatives that
include a restructuring or sale of the company to another
party.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8497>
&lt;Dixons Group PLC> said it received a
letter on March 19 from Citicorp Capital Investors Ltd, part of
the Cyacq investor group making a rival bid for Cyclops Corp
&lt;CYL>, proposing to drop the group's offer if Dixons would sell
Cyclops industrial businesses to Citicorp.
    "Cyacq's main equity investor appears ready to pull out and
deal directly with us for merely part of the company" said
Dixons. "It raises questions as to the strength of their
consortium and the purpose of their offer."
    Dixons also said a U.S. Federal Court had refused a request
by counsel for Cyacq, Audio/Video Affiliates Inc &lt;AVA> and a
shareholder plaintiff to prevent Dixons from
completing its tender offer for Cyclops. It also said the court
refused to require Cyclops to provide Cyacq with confidential
information previously provided to Dixons.
    On Friday Cyacq Corp, an investor group led by Audio/Video
Affiliates and Citicorp, raised their offer for Cyclops to
92.50 dlrs per share from 80 dlrs per share, if certain
conditions were satisfied.
    Last week Dixons said it won out over rival bidders for
Cyclops after getting 54 pct of Cyclop's oustanding with a
90.25 dlr or 384 mln dlr tender offer that expired March 18.
    On Friday, Dixons agreed to reopen its tender offer until
March 25, Wednesday.
    Dixons today called Cyacq's higher 92.50 dlr a share offer
for Cyclops "highly conditional."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8509>
Citicorp Capital Investors Ltd, a
unit of Citicorp, said it wants to buy Cyclops Corp's steel
assets from Dixons Group PLC and is willing to pay 124.4 mln
dlrs, nearly 13 mln dlrs more than had been offered for the
assets by Alleghany Corp.
    The disclosure of the Citicorp unit's interest in Cyclops'
Industrial Group came in disclosure documents filed by Dixons
Group with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
    Alleghany's MSL Industries Inc unit had agreed to buy the
steel assets from Dixons Group for 111.6 mln dlrs.
    Dixons Group has tendered for all outstanding Cyclops
shares at 90.25 dlrs a share in cash.
    The Citicorp unit said its higher offer came to about three
dlrs more for each Cyclops share outstanding.
    As a condition of its offer, it said Dixons would have to
increase the cash price it was to pay for each Cyclops share to
93.25 dlrs in cash.
    Dixons on Friday extended the expiration time of its tender
offer until midnight (EST) March 24.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8512>
Mark IV Industries Inc said it plans
to begin a tender offer at 25 dlrs a share for all outstanding
shares of Conrac Corp &lt;CAX>, a Stamford, Conn., maker of
control instruments and telecommunications products.
    Mark IV said it owns about 670,400 shares or about 9.9 pct
of Conrac's outstanding shares.
    The offer, to be made through Mark IV Acquisition Corp, a
wholly owned subsidiary, will not be conditioned on any minimum
number of shares being tendered, the company said.
    The tender offer will be conditioned upon, among other
things, the completion of financing arrangements.
    The terms and conditions of the offer will be described in
documents to be filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission and mailed to Conrac shareholders as soon as
possible.
    Bear Stearns and Co is expected to act as dealer manager
for the offer, it said.
    A Conrac spokesman declined comment.
    Conrac has about 6.75 mln shares outstanding. Its shares
closed off 1-3/8 at 21-1/8 as about 84,400 shares changed
hands.
    Mark IV is a Williamsville, N.Y., maker of pastic products
and industrial control equipment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8514>
MHI Group Inc said it is
affiliated with several investors who have entered into a
letter of intent providing for the purchase of Star of David
Memorial Gardens and Cemetery.
    The company said those investors will, under certain
circumstances, cede their rights under the letter of intent and
any definitive agreement to purchase the Fort Lauderdale, Fla.,
funeral home and cemetery business to MHI.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8518>
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc said it
is disappointed that no negotiations with Harper and Row
Publishers Inc are underway.
    Harcourt made a 50 dlrs a share unsolicited bid on March
11.
    On March 17, Harcourt said three of its officers met with
Harper's financial advisor but has had no discussions since
then.
    Harcourt said it does not plan to increase its bid.
    Harcourt's bid was preceded by an earlier 34 dlrs a share
bid by Theodore Cross.
    Harper had no response to Harcourt's announcement. Earlier
today, Harper said a recently appointed special committee of
independent directors had received expressions of interest from
several domestic and foreign firms with respect to
restructuring or acquisition transactions.
    Harper said no determination had been made as to any
transaction and that its special committee is continuing in
talks with interested parties in an effort to come to a
conclusion in the near future.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8543>
Du Pont Co has increased its equity
stake in &lt;Perceptive Systems Inc> to 33.5 pct from 20 pct,
Perceptive Systems said.
    Perceptive Systems, a venture capital firm based in
Houston, makes digital imaging equipment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8544>
Quaker Oats Co said Keystone Partners
Inc has purchased Vernell's Fine Candies Inc, previously an
indirect subsidiary of Quaker. The price was not disclosed.
    It said Vernell's, based in Bellevue, Wash., had annual
sales exceeding 30 mln dlrs. Vernell's was acquired by Quaker
in its acquisition of Golden Grain Macaroni Co in August 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8546>
Graphics Industries Inc said it
terminated negotiations for the acquisition of &lt;Holladay-Tyler
Printing Corp>, Rockville, Md.
    The companies on March 10 announced that they had signed an
agreement in principle for the acquisition.
    No reason was given termination of the negotiations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8558>
&lt;Cooper Canada Ltd> said it told those
who have expressed interest in acquiring control of the company
that it would entertain no offer unless it were made to holders
both of class A non-voting shares and voting common.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8561>
American Express Co said its board
approved a public offering of about 18 pct of its wholly owned
Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc brokerage unit.
    American Express also approved the previously announced
plan to sell about 13 pct, or 13 mln convertible preferred, of
the unit to Nippon Life insurance co for 538 mln dlrs. The
preferred shares are convertible to the same number of common
shares following Hart-Scott-Rodino and FDIC approvals.
    American Express said it will maintain 60 pct, or 60 mln of
the 100 mln shares of Shearson that will be outstanding.
    American Express said it had agreed with Nippon life that
American Express will hold a minimum of 40 pct of Shearson
until January, 1999.
   American Express said 7.5 mln Shearson shares would be held
by certain employees of Shearson and one mln by a Shearson
stock ownership plan to be formed.
    American Express said it anticipates a registration
statement for the public offering will be filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission shortly.
    American Express also declared a two-for-one stock split
and raised its quarterly dividend to 38 cts per share from 36
cts on a pre-split basis. Both dividends are payable May 8, to
shareholders of record April 3. There are currently 215 mln
American Express shares outstanding.
    The transaction with Nippon Life remains subject to
approval by the Japanese ministry of finance, which is expected
in April.
    American Express also said an agreement was reached by
Shearson and Nippon Life providing for a joint venture in
London.
    The venture will focus on investment advisory asset
management, market research and consulting on financing. It
also said it expects the relationship to extend to selected
projects involving American Express, Shearson Lehman and Nippon
Life in key financial centers of Asia and other regions, and to
future personnel exchanges.
    Under the agreement, Nippon will receive 13 mln cumulative
preferred shares with a five pct dividend rate. The cumulative
preferred stock will become convertible with voting powers to
an equal number of common shares following the U.S. government
approvals.
    American Express said that assuming conversion of the
preferred stock held by Nippon, 100 mln shares of Shearson
Lehman common stock would be outstanding. For the public
offering, it said there will be an underwriters overallotment
option to purchase 1.8 mln shares.
    American Express will also grant Nippon Life a five-year
warrant to purchase one mln American Express common shares at
100 dlrs per share. There are currently 215 mln American
Express shares outstanding.
    Nippon Life would be entitled to nominate two directors to
the Shearson board and one representative to serve as an
adviser to the American Express board of directors.
    "These proposed transactions are yet another signal that
american express intends to stay in the forefront of the
financial services industry worldwide," said American Express
Chairman James D. Robinson. "The implementation of our plans,
moreover, will enable us to maintain a majority interest in
shearson while enhancing the strength of our balance sheet by
tapping additional capital resources for shearson outside
american express."
Reuter...
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8567>
Hecla Mining Co said it agreed to buy a
28 pct stake in the Greens Creek joint venture from Amselco
Minerals Inc, a unit of British Petroleum PLC's &lt;BP> BP North
America Inc unit.
    The Greens Creek venture is engaged in final project
engineering of a gold-silver-lead-zinc ore body on Admiralty
Island, about 15 miles southwest of Juneau, Alaska.
    Hecla said it estimates its total investment in the
project, including its share of production costs, will be about
45 mln dlrs.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8571>
Avalon Corp said that &lt;Deltec
Panamerica SA> has arranged to sell its 23 pct stake in Avalon
and that Deltec's three representatives on Avalon's board had
resigned.
    An Avalon spokeswoman declined to indentify the buyer of
Deltec's stake or give terms of the sale.
    In addition, Avalon said three other directors resigned. It
said Benjamin W. Macdonald, a director of &lt;TMOC Resources Ltd>,
the principal holder of Avalon stock, and Hardwick Simmons, a
vice chairman of Shearson Lehman Bros Inc, were then named to
the board.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8572>
The Quaker Oats Co said it sold
its Vernell's Fine Candies Inc unit to privately-held Keystone
Partners Inc for an undisclosed price.
    The company said Vernells had sales of around 30 mln dlrs
in the year ended in August, 1986.
    Quaker Oats acquired Vernells in August, 1986 when it
purchased Golden Grain Macaroni Co.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8615>
&lt;TMOC Resources Ltd> told shareholders
not to accept Santos Ltd's &lt;STOS.S> 4.00 dlr a share takeover
bid pending advice from Macquarie Hill Samuel Corporate
Services, its corporate advisor.
    It said in a statement the Santos bid was below the
underlying value of the shares as assessed by Macquarie Hill
Samuel at between 4.08 dlrs and 4.72.
    TMOC, formerly the Moonie Oil Co Ltd, said the valuation
was made in response to an earlier and still current bid of
2.55 dlrs a share by &lt;Elders Resources Ltd>. Elders Resources
holds 19.9 pct of TMOC's 62 mln shares.
    TMOC said it did not know Elders Resources' response to the
bid or that of its other major shareholder the &lt;Australian Gas
Light Co>. The latter has a 10.5 pct stake in TMOC.
    &lt;Avalon Corp> of the U.S. Has a 17 pct stake in TMOC
through an option agreement.
    Santos, which is 15 pct owned by Elders Resources,
yesterday said its bid valued TMOC at 248.5 mln dlrs.
    TMOC said today this was not a premium over the share price
before the bid and that TMOC had traded at up to 4.06 dlrs a
share in the last two weeks.
    TMOC said in the statement that the bid was unsolicited and
that Santos had only a 3.07 pct stake despite paying up to four
dlrs a share on-market.
    TMOC has oil and gas interests and pipelines which
complement the operations of Santos, the major Cooper Basin oil
and gas producer.
    TMOC shares today closed five cents up at 4.15 dlrs on
turnover of 182,000 shares while Santos, due to release its
profit result today, rose eight cents to 4.50 dlrs on volume of
245,000 shares.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8618>
Industrial holding company Williams
Holdings Plc said it was bidding 542.2 mln stg for the ordinary
shares of building products and packaging group Norcros Plc.
    The offer would be made on the basis of 29 new Williams
shares for every 50 in Norcros, or 432.7p a share
    Norcros shares firmed to 410p at 0914 GMT from a close last
night of 397p.
    A statement by Williams said it was confident of the merits
of the proposed merger and it had therefore taken care to
propose from the outset the right terms, including a full cash
alternative.
    The offer will include a partial convertible alternative
under which shareholders would receive up to a total of 205.69
mln new second convertible shares in Williams instead of their
ordinary share allocations.
    The offer for Norcros preferential shares offers one
Williams preferential share for each one of Norcros, for a
value of 130p each and a total of 2.9 mln stg.
    Last week Williams reported that pretax profits for 1986
rose to 22.9 mln stg from 6.3 mln.
    Speculation about a bid for Norcros had been circulating in
the market for several months, dealers said. Initially it
centred on &lt;Bunzl Plc>, which once held a 2.6 pct stake, then
switched to Williams when it began accumulating shares.
    Earlier this year, Williams suggested holding talks with
Norcros on a possible merger but was rebuffed by Norcros which
replied that any benefits that could be achieved could also
result from normal trading.
    In the six months to end-September, Norcros reported a rise
in pretax profits to 20.14 mln stg from 18.55 mln on turnover
that lifted to 311.82 mln from 303.91 mln
    Williams Holdings began expanding from 1982 when it had a
market capitalisation of around one mln stg. A series of
acquisitions in the next four years has pushed its
capitalisation up to around 380 mln.
    The convertible offer would be on the basis of four
Williams convertibles for every Norcros share, worth 428p a
share. The cash alternative would offer the equivalent of
400.2p a share.
    The announcement of the bid pushed Williams share price
down to 733p from last night's close at 750p.
    Williams said it held a total 850,000 shares in Norcros, or
0.7 pct, while an associate held a further 1.99 mln or 1.6 pct.
    There was no immediate response from Norcros.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8628>
Nippon Life Insurance Co's 538 mln dlr
purchase of a 13 pct stake in Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc
brokerage unit is a shrewd move that other Japanese insurers
are likely to follow, securities analysts said.
    The investment in one of Wall Street's top brokerage houses
is likely to pay off in dollars and international market
position, they said. "It's part of a trend towards growing
capital participation by Japanese insurance firms in foreign
financial institutions," said Simon Smithson, an analyst with
Kleinwort Benson International Inc in Tokyo.
    The investment in Shearson Lehman, a growing firm described
by some analysts as the top U.S. Retail brokerage, will give
Nippon Life a ringside seat and possibly lower commissions on
Wall Street, where it invests an increasing percentage of its
assets of 90.2 billion dlrs, they said.
    Nippon Life staff will also acquire expertise in business
sectors which have not yet opened up in Japan, they added.
    The agreement between the two companies calls for a 50-50
joint venture in London focussing on investment advisory asset
management, market research, and consulting on financing.
    Nippon Life is Japan's largest insurance company and the
world's biggest institutional investor, analysts said.
    The Japanese finance ministry is expected to approve the
deal in April, making Nippon Life the first Japanese life
insurance firm to take a stake in a U.S. Financial firm.
    The limit on foreign assets as a proportion of Japanese
insurers' assets was increased to 25 pct from 10 pct last year.
Since then, they have stepped up purchases of foreign stocks
and sought to deepen their understandng of foreign markets and
instruments.
    Last year, a Sumitomo Life Insurance Co official was
appointed to E.F. Hutton Group Inc unit E.F. Hutton and Co's
board and Sumitomo Bank Ltd spent 500 mln dlrs to become a
limited partner in Goldman, Sachs and Co.
    Smithson said Japanese banks started buying smaller and
problem-plagued banks in 1984. "But now Japanese are going for
blue-chip organisations," he said.
    "It's a reflection of what has happened in manufacturing
industries," said Brian Waterhouse at James Capel and Co. "With a
historically high yen, and historically low interest rates,
there's an increasing disincentive to invest in Japan."
    Competition in fund management has grown along with greater
Japanese savings. The typical salaried employee has 7.33 mln
yen in savings, reflecting an annual average savings rate of 17
to 18 pct, he said.
    To stay competitive, fund managers must invest overseas and
gain experience with financial instruments which are likely to
spread to Japan with further deregulation. "The high regulatory
environment has delayed (life insurance firms')
diversification. Now there's a growing number of new products
in an environment of increasing competition for performance on
fund management," Smithson said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8666>
Nippon Life Insurance Co's 538 mln dlr
purchase of a 13 pct stake in Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc
brokerage unit is a shrewd move that other Japanese insurers
are likely to follow, securities analysts said.
    The investment in one of Wall Street's top brokerage houses
is likely to pay off in dollars and international market
position, they said. "It's part of a trend towards growing
capital participation by Japanese insurance firms in foreign
financial institutions," said Simon Smithson, an analyst with
Kleinwort Benson International Inc in Tokyo.
    The investment in Shearson Lehman, a growing firm described
by some analysts as the top U.S. Retail brokerage, will give
Nippon Life a ringside seat and possibly lower commissions on
Wall Street, where it invests an increasing percentage of its
assets of 90.2 billion dlrs, they said.
    Nippon Life staff will also acquire expertise in business
sectors which have not yet opened up in Japan, they added.
    The agreement between the two companies calls for a 50-50
joint venture in London focussing on investment advisory asset
management, market research, and consulting on financing.
    Nippon Life is Japan's largest insurance company and the
world's biggest institutional investor, analysts said.
    The Japanese finance ministry is expected to approve the
deal in April, making Nippon Life the first Japanese life
insurance firm to take a stake in a U.S. Financial firm.
    The limit on foreign assets as a proportion of Japanese
insurers' assets was increased to 25 pct from 10 pct last year.
Since then, they have stepped up purchases of foreign stocks
and sought to deepen their understandng of foreign markets and
instruments.
    Last year, a Sumitomo Life Insurance Co official was
appointed to E.F. Hutton Group Inc unit E.F. Hutton and Co's
board and Sumitomo Bank Ltd spent 500 mln dlrs to become a
limited partner in Goldman, Sachs and Co.
    Smithson said Japanese banks started buying smaller and
problem-plagued banks in 1984. "But now Japanese are going for
blue-chip organisations," he said.
    "It's a reflection of what has happened in manufacturing
industries," said Brian Waterhouse at James Capel and Co. "With a
historically high yen, and historically low interest rates,
there's an increasing disincentive to invest in Japan."
    Competition in fund management has grown along with greater
Japanese savings. The typical salaried employee has 7.33 mln
yen in savings, reflecting an annual average savings rate of 17
to 18 pct, he said.
    To stay competitive, fund managers must invest overseas and
gain experience with financial instruments which are likely to
spread to Japan with further deregulation. "The high regulatory
environment has delayed (life insurance firms')
diversification. Now there's a growing number of new products
in an environment of increasing competition for performance on
fund management," Smithson said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8685>
Norcros Plc &lt;NCRO.L> the building
products and packaging group said its board had no hesitation
in unanimously rejecting this morning's 542.2 mln stg bid from
&lt;Williams Holdings Plc>, the industrial holding firm.
    The company said Williams' 432.7p per share offer was
unsolicited and unwelcome and significantly undervalues
Norcros. By 1228 gmt Norcros shares were quoted at 418p, up
from 397p at yesterday's close. Williams was 15p higher at 765.
    The Norcros board's detailed views will be sent to
shareholders when the formal offer document has been issued by
Williams.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8689>
Merrill Lynch and Co Inc is holding
talks on acquiring Canadian brokerage firms, a company
spokesman told Reuters.
    He said one of the firms with which Merrill Lynch is
negotiating is &lt;Burns Fry Corp> of Toronto, which has already
received an offer from Security Pacific Corp's &lt;SPC> 83 pct
owned &lt;Hoare Govett Ltd> London-based brokerage unit.  The
Hoare Govett bid is valued at about 210.4 mln U.S. dlrs.
    The spokesman said the talks are the result of a change in
Ontario securities laws that takes effect June 30.
    Currently, companies outside the Canadian securities
industry are prohibited from owning more than 10 pct of a
Canadian broker.  On June 30, 1987, foreign brokers will be
allowed to own up to 50 pct of Canadian brokers, and the
percentage will rise to 100 pct a year later.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8690>
Mark IV Industries Inc said it has
started the 25 dlr per share tender offer for all shares of
Conrac Corp that it announced yesterday afternoon.
    In a newspaper advertisement, the company said the offer
and withdrawal rights expire April 20 unless extended.  The
offer is not conditioned on receipt of any minimum number of
shares but is conditioned on the arrangement of financing.
    Mark IV already owns about 9.9 pct of Conrac's 6.8 mln
shares outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8691>
Ecolab Inc said it has started its
previously-announced tender offer for all shares of ChemLawn
Corp at 36.50 dlrs each.
    In a newspaper advertisement, the company said the offer
and withdrawal rights expire April 20 unless extended.  The
ChemLawn board has approved the tender and a merger at the same
price that is to follow.
    Ecolab said the offer is conditioned on receipt of at least
5,325,000 shares.  ChemLawn now has about 10.0 mln shares
outstanding.
    Ecolab said ChemLawn has granted it a conditional option to
buy all authorized but unissued and unreseved ChemLawn shares
at 36.50 dlrs each.  The option is exercisable in the event
that another party were to acquire 20 pct or more of ChemLawn
by means other than a tender offer for all shares at a higher
price than Ecolab is offering.
    The company said if the merger agreement is terminated
under certain circumstasnces, it will be entitled to receive 20
mln dlrs in damages from ChemLawn.
    Ecolab said officers and directors of ChemLawn have granted
it options to acquire an aggregate of 2,535,435 ChemLawn shares
or about 24.8 pct for the tender price, again unless a higher
tender were to be made by another party.
    Waste Management Inc &lt;WMX> had originally made a hostile
tender offer of 27 dlrs per share for ChemLawn which ChemLawn
rejected as inadequate.  On Friday, Waste Management said it
would raise its bid to 35 dlrs per share.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8704>
KDI Corp said it has agreed
in principle to acquire Triangle Microwave Inc for 6.50 dlrs
plus a contingent payment for each Triangle share.
    It said holders of the contingent payment units will be
entitled to receive annual payments to the extent that the
predepreciation gross profits of Triangle Microwave in each of
the years 1987 through 1991 exceed threshholds ranging from
eight mln dlrs in 1987 to 14 mln dlrs in 1991.
    The company said holders of Triangle Microwave options and
warrants will be entitled to receive the difference between
6.50 dlrs and their exercise price, plus contingent payments.
    KDI said completion of the transaction is subject to
governmental approvals and the approval of Triangle Microwave
shareholders, and the transaction is valued at over 35 mln
dlrs.
    It said shareholders of Triangle Microwave controlling
about 30 pct of the company's stock have agreed to vote in
favor of the deal and to give KDI an option to buy their shares
under certain components.
    Triangle Microwave makes microwave components.  KDI, a
diversified company, produces electronic components, technical
products and swimming pool equipment.                
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8711>
Comdata Network Inc said it
has entered into a definitive agreement to merge into a company
formed by &lt;Welsh, Carson, Anderson and Stowe IV> for either
16.50 dlrs in cash or 10.00 dlrs in cash and a unit of
securities per Comdata share.
    The company said each unit of securities would consist of
1.25 common shares in the new company and three dlrs principal
amount of the new company's 11 pct subordinated debentures due
1997.
    It said the 16.50 dlr cash alternative is an improvement
over the 15.00 dlr per share price contemplated under an
agreement in principle with Welsh Carson announced on March
Five.
    Comdata said the cash and securities alternaitcve is
subject to Welsh Carson-affiliated investors owning at least 60
pct of the stock of the new company.
    The company said investment bankers &lt;Drexel Burnham Lambert
Inc> and Alex. Brown and Sons Inc &lt;ABSB> found the proposal to
be fair from a financial point of view.
    It said the transaction is subject to approval by its
shareholders and to Welsh Carson obtaining up to 230 mln dlrs
in debt financing. Comdata said it may terminate the agreement
if financing is not arranged by April Three.
    On Thursday, First Financial Management Corp &lt;FFMC> offered
to acquire Comdata for 18.00 dlrs per share in stock and cash,
subject to approval by the Comdata board.
    Under the First Financial proposal, Comdata holders would
receive no more than four dlrs per share in cash and could
receive all stock.
    Comdata had originally planned a recapitalization under
which it would have repurchased up to six mln common shares at
14.50 dlrs each.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8717>
Great Western Financial
Corp said it agreed to sell its John Alden Life Insurance Co
and its affiliated operations for 280 mln dlrs to a
newly-formed company onwed by the John Alden Management Group.
    General Electric Credit Corp delivered a commitment letter
arranged by the GECC Capital Markets Group Inc for the
financing.
    Great Western said the pre-tax gain on the sale will be
approximately 65 mln dlrs, and after tax gain will be 
approximately 15 mln.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8730>
&lt;Qintex Ltd> of Brisbane said &lt;Westpac
Banking Corp> of Australia has issued a commitment letter to
provide Princeville Development Corp with the letter of credit
required under Qintex's proposed acquisition of Princeville.
    The letter of credit would ensure payment of Princeville's
contingent subordinated notes to be distributed to shareholders
of record on the day immediately following completion of
Qintex's tender for 3,300,000 Princeville share. It said
issuance of the letter of credit is still subject to conditions
including appropriate documentation, but the letter is expected
to be issued around April Three.
    Qintex said as a result it has extended its tender offer
for Princeville shares until April Three.
    It said through yesterday it had received 7,424,292 shares
under the offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8734>
Columbia First Federal Savings and
Loan Association said it has acquired the insured deposits of
first Federal of Maryland, based in Hagerstown, from the
Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp and reopend First
Federal's six former offices as Columbia First branches.
    The Federal Home Loan Bank Board had closed First Federal
on March 20 because it was insolvent.  First Federal had assets
of 115.2 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8748>
Food and drink retailer Argyll Group Plc
&lt;AYLL.L> said it has agreed to sell its U.K. Subsidiary &lt;George
Morton Ltd> to &lt;Seagram United Kingdom Ltd> for about 14 mln
stg in cash.
    The consideration for Morton's fixed assets, stocks,
debtors and goodwill is payable on completion of the sale. The
disposal will bring Argyll an extraordinary credit of some 8.4
mln stg.
    Argyll added the agreements also depend on an indication
from the U.K. Office of Fair Trading by June 23 that the sale
will not be referred to the Monopolies Commission. Argyll
shares were up 12p to 440, firming before the announcement.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8756>
Bond Corp Holdings Ltd  &lt;BONA.S> of
Australia said it had no comment on an article in a London
evening newspaper speculating on its plans for a bid approach
to U.K. dDrinks and food giant Allied Lyons Plc &lt;ALLD.L>.
    Tony Oates, Bond Corp's Executive Director for Finance and
Administration, said "The company does not comment on market
rumors or press conjecture." He added in all instances of this
kind problems are likely to arise whatever is said.
    Allied's shares were 3p up at 401p, which values the
company at around 2.75 billion stg.
    London stock market analysts specializing in brewery shares
viewed a bid from Bond, which they said has assets of around
two billion stg, as highly unlikely.
    They added that rumours of a possible bid for Allied have
surfaced from time to time in the press and the London equity
market ever since last year's thwarted approach from Elders IXL
Ltd &lt;ELXA.S> of Australia.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8771>
Claremont Group Ltd, a New York
investment banking firm, said it intends to boost its current
10 pct stake in Champion Products Inc to as much as 15 pct of
the total outstanding common stock.
    Claremont added that it asked Champion to put two
representatives on its nine-member board of directors.
    Claremont previously disclosed in December that it had
agreed to act in concert with Walsh, Greenwood and Co, an
affiliated investment firm, to acquire Champion Products.
    Claremont said it made net purchases of 7,800 Champion
Products shares between Jan. 28 and March 18.
    In a March 20 letter to Champion Chairman John Tanis,
Claremont and Walsh representatives Stephen Walsh and John
Cirigliano said they were pleased with the company's
performance but wanted to take an active management role.
    "We believe that Champion Products has just begun to evolve
into the market leader it will eventually become," they said. "As
significant shareholders with mutual interests with the
company, we would like to actively participate in this process."
    Claremont's intentions and the letter were made public in a
filing with the federal Securities and Exchange Commission.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8778>
Cyclops Corp said that as it has
already stated, its agreements with &lt;Dixons Group PLC> are
binding and Dixons will not rescind or waive any provisions of
the agreements.
    The company said its agreement to merge into Dixons does
not permit it to provide nonpublic information to &lt;CYACQ>,
which is making a competing offer for Cyclops, that had been
provided to Dixons.
    It said other provisions Dixons will not waive include its
rights to recover breakup fees or expenses from Cyclops or buy
Cyclops common shares from Cyclops.
    Cyclops noted that Dixons' waiver of rights to breakup fees
or the purchase of common stock directly from Cyclops and the
provision of nonpublic information to CYACQ are conditions to
CYACQ's increased 92.50 dlr per share offer to acquire Cyclops
shares.
    Dixons is tendering for Cyclops shares at 90.25 dlrs a
share.  Yesterday Citicorp &lt;CCI>, with Audio/Video Affiliates
Inc &lt;AVA> an owner of CYACQ, said it had offered to acquire
from Dixons after the merger of Cyclops into Dixons Cyclops'
industrial businesses for 12.8 mln dlrs more than Alleghany
Corp &lt;Y> is currently scheduled to pay for them.
    Citicorp said yesterday that its proposal would allow
Dixons to raise its tender price to 93.25 dlrs per share. 
Citicorp said if Dixons accepted the proposal, CYACQ would
terminate its competing offer for Cyclops.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8780>
J.M. Resources Inc said it has acquired
a 90 pct interest in DEI Acquisition Corp from InterFirst
Venture Corp, Sam B. Myers, Neomar Resources Inc and Richard L.
Morgan, all of Dallas, for warrants to acquire 10.1 mln shares
of J.M. stock and three mln dlrs of notes.
    The warrants are exercisable at par value, currently 10 cts
per share, until March 20, 1997.  The company said if the
warrants were exercised in full, they would represent a 40.7
pct interest in J.M. common stock.  It said amounts due under
the notes are payable soleley from proceeds of the sale of
securities by J.M. and non-oil and natural gas revenues of DEI.
    J.M. said DEI provides specialty insulation installation
and asbestos removal services.
    J.M. said all of its directors except Jack E. Manning Jr.
have resigned and Myers and Morgan were named to the board.
    It said Manning has resigned as president in favor of Myers
and will service as vice president in charge of oil and natural
gas operations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8781>
Astrotech International Corp said
its director S. Kent Rockwell, who controls Rockwell Venture
Capital Inc, will buy 27 pct of the company's cumulative
preferred stock.
    It said will buy up to 302,300 shares of Astrotech's 1.80
dlrs cumulative preferred stock.
    It said the shares are owned by W.F. Rockwell Jr, chairman
and chief executive officer of Astrotech and S. Kent Rockwell's
father.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8795>
Moore McCormack Resources Inc
said it has completed the previously-announced sale of its
Interlake Steamship Co and Moore McCormack Bulk Transport Inc
Great Lakes and ocean bulk shipping units to James R. Barker.
    The company said president Paul Tregurtha has succeeded
Barker as chairman and chief executive officer of Moore
McCormack.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8823>
Dixons Group PLC said it does not plan
to extend the expiration date of its tender offer for any and
all common shares of Cyclops Corp beyond tonight.
    Dixons said it would accept shares validly tendered and not
withdrawn by midnight tonight.
    Dixons, which is offering 90.25 dlrs a share for Cyclops,
said last week it had about 54 pct of Cyclops common shares.
Its offer originally was scheduled to expire March 17 but was
extended for one week.
    Yesterday Citicorp &lt;CCI>, with Audio/Video Affiliates Inc
&lt;AVA> an owner of CYACQ, said it had offered to acquire from
Dixons after the merger of Cyclops into Dixons, Cyclops'
industrial businesses for 12.8 mln dlrs more than Alleghany
Corp &lt;Y> is currently scheduled to pay for them.
    Citicorp said yesterday that its proposal would allow
Dixons to raise its tender price to 93.25 dlrs per share.
Citicorp said if Dixons accepted the proposal, CYACQ would
terminate its competing 92.50 dlr offer for Cyclops.
    Citicorp had suggested yesterday that Dixons extend its
tender until March 31 in connection with the price increase.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8830>
&lt;GNB Inc> said it joined
with the management of the French company Compagnie Francaise
d'Electro-Chimie to purchase the company for an undisclosed
amount.
    The French company, which produces lead-acid batteries, had
sales in 1986 of 75 mln dlrs, GNB said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8836>
Calny Inc said its board
rejected as inadequate the unsolicited offer by PepsiCo Inc
&lt;PEP> subsidiary Taco Bell Corp for all Calny's outstanding
common stock at 11.50 dlrs cash per share.
    Taco Bell recently acquired 9.9 pct of Calny's outstanding
stock, Calny said.
    Calny said it retained Oppenheimer and Co Inc to consider
various financial and strategic alternatives available to the
company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8849>
National Heritage Inc, a unit of
Southmark Corp, said it began an initial public offering of two
mln shares of common stock at a price of 9.50 dlrs a share.
    All the shares are being offered by National Heritage,
which will trade under symbol NHER on Nasdaq, through lead
underwriter Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.
    Proceeds will be used to increase working capital, complete
renovations at leased facilities and repay certain debts to
Southmark.
    After the offer, Southmark will retain about 82 pct of the
11 mln outstanding common shares of National Heritage, which
operates 201 long-term nursing care facilities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8853>
OII HoLdings Corp, a concern formed by
Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and Co, said it completed its
previously announced acquisition of Owens-Illinois Inc.
    Under terms of the February 10 agreement, OII paid 60.50
dlrs per common share and 363 dlrs per 4.75 dlrs convertible
preferred share.
    OII said each common share still outstanding at the time of
the merger has been converted into the right to receive 60.50
dlrs per share and all preference shares not converted will be
redeemd on April 22 at a redemption price of 100 dlrs per
preference share plus accrued and unpaid dividends.
    OII said it has assumed Owen's 3-3/4 pct sinking fund
debentures due June 1, 1988, 9.35 pct sinking fund debentures
due November 1, 1999, and 7-5/8 pct debentures due April 1,
2001.
    OII said the New York Stock Exchange said the securities
will be delisted as a result of the merger. OII said it is
anticipated that the securities will be traded in the over-the-
counter market.
    The surviving company will be known as Owen-Illinois Inc,
it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8854>
Hecla Mining Co said it
has agreed to purchase a 28 pct interest in the Greens Creek
Joint Venture from British Petroleum Co PLC's Amselco Minerals
Inc unit.
    The venture expects to bring into production a
gold-silver-lead-zinc ore body on Admiralty Island, Alaska,
containing about 3,500,000 short tons of ore assaying about
0.18 ounce of gold, 24.0 ounces of silver, 9.7 pct zinc and 3.9
pct zinc per short ton, Hecla said.  It said there is
significant potential for the discovery of additional ore.
    Hecla said initial production from a trackless underground
mine is scheduled for late 1988 at a rate of about 1,000 tons
or ore per day.  "At this rate, the Greens Creek mine will be
the largest domestic silver mine and is expected to be one of
the lowest cost producers."
    The company said it estimates its total investment in the
project, including its share of preproduction costs, at about
45 mln dlrs, to be funded through internally generated cash and
existing lines of credit.  It said Amselco will retain a
majority interest in the project.  Other interest holders are
CSX Corp &lt;CSX> and &lt;Exaias Resources Corp>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8855>
Joint venture talks that could
lead to Chrysler Corp &lt;C> taking a stake in Italian car maker
&lt;Automobili Lamborghini SpA> are continuing, a Lamborghini
spokesman said.
    He told Reuters the two companies are discussing a number
of topics ranging from "a joint venture in the production area
to Chrysler becoming a shareholding partner" in the Italian
firm.
    The spokesman declined to comment on whether Chrysler was
interested in acquiring control of Lamborghini or if the two
sides were close to an accord.
    He said the two companies are discussing the possibility of
jointly developing a sports car aimed primarily at the U.S.
Market.
    The spokesman said Chrysler officials in Detroit had
already visited Lamborghini's production plant in Bologna and
another visit may be scheduled.
    Lamborghini, which is controlled by the Mimran Group of
Switzerland, broke even last year on sales of 29 billion lire,
he said.
    Chrysler also holds a 15 pct interest in Italian sports car
producer &lt;Alfieri Maserati Spa>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8877>
Hecla Minging Co said it
has agreed to purchase a 28 pct interest in the Greens Creek
Joint Venture from British Petroleum Co PLC's &lt;BP> Amselco
Minerals Inc unit.
    The venture expects to bring into production a
gold-silver-lead-zinc ore body on Admiralty Island, Alaska,
containing about 3,500,000 short tons of ore assaying about
0.18 ounce of gold, 24.0 ounces of silver, 9.7 pct zinc and 3.9
pct lead per short ton, Hecla said.  It said there is
significant potential for the discovery of additional ore.
    Corrects last assay result to lead from zinc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8880>
&lt;Pacific Western Airlines Corp>
said the airline resulting from the previously announced merger
of its Pacific Western Airlines Ltd unit and Canadian Pacific
Air Lines Ltd would be named Canadian Airlines International
Ltd, effective April 26.
    Pacific Western said the two airlines' services and
schedules would also be integrated on April 26. It previously
appointed management for the new airline.
    The new airline, Canada's second largest, will have 81
planes flying to 89 destinations in 13 countries.
    Pacific Western recently acquired Canadian Pacific Airlines
for 300 mln dlrs from Canadian Pacific Ltd &lt;CP>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8906>
Ing C Olivetti EC SpA &lt;OLIV.M> does not
exclude the possibility of investing in a semiconductor venture
currently under discussion between Italy's &lt;STET - Societa
Finanziaria Telefonica P.A.> and France's Thomson-CSF
&lt;TCSF.PA>, an Olivetti spokesman said.
    He said that if Olivetti were approached by the two
partners involved and the financial conditions of any proposal
were considered interesting, the company did not exclude the
possibility of investing in the venture. However, Olivetti had
made no decision on any such investment and did not have at its
disposal information to evaluate such a move.
     Stet and Thomson said last Thursday they were negotiating
an accord involving their respective subsidiaries &lt;SGS
Microelettronica SpA> and &lt;Thomson Semiconducteurs> in the
civil semiconductor field.
    They said the accord, once concluded, would be put for
approval to the French and Italian authorities.
    The Olivetti spokesman was responding to a Reuters query
about Italian press reports today saying that Olivetti might
participate in the venture with a two pct stake.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8909>
Swiss-based &lt;Nestle S.A.>'s Nestle
Enterprises Ltd unit said it signed a letter of intent to
acquire &lt;Nabisco Brands Ltd>'s Club, Melrose, Dickson and Chase
and Sanborn businesses for undisclosed terms.
    Nestle said the final agreement, subject to required
approvals, would be signed shortly.
    The businesses involved in the deal provide products to
hotels, restaurants and other parts of the food and beverage
industry. Nabisco is 80 pct-owned by RJR Nabisco Inc &lt;RJR>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8916>
Paul's Place Inc said chairman,
president and treasurer Paul D. Lambert has sold 240 mln common
shares to other board members, advisory board members Alan H.
Marcove and Gerald M. Marcove and an unaffiliated purchaser it
did not name.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    The company said Alan Marvoce has been named to replace
Lambert as chairman and chief executive officer and Michael T.
Fuller has been named president.
    Fuller was formerly president of &lt;Mr. Steak Inc>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8919>
Gordon Jewelry Corp said it has
completed the previously-announced sale of the assets of its
catalog showroom stores to privately-held Carlisle Capital Corp
for an undisclosed amount of cash and notes in excess of book
value.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8932>
Cyacq Corp, an investor group bidding
for Cyclops Corp, said it amended its outstanding 92.50 dlrs a
share tender offer for Cyclops to eliminate two conditions and
modify a third one.
    The group, which includes Audio/Video Affiliates Inc and a
unit of Citicorp &lt;CCI>, said it also obtained additional
financing commitments, including an increased commitment from
Citicorp Capital Investors Ltd.
    The conditions that were eliminated are Cyacq's request for
non-public information about Cyclops that was previously
provided to Dixons Group PLC and Cyacq's being satisified that
the information provides an adequate basis for Cyclop's
published financial projections.
    Cyclops has agreed to be acquired Dixons Group, which has a
90.25 dlrs a share tender offer for Cyclops outstanding. Dixons
said earlier it would allow the offer to expire tonight.
    The condition that was modified, which required Cyacq to be
satisfied that break up fees or other obligations to Dixons
were rescinded or ineffective, now says Cyclops shall not have
paid any such fees or expenses to Dixons prior to the
consummation of Cyacq's offer.
    Cyacq's amended offer expires midnight New York time on
April three, 1987, unless extended.
    Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co and CIT Group/Business
Credit Inc increased its tender offer commitment to 197 mln
dlrs from 166 mln dlrs and its merger commitment to 275 mln
dlrs from 250 mln dlrs.
    Additionally, the Citicorp unit and Audio/Video have
increased their commitments to Cyacq to 185 mln dlrs. Of the
new total, 150 mln dlrs has been committed by Citicorp.
    Cyacq said it estimates that it needs 407.5 mln dlrs to buy
all Cyclops shares that may be tendered and pay related fees
and expenses.
    It said it is seeking to arrange the balance of about 25.5
mln dlrs necessary to complete the offer.
    All previously announced conditions regarding the lending
group led by Manufacturers Hanover remain in effect, except
that the loans are subject to the concurrent receipt by Cyacq
of equity contributions and other financing of not less than
210.5 mln dlrs for the tender offer facility and 213.5 mln dlrs
for the merger facility.
    Cyacq also said the Citicorp unit had received no
indications of interest in an alternative offer it had made
from Dixons, Cyclops or Alleghany Corp &lt;Y>, which has agreed to
acquire Cyclops' industrial group from Dixons.
    Under the alternative offer, the Citicorp unit, with
Cyacq's approval, proposed to acquire the industrial group from
Dixons.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8944>
Heavy buying by speculators boosted
Conrac Corp 7-7/8 to 29, higher than a 25-dlr-per-share cash
tender offer announced by Mark IV Industries Inc &lt;IV>.
    "It's a case of ChemLawn euphoria," said one arbitrageur,
referring to a recent hostile tender that began at 27 dlrs per
share and ended when ChemLawn Corp &lt;CHEM> found a white knight
willing to bid 36.50 dlrs.
    For Conrac, the arbitrageur said, 28 dlrs per share seemed
like an "appropriate price." Another said "it's too early to
project the outcome."
    "The market is speaking for itself and saying the 25 dlr
offer is inadequate," the second arbitrageur said. But he added
it was hard to make a case for Conrac being worth much more
than the 29 dlrs where the shares traded today.
    He noted the stock recently sold in the high teens and
there could be a downward risk of 10 dlrs or more if Conrac is
able to thwart Mark IV.
    Conrac urged shareholders to take no action while its board
studies the offer and confers with advisers. Conrac said it
would make a recommendation by April 17.
    A third arbitrageur noted Mark IV had been involved in
several takeovers previously and has proven itself to be a
determined bidder. "They're not beginners," he said.
    Another said Conrac might have trouble if it tried to find
another buyer. "It's a hodge-podge of non-related businesses,"
he said. "There is only a small universe of people who would
want to own the company as it's presently structured."
    Conrac is involved in video displays, computer software,
aircraft instruments, telephone answering machines, welding
equipment and other products.
    "I'm telling retail clients to sell and leave the rest for
those who can take the risk," said Rudolph Hokanson, analyst at
Milwaukee Co.
    He called the 25-dlr offer by Mark IV "fair value but on
the low side." "I don't think management was looking for a
buyer in any way before this offer," he said.
    Hokanson said Conrac has conservative finances and has
developed a reputation for quality products that serve niche
markets. He said management has done a good job of turning
around the telephone answering machine business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8945>
Laser Photonics Inc said it sold
615,385 shares of its common stock to investors for one mln
dlrs under a previously-announced agreement.
    In connection with the investment, the company said it will
restructure its board. There will be eight members, three of
whom were designated by the new investors, the company said.
The group of investors include affiliates of &lt;Radix
Organization Inc>, the company said.
    Richard Gluch Jr resigned from the board. Joining the board
were Leonard Lichter, Pierre Schoenheimer and Roger Kirk, the
investors' designates, the company added.
    Other members of the board are chairman Don Friedkin,
president and chief executive officer Mark Fukuhara, and Jay
Watnick, Ira Goldstein, Thurman Sasser and Michael Clinger.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8947>
Conrac Corp said it is asking
shareholders to take no action on the 25-dlr-per-share tender
offer for all its shares launched this morning by Mark IV
Industries Inc &lt;IV>.
    The company said its board will study the offer with
financial and legal advisors and make a recommendation to
shareholders by April 17.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8962>
Financial Corp of America said
it is not holding discussions with anyone regarding a buyout of
the company.
    But a spokeswoman pointed out that Financial Corp has said
publicly for nearly two years that in the company's view a
merger would be one method of increasing the company's capital.
    "If an opportunity arises for us to strengthen our capital
position quickly we would be very open to it," the spokeswoman
said.
    Financial Corp would need over one billion dlrs to bring
its regulatory net worth up to Federal Savings and Loan
Insurance Corp requirements, the spokeswoman said.
    In addition, she said that the Federal Home Loan Bank
Board, in a letter dated January 26, 1987, stated that through
March 31, 1988 it will continue to support the company's
efforts to restructure its balance sheet, maintain profitable
operations and augment net worth.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8974>
CPC International Inc said it reached
an agreement in principle to sell its European corn wet milling
business to Agricola Finanziaria SpA, a member of the Ferruzzi
Group, for a price in excess of 600 mln dlrs.
    The transaction is expected to be completed by September
30.
    CPC said it expects no material gain or loss this year from
the transaction. But the effect of the deal on 1987 earnings
can be evaluated in full only when the definitive pacts are
completed, it said.
    The long-term effect of the transaction on CPC's earnings
should be positive, it added, as it will allow capital
expenditures to be cut back and will reduce corporate and
divisional overheads as well as operating expenses in the
European business.
    The sale is an important part of a restructuring announced
in November, CPC said.
    Proceeds of the sale will be used to reduce debt incurred
in the purchase of the Arnold Foods and Old London specialty
baking businesses and the stock repurchase program that was 
part of the restructuring.
    As of December 31, CPC had bought about 15 mln of its
common shares, adjusted for a 2-for-1 split in January, for a
total cost of 621.8 mln dlrs, according to its 1986 annual
report.
    In December, CPC acquired Arnold Foods and Old London for a
total of about 170 mln dlrs.
    CPC had previously said it wanted to sell the European corn
wet milling business and use the proceeds to help reduce debt,
including that incurred under the share buyback.
    In total, CPC has bought back about 16 mln shares of common
stock, adjusted for the split, it said today. In November it
authorized a buyback of 20 mln shares, adjusted for the split.
    The buyback and the restructuring were triggered in
November, after companies controlled by Ronald Perelman,
chairman of Revlon Group Inc &lt;REV>, acquired about 7.6 pct of
CPC's then outstanding stock.
    In 1986, the European corn wet milling business had sales
of 914.1 mln dlrs, operating income before overheads of 68.8
mln dlrs and associated headquarters overhead costs of 19.7 mln
dlrs, according to CPC's 1986 annual report.
    The businesses' assets were 645.7 mln dlrs in 1986, the
report said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8975>
Mobex Corp, a private building
product concern, said as of late yesterday it had accepted
about 2.3 mln shares or 98 pct of Grant Industries Inc under a
tender offer.
    The 7.75 dlrs a share cash offer expired at 2000 EST
yesterday. Mobex said its Mobex Acquisition Corp unit accepted
2,316,940 shares of Grant common, or about 98 pct of the
2,369,799 shares presently outstanding, at the tender price.
 
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8977>
Telecom Plus INternational Inc
said it completed the sale of its 65 pct interest in Tel Plus
Communications Inc to Siemens Information Systems INc for about
173 mln dlrs.
    Telecom received 107 mln dlrs at closing with the balance
to be paid in installments. Siemen said it will dispute various
matters in the financial statement issues and other matters, it
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8987>
Stanadyne Inc said it terminated
discussions about its proposed purchase of United Technologies
Corp's Diesel Systems &lt;UTX> unit.
    The reason was not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8996>
&lt;Sundor Group Inc> said it
purchased DWG Corp's Texun Inc's line of regional juice
products.
    The purchase terms were not disclosed, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8998>
Hayes-Albion Corp said its shareholders
approved a plan to merge with and become a wholly onwed
subsidiary of privately held Harvard Industries Inc.
    St. Louis-based Harvard Industries, a manufacturer and
distributor of automobile supplies, held 80 pct of Hayes
following completion of a 13 dlrs a share cash tender offer in
December.
    Under the merger agreement, remaining shareholders of
Hayes, a Jackson, Mich.-based maker of auto supplies, will
receive 13 dlrs cash for their shares.
    Trading in Hayes common will cease at the close of business
today, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9020>
&lt;Midivest Inc> said it acquired
all the assets of &lt;Business Aviation Inc> of Sioux Falls, S.D.,
for an undisclosed amount of stock.
    Midivest said it expects to sell 10 to 20 of the renovated
Beechcraft planes next year. It said management will also lease
these airborne intensive care units to hospitals and government
subdivisions through Metropolitan Leasing, a wholly-owned
subsidiary of Midivest.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9025>
Eastman Kodak Co said it plans
to sell its 2.3 pct holding in ICN Pharmaceuticals &lt;ICN> and
part of its nine pct holdings in Viratek &lt;VIRA>.
    It said the purpose of the investments had been to lay the
groundwork for the creation of its Nucleic Acid Research
Institute.
    Since that has been achieved, there is no longer any reason
to maintain the equity positions, Kodak said.
    Kodak holds 470,000 sahres of ICN, currently trading at
about 18-3/4 and 700,000 of Viratek, trading at 44.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9027>
Montreal-based Noverco Inc told the
Securities and Exchange Commission it reduced its stake in
Sceptre Resources Ltd to 1,232,200 shares or 4.8 pct of the
total outstanding.
    Noverco said it sold off 400,500 shares "to reduce the
investment of Noverco in Sceptre."
    "Additional common shares of Sceptre may be sold or
purchased by Noverco, depending upon market conditions," Noverco
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9033>
Nashua Corp said it signed a
letter of intent to purchase &lt;Lin Data Corp>, a private
manufacturer of high-capacity rigid discs for storage of
computer data.
    Under the terms of the letter, Nashua said it will acquire
all classes of Lin stock for 24 mln dlrs. In addition, it said
it will loan Lin 1,200,000 dlrs to support its operations.
    The closing of the sale is set for the second quarter of
1987, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9036>
GenCorp Inc said it withdrew from
consideration at its annual meeting on March 31 proposals aimed
at providing for a stock split and an increased dividend so
that it could focus its energies on responding to the takeover
offer made last week by a partnership of AFG Industries Inc
&lt;AFG> and Wagner and Brown.
    In addition to proposing an increase in the number of its
outstanding common shares, GenCorp had suggested the adoption
of a classified or "staggered" board and the elimination of
cumulative voting.
    GenCorp said these proposals could "distract energy and
attention from the real task at hand -- to respond to the
tender offer in a manner which is in the best interests of the
company, its shareholders and its other constituencies."
    GenCorp said the proposal to increase its outstanding
shares was made with the aim of declaring a stock split and a
dividend increase.
    The other proposals, it said, would provide for greater
long-term stability and cohesiveness for the GenCorp board.
    The company did not indicate when it might resubmit the
proposals for approval by its shareholders.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9045>
Gartner Group Inc said it
acquired sole ownership of the COMTEC Market Research Program.
    Gartner said its wholly-owned subsidiary purchased the
interests of its former partners for an aggregate price of
1,125,000 plus a percentage of net sales proceeds on future
sales of certain products.
    Prior to the acquisition, Gartner Group owned one-third in
the COMTEC partnership, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9047>
Resorts International Inc
said it received a proposal from &lt;KSZ Co Inc> under which
holders of Resorts class B stock would receive 140 dlrs a share
in cash and one share of common stock in a new company to be
formed through the takeover.
    Under the offer, Resorts said holders of its class A shares
would receive 15 dlrs a share in cash and three shares of
common stock in the new company.
    Resorts said the offer from KSZ calls for a merger of
Resorts with RI Acquisition Co Inc, a newly formed Delaware
corporation.
    Resorts said that prior to the merger, RI Acquisition would
be capitalized with about 100 mln dlrs of debt and about 220
mln dlrs of equity.
    It said 200 mln dlrs of the equity would be in the form of
special preferred stock.
    The KSZ offer, Resorts said, indicates that KSZ has a
commitment from &lt;M. Davies Cos> to buy all of the special
preferred stock.
    Resorts said the offer will expire at 1700 EST on March 27.
It said it asked its investment advisor, Bear, Stearns and Co,
to advise its board on the offer.
    Earlier this month, the estate of James M. Crosby and
certian members of his family agreed to sell their class B
shares to New York real estate tycoon Donald Trump for 135 dlrs
a share. The estate and family members hold 78 pct of the
752,297 class B shares outstanding.
    Trump also agreed to pay 135 dlrs a share for the remaining
class B shares outstanding.
    Resorts also has about 5,680,000 shares of outstanding
class A stock. These shares carry one one-hundredth the voting
power of the class B shares.
    Trump's offer beat out a rival bid of 135 dlrs a share made
by Pratt Hotel Corp &lt;PRAT>.
    Resorts said that under the proposal made by KSZ, existing
class A and class B shareholders would control about 96 pct of
the outstanding common of the new company formed to acquire
Resorts.
    Resorts said the new company, upon completion of the
merger, would hold the 220 mln dlrs of debt and that the
special preferred stock would immediately be converted into
exchangeable participating preferred of the new company.
    This preferred, Resorts said, would pay a dividend based on
the net cash flows from the new company's Paradise Island
operations.
    A Resorts spokesman said the KSZ offer was made in a
two-page letter and that Resorts could not comment on it
because it did not contain enough information. Resorts has
asked Bear, Sterns to obtain complete data, he said.
    The spokesman said Resorts is not familiar with KSZ but
that it believes the company is controlled by Marvin Davis, the
Denver oilman.
    Calls to Davis were referred to Lee Solters, who handles
public relations for Davis. Solters, said to be travelling, was
not immediately available for comment.
    Donald Trump was also unavailable for comment, as was a
spokesman for the Crosby estate.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9059>
Kirschner Medical corp said it
completed the acquisition of Minnesota Mining and
Manufacturing's &lt;MMM> orthopedic metal implant line division.
    The acquisition price is 12.0 mln dlrs in cash, a six mln
dlr three year note and 100,000 shares of Kirschner common
stock.
    The division had sales of 11.3 mln dlrs in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9064>
Maryland National Corp, the parent of
Maryland National Bank which earlier this month merged with
American Security Bank, said its shareholders will vote on a
new name for the regional bank holding company at its April 29
annual meeting.
    It said MNC Financial Inc is the proposed new name for the
parent company. The banks merged on March 16, and have combined
assets of about 14 billion dlrs.
    Maryland said the new name only will be used for the parent
and it does not plan to change the names of Maryland National
Bank, American Security Bank or non-bank affiliates.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9075>
Borg-Warner Corp said it has had
discussions with Irwin Jacobs on his interest in the
possibility of Minstar Inc &lt;MNST>, a Jacobs controlled company,
being given access to certain non-public information about
Borg-Warner.
    In late February, an investor group headed by Jacobs
offered 44 dlrs a share, or 3.29 billion dlrs, to take over
Borg-Warner.
    Borg-Warner said it advised Jacobs that before its board
would give Minstar access to company records Minstar would have
to provide satisfactory evidence that sufficient financing was
committed to carry out whatever transaction was proposed.
    A Borg-Warner spokesperson said the discussions with Jacobs
and other Minstar officials focused on terms and conditions
under which the company would consider granting Minstar access
to the information it was seeking.
    The Borg-Warner spokesperson said the company has not been
able to reach an agreement with Minstar, and Borg-Warner has
not granted Minstar access to any records.
    There can be no assurance that there will be further
discussions with Jacobs or that any agreement will be reached,
the company added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9081>
RB Industries Inc said it completed
the sale of its W and J SLoane Division to Laurence Crink Jr
and a group of investors.
    The definitive agreement provides for a closing on April 1,
1987. The division consists of four W and J Sloane furniture
store in Los Angeles and Orange counties.
    RB Industries also said it recently secured a five-year
8.573 pct secured 9.9-mln-dlr loan on its Irvine property from
a major institution. Proceeds will be used to retire existing
bank debt, for working capital and to retire a portion of its
outstanding 12 pct debentures.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9087>
The investor group seeking to acquire
GenCorp Inc said it agreed to cancel a court hearing after
GenCorp withdrew three proposals that, if approved, would have
made it more costly and difficult to acquire the Akron,
Ohio-based company.
    Earlier today GenCorp said it will not ask shareholders to
approve an increase in the number of its outstanding shares,
the election of a staggered board of directors and the
elimination of cumulative voting.
    However, the group said it will continue to try to block
GenCorp's poison-pill provision.
    The group, a partnership of AFG Industries Inc &lt;AFG> and
&lt;Wagner and Brown>, was to go to court on March 27 to block
GenCorp for having the three proposals voted on by shareholders
at its annual meeting.
    GenCorp said it withdrew the proposals so that it could
focus its attention on the takeover offer.
    The takeover partnership said it has asked to meet with
GenCorp to negotiate a repeal of the company's poison pill
plan.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9088>
Gencorp Inc said that because it is
continuing to evaluate General Acquisition Inc's tender offer
it has fixed April 3, subject to further extension, as the date
the rights to purchase preferred shares will trade separately
from the common stock as a result of the tender offer.
    This extension of the expiration date is conditioned on no
person acquiring beneficial ownership of 20 pct or more of
Gencorp's common stock prior to April 3, it said.
    Gencorp said it could distribute the rights certificates to
shareholders 10 to 30 days after the March 18 acquisition offer
was made.
    However, rather than leaving the expiration date in a
range, the board decided to set April 3 as the day it will
distribute the preferred share purchase rights.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9090>
American International Group Inc said
it sold its South African subsidiary, American International
Insurance Co Ltd, to Johannesburg Insurance Holdings Ltd, a
holding company owned by a consortium of shareholders led by
Rand Merchant Bank.
    Terms were not disclosed and company officials were
unavailable for comment.
    With the conclusion of the sale, American International has
entirely divested itself of its holdings in South Africa.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9098>
Bayou Resources Inc said it reached an
definite agreement to be acquired by Patrick Petroleum Co
through a stock and cash transaction valued at six dlrs per
Bayou share.
    Bayou also reported net loss of three cts or 23,024 dlrs
for the fourth quarter compared with a net income of 10,128
dlrs or one cts a year. Revenues fell to 532,807 dlrs from
769,465 dlrs a year ago.
    For the year, Bayou reported a net loss of 14 cts or
116,793 dlrs compared to a net income of 23 cts or 203,372
dlrs. Revenues fell to 2.4 mln dlrs from 3.3 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9102>
&lt;Fleet Aerospace Corp>
said it agreed in principle to acquire the assets and
operations of the Engineered Magnetics division of Gulton
Industries Inc, a unit of Mark IV Industries Inc.
    Terms were undisclosed.
    Los Angeles-based Engineered Magnetics designs and produces
custom power conversion systems mainly for use in the defense
and aerospace industries. Its revenues for the year ended
February 28 totaled about 20 mln Canadian dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9108>
PS Group Inc said it and
USAir Group agreed to move up the completion date of USAir's
acquisition of Pacific Southwest Airlines to April 30 from
September 30 originally.
    If the acquisition does not take place by April 30, either
party may terminate the agreement, the company said.
    The deadline has been moved up because the Department of
Transportation and PS Group shareholders have already approved
the transaction, the company said.
    A Teamsters Union agreement to certain labor contract
conditions remains to be resolved under the pact.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9110>
Automobile dealerships have become
large, multi-store operations, and the largest sell more than 1
billion dlrs a year worth of vehicles a year.
    Around the auto industry there is talk of mergers and
buyouts among dealerships, and there are rumors that the
largest are considering offering shares to the public, analysts
say.
    Retail car sales "are at a point of transition. There's not
much that's off the table in terms of creative thinking" about
ways to sell cars, says David Cole, analyst with the University
of Michigan's Transportation Research Institute.
    The retail car market is "much more freeform now" than it
was in 1956, the year things began to change, says Detroit
analyst Arvid Jauppi of Arvid Jauppi and Associates.
    Thirty years ago, in 1956, the situation was different.
Dealerships sold one kind of car--a "Chevy" or a Ford or a
Studebaker. The average dealer had 17 employees and sold
738,000 dlrs worth of vehicles, according to the National
Automobile Dealers Association.
    That year a tiny car from overseas--Germany's Volkswagen
Beatle--began to gain popularity. The "Bug" caused "a
rebellion" among dealers, who demanded greater freedom from
restrictions placed on them by the major American automakers,
says Jauppi.
    One of the most visible changes in retail car sales has
been in the size of dealerships, auto analysts say. Last year,
the average dealership had 11.2 mln dlrs in sales--a 15-fold
increase from 1956--and employed 34 workers.
    "I had one of these guys tell me he makes six, seven mln
dlrs a year and didn't know what to do with all his money,"
says Cole.
    "There's a whole lot more rich guys who sell cars than that
make cars," he says.
    With the increase in size, large dealers have been buying
up other dealerships, and auto analysts see few signs the trend
will let up.
    Donald Keithley, vice president, dealer services, for J.D.
Power, a California-based market research firm, says that, by
1990, 12,000 people will own dealerships compared to 16,800
principal owners today.
    Many dealers are experimenting with owning several
franchises, some of which might compete against each other. "It
used to be a Chevrolet dealer was a Chevrolet dealer. Now a
Chevrolet dealer might handle several lines," Jauppi says.
    As dealers get bigger, industry officials are talking about
the possibility that some of them might become publicly-owned
or open international operations.
    Offering shares to the public is an option large dealers,
"are obviously thinking of very seriously," says Cole.
    Although some say the franchise system might get in the way
of a public offering, Jauppi says there are few obstacles to
trading in car dealer shares.
    "Dealers are large enough now to go public. The only thing
the manufacturer cares about is that the dealer sells those
cars. It could happen any time," Jauppi says.
    "If you look at the whole merger mania, and look at the
scale some of these dealers, it's going to be very hard to
resist taking them public," said another analyst.
    And Jauppi says that dealerships can be expected to become
international.
    "We're going to have international dealers--dealer networks
that are worldwide," he says. U.S. dealers will be attracted
particularly to Europe, where the market will expand faster
than the U.S., he says.
    "It's not totally off the wall," says Cole.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9112>
Chapman Energy INc said it is launching
a major restructuring which, if not approved, it will have no
alternative but to seek protection under Chapter 11.
    Under the plan, Chapman will exchange securities and cash
for all outstanding 12 pct senior subordinated debentures due
2000 and will sell a controlling interest to Troon Partners
Ltd.
   The agreement with Troon requires Troon to advance 6.5 mln
dlrs partially secured by a first mortgage lien on the
company's interest in its natural gas pipeline partnership and
Troon to tender 100,000 principal amount of debentures to
Chapman.
    Proceeds of the loan will be used for the cash portion of
the restructuring. Troon will acquire a majority stock interest
and control of the board.
    In addition, Chapman and Troon will establish a 10 mln dlrs
acquisition joint ventures, it said.
    The plan also contemplates establishing a restructured loan
providing for one master credit agreement having an aggregate
balance of 22.4 mln dlrs.
    The plan also contemplates the recapitalization of
preferred stock whereby each share will be converted into three
shares of common stock.
    Chapman also said it also plans to negotiate settelment and
discharge of a substantial portion of its accounts payable and
settlement of certain litigation.
    If approved by various creditors and shareholders, the
company expects the plan to be completed by May 29.
    Chapman also repoted a loss of 43.4 mln dlrs for the year,
including asset writedowns of 35.5 mln dlrs, compared to
December 31, compared to a net income of 177,243 in 1985.
    The 1986 loss resulted in shareholders' deficiency of 15
mln dlrs compared to shareholder's equity of 28.9 mln last
year.
    Total assets decreased to 35.6 mln dlrs from 81.8 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9147>
&lt;Kokusan Kinzoku Kogyo Co Ltd> (KKK), a
Japanese autoparts maker owned 25 pct by Nissan Motor Co Ltd
&lt;NSAN.T>, has exchanged a memorandum to acquire over 50 pct of
U.S. Autoparts firm &lt;Master-Cast Co> to avoid losses on U.S.
Sales caused by the yen's rise against the dollar, a KKK
spokesman said.
    The final agreement should be signed this year when KKK
forms the new company &lt;Alfa K Technology>, he said.
    The new firm should supply all the U.S. Major car makers,
including Ford Motor Co &lt;F>, General Motor Corp &lt;GM> and
Chrysler Corp &lt;C>, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9156>
The Ferruzzi Group's holding company
Agricola Finanziara SpA will pay 630 mln dlrs for the European
corn wet milling business of CPC International Inc under the
agreement reached in principle between the two companies, a
statement by Ferruzzi released by its Brussels office said.
    When CPC announced the agreement yesterday in New York, it
said only that the price would be in excess of 600 mln dlrs.
    Ferruzzi said the deal is subject to agreement on several
clauses of the contract and needs government authorisations.
    It said the deal would involve 13 starch factories
employing about 5,000 people in eight European Community
countries plus facilities and commercial operations in other EC
states.
    The factories have a capacity to produce the equivalent of
1.6 mln tonnes of starch in starch and by-products a year, or
about one third of EC production, from about 2.7 mln tonnes of
cereals.
    Ferruzzi said the acquisition of these assets would extend
its presence in the European agro-industrial industry both
geographically and in terms of products.
    It said it is already the principal EC producer of sugar
and of soya oil and cake, and the major cereal trader.
    It noted that EC output of isoglucose is subject to maximum
quotas, of which CPC currently holds a 25 pct share, and said
it foresaw an increase in other industrial uses of starch in
the future, notably in the production of ethanol for fuel.
    Raul Gardini, president of the Ferruzzi Group, said the
present management of the CPC milling business will be asked to
remain in their posts.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9172>
Guinness Plc &lt;GUIN.L> will seek an
injunction in the U.K. High Court today to freeze the assets of
former Chairman Ernest Saunders in its attempts to recover 5.2
mln stg paid to a Jersey company as part of the company's
takeover battle for &lt;Distillers Co Plc>, a spokesman said.
    He said the court move aimed to freeze Saunders' assets up
to the value of the sum it wanted to recover. It was uncertain
whether the court would reach any decision on the request
today. Guinness said last week it planned to take legal action
to recover the funds, paid to non-executive director Thomas
Ward via the Jersey company.
    Lawyers representing Ward have said he saw the funds as his
reward for services performed during the takeover of
Distillers.
    Guinness is also planning a resolution at the annual
meeting in May to remove both Saunders and Ward from the
company's board.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9210>
&lt;Rainbow Corp Ltd> said it has
lifted its stake in supermarket group &lt;Progressive Enterprises
Ltd> to 52 pct from 44 pct.
    It said in a statement it has bought an extra 9.4 mln
shares at prices ranging from 3.80 N.Z. Dlrs to 4.80.
    Progressive is currently the subject of both a proposed
merger with Rainbow and a full takeover bid from &lt;Brierley
Investments Ltd> (BIL). The BIL bid, launched on Monday, is at
4.20 dlrs a share. The Rainbow merger involves shareholders in
both Rainbow and Progressive being issued shares in a new
company, &lt;Astral Pacific Corp Ltd>, on a one-for-one basis.
    Rainbow chief executive Craig Heatley said, "In our opinion
BIL's actions over the last few days have been undertaken for
their own strategic purposes which conflict with the desire of
both companies to merge their interests."
    BIL has said it is against the merger because it sees
Progressive shares as being worth twice as as much as
Rainbow's.
    Progressive traded today at 4.42, Rainbow at 3.66 and BIL
at 4.30 at the end of morning trading on the New Zealand Stock
Exchange.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9230>
&lt;Dart Group Corp> said it has
raised its offer to acquire Supermarkets General Corp to 42.00
dlrs in cash and three dlrs in exchangeable preferred stock per
Supermarkets General share from 41.75 dlrs per share in cash.
    The company said it would also be willing to negotiate a
plan with the Supermarkets General board under which
Supermarkets General shareholders would have a common stock
interest in the combined company.  It said it remains willing
to negotiate all terms of the proposed acquisition.
    The original bid was worth about 1.62 billion dlrs.
    Dart said the preferred stock in the new bid would be
exchangeable for a new class of Supermarkets General debt
securities that would be developed by Dart and Supermarkets.
    The new proposal would be subject to approval by the
Supermarkets General board, it said.  The new bid was contained
in a letter to the Supermarkets General board.
    In Woodbridge, N.J., Supermarkets General -- responding to
a previous letter to its board by Dart -- said "Your conduct
indicates to us that no transaction involving trust and
confidence can be entered into with you.  Your propaganda and
missstatements will not panic our board."
    Dart, in its previous letter, had alleged that Supermarkets
General executives were seeking millions of dollar in severance
and tax payments from Dart.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9234>
The U.K. Based commodity house E.D.
And F. Man Ltd and Singapore's Yeo Hiap Seng Ltd jointly
announced that Man will buy a substantial stake in Yeo's 71.1
pct held unit, Yeo Hiap Seng Enterprises Ltd.
    Man will develop the locally listed soft drinks
manufacturer into a securities and commodities brokerage arm
and will rename the firm Man Pacific (Holdings) Ltd.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9239>
Duriron Co Inc said it has
completed the acquisition of Valtek Inc for 11.75 dlrs per
share following Valtek shareholder approval yesterday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9246>
&lt;Dixons Group PLC> said only about
852,000 shares of Cyclops Corp common stock, or 20 pct on a
fully diluted basis, were tendered and not withdrawn under its
bid for all shares that expired yesterday, but the companmy has
still decided to accept all shares validly tendered.
    The company said it now has about 22 pct ownership of
Cyclops on a fully diluted basis and expects to proceeds toward
completion of its proposed acquisition of Cyclops.
    Last week, before extending its Cyclops offer for one week
at the request of the Securities and Exchange Commission,
Dixons had reported that 54 pct of Cyclops' stock had been
tendered in response to its 90.25 dlrs per share offer which
expired at 2400 EST yesterday.
    Yesterday, CAYACQ Corp dropped certain conditions of its
92.50 dlrs a share offer for Cyclops and firmed up the
financing for the proposed transaction. CAYACQ, an investor
group led by Audio/Video Affiliates Inc and Citicorp, raised
the value of its offer from 80 dlrs per Cyclops share on Friday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9252>
&lt;Renouf Corp International> said it
now owns 93.4 pct of Benequity Holdings a California Limited
Partnership.
    Renouf  said it has accepted for payment all 3,914,968
units of Benequity Holdings tendered in response to its 31 dlrs
per unit offer. Along with the 1,449,550 units already held by
Renouf, it now owns 93.4 pct of the 5,745,706 units outstanding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9258>
McFarland Energy Inc
said its board and that of Petrominerals Corp have approved a
definitive agreement for McFarland to acquire Petrominerals in
an exchange of stock.
    McFarland said it would exchange one common share for each
5.4 Petrominerals shares.  McFarland said former holders of
Petrominerals will have a 25 pct interest in the combined
company.
    The merger is still subject to approval by shareholders of
both companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9259>
&lt;Timminco Ltd> said it acquired
Universal Adhesives Inc, of Memphis, for undisclosed terms, in
a move to expand Timminco's operations into the United States.
    The company said Universal Adhesives, with five U.S.
plants, has annual sales of 12 mln U.S. dlrs, which will double
Timminco's presence in the North American adhesives market.
    Timminco said Universal Adhesives will complement the
company's Canadian-based industrial adhesives division and is a
key step in its long-term goal for expansion in the specialty
chemical field.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9277>
&lt;Brierley Investments Ltd>, (BIL),
said its offer of 4.20 N.Z. Dlrs per share for supermarket
group &lt;Progressive Enterprises Ltd> still stands, although
&lt;Rainbow Corp Ltd> said today it has 52 pct of Progressive.
    BIL said in a statement it will review events on a daily
basis.
    Rainbow announced earlier that it had increased its stake
in Progressive to 52 pct from 44 pct through the purchase of
9.4 mln shares at between 3.80 and 4.80 N.Z. Dlrs per share.
    BIL chief executive Paul Collins said: "All Rainbow has done
is to outlay a substantial amount of cash to purchase shares
from parties who presumably were supportive of the merger."
    Rainbow has proposed a merger with Progressive to form a
new company, &lt;Astral Pacific Corp Ltd>. Under the merger,
shareholders in both Progressive and Rainbow will be issued
shares in the new company on a one-for-one basis.
    "Quite simply, Rainbow should now bid for the balance of
Progressive Enterprises at 4.80 N.Z. Dlrs per share," Collins
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9283>
Reuters Holdings Plc &lt;RTRS.L> said it
had agreed in principle to buy &lt;I P Sharp Associates Ltd> of
Toronto for 30.4 mln stg.
    Sharp is a time-sharing network and database company
specialising in finance, economics, energy and aviation. It
operates a global packet-switching network and global limits
systems for foreign exchange trading.
    Sharp shareholders will be offered cash, shares or a
mixture of the two in settlement. The acquisition, which is
subject to Canadian government approval, would be through
amalgamation into a specially-created company.
    Reuters said it had been given options by a number of Sharp
shareholders covering 67 pct of the common stock pending
completion of a Reuters review of the company.
    Sharp operates 38 offices in 20 countries. In 1986 it
reported revenue of 55 mln Canadian dlrs with a pretax loss of
1.6 mln compared with a 1.9 mln profit in 1985.
    However, Sharp said that internal accounts showed the
company was in profit in the first two months of 1987.
    End-1986 net assets totalled 11.85 mln dlrs.
    A Reuters statement said the acquisition would fit
perfectly into its package for the banking and securities
industries.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9285>
Waste Management Inc said its
wholly owned subsidiary, WMX Acquisition Corp, ended its tender
offer to buy shares of ChemLawn Corp at 35 dlrs a share.
    All shares tendered to Waste Management will be returned to
shareholders as soon as practical, it said.
    Earlier this week, ChemLawn agreed to accept a merger
proposal at 36.50 dlrs a share from Ecolab Inc in a transaction
valued at about 370 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9288>
United Medical Corp said it
has reached a definitive agreement to sell its hospital
distribution unit to &lt;Myriad Group Inc> for undisclosed terms,
with closing expected in the next several weeks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9296>
CrossLand Savings FSB said it has
acquired Western Savings and Loand Co with the assistance of
the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp.
    CrossLand said Salt Lake City based Western has been
combined with its two Florida-based thrift subsidiaries. The
parent company contributed 50 mln dlrs in cash to the resulting
1.7 billion dlr asset subsidiary which will operate under the
name CrossLand Savings FSB with headquarters in Salt Lake City.
    CrossLand said Western, with assets of 400 mln dlrs,
operated 13 branch offices in the states of California, Oregon,
Utah and Washington.
    To facilitate the acquisition, CrossLand said, Western was
converted from a mutual to a stock association in a voluntary
supervisory conversion. Crossland and the FSLIC executived an
assistance agreement indemnifying CrossLand from certain losses
that could occur in connection with Western's loan portfolio.
    The company said James J. Heagerty, chairman and chief
executive officer of CrossLand Savings FSLA in Bradenton, Fla.,
will serve in that capacity for the new subsidiary resulting
from the merger.
    Western's president, Christopher J. Sumner, will be
president of the combined unit, CrossLand said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9302>
Commerzbank AG &lt;CBKG.F> said it will
acquire &lt;Linotype GmbH>, Europe's largest manufacturer of
type-setting and printing communications technology from Allied
Signal Inc &lt;ALD.N> and float off the shares in the company.
    Commerzbank declined to say how much it had paid for
Linotype.
    Linotype's group turnover in 1986 rose 15 pct to more than
500 mln marks, the bank said. The group's net return on capital
was seven pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9324>
Thermo Process Systems Inc said
its proposed acquisition of the Surface Combustion Division of
privately-held &lt;Midland-Ross Corp> has been terminated because
mutually satisfactory terms could not be established.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9332>
Stockholder Systems Inc said it has
agreed in principle to acquire privately-held Software Concepts
Inc, which provides software for check processing, mortgage
application processing and safe deposit box accounting, for
undisclosed terms.
    Software Concepts had revenues of about 3,200,000 dlrs for
the year ended June 30.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9338>
The Travelers Corp's Travelers
Mortgage Services said it signed a letter of intent to buy two
subsidiaries of the privately-held &lt;Equitable Life Assurance
Society of the U.S.>
    The company said it plans to acquire the Equitable
Relocation Management Corp and the Equitable Realty Network
Inc.
    The company said the acquisitions will give it broader
distribution of its corporate relocation service and mortgage
programs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9343>
A group led by Dallas investor
Harold Simmons told the Securities and Exchange Commission it
had reduced its stake in McDermott International Inc by one
pct, to under five pct.
    The group had said in a March 10 filing, announcing
acquisition of 5.4 pct of the firm's stock, that it might
consider seeking control of the company.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9363>
&lt;Novamin Inc> said it received a
proposed takeover offer from Breakwater Resources Ltd involving
a swap of one Breakwater share for two Novamin common shares.
    It said the proposal also called for conversion of
outstanding Novamin warrants into Breakwater common shares on
the same basis, provided the exercise price was paid by the
warrant holders.
    Novamin, a mineral exploration company, said directors
would meet next Tuesday to deal with the proposal, which, it
said, was subject to approval by Breakwater directors.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9365>
Commonwealth Realty Trust said
preliminary merger talks with Bay Financial Corp have been
terminated due to a failure to agree on terms.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9381>
Hadson Corp said it has signed a
definitive agreement to acquire 85 pct of the outstanding
common stock of Seaxe Energy Corp.
    The company said it will buy the 85 pct interest in Seaxe
from shareholders owning restricted or controlled shares for
less than 200,000 Hadson common shares.
    It said closing is subject to the approval of title
assignments by the French government.  Seaxe is involved in oil
and natural gas exploration and development in the Paris Basin
of France.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9382>
Reuters Holdings Plc &lt;RTRS.L> said it
had agreed in principle to buy &lt;I P Sharp Associates Ltd> of
Toronto for 30.4 mln stg.
    Sharp is a time-sharing network and database company
specialising in finance, economics, energy and aviation. It
operates a global packet-switching network and global limits
systems for foreign exchange trading.
    Sharp shareholders will be offered cash, shares or a
mixture of the two in settlement. The acquisition, which is
subject to Canadian government approval, would be through
amalgamation into a specially-created company.
    Reuters said it had been given options by a number of Sharp
shareholders covering 67 pct of the common stock pending
completion of a Reuters review of the company.
    Sharp operates 38 offices in 20 countries. In 1986 it
reported revenue of 55 mln Canadian dlrs with a pretax loss of
1.6 mln compared with a 1.9 mln profit in 1985.
    However, Sharp said that internal accounts showed the
company was in profit in the first two months of 1987.
    End-1986 net assets totalled 11.85 mln dlrs.
    A Reuters statement said the acquisition would fit
perfectly into its package for the banking and securities
industries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9392>
&lt;Consolidated Norex Resources
Ltd> said it agreed to acquire all issued and outstanding
shares of Triweb Resources Ltd, a privately held oil and gas
company with land holdings and production base in Alberta and
Saskatchewan.
    The company said specific details relating to purchase
price and other terms will be released on closing of the
transaction, expected by May 15.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9410>
Reichhold Chemicals Inc said
it is exploring the sale of its stake in its European
subsidiary Reichhold Chemie AG.
    Reichhold Chemie Ag, headquartered in Rausen, Switzerland,
had sales in excess of 75 mln dlrs last year. It is 83 pct
owned by Reichhold. The rest is owned by German and Swiss
shareholders.
    Reichhold said it is seeking the sale to focus on its
adhesives business.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9423>
Real estate magnate Donald Trump told
UAL Inc Chairman Richard Ferris that he was interested in UAL
stock as an investment, according to a UAL executive.
    Trump, who was unavailable for comment, is believed by
market sources to have a sizeable position in UAL, which he
began accumulating several weeks ago. UAL stock today was up
three at 63 in active trading.
    "They (ferris and Trump) talked last week. Apparently,
Trump said he was interested in it as an investment. He didn't
say how much stock he had. He didn't say what he would or
wouldn't do about it," said UAL senior vice president Kurt
Stocker.
    Trump is believed to have close to five pct of UAL's stock,
market sources said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9431>
Synalloy Corp said it has
ended talks on the sale of its Blackman Uhler Chemical Division
to Intex Products Inc because agreement could not be reached.
    The company said it does not intend to seek another buyer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9432>
&lt;C-I-L Inc> said it would exercise its
right to acquire &lt;Trimac Ltd>'s stake in their jointly owned
Tricil Ltd for 91 mln dlrs, with closing expected May 22.
    C-I-L added that the final price could be less, however,
depending on an Ontario court ruling resulting from a
previously reported legal action launched by C-I-L.
    Mississauga, Ontario-based Tricil is a waste management
company with operations in the U.S. and Canada.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9434>
Pantera's Corp said it agreed to
buy ten pizza restaurants in southeastern Colorado from
creditors foreclosing on the facilities.
    The purchase price includes 1.25 mln dlrs in cash and
company stock, it said.
    Separately, Pantera's said it issued an area development
agreement with a franchisee group for northeastern Colorado,
including the Denver area, for the opening of about 20
franchised Pantera's pizza restaurants.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9443>
Allied-Signal Inc said it
agreed to sell its Linotype Group unit to &lt;Commerzbank AG>
of West Germany for an undisclosed amount.
    Allied-Signal said Commerzbank is expected to offer shares
of the unit to the public later this year.
    The company said the agreement is subject to approval by
the government and its shareholders.
    The Linotype unit, based in Eschborn, West Germany, had
revenues in 1986 of more than 200 mln dlrs, the company said.
    The company said top management of Linotype plan to remain
with the unit, which has operations in the United States, West
Germany and the United Kingdom.
    Allied-Signal announced in December that it planned to sell
the Linotype unit as well as six other businesses in its
electronics and instrumentation segment.
    Linotype is a supplier of type and graphics composition
systems.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9454>
Messidor Ltd said it signed a letter
of intent to acquire 100 pct of the outstanding shares of
Triton Beleggineng Nederland B.V., a European investment
portfolio management company.
    If approved, two mln shares of stock held by the Messidor
Ltd officers and directors would be issued to Triton
shareholders.
    Triton will become a subsidiary of Messidor, it said.
    If approved, the president of Triton, Hendrik Bokma, will
be nominated as chairman of the combined company.
    There are about 1.5 mln Messidor units issued to the public
consisting of one share of common stock, four Class A common
stock warrants, four class B common stock warrants and four
class C common stock warrants.
    In addition there are four mln restricted shares
outstanding.
    Messidor said the acquisition is expected to be completed
by June three.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9472>
One of a pair of private investors
in Frost and Sullivan Inc told the Securities and Exchange
Commission he increased his stake in the firm by about two pct,
to 15.4 pct.
    He is Theodore Cross, Princeton, N.J., editor of Business
and Society Review.
    The other investor is Mason Slaine, Cos Cob, Mass,
president of Dealers' Digest Inc.  He holds a 3.3 pct stake.
    Cross told the SEC he bought the new shares at between 7.75
and 8.0 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9487>
Trans World Airlines Inc sold four mln
shares it held in USAir Group Inc, Wall Street sources said.
The sources said the buyers are believed to be a group of
institutions.
    Bear Stearns handled the trade. It crossed the four mln
shares at 45, off 1/8. Bear Stearns would not comment on buyers
or sellers.
    USAir and TWA had no immediate comment.
    USAir later said it did not buy the stock. A company
spokesman would not comment further.
    TWA earlier this month reported holding slightly more than
four mln shares, or about 15 pct of USAir. It had also proposed
a takeover of USAir, which at the time was negotiating its
proposed merger with Piedmont Aviation Inc.
    On March 16, TWA withdrew its bid, saying it did not intend
to seek control of USAir Group or to acquire more of its stock
at the time.
    TWA also said in the filing with the Securities and
Exchange Commission that its chairman, Carl Icahn is the target
of an SEC probe of alleged violations of securities laws.
    In its filings with the SEC, TWA said it paid 178.2 mln
dlrs for its USAir stock.
    "With this out of the way, if it indeed was bought by
institutions, it paves the way for better value for USAir stock
later," said Janney Montgomery analyst Louis Marckesano of
TWA's sale of its stock.
    "Technically, as long as that block was overhanging the
market you didn't know what was going to happen," he said.
    USAir stock was trading at 44-3/8, off 3/4 on volume of 4.4
mln shares. TWA stock rose one to 28-1/4.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9497>
Gateway Sporting Goods Co said it
acquired all of the shares of stock of Innovative Dental
Services Inc for an undisclosed amount of cash.
    Gateway said the acquired company has contracts with 102
dentists in 144 locations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9509>
A Belgian finance ministry spokesman
said new rules planned on insider trading would enable
offenders to be fined and imprisoned for up to a year, and be
compelled to forfeit gains.
    The new rules require parliamentary approval, and
government sources said it was unclear when they would come
into force. Insider trading is currently not an offence in this
country.
    The cabinet approved a separate bill that analysts said
includes provisions to make more difficult the build-up of
major new stakes in Belgian companies.
    The bill would make obligatory the declaration of major
stakes in companies quoted on the bourse with own resources of
more than 200 mln francs.
    The Minister for Economic Affairs would need to be informed
in advance of deals under which foreign interests planned to
buy a new stake of more than ten pct of the voting shares in a
large Belgian company, or to increase an existing stake to more
than 20 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9510>
Owens-Corning Fiberglas Corp said
it sold its controlling interest in its French foam insulation
producing subsidiary to a Lafarege Corp &lt;LAF> subsidiary.
    Owens-Corning said it sold its interest in Sentuc Porxpan
SA for an undisclosed price.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9526>
Cyclops Corp said the three
members of its board appointed last week by &lt;Dixons Group PLC>
had resigned and that it named three Cyclops executives to
replace them.
    Cyclops said the moves followed the announcement earlier
today by Dixons that it received only 20 pct of Cyclops
outstanding common stock under an extended tender offer that
expired yesterday.
    Dixons initially ended its 90.25 dlr a share tender offer
on March 17 after receiving 54 pct of Cyclops shares.
    However, the Securities and Exchange Commission last Friday
pressed Dixons to reopen the offer because the U.K.-based
company had dropped a condition that at least 80 pct of Cyclops
stock be tendered by the close of the offer.
    Dixons then extended the offer until yesterday and earlier
today indicated that a substantial number of tendered Cyclops
shares had been withdrawn, leaving it with only 852,000 shares,
or just over 20 pct of the roughly 4.26 mln Cyclops shares
outstanding.
    Dixons said today that it purchased the tendered shares,
which, when combined with the shares it already holds, gives it
a 21.7 pct stake in Cyclops.
    Cyclops said its reconstituted board includes the three
newly named directors and five outside directors, all of whom
were on the board prior to Dixons tender offer.
    The three Cyclops directors were replaced by Dixons
appointees on March 17 under an agreement reached between the
two companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9538>
&lt;First Federal Savings Bank>
of Delaware said its agreement to negotiate exclusively for its
sale with &lt;Oxford Financial Group> has been extended until
April 8 from March 18.
    The company said it is in the final stages of talks with
Oxford over the terms of the proposed acquisition.  Under a
nonbinding letter of intent signed in June 1986, Oxford would
pay 11 dlrs per First Federal share, subject to First Federal
shareholder approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9539>
A group led by New York investor
Asher Edelman said Morse Shoe Inc agreed to provide it
confidential company information and that his group would make
an offer to buy Morse only in a friendly, negotiated deal.
    The group also said in a filing with the Securities and
Exchange Commission that its members would not, without Morse
approval, buy or offer to buy any company securities giving the
group a 10 pct or more stake in the company.
    Edelman and his group said his terms held until the earlier
of 90 days from March 3 or the date on which Morse announces a
definite agreement for its sale.
    At the same time, the Edelman group said it cut its stake
in Morse to 8.4 pct from 9.7 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9544>
Husky Oil Ltd said the board
called a special meeting for April 22 for shareholders to vote
on its previously announced agreement for Hong Kong-based
Hutchison Whampoa Ltd and Hongkong Electric Holdings Ltd to
acquire a 43 pct interest in the company.
    The acquisition requires two-thirds approval by Husky
shareholders other than &lt;Nova, An Alberta Corp>, which owns a
57 pct interest in Husky.
    If approved by shareholders, the amalgamation will take
effect April 30, Husky said.
    Following completion, Oil Term Holdings Ltd, a new company
controlled by Nova, will hold a 43 pct stake in Husky.
Hutchison and Hongkong will indirectly hold 43 pct, Victor T.K.
Li will own nine pct and &lt;Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce>
will have a five pct interest.
    Husky said a special committee of five outside directors
recommended the board approve the transaction after determining
that the deal was in the best interests of Husky and fair to
shareholders.
    Husky previously announced shareholders will have the
option to receive 11.80 Canadian dlrs cash for each common, or
6.726 dlrs cash and one common share of Oil Term Investment
Ltd, which will be controlled by Nova through Oil Term Holdings
and own an insterest in Husky.
    U.S. shareholders will be restricted to the right to
receive 11.80 Canadian dlrs cash per share, which will be paid
in U.S. funds, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9557>
Helm Resources Inc said that, pursuant
to the exercise of an overallotment option by underwriters in
Bamberger Polymers INc's initial public offering, it has sold
another 35,000 Bamberger shares and reduced its ownership in
Bamberger to 51 pct from 55 pct.
    To date, Helm has sold 435,000 Bamberger's for 3.5 mln
dlrs.
    Bamberger has sold a total of 600,000 shares and received
net proceeds of about 4.8 mln dlrs since the February 1987
offering.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9561>
Mine Safety Appliances Co said it
will sell through its German subsidiary, Auergesellschaft, its
controlling interest in MSA (Africa), (PTY) Ltd, of
Johannesburg, South Africa to Boart International, a wholly-
owned subsidiary of Anglo American Corp of South Africa Ltd
&lt;ANGL>.
    The company said the terms of the sale were not disclosed.
    The company will operate as Boart-MSA (PTY) Ltd, it said.
    L.N. Short Jr, president of the company, said it sold the
unit because of slumping profits due to South Africa's economic
decline.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9570>
Allis-Chalmers Corp said it
has sold its Elex Ag unit in Zurich, Switzerland, to private
investors for an undisclosed amount.
    The company said Elex produces electrostatic precipitators
used in air pollution control.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9582>
The Securities Industry Association
backed a variety of restraints on insider trading and hostile
corporate takeovers and asked Congress to define insider
trading in law.
    The industry trade association called on U.S. securities
firms to take steps to protect sensitive corporate secrets to
guard against illegal trading by employees.
    The association also backed broad federal restrictions on a
variety of tactics used in hostile corporate takeovers.
    But it said investment banking firms should be allowed to
continue to engage in both arbitrage and merger and acquisition
activities so long as those functions were kept separate.
    The SIA, in a report adopted yesterday by its board of
directors, backed a higher enforcement budget for the federal
Securities and Exchange Commission and called on U.S. stock
exchanges to beef up their supervision of member brokerages.
    The report said securities firms "should be more rigorous in
restricting sensitive information on a need-to-know basis."
    It said firms should train their employees to understand
the need for confidentiality of market-sensitive information.
    It said legislation to define insider trading should avoid
expanding current law in a way that would impede the market.
    It said an insider trading definition should exempt a
securities firm from liability for law violations by its
employees unless the firm had participated in or was aware of
the wrongdoing.
    In the mergers and acquisitions area, the association
advocated a ban on greenmail payments or poison pill takeover
protection plans without prior shareholder approval.
    It said a group or individual buying up a company's stock
should be required to file a public disclosure statement before
acquiring more than five pct of the company's shares. Under
current law, disclosure may be made as late as ten days after
exceeding the five pct limit.
    The association said all purchases exceeding 20 pct of a
company's voting stock shouls be made only through a tender
offer open to all shareholders. Under current law there is no
limit on open market purchases.
    The group said the federal government should preempt state
regulation of defensive takeover tactics.
    The group said all tender offers should remain open for at
least 30 calendar days.
    The current requirement is expressed in business days.
    It said so-called "lockup" devices, in which securities are
issued to a friendly investor to seal a takeover deal or fend
off an unfriendly predator should be limited to 18.5 pct of the
target company's total common stock.
    Association president Edward O'Brien said the group acted
out of concern over the ad hoc restructuring of corporate
America on Wall Street and investor fears about insider trading
and fairness in the marketplace.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9607>
Forstmann Little and Co said Lear
Siegler Holding Corp plans to divest its aerospace group
subsidiary, comprised of the Defense Electronics Group and the
Components Group.
    Divestitures had been expected since Lear-Siegler, a
diversified conglomerate, was acquired last December in a 2.1-
billion-dlr-leveraged buyout by the Wall Street firm of
Forstmann Little.
    Lear's aerospace group revenues for fiscal 1987 are
expected to be about 700 mln dlrs, said Forstmann.
    The Defense Electronics Group designs and manufactures
weapons, management systems, flight control systems, remotely
piloted vehicles and reference and navigation systems, mainly
for military markets.
    The Defense Group subsidiaries are Astronics Corp, which is
based in Santa Monica, Calif., and employs 1,076 people;
Instrument and Avionic Systems Corp, based in Grand Rapids,
Mich., and employs 3,479 people; International Corp, based in
Stamford, Conn., and employs 266 people; and Development
Sciences Corp, based in Ontario, Calif., and employs 237
people.
    The Components Group manufactures pumps, bearings, and
other industrial components as well as nuclear control drive
rod mechanisms and valves.
    The Group's subsidiaries include Power Equipment Corp,
based in Cleveland, which employs 880 people; Energy Products
Corp, based in Santa Ana, Calif., which employs 755 people; 
Romek Corp, based in Elyria, Ohio, which employs 262 people;
and Transport Dynamics in Santa Ana, which employs 254 people.
    Overall, Lear's Aerospace Group's eight subsidiaries
employs 7,200 people.
    Lear Siegler said it plans to retain Management Services
Corp, engaged in aircraft maintenance modification for various
Department of Defense agencies.
    Morgan Stanley and Co will act as financial advsiors for
the group's divestitures.
    Last month, Lear Siegler said it planned to sell its Smith
and Wesson handgun business, Starcraft Recreational Products
Ltd, the Peerless truck trailer operations, and other units, as
part of its restructuring plans.
    Lear apparently will retain its Piper Aircraft unit.
     Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9608>
Rubbermaid Inc said it completed
the previously announced acquisitions of Viking Brush Ltd, a
Canadian maker of brushes, brooms and other cleaning aids, and
the Little Tikes' manufacturing licensee in Ireland.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    The acquisition of the Tikes' licensee is part of the
expansion of Little Tikes in the European toy market.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9619>
Modulaire Industries said it
acquired the design library and manufacturing rights of
privately-owned Boise Homes for an undisclosed amount of cash.
    Boise Homes sold commercial and residential prefabricated
structures, Modulaire said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9637>
Kansas City Southern Industries Inc
said it is ready to promptly purchase the Southern Pacific
Transportation Co from Santa Fe Southern Pacific Corp &lt;SFX> if
the Interstate Commerce Commission rejects Sante Fe's attempt
to reopen the merger of Southern and the Atchison, Tokepa and
Santa Fe Railway.
    In a filing with the ICC late today, the company outlined
four conditions of its offer to acquire Southern Pacific.
    Among the conditions are that Santa Fe enter into an
agreement to indemnify Kansas City for any contigent liabilites
of Southern Pacific existing as of the closing date, and that
the financial condition of Southern remain largely unchanged
from today onward.
    "We are willing, even eager, to make a fair market value
offer in cash for the Southern Pacific," said Kansas City
Southern president and chief executive officer Landon H.
Rowland.
    "This offer disproves the constant derogation of the
Sourthern Pacific by SFSP management, best exemplified by SFSP
Chief Executive John Schmidt's comment in ICC hearings that the
Southern Pacific was 'bankrupt,'" said Rowland.
    He said that merging Southern with Kansas City will achieve
the benefits of an end-to-end merger while preseving the
independece of the Southern Pacific versus its existing prime
competitor, Santa Fe.
    Kansas said that Southern's management had estimated the
value of the railroad in 1983 in the range of 281 mln dlrs to
1.2 billion dlrs.
    It said that Morgan Stanley and Co Inc and Salomon Brothers
Inc, hired in 1983 to advise Southern and Santa Fe in their
merger, appraised Southern as worth between 500 mln dlrs and
800 mln dlrs less than Southern's own internal valuations.
    Kanasa City Southern said it will make an offer for
Southern after its books, records and properties are examined.
    "Once that examination has been completed (and even in the
absence of a willingnes of SFSP to negotiate) KCSI will make an
offer in writing...." said the company.
    Kansas also said it argued in the ICC filing that Santa Fe
had not met the legal requirements justifying the Commission's
reconsideration of the proposed merger of Santa Fe and Southern
Pacific, two railroads that it said basically parallel each
other throughout their routes.
    ICC voted four to one last summer to reject the merger as
inherently anticompetitive. Kansas said Santa Fe in petitioning
for reconsideration now argues that the trackage agreements
with the Union Pacific, the Denver and Rio Grande Western and
other railroads, adds to the value of the merger.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9638>
An investor group said it might be
willing to raise its 100 dlr per share offer for GenCorp but so
far the company has turned down requests for a meeting.
    "We might be able to see some additional value if we could
meet" and get more financial data, said Joel Reed, speaking for
the investor group.
    Reed told Reuters that GenCorp chairman A. William Reynolds
"was not interested in sitting down and talking with us at this
time." Cyril Wagner sought the meeting in a recent telephone
conversation with Reynolds, Reed said.
    Wagner and Brown, along with AFG Industries Inc &lt;AFG>,
recently launched a surprise tender offer for GenCorp. The
offer is worth 2.23 billion dlrs.
    Reed said under the circumstances the 100 dlr per share
tender offer, which expires April 15, is a fair offer. GenCorp
gained 3-1/2 to 114 today on the NYSE.
    Reed outlined a plan to reshape GenCorp in the event his
group wins control. He said aerospace, soft drink bottling and
entertainment units are potential divestiture candidates. He
said the tire business, which the group wants to keep, may be
more viable if merged with another tire company.
    "One option would be to try to grow the tire business
through combination or an acquisition," Reed said. He said he
believes such a merger could create a stronger force in the
tire industry.
    Gary Miller, chief financial officer of AFG, said his
company has a record of acquiring mature businesses and
boosting productivity. Automation and incentives tied to profit
sharing have been used with success, he said.
    In the case of GenCorp's RKO General broadcasting stations,
Reed said the plan of the partners is to step into GenCorp's
shoes and proceed with plans to  sell the stations.
    The partners said if they succed in acquiring GenCorp they
intend to consummate sale of WOR-TV in New York to MCA Inc
&lt;MCA>. GenCorp last year entered into an agreement to sell the
station for 387 mln dlrs.
    The partners also said if they acquire Gencorp they would
also proceed with the proposed sale of KHJ-TV in Los Angeles to
Walt Disney Co &lt;DIS>. RKO General would receive 217 mln dlrs
and Fidelilty Television, which challenged the license, would
get about 103 mln dlrs.
    The partners also said the Federal Communications
Commission established an expedited schedule for receiving
comments on their request for special temporary authorization
of proposed trust arrangements while the FCC considers a formal
application for transfer of the broadcast unit.
    Reed said he was pleased with the expedited schedule
because it provides time for the agency to act on the request
before the expiration of the tender offer.
    He said it was the aim of the partners to move as quickly
as possible to eliminate uncertainty surrounding the stations.
    Asked about criticism of the takeover attempt voiced by
some municipal officials in Akron, Ohio, where GenCorp is
headquartered, Reed said, "the plan of the partners offers long
term growth for Ohio."
    He noted that the aerospace business, slated for
divestiture under the partners' plan, is located in California.
"Our program is one that overall would provide the greatest
long term growth for all segments," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9640>
Chemical New York Corp and Texas
Bancshares Inc &lt;TCB> said the Federal Reserve Board approved
their proposed 1.19 billion dlr merger.
    The companies also said the Securities and Exchange
Commission declared effective as of March 24 the registration
statement covering the securities Chemical will issue to Texas
Bancshares shareholders as part of the merger.
    The companies said they expect to complete the merger,
which will create a bank with 80 billion dlrs of assets, by the
end of the second quarter. The merger still requires
shareholder approval.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9642>
Campbell Resources Inc said it raised
its voting stake in &lt;Meston Lake Resources Inc> to about 64 pct
from 52 pct through acquisition of another 870,000 Meston Lake
shares in its previously reported takeover bid.
    Campbell, in its bid that expired March 23, offered 80 cts
cash and 1.25 "legended" Campbell shares for each Meston share.
The legended shares are not tradeable for one year.
    It said the 3.4 mln Meston shares not tendered in the offer
were held by about 550 stockholders, including Quebec's La
Societe de developpement de la Baie James, with 1.3 mln shares.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9644>
Metrobanc, a federal
savings bank, said its shareholders approved the previously
announced merger with Comerica Inc &lt;CMCA>, a bank holding
company.
    Metrobanc said the merger is still subject to regulatory
approval.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9661>
Clabir Corp and AmBrit Corp
said they called off their plans for Clabir to buy the 16 pct
voting interest in AmBrit that it does not already own.
    The companies said they agreed not to pursue the merger
because several actions recently taken by AmBrit would mean
substantial delays in completing the deal.
    They said they might revive merger plans at a later date or
seek other ways for Clabir to increase its holdings in AmBrit.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9668>
&lt;Hollinger Inc> said 58 pct-owned &lt;The
Daily Telegraph PLC>, of London, agreed to form a joint venture
printing company in Manchester, England with &lt;News
International PLC>. Financial terms were undisclosed.
    It said the deal involved News International's acquisition
of a 50 pct stake in the Telegraph's Trafford Park Printing Ltd
subsidiary. The joint company will continue to print northern
editions of the Telegraph and Sunday Telegraph, with spare
capacity used to print The Sun and News of the World.
    The arrangement will significantly cut Telegraph costs,
Hollinger said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9677>
Genova Inc said it signed a
definitive agreement for the previously announced merger with
&lt;Genova Products Inc>.
    Under the agreement, Genova Products will pay 5-3/8 dlrs a
share for the 29 pct of Genova's outstanding common shares it
does not already own.
    The company said it plans to complete the transaction,
which requires shareholder approval, by the end of March.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9733>
British Petroleum Co Plc &lt;BP.L> said it
intended to make a tender offer for the 45 pct of Standard Oil
Co &lt;SRD.N> it does not already own at 70 dlrs a share cash, for
a total of 7.4 billion if the offer is fully accepted.
    The offer would be made through its &lt;BP North America Inc>
unit and was intended to commence not later than April 1. The
offer would not be conditional on any minimum number of shares
being tendered.
    BP said in a statement the 70 dlr a share price was based
on its own valuation as well as those of its financial
advisers. It took into account reviews of both public and
non-public information.
    Standard closed in New York last night at 64-7/8 dlrs, down
1-3/4 dlrs.
    BP shares dropped on the announcement to 877p from 888p at
last night's close.
    About a third of the cash payable would be met from BP's
own resources.
    The remainder would come from new borrowings, partly from
banks under a four-year committed revolving credit facility and
partly from a a new U.S. Dlr commercial paper programme. The
company said it was in the course of arranging these
facilities.
    BP Chairman Sir Peter Walters said that the group's
investment in Standard was its largest single asset. Full
ownership would enable investment and operating decisions to be
made without the limitations of a minority interest.
    BP also believed the acquisition represented the optimum
use of its financial resources. It was confident oil prices
were likely to remain within a range sufficient to justify the
investment.
    Walters added that it also felt that, due to management
changes in 1986, Standard could now operate successfully even
in a lower oil price environment.
    Standard's net assets at end-1986 were 7.02 billion dlrs
and in the year it reported a loss of 1.08 billion dlrs before
tax and before an extraordinary item of 608 mln dlrs.
    Analysts said that the move by BP had come as a surprise.
One noted that it was not immediately clear why the group
should spend so much money buying a company it already
controlled.
    BP could also have bought up the remainder of Standard
shares considerably cheaper had it moved six months ago.
    It was also unclear what effect the tender would have on
the U.K. Government's recent announcement that it intended to
dispose of its remaining 31.7 pct stake in BP sometime in the
1987/88 financial year, analysts said.
    Analyst Paul Spedding of brokers Kleinwort Grieveson noted
that any effect on the government sale of its stake in BP would
depend on the reaction of the markets.
    The deal would probably push BP's gearing up to around 59
pct from 20 pct currently, he said.
    However, with the likelihood that oil prices would not
repeat last year's rapid drop the prospects for Standard
returning to profitability this year -- and BP benefitting from
its cash flow -- were good.
    Standard was a high cost oil producer, the analysts noted.
    Spedding noted that it needed about 12 dlrs a barrel to
make money, and at about 15 dlrs a barrel revenue from
production and its downstream activities would push it
comfortably into surplus.
    BP initially took a stake in Standard following the
discovery of oil in Alaska's Prudhoe bay in 1969. BP had
inadequate distribution facilities in the U.S. While Standard,
which was strong on marketing and refining, was short on crude
oil.
    The analysts said that BP had promoted a major management
reorganisation of Standard in the past year.
    The probability that much of the shake-up at Standard was
now complete was one possible factor behind the timing of the
tender offer, Spedding said.
    BP's willingness to take hard decisions such as major
balance sheet write offs and the sale of assets had been well
received in the markets.
    The lower costs that should now be possible -- especially
after the rationalisation of the loss making minerals division
-- should allow the benefits of an oil price recovery to come
straight through to 1987 profits without being cut back by
other sectors.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9742>
BP International and BP North America
are seeking a five billion dlr, four year syndicated credit
facility in support of British Petroleum Co Plc's tender offer
for the 45 pct of Standard Oil Co it does not already own,
Morgan Guaranty Trust Co of New York said as arranger.
    The facility, to be guaranteed by British Petroleum Co Plc
&lt;BP.L> is probably the largest credit facility ever arranged in
Europe, bond analysts said. Full terms will be announced either
later today or tomorrow morning. BP said earlier it planned a
tender offer for the 45 pct of Standard it does not already own
for 70 dlrs a share cash.
    The financing being arranged by Morgan Guaranty will take
the form of a fully committed revolving credit. As announced
earlier, BP also is arranging a U.S. Commercial paper program
in connection with the tender and part of the revolver will be
used to support that program.
    The exact size of the U.S. Program has not been decided and
the dealers have not yet been chosen.
    The credit facility will also allow the borrower to issue
cash advances with maturities of one, three or six months
through a tender panel, which will be comprised of banks
committed to the facility.
    Despite the unprecedented size of this euromarket facility,
Morgan Guaranty said that it was being syndicated only among
BP's relationship banks.
    As a result, banks were being offered lead manager status
at 200 mln dlrs, co-lead management at 125 mln and manager at
75 mln.
    Although pricing on many credit facilities has become
extremely fine in recent years because of the keen competition
to win mandates, Morgan Guaranty said banks would be
compensated fairly since this is a special purpose facility
which must be completed quickly, with signing expected in about
10 days.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9755>
One of two rival firms seeking to enter
Japan's international telecommunications market said it will
offer a stake in the company to 10 foreign firms.
    President of &lt;International Telecom Japan Inc> (ITJ), Nobuo
Ito, decline to specify what share the firms would take, but
told Reuters they would not participate in its management.
    ITJ and &lt;International Digital Communications Planning Inc>
(IDC), in which both Cable and Wireless Plc &lt;CAWL.L> and
Pacific Telesis Group &lt;PAC.N> own 20 pct stakes, are set to
merge into a new entity to compete against &lt;Kokusai Denshin
Denwa Co Ltd> (KDD).
    The Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications has urged the
two rival firms to merge so KDD would have only a single
competitor. The ministry has also rejected foreign management.
    Japan's law limits foreign ownership of any new
international telecommunications entrant to 33 pct, so C and
W's and Pacific's stakes could be three pct in the merged firm,
sources said. Those seeking to join are General Electric Co
&lt;GE.N>, Ford Motor Co &lt;F.N>, &lt;Citibank NA>, BankAmerica Corp
&lt;BAC.NYSE>, &lt;Shearson Lehman Bros Inc>, &lt;Saloman Brothers>,
&lt;Asia Boeing Computer Service>, Unisys Corp &lt;UIS.N>, &lt;Societe
Generale> and Deutsche Bank AG &lt;DBKG.FRA>.
    The merger plan has been criticised for excluding foreign
firms from a meaningful position in the market.
    The U.K.'s Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher, U.S. Secretary
of State George Shultz, U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm
Baldrige and U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter have all
expressed such opposition.
    Japanese Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone will draft a
reply to the criticism following further discussion, a Posts
and Ministry official said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9779>
The Commerce Commission has approved
a proposed merger between &lt;Progressive Enterprises Ltd> and
&lt;Rainbow Corp Ltd>, Rainbow said in a statement.
    The merger involves the formation of a new company &lt;Astral
Pacific Corp Ltd> which will acquire all shares in both
companies on a one-for-one share exchange basis.
    Rainbow earlier this week lifted its stake in Progressive
to 52 pct from 44 pct. The statement said a new private
company, &lt;Transcapital Corp Ltd>, fully owned by Rainbow
directors Craig Heatley, Gary Lane and Ken Wikeley, will
purchase this stake for an undisclosed cash sum.
    The Commission has also approved Transcapital acquiring up
to 45 pct of Astral Pacific, Rainbow said.
    &lt;Brierley Investments Ltd>, which has been a frequent
critic of the merger, launched a full bid for Progressive at
4.20 N.Z. Dlrs a share last Monday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9809>
Mickelberry Corp said it has completed
the previously-announced sale of the 51 pct of its C and W
Group subsidiary that it had retained to N W Ayer Inc for
undisclosed terms.
    Ayer bought the other 49 pct next year.
    Mickelberry said it will report a gain on the transaction.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9814>
&lt;Philips Electrical (Ireland) Ltd> has
arranged the sale of the one mln ordinary shares it holds in
its subsidiary &lt;Unidare Aluminium Ltd>, Unidare said.
    The placing has been arranged through &lt;Allied Irish
Investment Bank Plc> at an ex-dividend price of 371 Irish pence
per share.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9833>
Foote Mineral Co said it has signed
a letter of intent to merge into &lt;Rio Tinto-Zinc Corp PLC> for
cash.
    The company said at the time of the acquisition, its assets
will include only lithium and ferrosilicon operations. Foote,
which is 83 pct owned by Newmont Mining Corp &lt;NEM>, has signed
a letter of intent to sell its Cambridge operations and said it
is in talks on the sale of its manganese operations with
several companies.  Foote said Newmont has informally indicated
it would vote in favor of the Rio Tinto proposal.
    Foote said terms of the agreement, including price for the
proposed cash transaction, have not been released because they
are subject to a continuing due diligence investigation.
    The company said a definitive merger agreement is expected
to be negotiated within six weeks and shareholders are expected
to vote on the deal at a meeting expected to be held in June or
July.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9844>
Ethyl Corp said its subsidiaries
completed the acquisiton of Nelson Research and Development Co
&lt;NELR>.
    The merger was approved following completion on Jan 27 of a
tender offer valued at approximately 55 mln dlrs, the company
said.
    It added that Nelson, based in Irvine, Calif., will be
operated as a wholly-owned subsidiary of Ethyl.
    Nelson designs and develops new drugs, Ethyl said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9850>
British Petroleum Co PLC said it has
scheduled a New York press conference for 1300 EST/1800 gmt
today at which senior management will discuss the company's
proposed acquisition of the 45 pct of Standard Oil Co &lt;SRD>
that it does not already own for 70 dlrs per share.
    The offer is worth about 7.4 billion dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9858>
MCO Holdings Inc said its
shareholders and those of MAXXAM Group Inc have approved the
proposed merger of the two companies.
    MCO said one MAXXAM shareholder has filed an objection to
the proposed settlement of shareholder actions related to the
merger in the Delaware Court of Chancery. A hearing on the
settlement proposal is scheduled for March 27... The merger is
subject to court approval of the settlement as well as to other
conditions.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9867>
Neoax Inc said it has
agreed to sell the assets and business of its Novatronics
Division to Veeco Instruments Inc &lt;VEE> for 20 mln dlrs.
    Neoax said it expects a gain of about nine mln dlrs on the
transaction which is expected to becomleted during the second
quarter, adding the gain will be sheltered by its tax loss
carryforwards.
    Novatronics makes military-specification power supplies and
avionics components for various prime government defense
contractors. It had 1986 sales of 21 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9872>
Standard Oil Co said British
Petroleum Co Plc's proposed offer of 70 dlrs a share for the 45
pct of Standard's stock not held by BP is being referred to a
special committee of the company's board.
    This committee, which is composed of the independent,
non-exective directors of the company, was formed in April 1986
for the purpose of monitoring the relationship between Standard
Oil and BP.
    Standard said the group will consider BP's offer in due
course noting the committee has retained the First Boston Corp
and Cravath Swaine and Moore as advisers.               
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9891>
Foote Mineral Co said it signed a
letter of intent to merge into Rio Tinto-Zinc Corp PLC for
cash.
    Foote, 83 pct owned by Newmont Mining Corp, said Newmont
has informally indicated it would vote in favor of the Rio
Tinto proposal.
    Foote said terms of the agreement, including price for the
proposed cash transaction, have not been released because they
are subject to a continuing due diligence investigation.
    The company said a definitive merger agreement is expected
to be negotiated within six weeks and shareholders are expected
to vote on the deal at a meeting expected to be held in June or
July.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9893>
Cross and Trecker said it
agreed to acquire the Alliance Automation Systems division of
Gleason Corp &lt;GLE> for an undisclosed amount of cash.
    It said the Gleason division manufactures automated
assembly and test systems used in the production of small to
medium size components for a number of industries, including
automotive, electronic and appliance.
    Alliance Automation had 1986 sales of about 35 mln dlrs and
employs 200.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9913>
British Petroleum Co PLC's
announcement that its U.S. subsidiary intends to tender for the
45 pct of Standard Oil Co &lt;SRD> it does not already own,
catapulted U.S. oil stocks sharply higher this morning, traders
and analysts said.
    "It raises the specter of additional consolidation in the
industry and that is what is boosting the other oils," analyst
Rosario Ilacqua of L.F. Rothschild said.
    Sanford Margoshes of Shearson Lehman Brothers said "this
deal shows that British Petroleum, a conservative investor that
knows the oil business, is clearly confident in the U.S. oil
industry, and that shines well on the U.S. companies."
 More
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9918>
Blockbuster Entertainment Corp said it
agreed to buy &lt;Southern Video>, a Blockbuster licensee in San
Antonio.
    Blockbuster said it will issue 80,460 shares of its common
stock for all the net assets of Southern Video.
    The company said after the acquisition is complete, it
intends to open additional Blockbuster Video Superstores in the
San Antonio market.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9920>
Contel Corp said it has agreed in
principle to acquire &lt;Walker County Telephone Co> of LaFayette,
Ga., for an undisclosed amount of common stock.
    Walker has 7,600 customers in northeast Georgia.
    The company said the agreement is subject to approval by
regulatory agencies, both boards and Walker shareholders.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9925>
Thermo Process Systems Inc said
it completed its purchase of Thermo Process Services Inc, a
subsidiary of Thermo Electron Corp &lt;TMO>.
    Thermo Process Systems said it issued 2,590,000 shares of
its common stock to Thermo Electron in connection with the
sale.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9926>
Siemens AG's &lt;SIEG.F>
fully-owned subsidiary Siemens Informations Systems Inc. Has
raised its stake in Telecom Plus Communications Inc. By 65 pct
to 100 pct, a Siemens spokesman said.
    He added that Telecom Plus Communications was the largest
independent supplier of telephone exchange systems in the U.S.
And had achieved a turnover of 234 mln dlrs in 1986.
   The stake had been acquired from Telecom Plus International
Inc. The spokesman declined to comment on U.S. Newspaper
reports that the purchase price of the remaining stake totalled
173 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9928>
Michigan General Corp said
it agreed to sell substantially all of the assets and certain
liabilities of its Krestmark subsidiaries to LCB Holdings Inc
for 6.5 mln dlrs cash.
    Sale of Texas-based Krestmark, a maker of doors, door
frames and other products, will allow Michigan General to
concentrate on retailing through its Diamond Lumber and
Savannah Wholesale units.
    Proceeds of the sale will be used to reduce debt. The deal
is subject to execution of a definitive agreement.
    Krestmark had revenues of about 40 mln dlrs and operating
losses of three mln dlrs in 1986, the company said. It has been
accounted for as a discontinued operation since last September.
    Dallas-based LCB is a privately-held maker of structural
steel joists and rack and storage handling systems.
    Michigan General also said its Diamond Lumber homebuilding
products retail unit closed nine unprofitable stores in the
first quarter and reduced its headquarters staff by 10 pct. The
nine closed stores, which had pretax operating losses of 1.7
mln dlrs in 1986, are being sold to provide cash for
operations.
    About 4.5 mln dlrs of inventory from the stores is being
transferred to other locations, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9929>
Rabbit Software Corp said it
agreed in principle to merge with &lt;CTI Data Inc>, a privately
owned communications company.
    According to terms, CTI holders and employees will receive
200,000 shares of Rabbit stock and royalties on sales of CTI
Products. CTI will become a wholly owned subsidiary of Rabbit.
    The deal is subject to completion of a definitive merger
agreement, receipt of third party approvals and other
conditions, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9947>
British Petroleum Co PLC's
announcement that its U.S. subsidiary intends to tender for the
45 pct of Standard Oil Co &lt;SRD> it does not already own,
catapulted U.S. oil stocks sharply higher this morning, traders
and analysts said.
    "It raises the specter of additional consolidation in the
industry and that is what is boosting the other oils," analyst
Rosario Ilacqua of L.F. Rothschild said.
    Sanford Margoshes of Shearson Lehman Brothers said "this
deal shows that British Petroleum, a conservative investor that
knows the oil business, is clearly confident in the U.S. oil
industry, and that shines well on the U.S. companies."
    Philips Petroleum &lt;P> gained 3/4 to 15-7/8, Occidental
Petroleum &lt;OXY> one to 34-5/8, USX Corp &lt;X>, with its Marathon
Oil Co unit, rose 1/2 to 28-3/8. Exxon &lt;XON> climbed one to
88-3/8, Mobil &lt;MOB> one to 50-1/4, Atlantic Richfield &lt;ARC>
3-1/8 to 80-1/2, Amoco &lt;AN> 1-7/8 to 84-1/8, and Amerada Hess
one to 33-5/8. BP gained 2-3/8 to 59-3/4.
    Both analysts said the rise in Standard's price this
morning to above the proposed tender price of 70 dlrs a share,
is an indication that investors expect the bid to be sweetened.
Standard gained 6-3/4 to 71-5/8.
    The analysts cited Royal Dutch/Shell Group's &lt;RD> &lt;SC> bid
for Shell Oil Co, which was sweetened before its successful
conclusion.
    Margoshes said the BP action "is an articulation of the
underlying value of oil companies in the marketplace." But he
expressed skepticism that this will necessarily lead to
heightened merger or buyout activity in the oil group.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9954>
Siemens AG &lt;SIEG.F> rebutted U.S.
Criticism it is blocking American Telephone and Telegraph
Corp's &lt;T.N>, AT and T, entry into French telecommunications
firm &lt;Compagnie Generale Constructions Telephoniques>, CGCT.
    Management board member Hans Baur told journalists that the
acquisition of a joint 20 pct stake in CGCT by AT and T and
Philips Gloeilampenfabrieken NV &lt;PGLO.AS> had not been decided
on two years ago as claimed by AT and T.
    The French government, which owns CGCT, had asked Siemens
at the start of 1986 to submit an offer for the stake in CGCT.
The result of the negotiations was still open.
    Baur said Siemens had first made an offer last summer.
    The Handelsblatt newspaper today quoted AT and T chairman
James E. Olson as saying that Siemens' attempt to stop AT and T
and Philips could lead to a resurgence of protectionism in the
U.S.
    Baur said he expected the French government to decide on
the winning bid by the end of April. CGCT's share of the French
switchboard market amounts to around 16 pct.
    The French government has limited CGCT participation by
foreign companies to 20 pct and set a price of 500 mln francs
for the whole company.
    Bauer said the 20 pct limitation would only apply to the
initial stake. He did not rule out a stake increase later but
said Siemens' aim was to introduce its technology.
    Bauer said Siemens and French telecommunications firm
&lt;Jeumont-Schneider SA> submitted a joint offer at the start of
March because of the 20 pct limitation. Both companies will
form a joint venture to take over the whole of CGCT.
   Siemens will have a 20 pct stake in the new company while
Jeumont-Schneider will own 80 pct. Apart from investing 100 mln
francs for the modernisation of CGCT, a new research centre
with was also being planned.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9971>
USAir Group Inc said the U.S.
Department of Transportation has issued an order allowing it to
purchase and hold in a voting trust the 9,309,394 Piedmont
Aviation Inc shares USAir is seeking in its current 69 dlr per
share tender offer.
    The company said the new order supersedes an order issued
by the department last Friday that would have required USAir to
sell within one week of expiration of the tender any Piedmont
shares it held in excess of 51 pct of the Piedmont stock then
outstanding.
    The company said the 9,309,394 Piedmont shares, together
with the 2,292,599 Piedmont shares already owned by USAir,
constitute about 50.1 pct of Piedmont's shares on a
fully-diluted basius but about 61.0 pct of shares currently
outstanding.
    The shares are to be held in a voting trust pending the
department's review of USAir's application to obtain control of
Piedmont.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9976>
President Nobuo Ito of International
Telecom Japan Inc (ITJ), one of two rival firms seeking to
enter Japan's international telecommunications market, said it
will offer a stake in the company to 10 foreign firms.
      But he declined to specify what share the firms would
take, and told Reuters they would not participate in its
management.
    ITJ and International Digital Communications Planning Inc
(IDC), in which both Cable and Wireless Plc and Pacific Telesis
Group own 20 pct stakes, are set to merge into a new entity to
compete against Kokusai Denshin Denwa Co Ltd.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9977>
Siemens AG's &lt;SIEG.F>
fully-owned subsidiary Siemens Informations Systems Inc. Has
raised its stake in &lt;Telecom Plus Communications Inc.> by 65
pct to 100 pct, a Siemens spokesman said.
    He added that Telecom Plus Communications was the largest
independent supplier of telephone exchange systems in the U.S.
And had turnover of 234 mln dlrs in 1986.
   The stake had been acquired from Telecom Plus International
Inc. The spokesman declined to comment on U.S. Newspaper
reports that the purchase price totalled 173 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9978>
Less than two months after First
Interstate Bancorp withdrew its bold attempt to buy BankAmerica
Corp, Chairman Joseph Pinola is still looking for a good buy,
but he is also looking at ways to avoid being bought.
    In a wide-ranging interview, Pinola said he's looking for
ways to improve profitability and capital between now and 1991,
"so as to resist any potential look at us...to maintain our
independence, if possible."
    In 1991 federal regulatory changes will allow the major
East Coast banks to buy banks in California.
    First Interstate, the fourth largest California bank, and
the nineth largest nationwide, owns 24 banks in 12 western
states and has franchise operations in four additional states.
    Bank industry sources say it is an attractive target for
large U.S. or foreign banks, looking to quickly move into the 
lucrative California market and the West Coast region.
    While declining specifics on his corporate strategy, when
asked if acquisitions will be part of the plan, Pinola replied,
"That's undoubtedly a fair statement...it would be almost naive
not to think that."
    Pinola characterized his acquisition strategy as
"opportunistic".
    He said he will look for banks in management trouble that
he can get at a bargain, then add management to restore
profitability, or for banks in states where First Interstate
already operates, then cut costs by combining resources.
    The exception, he said, would be Texas, where he said most
of the banks are already well managed, but might be purchased
at a discount because of the depressed regional economy.
    Pinola declined comment on what circumstances might move
him to rekindle his bid for BankAmerica, saying only, "We
continue to monitor and look at a lot of things and a lot of
people continue to monitor and look at us."
    Banking analysts, however, consider another First
Interstate bid at BankAmerica a long shot, not likely to happen
any time soon.
    Pinola called his decision last month to withdraw his 3.25
billion dlr bid at the nation's second largest bank, "a very,
very difficult decision."
    With that decision made, however, he acknowledged First
Interstate may now have a difficult time keeping its number
four position in the California banking community.
    "The competition in this state is tough," he said, noting
CityBank's recent purchase of 50 financial service branches
from Sears Roebuck company. "CityBank is moving rapidly to move
us down to fifth and Wells Fargo down to fourth," he said.
    Outside California, Pinola acknowledged that Security
Pacific Corp, with its recent acquisitions in Arizona,
Washington and Oregon, is quickly becoming a regional
competitor in areas where First Interstate has long dominated.
    "Security is, has been and continues to be a highly
profitable and obviously well managed company," he said.
    He added, however, First Interstate, at the moment, has the
advantages of having owned and managed regional banks longer
and has the recognition advantage of having given its regional
banks a common name.
    Pinola said while its coastal state banks are in good
financial condition, First Interstate continues to sustain
serious loan losses in its Rocky Mountain states, where energy,
real estate and agriculture dominate the economy.
    Asked if he thought loan losses in those areas had peaked,
he said, "I don't think it has bottomed out, because I think
most of the problems are real estate-related and the real
estate problems are going to be with us for several years."
    Pinola said another failing economic sector, agriculture in
the Midwest, has slowed expansion of First Interstate's
franchise operation.
    First Interstate has 42 franchise banks that offer First
Interstate financial services in ten states.
    While a year ago he was considering taking his franchise
operation east of the Mississippi River, Pinola said because
most of the franchise banks are now in the West, expansion into
the Midwest must come first.
    Calling the franchise system, "moderately profitable,"
Pinola said, "It is going to take a rejuvenation of the
agriculture sector for us to commence franchising at the speed
we were generating before the last year or two."
    On the banking industry in general, Pinola said he thinks
1987 will be another bad year for loan losses, with only banks
with minimal holdings in real estate able to improve profits.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9984>
Eastman Kodak Co said it has
reached an agreement to acquire new stock representing a 16 pct
interest in industrial biotechnology company &lt;Genencor Inc> for
undisclosed terms.
    Other Genencor shareholders include Staley Continental Inc
&lt;STA>, Corning Glass Works &lt;GLW> and Genentech Inc &lt;GENE>.
    The company said it has been granted options to increase
its equity stake during 1987.  It said it has agreed to make a
multiyear, multimillion dollar commitment to Genecor research
products related to food additivies and pharmaceutical
intermediates.
 Reuter
</BODY>
